Alan Turing
science
Alan Mathison Turing (June 23, 1912 - June 7, 1954) was an English mathematician and computer scientist.
He was one of the first people to work with modern digital computers. He was the first person to think of using a computer for different things. He told people that computers could run different programs. Turing introduced the idea of a Turing machine in 1936. The machine was imaginary, and ran a set of commands.
Turing also thought of the Turing test.
During the Second World War, Turing was a main participant in the efforts to break German ciphers. On the basis of cryptanalysis he he helped to break both the Enigma machine and the 42 (a teletype cipher attachment codenamed "Tunny" by the British), and was, for a time, head of Hut 8, the section responsible for reading German naval signals.
Alan Turing was a gay man. In 1952, Turing admitted having sex with a man. At that time in England, homosexuality was a crime. He was tried and convicted of this crime in a British court. and was forced to make a choice. He had to choose between going to jail or "chemical castration" (taking female hormones like estrogen to lower his sex drive). He chose the hormones. But this made him impotent (unable to have sex) and made him grow breasts. After suffering these effects for two years, he committed suicide (killed himself) with an apple poisoned with cyanide in 1954.
This kind of treatment is now believed to be very wrong, going against medical ethics and international laws of human rights, and malpractice by most doctors.

Alanis Morissette
music
Alanis Nadine Morissette (born June 1, 1974) is a Grammy Award-winning Canadian-American singer and songwriter. She was born in Ottawa, Canada. She began singing in Canada as a teenager in 1990. In 1995, she became popular all over the world.
As a young child in Canada, Morissette began to act on television, including 5 episodes of the long-running series, "You Can't Do That on Television". Her first album was released only in Canada in 1990.
She also acted in several movies, including Kevin Smith's "Dogma", where she played God.
About her life.
Alanis Morisette's father is French-Canadian. Her mother is from Hungary. She has an older brother, Chad, and a twin brother who is 12 minutes younger than she is. Her parents had worked as teachers at a military base in Lahr, Germany.
Jagged Little Pill.
Morissette has had many albums. Her 1995 album "Jagged Little Pill" became a very popular album. It has sold over 30 million copies worldwide. The album caused Morissette to win four Grammy Awards. The album "Jagged Little Pill" touched many people.

O Canada
music
O Canada is the national anthem of Canada.
Calixa Lavallée wrote the music; Adolphe-Basile Routhier wrote the words in French. It was first sung in French in 1880. Robert Stanley Weir wrote English words for the song in 1908.
It was sung as the national anthem for many years before the government made it official in 1980.
O Canada! Our home and native land,
True patriot love in all thy sons command!
With glowing hearts we see thee rise
The True North strong and free,
From far and wide, O Canada,
We stand on guard for thee.
God keep our land glorious and free!
O Canada, we stand on guard for thee;
O Canada, we stand on guard for thee.
Here are the words in French. The words in French and English do not mean the same thing.
Ô Canada! Terre de nos aĩeux,
Ton front est ceint de fleurons glorieux!
Car ton bras sait porter l'épée,
Et ta valeur de foi trempée
Protégera nos foyers et nos droits;
Protégera nos foyers et nos droits.

Platonic realism
science
Platonic realism (also called Platonism" or Anti realism") is the philosophical idea that one must try to know about perfect things, even though you know that they do not exist and may not be able to be understood. It is named after the philosopher Plato. Plato thought that goodness was part of reality, but was part of a parallel 'perfect' universe. Plato thought it was the job of the philosopher to look for reflections of these perfect things in our universe and to teach others about what they found.
In philosophy of mathematics, someone is called a Platonist if they believe a mathematical proof is part of reality, but also that it is not part of our universe but a parallel 'perfect' one. Mathematical Platonists also believe that numbers are not related to things in our universe, and that even if there was never a group of one million things that the number one million would still be a real number.
Some think this idea affects our ideas about money (economics) and our ideas of time. It is hard to say if this is true, since platonism is so basic in the Western culture. Plato and his student Aristotle had many ideas which are still the most important in this culture. It is hard to say if this one was critical. God's eye view may be more important, especially in politics.
Today, Platonism is mostly considered a philosophy of mathematics but not of science or reality in general. This might under-estimate its effects. But no one calls themselves Platonist other than a few mathematicians today.

Alexander Gode
science
Alexander Gottfried Friedrich Gode-von-Aesch or simply Alexander Gode (October 30, 1906 - August 10, 1970) a German-American linguist and translator. He was the founder of Interlingua.

Albert Einstein
science
Albert Einstein (March 14, 1879 - April 18, 1955) was a famous scientist. He received the Nobel Prize in 1921 for Physics.
Einstein is famous for his theories about light, matter, gravity, space, and time, which helps scientists to understand these things much better than they had before. His theories include the theory of special relativity and the theory of general relativity. His most famous equation is formula_1. It means that energy and mass are different forms of the same thing, and that the amount of energy in a piece of mass is the same as the amount of the mass multiplied by the speed of light times itself (a very big number).
His life.
Einstein was born at Ulm in Württemberg, Germany on March 14, 1879. He was a very fat baby, with an unusually large head. His family was Jewish but was not very religious. Albert also didn't talk until he was about three, which is very unusual. When Albert was around four, his father gave him a magnetic compass. He was very interested in trying to understand how an invisible force could make the needle move and became interested in studying science and mathematics. This compass inspired him to explore the world. Albert went to a Roman Catholic school. He was not a good student, and many people thought him to be not very smart.
When he became older, he went to a school in Switzerland. After he graduated, he got a job in the patent office there. While he was working there, he wrote the papers that made him famous as a great scientist.Einstein had two heavily-disabled children with his first wife Mileva. Liesel suffered from Down syndrome and was brought to her Serbian grandparents. She has been never heard of again. Eduard Einstein was diagnosed with a severe mental illness spending decades in hospitals.
Einstein's brain was found severely unusual for a genius. Geniuses' brains are around 1500 to 1600 cm³. There is an indirect connection between brain size and the size of the neopallium especially important for the brain's higher functions. However,Einstein's brain weight was under-average and showed further signs of degeneration (e.g.Sylvian fissure).
In 1917, Einstein became very sick with an illness that almost killed him. His cousin Elsa Lowenthal then nursed him back to health. After this, Einstein divorced Mileva, and married Elsa on June 2, 1919.
Just before the start of World War I, he moved back to Germany, and became director of a school there. He lived in Berlin until the Nazi government came to power. The Nazis hated people who were Jewish or who came from Jewish families. They accused Einstein of helping to create "Jewish physics," and German physicists tried to prove that his theories were wrong. Einstein moved to the United States to Princeton, New Jersey after feeling the heat of Nazi Germany and in 1940 he became a United States citizen.
During World War II, Einstein wrote to the U.S. president Franklin D. Roosevelt, to say that the United States should invent an atomic bomb before the Nazi government could invent one first. He was also part of the Manhattan project, which was the project to create the atomic bomb.
Einstein died on April 18, 1955 of heart disease. He was still writing about quantum physics hours before he died.
The Special Theory of Relativity.
The Special Theory of Relativity was published by Einstein in 1905 on a paper called "On the Electrodynamics of Moving Bodies". It states that both space and time are altered near the speed of light. This means that as you get closer to the speed of 186,000 miles per second, distances appear to stretch, and clocks tick more slowly. Einstein proposed that Special Relativity is based on two ideas. The first is that the laws of physics are the same for all observers in an inertial state of motion, meaning that all observers move in different directions without acceleration. The second idea is that the constancy of the speed of light in a vacuum is always the same. A vacuum is a space without matter. The Special Theory of Relativity also states that every peson has their own time, meaning that one person's clock says something different than another person's clock. The reason for this is time dilation, which can be understood better by the twin paradox. The twin paradox also shows how time has changed because of speed and mass. The faster something moves, or the more mass that it has, makes time go slower for them. You can demonstrate this with a pair of twins. Suppose that Joe and Moe are identical twins. On their twentienth birthday, Joe goes into space in a rocket going close to the speed of light. He stays in the rocket for a while, and then comes back to Earth where Moe is waiting for him. They will discover that Moe is a lot older than Joe because Joe was traveling near the speed of light, and therefore, time goes by much slower for him, due to relativistic time dilation. So, time dilation is the effect that a stationary clock runs slower than a moving clock.
Special Relativity also relates energy with mass, in Albert Einstein's E=mc2 formula.
Mass-energy equivalence.
E=mc2, also called the mass-energy equivalence, is one of the things that Einstein is most famous for. It is a famous equation in physics and math that relates mass to energy. The "E" in the equation stands for energy. Energy is a number in which you give to objects depending on how much they change. It is a number given to all physical objects to describe how much potential the object has in order to change. There are three basic forms of energy: Potential Energy, Kinectic Energy, and Rest Energy. When energy moves from one form to another, the amount of energy always remains the same. It can't be made or destroyed. This rule is called the "conservation law of energy". For example, when you throw a ball, the energy is transferrred from your hand to the ball as you release it. But the energy that was in your hand, and now the energy that is in the ball is the same number.
The "M" in the equation stands for mass. Mass is the amount of matter you have in your body. A lot of people think mass and weight is the same thing, but it isn't. An object always has the same amount of mass, even if you were to go to the moon, while the weight of an object changes if you go to the moon. But the mass can change as it gets closer to the speed of light. The object becomes bigger. But mass and weight are also similar in some ways. Because a boulder weighs more than a pebble, it has more energy in it, and therefore has more mass.
The c2 in the equation stands for the speed of light squared. To square something means to multiply it by itself, so if you were to square the speed of light, it would be 186,000 miles per second, times 186,000 miles per second.
Einstein's equation, E=mc2, implies that an object with mass has energy in its mass, and objects with more mass have more energy. An example of this is a photon. A light photon has no mass, but its energy can act as its mass when it hits something. The equation also says that an object with mass can't go faster than the speed of light.
The General Theory of Relativity.
The General Theory of Relativity was published in 1915, ten years after the Special Theory of Relativity was created. According to the General Theory of Relativity, the gravitational attraction between masses results in the masses in space and time, meaning that every object is attracted to each other, and that results in space and time.
Einstein's General Relativity also explained spacetime. Spacetime is the fact that we have a four dimensional universe, having three spatial(space) dimensions, and one temporal(time) dimension. All physical objects-us, the moon, the sun, the Milky Way, everything, is located inside these three dimensions. Also, mass changes the shape of spacetime to change, making the force of gravity curved. These curves are called gravitational waves, and all moving things follow these curves. Black holes are a major source of gravitational waves. A black hole is an object in the universe that has such a strong pull of gravity, that not even light can escape it. They are formed when giant stars, at least three times the size of our sun, dies. This is called a supernova.
Also, general relativity explains gravitational lensing, which is where light bends when a massive object comes near it. This was proven during a solar eclipse, when the sun moved behind the moon, and made light
General Relativity also set the stage for the theory of the formation of our universe. This theory is called the Big Bang. General Relativity explained singularities, which is what scientists think the universe formed from. This singularity was small, dense, and very hot. All of the matter that we know today came out of this point 15 billion years ago.
Beliefs.
Many scientists only care about their work, but Einstein also spoke and wrote often about politics and world peace. He liked the ideas of socialism and of having only one government for the whole world. He also worked for Zionism, the effort to try to create the new country of Israel.
Einstein's family was Jewish, but Einstein never practiced this religion seriously. He liked the ideas of the Jewish philosopher Baruch Spinoza and also thought that Buddhism was a good religion.
Even though Einstein thought of many ideas that helped scientists understand the world much better, he disagreed with many scientific theories that were developed later in his life. Many scientific theories discuss things that we cannot know for certain, but only as probabilities. Einstein didn't like these kinds of theories; he thought that it should be possible to understand anything, if we had the correct theory. He once said, "I do not believe that God plays dice with the Universe."
Because Einstein helped science so much, his name is now used for several different things. A unit used in photochemistry was named for him. It is equal to Avogadro's number multiplied by the energy of one photon of light. The chemical element Einsteinium is named after the scientist as well. In slang, we sometimes call a very smart person an "Einstein."
One of his inspiring sayings is "There are two ways to live your life, one is as though nothing is a miracle, the other is as though everything is a miracle."
There is still a strong criticism of Einstein. Ronald William Clark says that Einstein hated Germany and the Germans since his youth. G.O.Mueller wrote a whole encyclopedia refuting Einstein's relativity. G.O.Mueller, Aristotle, Kant, Leibniz say space and time are categories of perception, not distortable "things", and not joined together.The speed of light could be higher. Paul Dirac and others thought that constants can change over time, too (e.g. gravitation).G.O.Mueller lists about 4000 Einstein-critical works since 1905, rallying worldwide for rethinking relativity.

Sheffield F.C.
sports
Sheffield Football Club is a football club in England.
Sheffield F.C. is the oldest football club in the world. It was set up in 1857 in the city of Sheffield.
It is not the same as Sheffield United F.C. or Sheffield Wednesday F.C.. It does not play in a national league.

M-theory
science
M-theory is a new idea in small-particle physics that is part of superstring theory. The idea, or theory, often causes arguments among scientists, because there is no way to test it to see if it is true. If ever proven true, M-theory and string theory would mean big progress for science.
String theory.
To understand M-theory someone must first have some knowledge of string theory. For hundreds of years, scientists have thought that the simplest objects in the universe are points, like dots. String theory says that this is wrong and that the simplest objects in the universe are shaped like pieces of string. These strings are so small that even when looked at very closely they look like points. Each basic particle is created by the strings vibrating in different patterns. The reason scientists had not thought of this idea for so long is that strings are much harder to work with than points. They seem to break rules such as causality and special relativity, which says that information cannot travel faster than the speed of light.
String theory has been developed because of a very important problem that has existed for almost 100 years. Albert Einstein's theory that describes the universe on very large scales (it is called general relativity), disagrees with two theories that describe things on very small scales (they are called quantum mechanics and the standard model). There are also problems with the Standard Model: it includes about 20 numbers that seem to have no explanation; it has too many "basic particles" - some scientists think it needs to have fewer; and it does not include gravity, which is needed to explain weight.
Many of these problems can be solved by thinking of basic particles as strings. Now there is only one number with no explanation, which gives the size of the strings. String theory includes particles that cause gravity, called gravitons; finding this out delighted the scientists who work on string theory. So, string theory successfully brings General Relativity and Quantum Mechanics together.
But there are some problems with string theory. Normally, we think of the universe as having 4 dimensions, or "basic directions". 3 of these basic directions can be thought of as "up", "forward" and "left". The other direction is time. String theory needs 10 basic directions.
These six other directions can be explained if they are "curled up", so they are much too small to see. For example, if by following the path of a spiral, it is possible to go a great distance along it without moving very far. The 6 other directions can be thought of as tiny spirals - strings can move along them a great distance but not seem to move. This can be looked at as a mathematical trick. A trick that has little to do with the real world that can be seen and touched. Such tricks are allowed, if they give a theory that can better tell us how things work.
Another problem with string theory is that there are 5 different versions of it. Each version allows different kinds of strings and says they work in different ways. String theory is supposed to be a "theory of everything" so there should be only one version, not 5. M-theory solves this problem.
M-theory.
In 1995, Edward Witten started what has been called the "Second Superstring Revolution" by introducing M-theory to the world. This theory combines the 5 different string theories (along with a previously abandoned attempt to unify General Relativity and Quantum Mechanics called 11D-Supergravity) into one theory. What Witten actually did was to predict that the fact that all these different theories were connected was a result of there being some underlying theory to which they were all approximations of. This theory is somewhat vague in nature and has not yet been pinned down.
Additionally, it was found that the equations that required string theory to exist in 10 dimensions were actually approximations as well. The proposed M-theory would need one extra dimension and instead be a theory that takes place in "11 dimensions". Witten has himself described this idea in simple terms as the general taking position on a hill-top, the extra space-coordinate, to get a better view of the battlefield's two other dimensions.
The combination is accomplished by knitting together a web of relationships between each of the string theories called dualities (specifically, S-duality, T-duality, and U-duality). Each of these dualities provides a way of converting one of the string theories into another. T-duality is probably the most easily explained of the dualities. It has to do with the size, written as R, of the curled up dimensions of the string theories. It was discovered that by taking a Type IIA string theory that has a size R and changing the radius to 1/R the result will end up being what is equivalent to a Type IIB theory of size R. This duality, along with the others, creates connections between all 5 (or 6, if supergravity is counted) theories. The fact that these dualities existed had been known before Witten came up with the idea of M-theory.
Additional amusement has come for many in guessing what the M might stand for (possibilities include Matrix, Magic, Muffin, Mystery, Mother and Membrane). Regardless of what the M might possibly mean, M-theory has become one of the most interesting and active areas of research in theoretical physics today.
"For a more technical explanation, see."

CNN
media
Cable News Network (CNN) is a national news service on television in the United States of America. It was started by Ted Turner and its headquarters are in Atlanta, Georgia. It is one of the most watched networks in the United States. It was the first network to air news 24 hours a day.

Galileo Galilei
science
Galileo Galilei (Gal-lee-lay-oh Gal-eel-ay) (February 15, 1564 – January 8, 1642) was an Italian astronomer, (a person who studies outer space) and a famous thinker.
He was the first man to make telescopes so he could look at stars and other planets. He discovered that the Milky Way is made of many tiny stars, that the moon has hills,and found four of Jupiter's moons now know as the Galilean Moons.
Galileo also discovered the rules of how things fall by dropping two balls off the Leaning Tower of Pisa. These rules are part of physics. From his experiment, he determined that, if you ignore wind resistance, objects of different weights drop at the same rate and will reach the ground at the same time; opposing the views of Aristotle who's theory was the complete opposite. Galileo's findings were ignored by most and Aristotle's view was accepted as correct until Isaac Newton proved Galileo right. This also lead to Newton creating his Law of Gravity.
He climbed one hill and had an assistant to climb another hill; both had lanterns with shutters, initially closed.
He then opened the shutter of his lantern. His assistant was instructed to open his own shutter upon seeing Galileo's lantern. Galileo then measured the time interval for his assistant's shutter to open.
Knowing the time interval and the separation between the hills, he determined the apparent speed of light.
Since Galileo said that the Sun was the center of the then known universe, not the Earth, the Catholic Church arrested him, and threatened to kill him, unless he explained the Church's view as well in his books. He then wrote a book which was a collection of conversations between three men. The man representing the Church's point of view was a idiot called Simplicio. The Church then decided to kill him unless he changed his mind completely. He said that he changed his mind to avoid dying. The Church forced him to spend the rest of his life trapped in his house until he died.

George W. Bush
sports
George Walker Bush (born July 6, 1946) is the current President of the United States of America. He is a Republican, and Dick Cheney is his Vice President. He is from Midland, Texas. He has a ranch in Crawford, Texas, which is near Waco.
He is the son of former U.S. President George H. W. Bush. Before he was President, George Bush was Governor of Texas. He is married to Laura, and they have twin daughters, Jenna and Barbara.
Early years.
Bush was born in Connecticut. He went to school at Yale University, which is famous for a high standard of education. He lived briefly in Midland, Texas on a ranch. He joined the Texas Air National Guard (part of the United States National Guard) during the Vietnam War, but did not fight in Vietnam.
2000 election.
During the 2000 United States presidential election, Florida was a state where the election was not clear. It took more than a month to know who won. The Supreme Court made a decision to stop recounting votes, and at that time Bush was ahead by only 537 votes and declared the winner. The election is still controversial.
2004 election.
In the 2004 presidential election, Bush won again. His opponent was Massachusetts Senator John Kerry, a Democrat.
Iraq.
After the attacks of September 11 2001, Bush ordered an invasion of Afghanistan. Later he wanted something done about Iraq. Bush asked the United Nations to take away all Iraq's Weapons of Mass Destruction. The United Nations refused because there was no proof Iraq had any weapons. He sent the United States Army into Iraq on March 20, 2003 and took control of the country. Saddam Hussein was captured and Iraq killed him as punishment for War Crimes. Even today, no weapons of mass destruction have been found. Elections happened for the first time in the country, but violence continues.
Bushisms.
Bush sometimes has trouble speaking in public. He would sometimes make a mistake or say something opposite to what he means. These mistakes have led to the creation of the phrase "Bushism". Many websites on the Internet collect Bushisms.
Controversy.
A lot of people have made arguments against Bush because of his views, mainly on the War in Iraq.

Adolf Hitler
politics
Adolf Hitler (April 20, 1889 in Braunau am Inn, Austria - April 30, 1945 in Berlin) was a German politician who was the leader of the Nazi party. He became Chancellor of Germany in 1933 and became dictator of Germany in 1934. He called himself "Führer" (leader) of the German Empire. He ruled until 1945 when he killed himself.
When Hitler was ruler, Nazis created the dictatorship of the so-called Third Reich. In 1933, they blocked out all the other political parties. Their enemies were killed or arrested. Hitler and his men also took the civil rights of European Jews and other ethnic, religious or political minorities. In what is called The Holocaust, the Nazis killed many of them. They also started World War II, which destroyed Europe. Because of Hitler, at least 44 million people were killed, about 6 million of them were Jews.
Hitler's Life story.
Adolf Hitler was born on April 20, 1889 at Braunau am Inn, a small town near Linz in the province of Upper Austria, close to the German border, in what was then Austria-Hungary.
Hitler failed high school admission tests in Linz twice. He became interested in the anti-Semitic (anti-Jewish), Pan-German teachings of Professor
Leopold Poetsch.
In 1907, Hitler's mother died and because of that he was very depressed.
In 1909, Hitler went to Vienna to study art. He was not good enough for the Academy of Arts.
In 1913, Hitler was 24 years old. At that time, all young Austrian men had to join the army. Hitler did not like the Austrian army, so he left Austria for Germany. He lived in a German city, Munich.
In 1914, Hitler joined the German army. He fought for Germany in the First World War. He was wounded in the war. The government gave him the Iron Cross as a reward for fighting hard in the war.
In 1919, Hitler joined a small political party called the German Workers Party. He soon won the support of the party members. Two years later, he became the leader of the party. He renamed the party the National Socialist German Workers Party. It became known as the Nazi Party.
In 1923, Hitler tried to overthrow the Weimar Republic government (1918-36) in the Beer Hall Putsch. The putsch failed. The government killed 16 of his men (the 16 dead men were later declared saints in Nazi ideology). They also put Hitler in the Landsberg Prison. They said that he would stay in prison for 5 years, but they let him leave after 9 months. While he was in prison, he wrote a book with the help of his friend Rudolf Hess. At first, Hitler wanted to call the book "Four and a Half Years of Struggle against Lies, Stupidity and Cowardice". In the end, he called the book "Mein Kampf" or My Struggle. The book said that Germany would take land from Poland and Russia. It also had many anti-semitic comments, and called for the murder and expulsion of Jews from Germany.
In 1933 Hitler was elected into the German government. He ended freedom of speech, and put his enemies in jail or killed them. He did not allow any other party except the Nazi party. Hitler and his propaganda minister, Joseph Goebbels, spread extreme nationalism within Germany. All media had to praise the Nazis. Also, more people were born because Hitler wanted more people of the "master race" (by that he meant Aryan, or those with blue eyes and blond hair). He made Germany a totalitarian Nazi state. Aryanism was a myth, but Hitler and his friends believed it. They thought that people like the Jews and Slavs were inferior (less valuable) and should be killed.
World War II.
Hitler started World War II by ordering the German Army to invade Poland. His army conquered most of the Europe including Poland, France, and a large part of the Soviet Union. During the war he ordered the Nazis to kill many people, including women and children. The Nazis killed 6 million Jews, in The Holocaust. Other people that the Nazis killed were Roma (Gypsies), homosexuals, Slavs such as Russians and Poles, and his political opponents.
Finally the other countries in the world worked together to defeat Germany. Hitler lost all of the land that he had taken, and millions of Germans were killed. At the end of World War II, Hitler wanted everyone to die, including himself. He committed suicide (killed himself) in Berlin in 1945.

Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart
music
Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart was an Austrian composer and pianist. During his short life he wrote more than 600 pieces of music. Many people think he was one of the best composers of music of all time. He was born in the city of Salzburg on January 27, 1756. He wrote over 600 pieces of music, including the operas (music with a story) "Don Giovanni" and "Die Zauberflöte" ("The Magic Flute"). His works began with a minuet that he wrote when he was four, and end with his final piece, the "Requiem", which he left unfinished. Mozart was a prodigy at the piano, and he was known as a great pianist as well as a great composer. He died on December 5, 1791 when he was 35 years old.
Family and early years.
Mozart was born into a musical family. His father Leopold Mozart was a famous violinist and composer who worked for the Archbishop of Salzburg. He had one older sister called Maria Anna whose nickname was Nannerl (there were other brothers and sisters who died as babies). Mozart was baptized on the morning after his birth in the cathedral in Salzburg. The Latin form of his name was “Joannes Chrysostomus Wolfgangus Theophilus Mozart”. He was usually known as “Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart” and his nickname was “Wolfi”. The house where he was born in the street called Getreidegasse is now a Mozart museum.
. From a very early age he showed extraordinary musical talent. His father gave up composing in order to teach his son music. Wolfgang was learning the keyboard at the age of three and was soon learning the violin and organ as well. There are two short piano pieces written when he was five. They were written in his father’s handwriting, so it is not easy to say how much help he might have had.
Soon his father started to show off his son, making him play in concerts in front of lots of important people. Nowadays this would be called “exploiting” the young genius, but in those days people saw nothing wrong with allowing a child to be used in this way. It is amazing that it seemed to do him no harm, and that he grew up to become the great composer that he deserved to be.
Mozart played in public in Salzburg when he was five. Then he was taken to Vienna when he was six. He also played in Linz and Pressburg (now called Bratislava). Twice he played in front of the empress Maria Theresa of Austria. At these concerts he played pieces that adults usually played, he played at sight, improvised and played with a cloth covering the keyboard, played blindfolded and with one hand crossing another. He also made up accompaniments to tunes that were put in front of him. Many people who heard him wrote about this remarkable boy and that is how we know a lot of what happened.
Travels abroad.
Soon Mozart was travelling abroad. He played in Munich, Prague, Paris, The Hague and London. In London he played to King George III and met a composer by the name of Johann Christian Bach, one of the sons of Johann Sebastian Bach. He liked Johann Christian Bach’s music and he played duets with him. In 1767 he was in Vienna again where he was ill with smallpox, but he recovered, and his father saw this as a sign from God that his child would do well. He went to Italy where he heard music by many famous Italian composers, including Gregorio Allegri who had written a piece called "Miserere". This piece had been written for the Pope for the choir of the Vatican to sing. No one was allowed to see the written music so that no other choir would be able to sing it. Mozart heard the piece once and then wrote it all down from memory! He met the Pope and received a knighthood (Order of the Golden Spur).
In 1777 he went on a journey with his mother. In Mannheim he fell in love with a girl called Aloysia Weber. She was 16 years old and studying singing. Mozart wanted to take her to Italy to make her famous, but his father wrote him back very stern letters telling him to stop thinking about such nonsense. By 1778 Mozart and his mother were in Paris, but there his mother died.
Mozart in Vienna.
Mozart wrote several small operas when he was young, but his first really important opera was "Idomeneo". It was first performed in Munich in 1780. The next year he went to Vienna. By this time he was working, like his father, for the Archbishop of Salzburg. When he went back to Salzburg he argued with the Archbishop who literally kicked him out. Mozart went off to Vienna where he would spend the rest of his life.
In 1782 he married Constanze Weber, one of the three younger sisters of Aloysia (who by now was married to someone else). They were to have seven children, but five of them died in childhood. Mozart’s father did not approve of the marriage. Constanze was a loving wife, but, like Mozart, she was not good at looking after money, so they were often very poor.
In that same year, 1782, Mozart wrote another very successful opera: "Die Entführung aus dem Serail" ("The Abduction from the Seraglio"). One famous story tells that, after the emperor had heard the opera, he told Mozart that there were “too many notes”. Mozart replied to the emperor: “Just as many as are necessary, Your Majesty.”
Mozart began a series of concerts in which he played his own piano concertos, conducting from the keyboard. He met the composer Joseph Haydn and the two men became great friends, often playing together in a string quartet. Haydn said to Leopold Mozart one day: "Before God and as an honest man I tell you that your son is the greatest composer known to me either in person or by name. He has taste, and what is more, the most profound knowledge of composition." Mozart was in the same Masonic Lodge as Haydn, and he dedicated some of his string quartets to him.
Mozart and Prague.
The audiences in Vienna did not give Mozart much support after a few years, so he often went to Prague where the audiences adored him. His opera "The Marriage of Figaro" was very popular there, and in 1787 he gave the first performance there of his opera "Don Giovanni".
Final illness and death.
There are several stories about Mozart’s final illness and death, and it is not easy to be sure what happened. He was working on an opera "The Magic Flute" which is one of his greatest works and a very popular opera today. It is written in German, not Italian, like most of his other operas. In some ways it is like an English pantomime. At the same time that he was working on this he was asked by a stranger to compose a requiem. He was told to compose this in secret. Then he was asked to write an Italian opera "La Clemenza di Tito". This was performed in Prague during September 1791. At the end of September "The Magic Flute" was given its first performance. Mozart then worked very hard at the "Requiem". He must have realized that he was already very ill, and that in a way the requiem (a mass for the dead) was for himself. He died before he could finish it. Constanze asked another composer, a man called Franz Xaver Süssmayr, to finish the work. Today we are not sure which bits Süssmayr added, but probably most of the music is Mozart’s own work.
Mozart was buried in an unmarked grave because there was no money for a proper funeral.
Mozart’s music.
Mozart's music, like that of Haydn, is the very greatest of what is known as the Classical style. At the time he started to compose, the Baroque period was just coming to an end. Tastes were changing in music. Form, balance and elegance were thought of as more important than counterpoint. Mozart was the first great composer to write music for the piano, an instrument which had only just become popular. He wrote almost every kind of music: symphonies, operas, solo concertos, chamber music, especially string quartets and string quintets, and the piano sonata. He also wrote a lot of religious music, including masses, as well as popular music like dances, divertimenti and serenades.
When Mozart was young a symphony was usually a short, simple piece for entertainment. Mozart made the symphony into a carefully worked-out piece lasting up to half an hour. His last three symphonies are especially fine masterpieces. His concertos, especially his piano concertos, are far more advanced than anything that had been written before. Although Mozart behaved in quite a childish way at times, he was good at understanding human character. This is obvious in his operas, where he introduced many subtle effects to describe the characters in the story.
Mozart's operas are among his greatest works. He understood people's characters very well and was able to write music which tell us everything about the personalities in the operas. The three operas in which he set words by Metastasio: "Don Giovanni", "Le Nozze di Figaro" ("The Marriage of Figaro") and "Cosi fan tutte" each include some very clever ensembles in which several characters are singing at once, each one showing his or her view of the situation.
As well as many great masterpieces, Mozart wrote many pieces in a more popular style, including some tunes that everybody knows today. His serenade "Eine kleine Nachtmusik" is recognized everywhere, as is the "Turkish Rondo" from his "Piano Sonata in A", the opening of the "Symphony no 40 in G minor K550", and the birdcatcher’s song from "The Magic Flute".
Catalogue of Works.
Some time after Mozart’s death a man called Köchel studied all Mozart’s music, tried to put them in chronological order, and gave them a number. The number helps us to know exactly which work is meant e.g. "Symphony in G minor K183" is not the same piece as "Symphony in G minor K550" (K stands for Köchel. Sometimes it is written "KV550" standing for "Köchel Verzeichnis" i.e. "Köchel Catalogue").
References.
Groves Dictionary of Music and Musicians, edited by Stanley Sadie; 1980; ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Johann Sebastian Bach
music
Johann Sebastian Bach (b. Eisenach, 25 March 1685; d. Leipzig, 28 July 1750) was the greatest composer of his time. He lived in the last part of the Baroque period. He never traveled very far, spending all his life in central Germany, but he studied all the music he could find by other composers of his time. His own music shows that he learned from the music of Italian, French and German composers. He spent several years working at courts of noblemen. Here he wrote most of his chamber music and orchestral music. Most of his life, however, he worked in a church where he was expected to write church music. Bach wrote almost every kind of music except opera. During the last part of his life most composers were writing in a new style called the Classical style, but Bach always wrote in the Baroque style. That made some people at the time think he was old-fashioned, but today we know that his work is the very best of Baroque music.
Early Life.
Bach came from a highly musical family. Many of his relatives were professional musicians of some sort: violinists and town musicians, organists, "Kantors" (Directors of Music in a church), court musicians and "Kapellmeisters" (Directors of Music at a royal court). Most of them played several instruments. Of his twenty children, several became quite famous composers, especially Carl Philipp Emmanuel Bach (1714-1788), Johann Christian Bach (1735-1782) and Wilhelm Friedemann Bach (1710-1784).
We hardly know anything about Johann Sebastian’s childhood. He must have sung in the church choir at Eisenach where he was born. He may have learned to play instruments from his father. When he was ten years old, his mother and father both died within eight months of one another (1694 and 1695). He went to live with his brother Johann Christoph Bach in a small town called Ohrdruf nearby. Johann Christoph was an excellent teacher and taught the young boy a lot. There was a good school there, and he studied religion, reading, writing, arithmetic, singing, history and science. There is a well known story that there was one music book which his uncle would not let him study. So the young boy took it at night and copied the music down by moonlight. When his brother found him doing this he took it away from him. We cannot be sure that the story is true, but it could well have been. It shows that he learned by copying manuscripts (music written by hand). Music was not often published in those days: anyone who wanted a copy of a piece of music usually had to write it out by hand.
When he was fifteen he went to the large town of Lüneburg. At first he sang treble in the choir, but his voice very soon got lower, so he made himself useful playing instruments. He learned by listening to famous organists like Reincken (1623-1722) and Dietrich Buxtehude (1637-1707). Bach got his first job in 1703 in Arnstadt. It was a well-paid job for a young lad of 18. There was a new organ in the church and Bach already knew a lot about organ building as well as being a brilliant organist. They asked him to examine the new organ, and then offered him a job. Bach spent four years as organist there. He composed some organ works. Unfortunately the congregation were not musical enough to like it. They did not understand the ornamental notes he added to the hymn tunes. Bach got rather fed up with the priests who were always complaining about it, and so he resigned and took another job in Mühlhausen, not far away. After a year there he gave up that job and went to a big town called Weimar.• Johann Sebastian Bach was born on March 21, 1685 – July 28, 1750.
• He is a German Composer and the greatest composer at his time.
• Bach lived in the last part of Baroque period.
• His music shows that he learned from the music of Italian, French and German.
• He wrote most of his chamber music and orchestral music.
• He worked in a church where he was expected to write church music.
• Bach wrote almost every kind of music except opera.
Weimar years (1708-1717).
Johann Sebastian was made organist to the Duke of Weimar. At the Duke’s court there was a chapel with an organ. Bach composed many of his great organ works at this time. He became very famous as an organist as was invited to play in other big churches and to give advice on organ building. He was extremely good at improvisation. On one occasion he was in Dresden at the same time as a French organist named Louis Marchant. There was going to be a competition between the two men to see who was better at improvisation. Bach was practising the day before and Marchant heard him. He realized that Bach would win, so he ran away.
In 1714 the Duke made Bach "Konzertmeister" (Concert Master), which meant he earned more money. He had to write cantatas for church services. In 1717 he was offered a job in the town of Cöthen, where he would earn an even better salary. The Duke was angry and did not want him to go but Bach insisted, so the Duke put Bach in prison for a month. In the end he had to let the musician go.
Cöthen (1717-1723).
At Cöthen Bach worked for Prince Leopold. The Prince was very musical and a nice man to work for. Bach was "Kapellmeister" (Director of Music) and was treated well. The organ was not very good and it was not used much, so Bach did not write any organ music during this period. The Duke had an orchestra and Bach was in charge. Nearly all Bach’s orchestral works were written in Cöthen: the Brandenburg Concertos, the violin concertos, the orchestral suites, the solo music for violin and for cello, and a lot of keyboard music for harpsichord or clavichord.
During 1719 the great composer Handel, who had moved to England, came to Germany to visit his mother. Bach wanted to meet Handel, who was only 30 km away, but these two famous musicians never met. Handel wanted to spend his limited time in Germany with his mother who was old and frail, knowing that it would be the last time he would see her.
Bach’s first wife, Maria Barbara, died in 1720. The couple had seven children. Soon afterwards he married Anna Magdalena, with whom he had another fourteen children. However, several of his children died young.
Leipzig (1723-1750).
In 1723 Bach moved to Leipzig to take the job of "Kantor" at the St Thomas Church, a very large church in the town. As "Kantor" he was in charge of all the music, both at St Thomas and at another church nearby. He also had to compose music for the town. It was an excellent job, and more secure than being at a court. The schools were good for his sons. Bach stayed in Leipzig until his death. He loved his job and worked very hard. He composed many cantatas for the church services. These services were very long, lasting about three hours. Many of the cantatas he wrote last about 30 minutes, and that was just one part of a service! He had assistants to play the organ. Bach himself directed the choir and the orchestra. There were probably 16 singers in the choir and 18 players in the orchestra. He wrote the "St Matthew Passion" and the "St John Passion". Both these works, which are very long, tell the story of Jesus dying on the cross. They are among the most famous pieces of music ever written. He also wrote cantatas for special occasions such as weddings or funerals.
Life was not always easy, and there were sometimes arguments with the people who ruled the church. The sub-deacon wanted to choose some of the hymns, but this was the "Kantor’s" job. Bach was a sensible man, and he managed to get his way without making enemies. On another occasion he argued with the headmaster of the school (Bach had to do some teaching at the church school) about who was allowed to choose the choir section leaders. This actually went to court, and Bach lost the case.
Bach often made journeys to other towns. In 1747 he visited the court of Prussian King Frederick the Great near Berlin. The king, a music lover, gave Bach a tune to play on the harpsichord. Bach sat down and improvised a piece using this theme. The king was very impressed. Later Bach wrote a very long composition for flute, violin and harpsichord with cello accompaniment, in many movements, all based on this theme. At the end, the tune is heard in six voices all together. Bach called it the "Musical Offering" and he sent it to king, who was very much pleased. In the picture at the top of this article Bach is holding the music of the 6 part movement (called: a ricercar).
Bach loved writing fugues, and he decided to write a collection called "The Art of Fugue". He wanted to publish it and he was making some changes, but sadly he died before he could finish it. In the last year or two of his life, he became blind in spite of two eye operations.
Bach’s music and how to enjoy it.
Bach wrote so much music that it cannot all be mentioned here. Beginner pianists will know some of his small pieces, e.g. Minuet in G, although some musicians do not feel sure that this is by Bach. He wrote lots of music for his pupils, who were often his own sons. The Inventions in 2 and 3 parts (i.e. voices) are an excellent start to playing contrapuntal music. The "Well-Tempered Clavier" is a collection of 48 Preludes and Fugues, written to show that, with the new way of tuning keyboard instruments, music could now be played in any key. All these works could be played on the harpsichord or clavichord or even the organ. In those days the German word “Clavier” meant any keyboard instrument. Bach wrote lots of great organ music. The most popular one is the Toccata and Fugue in D minor.
The Brandenburg Concertos, Orchestral Suites and the Violin Concertos are great fun and quite easy to listen to as they have very strong, rhythmic life and singable tunes. There are lots of beautiful music in the Cantatas, although they are in German and it is a help to know what the choir or soloists are singing about. The motets, the two passions and the Mass in B minor (in German: Hohe Messe) are among the greatest works the world has ever heard.

Karl Marx
media
Karl Heinrich Marx (May 5, 1818 – March 14, 1883) was a German philosopher and political thinker who wrote about money (economics) and power (politics). Marx thought that in an economy run on wage-labor, there would always be class struggle. His most famous book was the "Communist Manifesto". He wrote it with Friedrich Engels in 1848. The book sets out the ideas and aims of communism. His ideas are called Marxism.
His most important work is "Das Kapital". He spent many years working on the three volumes of the book. Das Kapital talks about and disagrees with "capitalism". The book has led to many debates between those who agree with the book and those who do not. This is mainly because those who believed in the ideas of the book started many socialist revolutions (like the Russian Revolution) to change many countries. The system in those countries were communist, and many of their governments killed those who disagreed with them, or put them in prison.
Marx's most popular theory was his "Materialism". He believed that religion, morality, social structures and other things are all rooted in economics.
Karl Marx was born in Germany in 1818, but had to move many times because people did not like his ideas.
Marx lived for a long time in London. He died there in 1883. After he died, his friend Engels finished many of his works.
Marx also wrote <O"onomisch-philosophische Manuskripte aus dem Jahre 1844> in his early days.
Other websites.
"Italic text"=== Bibliography and online texts ===

Carl Sagan
science
Carl Edward Sagan (November 9, 1934 - December 20, 1996) was an American astronomer. He tried to make science popular. He thought about what life from other planets would be like. He said that people should look for life on other planets (SETI). He is world famous for his popular science books and the television series "Cosmos", which he co-wrote and presented. He said people should use the scientific method.
Education and work.
Carl Sagan was born in Brooklyn, New York. His father, Sam Sagan, was a Jewish clothes maker and his mother, Rachel Molly Gruber, was a housewife. Sagan went to the University of Chicago, where he got two degrees in physics. Then he became a doctor of astronomy in 1960. He taught at Harvard University until 1968, when he moved to Cornell University.
Sagan became a teacher and director at Cornell in 1971. He helped many unmanned spacecraft to explore outer space. He thought of the idea of putting a message on spacecraft which could be understood by any life from another planet that might find it. The first message sent into space was a large gold-plated label on the space probe Pioneer 10. He continued to make the messages better. The last message he helped with was the Voyager Golden Record that was sent out with the Voyager space probes.
Scientific achievements.
He was well known as a writer who warned of the dangers of nuclear winter. He helped people learn about the atmosphere of Venus, seasonal changes on Mars, and Saturn's moon Titan. He showed that the atmosphere of Venus is very hot and dense. He also said that global warming was a growing, man-made danger like the natural development of Venus into a hot and dangerous planet with greenhouse gases. He suggested that the seasonal changes on Mars were due to dust storms.
Sagan was among the first to guess that Titan and Jupiter's moon Europa might have oceans or lakes, which means that life could be there. Europa's underground ocean was later confirmed by the spacecraft Galileo.
Sagan thought the search for life on other planets was a good idea. He said scientists should listen with large radio telescopes for signals from other planets. He thought sending probes to other planets was a good idea. Sagan was editor "Icarus" (a magazine about space exploration) for 12 years. He helped start the "Planetary Society" and was a member of the SETI Institute Board of Trustees.
Social concerns.
Sagan also believed that the Drake equation suggested that many kinds of intelligent life could form, but that the lack of evidence (the Fermi paradox) suggests that intelligent beings destroy themselves rather quickly. This made him keen to talk about ways that humanity could destroy itself, in the hope of avoiding such destruction.
Under the name "Mr. X," Sagan wrote about pot smoking in the 1971 book "Reconsidering Marijuana". Lester Grinspoon (the book's editor), told this to Keay Davidson, Sagan's biographer. Sagan said that marijuana helped him write some of his books.
Making science popular.
Sagan was very good at helping people to understand the cosmos. He gave the 1977/1978 Christmas Lectures for Young People at the Royal Institution. He wrote (with Ann Druyan, who became his third wife) and made the very popular thirteen-part PBS television series "Cosmos"; he also wrote books to help science become more popular ("The Dragons of Eden", which won a Pulitzer Prize, "Broca's Brain", etc.) and a novel, "Contact", that was a best-seller and was made into a film starring Jodie Foster in 1997. The film won the 1998 Hugo Award.
After "Cosmos", Sagan was linked with the catchphrase "billions and billions", which he never used in the television series (but he often used the word "billions"). He wrote "Pale Blue Dot: A Vision of the Human Future in Space", which was chosen as a notable book of 1995 by The "New York Times".
Not all scientists agreed with him. Although they all liked the way he made science popular, some were afraid that people would think that his personal opinions might be confused with real science. What he said about the Kuwait oil well fires during the first Gulf War were shown later to be wrong.
Later in his life, Sagan's books showed his skeptical, naturalistic view of the world. In his book "The Demon-Haunted World", Sagan gave a list of mistakes he had made as an example of how science is self-correcting. The compilation "Billions and Billions: Thoughts on Life and Death at the End of the Millennium", published after Sagan's death, contains essays written by Sagan, such as his views on abortion, and Ann Druyan's account of his death as a non-believer.
Personality.
Some people thought Sagan had a big ego. In 1994, Apple Computer chose a code name "Sagan" when they developed the Power Macintosh 7100. When Sagan heard this, he tried to make Apple Computer use another name. Sagan lost the fight in court, but Apple engineers did what he asked anyway, and named the project "Butthead Astronomer". Sagan tried to sue Apple again, saying they made him look stupid. Sagan lost in court again, but the name of the project was changed to "LAW" (Lawyers Are Wimps).
Sagan is said to be an atheist or agnostic, but some people have said he is a pantheist, because he said thing like "The idea that God is an oversized white male with a flowing beard who sits in the sky and tallies the fall of every sparrow is ludicrous. But if by 'God' one means the set of physical laws that govern the universe, then clearly there is such a God. This God is emotionally unsatisfying... it does not make much sense to pray to the law of gravity."
Sagan married three times; the biologist Lynn Margulis (mother of Dorion Sagan) in 1957, artist Linda Salzman in 1968, and author Ann Druyan in 1981, to whom he was married until his death.
Legacy.
After a long and difficult fight with myelodysplasia, Sagan died at the age of 62, on December 20, 1996, at the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Research Center in Seattle, Washington. Sagan was very important, because he made science popular, and changed the way science was organized, and because he defended humanism, and argued against seeing things from only one point of view.
The landing site of the unmanned Mars Pathfinder spacecraft was renamed the "Carl Sagan Memorial Station" in honor of Dr. Sagan on July 5, 1997. Asteroid 2709 Sagan is also named in his honor.
The 1997 movie "Contact" (see above), based on Sagan's novel of the same name, and finished after his death, ends with the dedication "For Carl."

Ludwig van Beethoven
music
Ludwig van Beethoven (baptized December 17, 1770 in Bonn, died March 26, 1827 in Vienna) was a German composer. He wrote classical music for the piano, groups of instruments and orchestras. His best-known works are his fifth and ninth symphonies and also the piano piece "Für Elise". He is considered to be one of the great classical composers. When he was a young man, he was a talented pianist, popular with the rich and important people in Vienna, Austria, where he lived. In 1801, however, he began to lose his hearing. His deafness became worse and in 1817, he was completely deaf. Although he could no longer play in concerts, he continued to compose, and during this time composed some of his greatest works. He was, as quoted by many people, the greatest composer who ever lived.
He moved to Vienna in 1792 and lived there for the rest of his life. He never married.
Early years.
Very little is known about Beethoven’s childhood. He was baptized on 17 December 1770 so he was probably born a few days before that. Beethoven's parents were Johann van Beethoven (1740 in Bonn – December 18, 1792) and Maria Magdalena Keverich (1744 in Ehrenbreitstein – July 17, 1787). Magdalena's father Johann Heinrich Keverich had been Chef at the court of the Archbishopric of Trier at Festung Ehrenbreitstein fortress opposite to Koblenz. His father was a fairly unimportant musician who worked at the court of the Elector of Cologne. This court was in Bonn and it was here that he lived until he was a young man. His father gave him his first lessons in piano and violin. Beethoven was a child prodigy like Mozart, but while Mozart as a little boy was taken all over Europe by his father, Beethoven never travelled until he was 17. By that time his piano teacher was a man called Neefe who himself had learned the piano from Carl Philipp Emanuel Bach, who was a son of the great composer Johann Sebastian Bach. Neefe said to the Elector that the young Beethoven should be given the chance to travel, so he was allowed to go to Vienna. There he seems to have had one or two lessons from Mozart, but then Beethoven got a letter saying that his mother was dying, so he hurried back to Bonn. Soon his mother died, and Beethoven had to help to look after the family because his father had become an alcoholic. He played the viola in the orchestra of the Elector, he started to compose, and made many friends. Some of these friends were musicians; others were very important people; many of them were aristocrats who would be able to help him in his career.
In 1792 the Elector let Beethoven travel to Vienna again. He expected him to return after a while, but Beethoven never left Vienna, staying there for the rest of his life. He would have loved to have had some more composition lessons from Mozart, but Mozart had just died, so he had lessons from Haydn instead. Haydn was a good teacher, but a year later he went off to England, so Beethoven took lessons from a man called Albrechtsberger who was not famous like Haydn, but he was a good teacher and he made him write lots of technical exercises. He showed him how to write advanced counterpoint and fugues. This helped him to be a great composer.
Beethoven wanted to become famous as a pianist and composer, so he started to get to know important, aristocratic people. Some of these people had already heard him in Bonn when they had travelled there, so his name was becoming known in Vienna. It also helped that he could say he was the pupil of the famous Joseph Haydn. There were a lot of aristocratic people in Vienna who liked music, and many had their own private orchestras. Some of them started to give Beethoven lodgings when the Elector of Bonn stopped sending him money in 1794. Beethoven started to perform in private houses and he became known for his improvisations. In 1795 he performed one of his piano concertos at a concert. He also had his first publication (his opus 1). This was a group of three Piano Trios. Haydn had heard them at a private concert a year before and had advised Beethoven not to publish the third one. However, he did publish it, and that was the one which became the most successful. His opus 2 was a group of three piano sonatas which he played at the court of his friend Prince Lichnowsky. When he published them he dedicated them to Haydn.
Beethoven was starting to become famous, travelling to places like Prague and Pressburg. He wrote much chamber music. He was, perhaps, a little jealous of the success that Haydn had with his latest symphonies he had written for London. In 1800 he gave his first public concert with his own music. He conducted his First Symphony as well as the Septet. By now several publishers were trying to persuade him to let them publish his new works. Beethoven was becoming famous as a composer. However, he was far from happy because he realized that he was starting to become deaf.
Middle period.
Beethoven seems to have taken his mind off these terrible thoughts by working very hard. He composed a lot more music, including his Third Symphony, called the "Eroica". Originally he gave it the title "Bonaparte" in honour of Napoleon whom he admired. But when Napoleon crowned himself emperor in 1804 Beethoven realized that he was just a tyrant who wanted lots of power. He went to the table where the score of the symphony was lying and tore up the title page. Beethoven stayed in Vienna that year, working hard at an opera and giving piano lessons to Josephine von Brunsvik to whom he wrote passionate letters. She was a young widow with four children. It is impossible to know quite what her feelings were for Beethoven, but socially she belonged in higher society and probably thought that a wild musician was not a suitable husband. In the end she married a Baron, but this marriage, like her first one, was not happy either.
In 1805 Beethoven wrote his only opera. The next spring it had two performances but was then not performed again for another eight years. Beethoven had made several changes to the opera which became known as "Fidelio". The overture that he had written for the 1806 performance is now known as "Leonore 3" and is usually performed separately at concerts. The opera is a “rescue” opera, a typical French kind of opera describing a man who is imprisoned and rescued by his lover who disguises herself as a man and manages to get into the prison. It has very beautiful music.
Beethoven continued to write compositions: a Violin Concerto, symphonies, piano concertos, string quartets and chamber music. He earned money by pleasing the aristocrats, dedicating works to them in return for fees, and by selling his music to publishers. Occasionally he earned money from concerts. It was not a regular income. He would have liked the job of Kapellmeister to the emperor. He was not able to get this, but in 1809 three rich aristocrats: the Archduke Rodolph, Prince Lobkowitz and Prince Kinsky gave him an income for the rest of his life on condition that he stayed in Vienna. This meant that Beethoven did not have to worry so much about money. He was asked to write music for "Egmont", a play by Goethe. The overture is very often performed as a concert piece. Beethoven very much wanted to meet Goethe. The two great men eventually met in Teplitz. Goethe later described Beethoven as a rather wild-mannered man who made life difficult for himself by his cross attitude to the world. Beethoven admired several women, including one to whom he wrote a passionate letter. She is known as the “Immortal Beloved”, but no one knows who she was. Beethoven seems to have become deeply depressed because he never found true happiness in love.
Later life.
By 1814, Beethoven had reached the height of his fame. He was thought of as the greatest composer by the Viennese people and he was often invited by royal people to their palaces. It was the year in which he played his famous Piano Trio op 97 "The Archduke". That was the last time he played the piano in public. His deafness was making it impossible to continue.
Beethoven had many problems when his brother Caspar Carl died, leaving a 9-year-old son. The boy’s mother may have been incapable of looking after him, but Beethoven had to prove this in a court of law. For several years Beethoven looked after his nephew, but it was a difficult relationship, and it involved a lot of legal letters and quarrels with people. In 1826 Karl tried to shoot himself. He survived, but people persuaded Beethoven to stop being his guardian. Karl went into the army.
The last years were unhappy years for Beethoven. For some time he composed very little. Then, in 1817, he recovered and wrote his last two symphonies, a mass called "Missa Solemnis", his last five piano sonatas, and a group of string quartets which were so modern and difficult that very few people at the time understood the music. Nowadays, people think they are the greatest works ever written for string quartet.
His Ninth Symphony is called the "Choral" Symphony because there is a choir and soloists in the last movement. At the time people did not understand this either, because a symphony is normally a work for orchestra, not a work with singers. Beethoven chose the words of a poem by the German poet Friedrich Schiller: "An die Freude" ("Ode to Joy"). It is all about living together in peace and harmony, so that it sends an important message to people. This is why it has been chosen in recent years as the National Anthem for the European Union. The Ninth Symphony was performed at a concert on 7 May 1824. After the scherzo movement the audience applauded enthusiastically, but Beethoven could not hear the applause and one of the singers had to turn him round so that he could see that people were clapping.
Beethoven died on 26 March 1827. About 10,000 people came onto the streets for his funeral. The famous poet Franz Grillparzer wrote the funeral speech. One of the torchbearers was Franz Schubert. Schubert died the next year. In 1888 Beethoven’s and Schubert’s remains were moved to another cemetery in Vienna and were placed side by side.
Deafness.
In a letter dated 29 June 1801 Beethoven told a friend in Bonn about a terrible secret he had for some time. He knew that he was becoming deaf. For some time he had spells of fever and stomach pains. A young man does not expect to become deaf, but now he was starting to admit it to himself. He was finding it hard to hear what people were saying. Just at the moment when he was starting to become known as one of the greatest of all composers, it was a terrible blow to realize that he was losing his hearing. In 1802 he stayed for a time in Heiligenstadt which is now a suburb of Vienna but at that time it was outside the city. There he wrote a famous letter which is known as the "Heiligenstadt Testament". It is dated 6 October and told about his rising frustration at his deafness. He asks people to forgive him if he cannot hear what they are saying. He said that he had often thought of suicide, but that he had so much music in his head which had to be written down that he decided to continue his life. This very emotional letter was found amongst his papers after his death. It was never sent to anyone.
How he is remembered.
Beethoven’s music is usually divided into three periods: Early, Middle and Late. Most composers who live a long time develop as they get older and change their way of composing. Beethoven was like this: he was always trying out new ideas. Of course, these changes in style are not sudden, but they are quite a good way of understanding the different periods of his composing life.
His first period includes the works he wrote in his youth in Bonn, and his early days in Vienna up to about 1803. His middle period starts with the Eroica Symphony and includes most of his orchestral works. His last period includes the Ninth Symphony and the late string quartets.
Beethoven is probably the most famous of all composers, and the most written about. He had a wild personality and this was something that the Romantics in the 19th century always expected from great artists. The Romantics thought that the artist was somehow a person with exaggerated qualities who was not like normal people. Beethoven had a very strong personality. He lived in the time of the French Revolution and had strong views on independence and ways of living free from tyranny. This made him a hero in many people’s eyes.
His music was so famous that many composers in the 19th century found it quite hard to compose because they thought they would be compared to him. For example, Johannes Brahms, took a long time to write his First Symphony. He thought that everyone was expecting him to be the next Beethoven. It was only towards the end of the 19th century that Gustav Mahler wrote several symphonies which include singing, although he does this very differently to Beethoven.

Anders Celsius
science
Anders Celsius (November 27, 1701 - April 25, 1744) was a Swedish astronomer. Celsius was born in Uppsala in Sweden. He developed the Celsius temperature scale as the international temperature standard when he worked on meteorology (a science about weather conditions). One of his good friends Gabriel Fahrenheit invented the Fahrenheit scale for the thermometer.

James Watt
science
James Watt (January 19, 1736 - August 19, 1819) was a Scottish mathematician and engineer. He did not invent the first steam engine, but he did modify it to work better. There were other patented steam engines (such as the Savery and Newcomen steam engines) in use by the time Watt started his work on them. His major contribution is in developing the modern form of the steam engine. The Watt steam engine is credited for driving the Industrial Revolution of the 18th and 19th centuries.James Watt was a brilliant engineer and he also transformed the Newcomen engine.
Today, most people honor him by naming a unit of power, the watt, after him.
Other websites.
"Note: This link may not be simple."

Leonardo da Vinci
science
Leonardo da Vinci (April 15, 1452 - May 2, 1519) was born in Florence in Italy. He was an
Italian painter, sculptor, builder, inventor and engineer.
Leonardo's most famous pictures include "The Last Supper" and the "Mona Lisa".
Leonardo da Vinci developed a new painting style. Artists of his time usually used a white background to paint pictures. Yet he used a dark background. This could bring out a three-dimensional effect in the main object. He was also known for making his paintings in a dark style, in which there were many shadows.
Leonardo da Vinci was one of the Masters of the High Renaissance. He was so interested in realistic painting that he dissected a human body to see how the body worked.He was an illegitimate child of a local lawyer, and worked under Pope Alexander VI who was not the best pope to reign.His work which explains physics aand human drawings were viewed to be possesed and demonic, history has it that his famous paiting monalisa potrays a lot of emotions or ideas.A film(the da vinci code) and also a book was also made.The book sold next to the bible which is the most sold book in history.

Marxism
science
Marxism is the name for a set of political ideas. The base of these ideas comes from the works of Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels. They have had a lot of influence in many countries. Very often, both authors are named, as it is difficult to say which of the two wrote what piece of the theory.
Modern Communism is based on Marxist ideas, but many Marxists disagree about whether Communist countries have understood Marxism correctly.
The working class and the capitalist class.
Marxism says there are different economic classes (or groups) of people. Most people need to work to get money. They are called "workers". They belong to the "working class" (or "proletariat"). Another group, usually business owners, are called "capitalists" because they live by amassing capital which is money made by selling something for a higher price than they payed for it. In the Marxist view, not all money is "capital", only money made by buying something and then selling it -- in other words, the same thing other people refer to as "profit".
Most workers work for companies owned by other people or groups. The capitalist pays a wage to the worker. The capitalist has bought work from the worker, which according to marxist economic thinking is the only thing that can add exchange-value to a product, and then sells the product for more money than the worker was paid. The capitalist amasses capital by paying the worker less money than the value added to the product by the work done and then selling the product for more money. Exchange-value is the value something has on a market. Exchange-value is created by adding work to something. A products exchange-value is determined by the average work needed to create the product for the market. Exchange-value is often described in work-time.
As an example: Peter and Bob are the only hairdressers in town. Peter cuts one persons hair in 20 minutes while Bob cuts one persons hair in half an hour. Because of this the average time to cut someones hair on the hairdressing market is 25 minutes and therefore the exchange-value of the product "hairdressing".
Peter and Bob are both employed by Carl who owns the business and buys their work as hairdressers in order to sell it as the product "hairdressing" to consumers. Carl pays Peter and Bob for only a part of the exchange-value they have created. The part he doesn't pay them for is called surplus value. It is this surplus value that makes it possible for Carl to live on the work of Peter and Bob. He can also use it to invest in more work and thereby make more capital. In order to do that Carl and all other capitalists have to make a profit. To make a profit Carl has to sell his product, "hairdressing", for a higher price than Peter's and Bob's wages and his investments in things like scissors and other needed materials.
It is important to understand that things like scissors and housing can't generate any exchange-value by themselves. To generate exchange-value the capitalist have to hire workers.
Peter and Bob and all other workers want, according to marxist thinking, a greater part of the value they have created, usually higher wage, while Carl and all other capitalists want a larger surplus value. This conflict is called class struggle and is, in different forms, seen by most marxists as the main driving force in the history of human societies. In feudal economies for example, the class struggle was centered at the surplus production of the farmers which the nobles wanted.
Materialism.
From a philosophical standpoint, Marxists are materialists. A materialist is someone who believes that the world around us is made of material, that there are no gods or other supernatural things. "Economics" (money and property) are the forces that govern society. "Spiritual" matters are secondary, or unimportant, as the existence of a spirit is not scientifically proven.
Dialectic. A dialectic is an argument or conflict between different groups. The different groups or classes have their own interests and needs.
Dialectical materialism is the idea that the history of humans is the history of conflict between classes. Different classes with different interests argue or fight each other. Social change is the result.
Many Marxists believe that there will be a revolution. In the revolution, the workers will fight the capitalists and will (eventually) win. After this, they will set up a Socialist "workers' state" (a government for the workers) that will serve as a temporary state (just for a time) until all capitalist-countries have been defeated. In the end, class conflict will finish, and there will be a "classless society" - a society which has no social groups are in conflict and there is no government anymore, and the state will be dismantled, voluntarily or not, and it will be a borderless world with world-wide communes and worker-councils.

Leninism
science
Vladimir Lenin was a Russian Marxist. He had a set of political ideas based on Marxism. Lenin's development of Marxism has become known as Leninism.

Bolshevik
politics
A Bolshevik was a Russian Communist.
The Russian Social Democratic Workers Party was a Marxist political party. In 1903 at the Party Congress members disagreed with each other on a seemingly minor issue of organization. The Party ended up dividing into two groups, the Bolsheviks was one group. They were called Bolsheviks because it means "those who are more." Vladimir Ilyich Lenin was the leader of the Bolshevik group. The other group in the split were known as the Mensheviks - meaning "The Minority" lead by figures such as Martov. Though the Bolsheviks were called "those who are more", before 1917 there were more Mensheviks most of the time. Many socialists were afraid that Lenin liked to control things too much.
In 1905 the Bolshevik group became a separate political party, the RSDLP (B) the 'B' in brackets standing for 'Bolsheviki'.
After the February Revolution, some of the Mensheviks had taken positions in the Provisional Government. Lenin said socialists must oppose the Provisional Government. Soon the government started to make mistakes and people began to think Lenin was right. Because of this many Mensheviks joined Bolsheviks.
The Bolsheviks led the October Revolution in Russia in 1917. They said they created the world's first Workers State. Soon, however, the government started to control what people could say. The Mensheviks opposed the government led by the Bolsheviks. Many ended up in prison. After that they opposed the Bolsheviks from outside Russia, in exile.
After the Revolution, the Bolshevik Party decided to call itself "the Communist Party".

Saddam Hussein
politics
Saddam Hussein Abd al-Majid al-Tikriti (April 28 1937 - December 30 2006), was the President of Iraq, from July 16 1979 to April 9 2003, when he was removed from his position during the War in Iraq led by the United States.
Saddam as a young man.
Saddam Hussein was born in the village of Al-Awja, in the Tikrit in Iraq. He never knew his father, Hussein 'Abd al-Majid, who disappeared five months before Saddam was born. Shortly before Saddam was born, Saddam's twelve-year-old brother died of cancer, leaving his mother very depressed in the final months of the pregnancy. She tried to kill herself near the end of the pregnancy, and did not want to care for Saddam when he was born. Saddam was sent to the family of an uncle, Khairallah Tulfah, until he was three.
At ten, Saddam ran away from the family to return to live with his uncle, who was a devout Sunni Muslim, in Baghdad. According to Saddam, in 1957, at the age of 20, Saddam became part of the Ba'ath Party.
Saddam's rise in the Ba'ath party.
A year after Saddam had joined the Ba'ath party, army officers led by General Abdul Karim Qassim got rid of Faisal II of Iraq. The Ba'athists opposed the new regime, and in 1959, Saddam was involved in the attempted murder of Prime Minister Qassim. Saddam was shot in the leg, but managed to get away to Syria, later he moved to Egypt. He was sentenced to death. In exile he attended the University of Cairo law school.
Army officers, including some with the Ba'ath party, came to power in Iraq in a military coup in 1963. However, the new regime was kicked out quickly. Saddam returned to Iraq, but was imprisoned in 1964 when an anti-Ba'ath group led by Abdul Rahman Arif took power. He escaped from jail in 1967 and became one of the leading members of the party.
Saddam gains power.
In 1976 Saddam was appointed as a general in the Iraqi army. He quickly became the most important person of the regime. He slowly began to gain more power over Iraq's government and the Ba'ath party. As Iraq's weak and old President Ahmed Hassan al-Bakr became more unable to do the duties of his office, Saddam began to become an larger important role as the head of the Iraqi government. He soon became the creator of Iraq's foreign policy and represented the nation in all diplomatic situations.
Iraq-Iran War.
In 1979 Iran's Shah Mohammad Reza Pahlavi was overthrown by the Islamic Revolution,giving way to an Islamic republic led by the Ayatollah Khomeini. The influence of revolutionary Shi'ite Islam grew in the region, particularly in countries with large Shi'ite populations, especially Iraq. Saddam feared that radical Islamic ideas—hostile to his rule— were rapidly spreading inside his country among the most of the Shi'ite people
There had also been bitter rivalry between Saddam and Khomeini since the 1970s. Khomeini, having been exiled from Iran in 1964, took up living in Iraq, at the Shi'ite holy city of An Najaf. There he involved himself with Iraqi Shi'ites and developed a strong, worldwide religious and political following. Under pressure from the Shah, who had agreed to a rapprochement between Iraq and Iran in 1975, Saddam agreed to expel Khomeini in 1978. After the Islamic Revolution, Khomeini maybe regarded toppling Saddam's government as a goal second only to consolidating power in Iran.
After Khomeini gained power, skirmishes between Iraq and revolutionary Iran occurred for ten months over the sovereignty of the disputed Shatt al-Arab waterway, which divides the two countries. Iraq and Iran entered into warfare on September 22, 1980. The pretext for war with Iran was this territorial dispute, but the war was more likely an attempt by Saddam, helped by both the United States and the Soviet Union, to have Iraq form a bulwark against the expansion of radical Iranian-style revolution.
In the first days of the war, there was heavy ground fighting around major ports as Iraq launched an attack on Iran's oil-rich, Arab-populated province of Khuzestan. After making some gains, Iraq's troops began to suffer losses from human-wave attacks by Iran. By 1982 Iraq was looking to end the war.
During the war, Iraq used chemical weapons against Iranian forces and Kurdish separatists. On March 16, 1988 Iraqi troops, on orders from Saddam to stop a Kurdish uprising, attacked the Kurdish town of Halabjah with a mix of poison gas and nerve agents killing 5000 people, mostly women and children.
Saddam reached out to other Arab governments for cash and political help. The Iranians, hoping to bring down Saddam's secular government and start a Shi'ite rebellion in Iraq, refused a cease-fire until 1988.
The bloody eight-year war ended in a tie. There were hundreds of thousands of casualties. Perhaps 1.7 million died on both sides. Both economies, previously healthy and expanding, were left in ruins.
Saddam was also stuck with a debt of roughly $75 billion. Borrowing money from the U.S. was making Iraq into its client state, embarrassing a strongman who had sought to define and dominate Arab nationalism. Saddam also borrowed a large amount of money from other Arab states during the 1980s to fight Iran. Faced with rebuilding Iraq's infrastructure, Saddam desperately sought out cash once again, this time for postwar reconstruction.
Tensions with Kuwait.
Saddam was pressuring Kuwait to forgive its share of his debt, some $30 billion. He argued that since the struggle with Iran had been fought for the benefit of the other Gulf Arab states as much as for Iraq that a share of Iraqi debt should be forgiven.
Saddam had pushed oil-exporting countries to raise oil prices and cut back production, but on top of Kuwaiti refusals to do so, Kuwait helped spearhead OPEC's opposition to the production cuts that Saddam had requested. Kuwait was pumping large amounts of oil, and keeping prices low, when Iraq needed to sell high-priced oil from its wells to pay off a huge debt.
Of course, the colossal extent of Kuwaiti oil reserves intensified tensions in the region. The oil reserves of Kuwait (with a population of a mere 2 million next to Iraq's 25) were roughly equal to those of Iraq. Taken together Iraq and Kuwait sat on top of 20 percent of the world's known oil reserves.
The Kuwaiti monarchy further angered Saddam by drilling oil out of Iraqi wells. At the time, Saddam's regime was not know as a pariah state. Saddam complained about the drilling to the U.S. State Department. Although this had gone on for years, Saddam now needed oil money to get rid of a looming economic crisis. Saddam still had an experienced and well-equipped army, which he used to influence regional affairs. He later ordered troops to the Iraq-Kuwait border.
As Iraq-Kuwait relations rapidly grew worse, Saddam was getting conflicting information about how the U.S. would respond to an invasion. Washington had been taking measures to start a good relationship with Iraq for roughly a decade. The Reagan administration gave Saddam roughly $40 billion worth of arms in the 1980s to fight Iran, nearly all of it on credit. The U.S. also sent billions of dollars of food and arms to Saddam to keep him from forming a strong alliance with the Soviets.
The U.S. ambassador to Iraq, April Glaspie, met with Saddam in an meeting on July 25, where the Iraqi leader said he wanted to continue talks. U.S. officials attempted to maintain a conciliatory line with Iraq, indicating that while Bush and Baker did not want force to be used, they would not take any position on the Iraqi-Kuwait dispute and did not want to become involved. Later, Iraq and Kuwait then met for a final negotiation session, which failed. Saddam then sent his troops into Kuwait.
Gulf War.
In August 2, 1990, Saddam invaded and Kuwait, thus making an international crisis. The invasion of Kuwait gave Iraq, with its own substantial oil fields, control of 20 percent of the Persian Gulf oil. The U.S. helped Saddam Hussein in the war with Iran, but with Iraq's take over of the oil-rich emirate of Kuwait in August of 1990 the United States led a United Nations attempt that drove Saddam from Kuwait in February 1991.
Cooperation between the United States and the Soviet Union made possible the passage of resolutions in the United Nations Security Council and gave Iraq a deadline to leave Kuwait.
Saddam ignored the Security Council deadline. Helped by the Security Council, a U.S.-led coalition launched missile attacks on Iraq, January 16, 1991. The United States and a group of allies it had hastily rounded up, including Egypt, Syria and Saudi Arabia, made Saddam's army move from Kuwait in January 1991. ("see" Gulf War).
Israel, though subjected to attack by Iraqi missiles, refrained from retaliating in order not to anger Arab states into leaving the coalition. But Saddam had focused attention on the Palestinian problem by promising to make his forces leave from Kuwait if Israel would leave the occupied territories in the West Bank, the Golan Heights, and the Gaza Strip. Saddam's proposal further split the Arab world, pitting U.S.- and Western-supported Arab states against the Palestinians.
175,000 Iraqis were taken prisoner and the dead were estimated to be 85,000. As part of the cease-fire agreement, Iraq agreed to get rid of all poison gas and germ weapons and allow UN observers to inspect the sites.
After the War.
All of the different religions and the violence of the war that this had created, caused after-war rebellions. After the war, fighting between Shi'ite Muslims, Kurds, and dissident military units was bad. This was a problem to Saddam's rule. Saddam acted by stopping all rebellions in their tracks, especially in the North.
The United States did not help the rebellions, although they had wanted Iraqis to rise up against Saddam. Turkey - a friend of the US - was against Kurdish independence, which would have stopped the fighting. This was because the Saudis and old-fashioned Arab states were afraid of a change like what happened in Iran with the Shiites. Saddam survived these problems that happened right after the war. He was then left completely in control of Iraq. The country never recovered from the Gulf War, economically or with the army. Hussein often showed his "proof" that Iraq had won the Gulf War, and the USA had lost. This made Saddam popular in many parts of the Arab world.
Saddam liked to show himself as a strict Muslim. This was to calm down the religious parts of the society. Some parts of the Sharia law were brought back. This included the 2001 law imposing the death penalty for homosexuality (gay people.) The phrase "Allahu Akbar" ("God is great"), in Saddam's handwriting, was added to the Iraq national flag.
1991-2003.
Relations between the United States and Iraq remained tense following the Gulf War. The U.S. launched a missile attacked aimed at Iraq's intelligence headquarters in Baghdad June 26, 1993, believing evidence that Iraq had sponsored a plot to kill former President George Bush.
The UN placed a trade embargo on Iraq, blocking Iraqi oil exports. This caused hardship in Iraq and almost destroyed the Iraqi economy and state infrastructure. Only smuggling across the Syrian border, and humanitarian aid kept Iraq from crisis. Later, limited amounts of income from the United Nations oil-for-food program started flowing into Iraq. On December 9, 1996 the United Nations allowed Baghdad to begin selling limited amounts of oil for food and medicine.
U.S. officials continued to accuse Saddam of violating the terms of the Gulf War's cease fire, by developing weapons of mass destruction and other banned weaponry, and violating the UN-imposed sanctions and "no fly zones." Isolated military strikes by U.S. and British forces continued on Iraq, the largest being Operation Desert Fox in 1998.
After two years of intermittent activity, U.S. and British warplanes struck harder at sites near Baghdad in February, 2001.
Saddam's base of Tikriti tribesmen, family members, and other supporters was divided after the war, and in the following years, adding to the regime's increasingly repressive and arbitrary nature. Domestic repression inside Iraq grew worse, and Saddam's sons, Uday Hussein and Qusay Hussein, became increasingly powerful and carried out a private reign of terror. They likely had a leading hand when, in August 1995, two of Saddam Hussein's sons-in-law, who held high positions in the Iraqi military, defected to Jordan. Both were killed after returning to Iraq the following February.
2003 invasion of Iraq.
The main reason for the invasion was the claim by the Bush administration that Saddam has WMD.
He was seen as a major threat to Western allies such as oil-rich Saudi Arabia and Israel, to Western oil supplies from the Gulf states, and to Middle East stability generally. Bush's successor, U.S. President Bill Clinton (1993-2001), maintained sanctions and made occasional air strikes in the "Iraqi no-fly zones" or other restrictions, in the hope that Saddam would be overthrown by his many political enemies.
The domestic political equation changed in the U.S. after the September 11, 2001 attacks, which added to the influence of the neoconservative faction in the presidential administration and throughout Washington. In his January 2002 state-of-the-union message to Congress, George W. Bush (the son of George H.W. Bush) spoke of an "axis of evil" comprising Iran, North Korea, and Iraq.
As the war was looming on February 24, 2003, Saddam Hussein talked with CBS News anchor Dan Rather for more than three hours—his first interview with a U.S. reporter in over a decade. CBS aired the taped interview later that week.
The Iraqi government and military collapsed in three weeks of the beginning of the U.S.-led 2003 invasion of Iraq on March 20. The United States made at least two attempts to kill Saddam with targeted air strikes, but both failed to hit their target. By the beginning of April Coalition forces had much of Iraq. The resistance of the much-weakened Iraqi Army either crumbled or shifted to guerrilla tactics, and it appeared that Saddam had lost control of Iraq. He was last seen in a video which showed him in the Baghdad suburbs surrounded by supporters. When Baghdad fell to the Coalition on April 9, Saddam was nowhere to be found.
Saddam was also accused by the Bush administration of being part of Al Qaeda. That has never been proven and there is no evidence Saddam ever had any ties. People in the Bush administration, including the Vice President Dick Cheney will forever claim otherwise. Mostly to justify the largely perceived illegal invasion.
Pursuit and capture.
Even when Baghdad was taken over, and most of the fighting had stopped, people still didn't know where Saddam was. For a few weeks, some people said they saw Saddam, and some videotapes of Saddam talking came out, but still nobody knows if they were true or not.
Although Saddam was placed at the top of the "most-wanted list," he could not be found, even when the other leaders of the Iraqi regime were arrested. His sons and political heirs, Uday and Qusay, were killed in July 2003 in a clash with U.S. forces after a tip from an Iraqi.
On December 14, 2003, the Islamic Republic News Agency (IRNA) of Iran first reported that Saddam Hussein had been arrested. These reports were soon confirmed by other members of the Governing Council, by U.S. military sources, and by British Prime Minister Tony Blair. In a press conference in Baghdad, shortly afterwards, the U.S. Civil Administrator in Iraq Paul Bremer officially announced the capture of Saddam by saying, "Ladies and gentlemen, we got him!" He was found at around 8:30 PM Iraqi time on December 13, in an underground "spider hole" at a farmhouse in ad-Dawr near his home town Tikrit, in what was called Operation Red Dawn.
The first photos taken of Saddam after the soldiers found him didn't look like the photos taken when he was president of Iraq. He had grown long hair and a long beard. Later on, he cut off his hair and beard. The DNA tests came back and showed that he really was Saddam Hussein. People who talked with him after the soldiers found him said he was healthy, and wanted to talk to people and do what they told him to do. Paul Bremer said that Saddam would have a trial, but that he didn't know yet what kind of trial.
The Iraqi Special Tribunal was in charge of Saddam Hussein's trial, and the trials of some people that helped him to be president of Iraq.
In November, 2006, Saddam Hussein was found guilty of 148 murders, and on December 30, 2006, he was put to death. The hanging, recorded by officials of the government, and secretly recorded by a member of the witnesses with a cell phone camera - with sound - showed Saddam being calm, as he was prepared for his final moments. Both witnesses and exectutioners could be heard teasing him as the rope was placed on his head, and he was put on the trap door. He was in the middle of a prayer, when the trap door beneath him opened, and his life ended. Later pictures and live video of Saddam's taunting and execution, of his dead corpse were shown on many internet sites.
Personal.
Saddam has been married three times. His first marriage was to his first cousin Sajida Talfah. This union with the eldest daughter of Khairallah Talfah, Saddam's uncle, produced two sons, (Uday Saddam Hussein and Qusay Hussein) and three daughters, Rana, Raghad and Hala. Sajida was put under house arrest in early 1997, along with daughters Raghad and Rana, because of suspicions of their involvement in an attempted assassination on Uday in December 12, 1996. General Adnan Khairallah Tuffah, who was Sajida's brother and Saddam Hussein's boyhood friend, was allegedly executed because of his growing popularity.
Saddam Hussein also married two other women: Samira Shahbandar, whom he married in 1986 after forcing her husband to divorce her (she is said to be his favourite wife), and Nidal al-Hamdani, the general manager of the Solar Energy Research Center in the Council of Scientific Research, whose husband apparently was also persuaded to divorce his wife.
In August 1995, Rana and her husband Hussein Kamel al Majid and Raghad and her husband, Saddam Kamel Majid, defected to Jordan, taking their children with them. They returned to Iraq when they received assurances that Saddam Hussein would pardon them. Within three days of their return in February 1996, both of the Majid brothers were executed.
Saddam's daughter Hala is married to Jamal Mustafa, the deputy head of Iraq's Tribal Affairs Office. Neither has been known to be involved in politics. Another cousin was Ali Hassan al-Majid, also known in the United States as "Chemical Ali," who was accused of ordering the use of poison gas in 1988.
Death.
Saddam was scheduled to die on Thursday night, December 28, 2006. Because of last minute legal appeals in the American federal court, Saddam's execution came about 40 hours later. Saddam Hussein was hanged on December 30, 2006, at 6:05 AM, Iraqi time. Saddam refused to wear a hood. The execution was performed by the Shiites. He was pronounced dead at 6:10 AM Baghdad time. Baghdad had curfews on those days, policy regulation required people to be off the streets by evening. His motionless body was allowed to dangle on the rope for about 10 minutes. Many Shiites danced around his corpse.
Notes.
2 See PBS Frontline (2003), "The survival of Saddam: secrets of his life and leadership: interview with Saïd K. Aburish" at.
3 From Elisabeth Bumiller's interview of Jerrold M. Post, the founder of the Center for the Analysis of Personality and Political Behavior at the CIA in the "New York Times' (May 15, 2004) on the importance of events during Saddam Hussein's youth. It can be read online at.
8 The full text of Bush's 2002 State of the Union address can be read online (BBC News) at.

Luke McCormick
sports
Luke McCormick is an English football player. He was born August 15, 1983 in Coventry, England. He is a goalkeeper. He plays for the English football team Plymouth Argyle.
In the 2003/04 season, McCormick played when Romain Larrieu could not. Larrieu injured his knee. McCormick played instead. Plymouth Argyle beat Stockport County on 24 January 2004. The score was 2-0. This match was one where McCormick set a new club record of seven "clean sheets" in a row. A clean sheet is a game where the other side gets no goals.
McCormick was voted the most promising player of the 2003/04 season by Plymouth Argyle fans.
On June 7, 2008. McCormick was arrested on suspicion for killing two people by dangerous driving. Subsequently he was released by Plymouth Arygle and was jailed for seven years on October 6, 2008 but could be out in three and a half years.

Vladimir Lenin
media
Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov (Russian: Влади́мир Ильи́ч Улья́нов, IPA: vla'dʲimʲr ilj'itʂ ul'janʌf), better known as (Ленин)) (April 22, 1870 - January 21, 1924) was a Russian revolutionary and the leader of the Bolsheviks party. He was the first leader of the Soviet Union. Soviet Union is the other name of the Union of the Soviet Socialist Republics (USSR). Lenin is also known as the maker of Leninism, which was later called Marxism-Leninism by Josif Stalin.
At school, Lenin was very good at the Latin and Greek languages. But in 1887 he was thrown out from Kazan State University because he was too radical and protested against the Tsar, who was the king of Russia at that time. In that year, Lenin's brother Alexander Ulyanov was hanged for his part in a bomb plot to kill Tsar Alexander III. Lenin continued to study by himself, and in 1891 he got a license to be a lawyer.
While he studied Law in the then Russian capital, St. Petersburg, he learned about the thoughts of Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels. Because Marxism was not allowed in Russia, Lenin was arrested and put in prison for a year, then he was sent to exile in Siberia.
In July 1898, when he was still in Siberia, Lenin married a socialist woman, Nadezhda Krupskaya. In 1899, he wrote a book. It was called "The Development of Capitalism in Russia". In 1900, Lenin was released from Siberia.
After he was allowed to leave, Lenin travelled around Europe. He began to publish a Marxist newspaper called "Iskra", the Russian word for "spark". He became a leading member of the Russian Social Democratic Labour Party, or RSDLP.
In 1903, Lenin had a dispute with an other leader of the RSDLP, Julius Martov. This dispute, which was about the organization of the Party, divided the party in two. Lenin wanted a strict, centralised, and disciplined model. Martov wanted a less strict, less centralised one. Martov's helpers became known as Mensheviks (meaning "those who are less"). Lenin's supporters were called Bolsheviks ("those who are more").
Lenin went to Finland in 1907, because it was safer for Marxists in Finland than in Russia. He travelled around Europe and visited many socialist meetings and events. During this time he lived in different places like London, Paris and, during World War I, in Geneva. At the beginning of the war, a big meeting, theSecond International that included the Bolsheviks, broke down, when various member Parties helped their countries in the war, going away from the Marxist idea of internationalism. Lenin and the Bolsheviks were one of only a handful of groups and people who stood against the war for Marxist reasons.
1917.
After Tsar Nicholas II was removed from office during the The February Revolution, Lenin went back to Russia. He became an important Bolshevik leader, and made public the "April Theses" about what he said were mistakes of the new middle class government of Kerensky, and he called for a Workers' Revolution to overthrow the government. Lenin also talked about the mistakes of many members of the Bolshevik Central Committee (including Zinoviev, Kamenev and Stalin) who helped the government to continue to fight the war against Germany, against the wishes of the Leninists.
During July 1917, when people said that Lenin had got money from the Germans; he was afraid and had to flee to Finland.
In October 1917, the Bolsheviks under Lenin and Trotsky headed the Petrograd Soviet and other Soviets all over Russia in a taking of power from Kerensky's Government, known as the October Revolution ended up in the making of the first Marxist Communist State in world history.
On November 8, 1917, Lenin was chosen Chairman of the Council of People's Commissars by the Russian Soviet Congress. This means that he was the leader of Russia.
Because he was shocked by the German invasion, he signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk. Russia lost a lot of land, but the Germans stopped the invasion.
During the Russian Civil War, Lenin started war communism. But after the war, Lenin brought the New Economic Policy. Some private enterprise was allowed, but not much at all. Businessmen, known as nepmen, can own only light industry, not heavy.
After Kaplan shot Lenin, he started having many strokes. By May 1922, he was badly paralysed. After a stroke in March 1923, he could not speak or move. Lenin's fourth stroke killed him in January 1924.
The city of St. Petersburg had been renamed by the Tsar to Petrograd in 1914, but was renamed Leningrad in Lenin's honour in 1924. But after the end of soviet socialism, in 1991, it was called St. Petersburg again.
Before Lenin died, he said he wanted to be buried beside his mother. When he died, the communists let the people of Russia come to look at him. Because people kept coming, they decided not to bury him. A building was built, in Red Square, Moscow, over Lenin's body, so that people could see him. Lenin's body was mummied (became mummy). It is called the Lenin mausoleum (a mausoleum is a building for dead people). It is a situated in Moscow, Russia, and many people still go there to see him.

Edmund Hillary
sports
Sir Edmund Percival Hillary, (born July 20, 1919, died January 11, 2008) was a New Zealand mountaineer and explorer. Along with Sherpa guide Tenzing Norgay, he was the first successful person to climb Mount Everest on May 29, 1953. Mount Everest is the tallest mountain on earth. During his teenage years, Edmund Hillary had attended Auckland Grammar School.
Sir Edmund Hillary was the first New Zealander in the world to conquer the mighty Mt. Everest in Nepal. He is on the New Zealand five dollar note. He also climbed ten other mountains after Mount Everest, all of which are also located in the Himalayas.
Early Life.
Hillary was born to Percival Augustus Hillary and Gertrude Hillary, née Clark, in Auckland, New Zealand, on 20 July 1919. His family moved to Tuakau (south of Auckland) in 1920, after his father (who served at Gallipoli) had gotten land there. His grandparents were early settlers in northern Wairoa in the mid 19th century after moving from Yorkshire, England.
Hillary learned at Tuakau Primary School and then Auckland Grammar School. He finished primary school two years early, but he did not do very well at high school. At first, he was smaller than other students there and very shy so he felt safe with his books and often thought of a life filled with adventure. Every day, he rode a train to and from high school, and he often used this time to read. Learning how to box helped him become more confident. At age 16 his interest in climbing started during a school trip to Mount Ruapehu. Although very tall at 6 ft 5 in (195cm), he found that he was stronger than many of his fellow hikers.
He learned about mathematics and science at The University of Auckland, and in 1939 he completed his first important climb, which was reaching the top of a mountain called Mount Ollivier. With his brother Rex, Hillary became a beekeeper during summertime, which allowed him to do climbing in the winter.

Charles Darwin
science
Charles Robert Darwin (February 12, 1809 - April 19, 1882) was an English naturalist. He is most famous for proposing the theory of evolution. This theory says that all types of living organisms came from a common ancestor. He said the way that groups of organisms changed was through natural selection of the fittest, most well adapted or most successful organisms over other, less fit ones. He also said that some organisms are better adapted because of normal differences brought about by mutations (changes in the genes). Since some differences might make an organism more successful, it would have a better chance to survive, and would pass on its genes to future generations. Any difference that would cause the organism to have a lower survival rate would be less likely to be passed on, and might die out sooner.
He first thought of this theory in 1838. Historians think that he did not talk about his theory because he was afraid that people would not like his theory if it showed questions about religion. So he did not publish it in a book until 1859, when he heard that another scientist, Alfred Wallace had the same ideas. Wallace was close to publishing his ideas, so Darwin gave a lecture talking about his own and Wallace's ideas, then published his book. The name of the book was "On the Origin of Species by Means of Natural Selection, or the Preservation of Favoured Races in the Struggle for Life". This is also just called "The Origin of Species".

Isaac Newton
science
Sir Isaac Newton (January 4, 1643 – March 31, 1727) was an English physicist and mathematician. He is famous for his work on the laws of motion, optics, gravity, and calculus. He was born in Lincolnshire, England.
He started his education at the The King's School, Grantham. After a few years, his mother
called him back to his home and asked him to do farming. But, his teacher begged for Isaac to come
back to his school. So, after one year he did so. Later, he wrote a paper called the "Philosophiae Naturalis Principia Mathematica" which became very famous.
Early life.
Isaac Newton was born in 1643 (The same year Galileo Galilei died) in a manor house in Lincolnshire, England. His father had died three months before his birth. When Isaac was three his mother remarried, and Isaac remained with his grandmother. He was not interested in the family farm, so he was sent to the University of Cambridge to study.
Early workings.
Isaac Newton explained the workings of the universe through mathematics. He described laws of motion and gravitation. These laws are math formulas that explain how objects move when a force acts on them. Isaac published his most famous book, Principia, in 1687 while he was a mathematics professor at Trinity College, Cambridge. In the Principia, Isaac explained three basic laws that govern the way objects move. He then described his idea, or theory, about gravity. Gravity is the force that causes things to fall down. If a pencil fell off a desk, it will land on the floor, not the ceiling. In his book Isaac also used his laws to show that the planets revolve around the suns in orbits that are oval, not round.
The three laws.
Isaac Newton used three laws to explain the way objects move. They are called Newton’s Laws of Motion.
The first law (Law of Inertia).
The First Law states that an object that is not being pushed or pulled by some force will stay still, or will keep moving in a straight line at a steady speed. It is easy to understand that a bike will not move unless something pushes or pulls it. It is harder to understand that an object will continue to move without help. Think of the bike again. If someone is riding a bike and jumps off before the bike is stopped, what happens? The bike continues on until it falls over. The tendency of an object to remain still, or keep moving in a straight line at a steady speed is called inertia.
The second law (Law of Acceleration).
The Second Law explains how a force acts on an object. An object accelerates in the direction the force is moving it. If someone gets on a bike and pushes the pedals forward the bike will begin to move. If someone gives the bike a push from behind, the bike will speed up. If the rider pushes back on the pedals the bike will slow down. If the rider turns the handlebars, the bike will change direction.
The third law (Law of Reciprocal Actions).
The Third Law states that if an object is pushed or pulled, it will push or pull equally in the opposite direction. If someone lifts a heavy box, they use force to push it up. The box is heavy because it is producing an equal force downward on the lifter’s arms. The weight is transferred through the lifter’s legs to the floor. The floor presses upward with an equal force. If the floor pushed back with less force, the person lifting the box would fall through the floor. If it pushed back with more force the lifter would fly into the air.
The discovery of gravity.
When most people think of Isaac Newton, they think of him sitting under an apple tree watching an apple fall to the ground. When he saw the apple fall, Newton began to think about a specific kind of force — gravity. Newton understood that gravity was the force of attraction between two objects. He also understood that an object with more matter – mass - exerted the greater force, or pulled the smaller object toward it. That meant that the large mass of the earth pulled objects toward it. That is why the apple fell down instead of up, and why people don’t float in the air. But this image of Isaac Newton never happened.
Early workings in the field of gravity.
Isaac Newton thought about gravity and the apple. He thought that maybe gravity was not just limited to the earth and the objects on it. What if gravity extended to the moon and beyond? Isaac calculated the force needed to keep the moon moving around the earth. Then he compared it with the force that made the apple fall downward. After allowing for the fact that the moon is much farther from the earth, and has a much greater mass, he discovered that the forces were the same. The moon is held in an orbit around earth by the pull of earth’s gravity.
Impact.
Isaac Newton’s calculations changed the way people understood the universe. No one had been able to explain why the planets stayed in their orbits. What held them up? Less than 50 years before Isaac Newton was born it was thought that the planets were held in place by an invisible shield. Isaac proved that they were held in place by the sun’s gravity. He also showed that the force of gravity was affected by distance and by mass. He was not the first to understand that the orbit of a planet was not circular, but more elongated, like an oval. What he did was to explain how it worked.
But the great physicist, Albert Einstein, thought that Newton's work was wrong. He corrected many of the things that Newton did.
Death.
Isaac Newton died on March 31, 1727 in London, England. He is buried in Westminster Abbey. He set the stage for many great physicists to come, such as Albert Einstein, James Chadwick, and Stephen Hawking.

Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
science
Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (pronounced ‘GUR-te’ with “oe” like the French “eu” in “beurre”) (August 28, 1749 – March 22, 1832) was the greatest of all German writers. He was a poet, novelist and playwright, but he was also an actor, administrator, scientist, geologist, botanist and philosopher. He had a very important influence on lots of writers and thinkers in the 19th century and even in our own time. He contributed to science with his work in botany and his Theory of colours. Many people quote famous lines from his books and some of his phrases have become part of the German language. His poems were set to music by composers like Schubert, Schumann, Brahms, Wolf and Strauss. Yet Goethe is not an easy person to discuss. His poems, like all great poetry, do not sound very good when translated. His plays are not often performed outside Germany and most of his scientific work now seems old-fashioned. However, there is no doubt that he was one of the world’s greatest geniuses.
His Youth: from his birth until his arrival in Weimar (1749-1775).
Goethe was born in Frankfurt am Main, Germany. His father was well-educated but very strict. His mother was only 18 when he was born. She was kind, and Goethe probably got his poetic talent from her. When he was a young boy he started to write stories and plays for his friends. In his youth, he learned Greek, Latin and French. He studied law in Leipzig from 1765 to 1768. During this time he wrote some beautiful letters which showed his promise as a writer. He continued his studies in Strasbourg from 1770 to 1771. He soon joined other young men who wanted to change the way that German writers were writing. He thought that people like Johann Christoph Gottsched were too strict about writing poetry that obeyed the old rules. Instead of the ideas of the Enlightenment he wanted poets to feel their own creative genius and make their own rules. Goethe and his young friends liked Nature. They liked the hills, the beautiful landscapes, the sun, moon and stars. They also liked human Nature: by this they meant people who had not been spoiled by civilization but were close to the country in their hearts.
One man who had lots of new ideas was a poet called Johann Gottfried von Herder. Herder liked the plays of Shakespeare (which he knew in German translations)] as well as folk poetry. These ideas were exciting for Goethe who wrote a play called "Götz von Berlichingen". Götz was an historical person who was a hero in a similar way to the English Robin Hood: he was a knight who fought for justice and protected poor people who were being mistreated by the powerful princes Goethe helped Herder to collect folk poetry. Both men believed that poetry must always come from the heart. It had to be based on the poet’s experiences, not just on an old-fashioned idea of what a good poem should be. Goethe’s poems from this period include some of his best known ones: "Heidenröslein", "Der König in Thule", "Erlkönig" etc.
Goethe fell in love with several women during his lifetime. During this early period of his life he was in love with a girl called Friederike Brion whose father was a pastor. Several of his poems are inspired by her. He felt terribly sad when they split up and the feeling of desertion by a lover comes into a lot of Goethe’s works. They are all based on his own experience. His disappointment in love inspired him when writing about Werther in "Die Leiden des jungen Werthers" and Gretchen in his great play "Faust". His poems also show his ideas about science and philosophy.
"Die Leiden des jungen Werthers" ("The Sufferings of Young Werther") is a book written in the form of letters. Werther is a young man who falls passionately in love with a girl called Lotte who is married to someone else. Werther commits suicide in the end. The book was a huge success all over Europe. People talked about “Werther fever”. Many young men who were disappointed in love copied Werther and committed suicide.
Goethe’s most famous work is a very long play called "Faust". He spent most of his life working at it. He was writing the first version of "Faust" at this time. Based on a legendary character, it tells of a man called Faust who is tired of studying and wants to have the greatest possible happiness. The devil (called Mephistopheles in the play) tells Faust he can help him to do this, but that in the end Faust must give him his soul and go with him to hell. Faust uses magic in the hope that it will tell him everything about life.
As well as his writing he was developing his career in law. In 1772 he spent four months in Wetzlar at the Imperial Law Courts. Here he made new friends, including a young girl who was already engaged to someone else.
Midde Period: Arrival in Weimar until death of Schiller (1775-1805).
Goethe had been well-educated and was good at organizing and getting on with important people. For eleven years he worked at the court of Weimar for a young Duke called Karl August. He became a member and later the president of the Duke’s cabinet. He had to organize road-building projects, and look after parks and buildings. He studied geology, mineralogy, botany and anatomy. He fell in love with a woman called Charlotte von Stein who was married and had several children. He wrote love letters to her, and she inspired him to write many poems. At this time he felt that a man’s task in life was to be useful. The heroes of his books at this time were often ordinary people instead of geniuses.
After a time he realized that all his work on governmental duties were not giving him time for his writing, so he went to Italy for 18 months. He loved the landscape and made lots of sketches, and he read the ancient poets and books on the history of art. He wrote a play in rhyme called "Iphigenie auf Tauris" which combines the beauty of Classicism with great poetry.
When he returned from Italy he settled once more in Weimar. He visited Italy a second time. He became great friends with the famous poet and playwright Friedrich Schiller. The two men talked about many of their ideas and helped one another by offering criticism of their works. He wrote short works such as "Hermann und Dorothea" which is about life in a small German town at the time of the French Revolution.
Two works of the greatest importance works occupied him at this time. One is the novel "Wilhelm Meisters Lehrjahre". This is an example of what is called in German a “Bildungsroman” which means something like “Education novel”. It means a novel which shows a person growing up and developing his character and learning about the world. This book was a very important influence on the 19th century Romantic novel and on all German autobiographical novels ever since. Goethe spent many years working on this book.
The second work of enormous importance was his play "Faust". He made changes to the original version, putting all the small bits together into one great play. Schiller gave him advice while he was writing it. Faust enters into a pact with the devil, Mephistopheles who promises him all his soul can wish for: fine living, gold, women and honour. He signs the pact with his blood.
Later life (1805-1832).
Napoleon was fighting wars all over Europe at this time. Germany, which was still made up of lots of small countries, was an enemy of France. Goethe always thought of Napoleon as a hero. His ideas about politics were still based on 18th century ideas. He hated war and so he did not take part in politics but concentrated on science and literature. He wrote a book called "Die Wahlverwandtschaften" ("Elective Affinities") which is about a divorce problem. Some of his scientific ideas are used in the story as he talks about the way that two chemical compounds can break up and form new unions. He compares this to the people in his story. His poems in "Westöstlicher Divan" are some of his greatest. He uses ideas from Persia and other Eastern countries together with ideas from the West. It has a lot of parables about human life.
Many interesting things that Goethe said were written down in a book by his friend Eckermann, who published them in a book called "Conversations with Goethe". Goethe also wrote about his own life in his autobiography which he called "Dichtung und Wahrheit" ("Poetry and Truth"). The book tells us about his youth up to the time of his arrival in Weimar. It is in four parts. The fourth part was published after his death. He chose the title to show that he was telling us the truth about his life, but that he had changed the order of some events to make it into a poetic book.
Goethe wrote a sequel (a part which follows on) to "Wilhelm Meister" called "Wilhelm Meisters Wanderjahre" ("The Years of Wilhelm Meister’s Wanderings"). It consists of several sections which are like separate stories. They tell us about Wilhelm Meister’s relationship with society and how he has to change his ways to fit in with other people.
Goethe’s "Faust" had made him the greatest person in European literature. At the end of his life he finished a second part of "Faust". It is quite hard to read, and is more of a long poem than a dramatic play. It talks of his ideas about allegory, science and philosophy.
Goethe died in Weimar on March 22, 1832. He had started as a great Classical writer of the 18th century and finished as a young Romantic of the 19th century. No one else had such a big influence on art and literature of that time.

Dante Alighieri
politics
Dante Alighieri, or simply Dante (May 14/June 13 1265 - September 14, 1321), was an Italian poet from Florence. His central work, the "Commedia" ("Divine Comedy"), is considered the greatest literary work composed in the Italian language and a masterpiece of world literature. In Italian he is known as "the Supreme Poet" ("il Sommo Poeta"). Dante and the "Divine Comedy" have been a source of inspiration for artists for almost seven centuries. Dante, with Petrarch and Boccaccio are also known as "the three fountains". Dante is also called the "the Father of the Italian language". The first biography written on him was by his contemporary Giovanni Villani. The most famous section in "La Divina Commedia" is the first third of it, the first 34 cantos of the poem, called "Inferno", which is Dante's vision of hell.
Life.
Dante Alighieri was born in 1265, between May 14 and June 13, under the name "Durante Alighieri." ca. 1450 (Uffizi Gallery). His family was important in Florence, and supported the Papacy.
The poet's mother was Bella degli Abati. She died when Dante was 7 years old, and Alighiero soon married again, to Lapa di Chiarissimo Cialuffi. Lapa had two children, Dante's brother Francesco and sister "Tana" (short version of "Gaetana").
Dante fought in the front of the Guelph troops in the battle of Campaldino (June 11, 1289). After the victory Dante gained an important part in public life.
When Dante was 12, in 1277, he married Gemma di Manetto Donati. Dante had already fallen in love with another girl, Beatrice Portinari that is mentioned same in "Divine Comedy", (known also as Bice). Years after Dante's marriage to Gemma he met Beatrice again. He had become interested in writing poems.
Dante had six children with Gemma: Jacopo, Pietro, Giovanni, Gabrielle Alighieri, and Antonia.
Education, youth and poetry.
Not much is known about Dante's education, and it is presumed he studied at home. It is known that he studied Tuscan poetry. His interests brought him to discover the Occitan poetry of the troubadours and the Latin poetry of classical antiquity (with a particular devotion to Virgil).
At 18, Dante met Guido Cavalcanti, Lapo Gianni, Cino da Pistoia, and soon after Brunetto Latini; together they became the leaders of "Dolce Stil Novo" ("The Sweet New Style"). Brunetto later received a special mention in the "Divine Comedy" ("Inferno", XV, 28), for what he had taught Dante.
When he was nine years old he met Beatrice Portinari, daughter of Folco Portinari, with whom he fell in love "at first sight", and apparently without even having spoken to her. He saw her frequently after age 18, often exchanging greetings in the street, but he never knew her well—he effectively set the example for the so-called "courtly love".Dante gave his imprint to the Stil Novo. Love for Beatrice (as in a different manner Petrarch would show for his Laura) would apparently be the reason for poetry and for living, together with political passions. In many of his poems, she appears such as semi-divine, watching over him constantly.
When Beatrice died in 1290, Dante tried to find an "help" in Latin literature.
He then dedicated himself to philosophical studies at religious schools like the Dominican one in Santa Maria Novella. This "excessive" passion for philosophy would later be criticized by the character Beatrice, in "Purgatorio", the second book of the "Divine Comedy".
Exile and death.
Boniface quickly dismissed the other delegates and asked Dante alone to remain in Rome. At the same time (November 1, 1301), Charles de Valois entered Florence with Black Guelphs, who in the next six days destroyed much of the city and killed many of their enemies. A new Black Guelph government was installed and Messer Cante dei Gabrielli di Gubbio was appointed "Podestà" of Florence. Dante wasput in exile for two years, and ordered to pay a large hill of money.
Dante did not pay the money, in part because he believed he was not guilty, and in part because all his needs in Florence had been stolen by the Black Guelphs. He was condemned to exile for live, and if he returned to Florence without paying the money, he could be burned at the stake.
In exile he began searching the foundation for the "Divine Comedy", a work in 100 cantos, divided into three books of thirty-three cantos each, with a single introductory canto.
He went to Verona as a guest of Bartolomeo I della Scala, then moved to Sarzana in Liguria. Later, he is supposed to have lived in Lucca with Madame Gentucca. Some not sure sources say that he was also in Paris between 1308 and 1310.
In 1310, the Holy Roman Emperor Henry VII of Luxembourg, marched 5,000 troops into Italy. Dante saw in him a new Charlemagne who would restore the office of the Holy Roman Emperor for re-take Florence from the Black Guelphs. He wrote to Henry and several Italian princes, demanding that they destroy the Black Guelphs. Mixing religion and private concerns, he invoked the worst anger of God against his city, suggesting several particular targets that coincided with his personal enemies. It was during this time that he wrote the first two books of the "Divine Comedy".
When Dante died at Ravenna, the custodians of the body at Ravenna put the bones in a false wall of the monastery. Nevertheless, in 1829, a tomb was built for him in Florence in the basilica of Santa Croce. That tomb has been empty ever since, with Dante's body remaining in Ravenna, far from the land he loved so dearly. The front of his tomb in Florence reads "Onorate l'altissimo poeta" - which roughly translates as "Honour the most exalted poet".

Charles Dickens
media
Charles Dickens was born on February 7, 1812 in Portsmouth, England. His parents were John Dickens, a naval pay clerk, and Elizabeth Barrow.
At five, Charles moved to Chatham. When Charles was ten years old, his family moved to Camden, London. He worked in a blacking factory there while his father went to prison for debt. Dickens's hard times in this blackening factory served as the base of ideas for many of his novels. Many like 'oliver twist' soon became famous. When his uncle died and he inherited money, Charles's father paid off his debts and was released from prison. Charles did not like working and wished to stop working after his father was released. His mother said that the family needed the money so Charles was forced to continue working. Charles then finished his schooling, and got a job as an office boy for an attorney. After finding that job dull, he taught himself shorthand and became a journalist that reported on the government. He published his first book, "The Pickwick Papers", in 1836. The name 'Dickens' was considered queer as it refered to the devil.
Amongst Charles' other famous books are "Oliver Twist", "Great Expectations", "David Copperfield", "Nicholas Nickelby", "Moby Dick" and "The Old Curiosity Shop". Charles also wrote "A Christmas Carol", which is often read at Christmas time.
Charles Dickens died on June 9, 1870. He was buried in Poet's Corner in Westminster Abbey.

Britney Spears
music
Britney Spears (born 2 December 1981 in McComb, Mississippi), is an American Pop singer.
Early success and rise to fame.
Britney Spears was born in McComb, Mississippi, about 25 miles away from where she grew up in Kentwood, Louisiana. Her parents are James (Jamie) and Lynne Spears. She has an older brother, Bryan (born 1977) and a younger sister, Jamie-Lynn (born 1991). Ever since Britney was very young she liked to sing, dance and act so she took lessons. Britney also did gymnastics and she was very good at it. When Britney was eight, she tried out for a TV program for children in called the "New Mickey Mouse Club". She was great, but too young. Every summer for the next three years, Britney went a school for performing arts in New York City. It was a long way from home for a young child, her mother and baby sister from a small town to go but Britney's family believed in her. At the age of 11, Britney tried out once again for the Mickey Mouse Club and was on the show from 1993. It was filmed in Lakeland, Florida Others on the show during this time were singers Christina Aguilera, Justin Timberlake, and JC Chasez (who would later be members of the band *NSYNC), and actors Ryan Gosling and Keri Russell. After the Mickey Mouse Club ended in 1994, Britney Spears went back to her hometown, Kentwood and went to high school. In 1995 and 1996, she was voted Junior High School Most Beautiful. Britney liked her home but really wanted to sing and dance again. In 1997 she joined a girl group called Innosense but she wanted to be a solo singer. Later that year, the 16 year old Britney was signed by Jive Records.
In 1998, she made her first song, "...Baby One More Time". The music video for the song is famous for showing Britney in a schoolgirl uniform.
Continued success.
Spears is currently the 8th best selling female artist in America and has sold 83 million records worldwide. She has one Grammy, three MTV Video Music Awards and has her own star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. Her most successful songs to date are Toxic, Baby One More Time, and Womanizer.
Spears is currently putting the final touches on her 6th studio album Circus. The lead single Womanizer has been released as has an accompanying music video. Spears will conduct a world tour for this album in 2009.
Movies.
In 2002, Spears play the lead role, Lucy Ann Wagner, in the movie "Crossroads".
She also had a small role in the movie "Austin Powers in Goldmember" in 2002.
Family life.
On January 3, 2004, Spears married her childhood friend Jason Allan Alexander in Las Vegas, Nevada, United States. The marriage was annulled only 55 hours later.
On September 18, 2004, Spears married Kevin Federline. They had a son together on September 14, 2005 named Sean Preston Spears Federline. On September 12, 2006, Britney gave birth to her second child, another son named Jayden James Spears Federline.
In November 2006, Spears filed for divorce from Kevin.
In September of 2007, Spears lost some custody of her two children, Sean Preston and Jayden James, to her ex-husband, Kevin Federline.
At the beginning of January 2008, Spears lost full custody of her children after a mental breakdown. The media reported mostly on Britney Spears' mental issues and custody battle with ex-husband Federline.
Since February 2008, her father has taken control of her estate and has helped Britney to get her life back to normal. She is said to regain entire control at the end of 2008.
Britney currently has monitored visits with her children at least 4 times a week and is allowed to pick them up from pre-school. The judge overseeing the visits has said she has made impressive progress.

Gwyneth Paltrow
music
Gwyneth Kate Paltrow (b. September 28, 1972) is an actor. She is from America. She was born in Los Angeles, California.
She studied Spanish language in Talavera of the Queen, Spain.
Personal life.
Paltrow married Chris Martin, who is the singer of the band "Coldplay" on December 5, 2003. Together they have a daughter called Apple, who was born on May 14, 2004. A second child, Moses, was born on April 8, 2006.

Social network
science
A social network is a set of social actors (e.g. people, organizations, communities, nations) and a set of social relationships (e.g. friendship/affect, communication, economic transactions, interactions, kinship, authority/hierarchy, trust, social support, diffusion, contagion, shared memberships) among them. Considering social relationships as a network calls attention in some manner (e.g. graphically, analytically) to the importance of the pattern or structure of the set of relationships.
A personal social network is the pattern of relationships among a set of actors who have a relationship to a particular focal person. A community social network is the pattern of relationships among a set of people and/or organizations in a community. Each of these networks can involve social support, provide people with a sense of community and
lead them to help and protect each other.
How big a personal network can become depends on the individual and the type of relationships considered. The set of people that a person knows well or with whom a person frequently interacts seldom exceeds several hundred. Similarly as the size of a community network grows maintaining relationships among all or even most members is strained by sheer size. There is a Law of 150 which suggests that about 150 persons is the best size for a village or large clan. Many experts think that a corporation has an ideal size of about 70 people: these people and their spouses would also fit as a large social network.
Social capital refers to properties of social relationships (i.e. a network) which can be utilized to yield a desired result or return, just as human capital are skills and talents resident in a person that can be used to achieve a desired result and (economic) capital are material items that can be used to yield a desired result (e.g. new product, profit). One example of social capital is people in a community network who are willing to help each other. This use of a social network is most obvious during disaster recovery. At that time people often come forward to help each other. Other examples are people using their social network to find employment or to aid their career.
In psychology, a free rider is a person who uses the social network but does not contribute help when required. It is often thought that power structures evolve from the need to detect and exclude such free riders. Social networks are vulnerable to them, since the circumstances where help is required, like disasters, occur by surprise. It might happen that someone cannot help at that one time - it might also happen that they are not there the next time. Only after a lot of time does it become obvious who is and is not contributing to the safety of the group, or who is avoiding the group when people really need their help.
Some social networks are held together by the ties of religion. A mosque, church or temple is almost always a center of a social network, and often that network has a name and an identity of its own that is not that of the religious organization.
See also: contact network
Sources.
The Law of 150 is well documented by Robin Dunbar, British Anthropologist, Professor of Psychology, University of Liverpool, in R. I. M. Dunbar, ""Neocortex size as a constraint on group size in primates,"" Journal of Human Evolution (1992), vol. 20, pp. 469-493 - it is also proposed by some branches of sociology.

Kylie Minogue
music
Kylie Ann Minogue (born May 28, 1968 in Melbourne, Australia) is a singer and actress. She became popular in the late 1980s, because of her role in the Australian television soap opera "Neighbours", before being a dance-pop singer.
Signed to a contract by British songwriters and producers Stock, Aitken & Waterman, she got hit records throughout the world. Her popularity began to decline by the early 1990s and she left Stock, Aitken & Waterman in 1992. For years she tried to become an independent performer and songwriter. Her projects were widely talked about, but her albums resulted in the lowest sales of her career.
In 2000, Minogue became popular again as a dance-pop singer and became well-known for her sexual music videos and expensive concerts. She has one of the longest and most successful careers in pop music, and she has become one of the most recognisable celebrities and sex symbols. In Australia, she holds the record for the highest concert ticket sales for a woman, and has had 9 singles at number 1 on the Australian ARIA Singles Chart.
On May 17 2005, Minogue was diagnosed with breast cancer. She was on tour at the time, and the rest of it had to be cancelled. Minogue had surgery for it on May 21 2005 at a hospital in Malvern, and started chemotherapy soon afterwards. She finished her chemotherapy treatment in January 2006, but still needed six more weeks of radiotherapy to stop any new cancerous tumours from growing.

Jennifer Love Hewitt
music
Jennifer Love Hewitt (born February 21 1979) is an American actress and singer. She is most known for playing Sarah Reeves in the Fox television series "Party of Five" from (1995-1999), and as Julie James in the "I Know What You Did Last Summer" films. She can currently be seen on the CBS television series "Ghost Whisperer", as Melinda Gordon. She plays a person who talks with the dead.
Early life and career.
Hewitt was born in Waco, Texas. Her parents are Herbert Daniel Hewitt and Patricia Mae Shipp. She moved to Garland, Texas in 1987. Hewitt grew up in Killeen, Texas. After the divorce of her parents, Hewitt and her only sibling, Todd Hewitt, grew up with her mother.
As a young girl, Hewitt liked music. This led to her first encounters with the entertainment industry. At the age of three, she sang "The Greatest Love of All" at a livestock show. By the time she was five, Hewitt already had tap dancing and ballet in her portfolio. At the age of ten she moved to Los Angeles, California, with her mother for a career in both acting and singing.
After moving to Los Angeles, Hewitt was in more than twenty television commercials. Her first break came as a child actor on the Disney Channel variety show "Kids Incorporated" (1989–1991). Hewitt became a young star after getting the role of Sarah Reeves on the Fox Television show "Party of Five" (1995–1999). She joined the cast during its second season.
Film and music career.
She made her film debut in the independent movie "Munchie" (1992). Hewitt became a film star after a lead role in the horror movie "I Know What You Did Last Summer" (1997). She also played in the sequel "I Still Know What You Did Last Summer" (1998). Other movie roles included the high-school comedy "Can't Hardly Wait" (1998) and the romantic comedy "Heartbreakers" (2001). In 2002, she worked with Jackie Chan in the action comedy "The Tuxedo".
She has released four albums with some success, mostly in Europe and Japan. Her first album was released in Japan, where she is widely considered a pop star.

God Save the Queen
music
God Save the Queen is a song, the national anthem of the United Kingdom. When there is a king instead of a queen it becomes God Save the King. Some other countries that still have the British monarch as their head of state use this song as a "Royal Anthem" to honour the queen.
It is not completely certain who wrote it, but most people think it was Dr Henry Carey, who first performed it in 1740.
The tune for God Save the Queen was used in many countries as a national anthem. Apart from the German state, many of which were linked to Great Britain by marriage, Liechtenstein and Switzerland used the tune. Switzerland changed to a different tune in the 1960s. Liechtenstein still uses the tune.
In the 1930s the United States chose an official anthem. The "Star Spangled Banner" was chosen instead of the equally popular "My Country 'tis of Thee" which used the God Save the Queen tune.

Julius Caesar
politics
Gaius Julius Caesar (July 13, 100 BC – March 15, 44 BC) was a military leader and politician of the Roman Republic in very early times.
Biography.
Caesar first took power with two other politicians, Gnaeus Pompeius Magnus (Pompey the Great) and Marcus Licinius Crassus. These three men ruled Rome and were called the "Triumvirate". With their agreement, Caesar became the governor of Gallia. Gallia is the area which is today North Italy, Switzerland, and France. Caesar was leader during the Gallic War, which was fought between the Gallic people and German people, who wanted to live in Gallia. Caesar wrote about this eight-year war in his book "De Bello Galico" ("On the Gallic Wars"). This book was written in the Latin language, and is an early history book. Many people think it has the first geographic description of France.
When his time as the governor of Gallia was almost finished, Caesar thought he should return to Rome as soon as possible, or his enemies, throughout the Senate, a group of other important Roman men, would stop him. He and his army entered Rome and took power. This caused a civil war, but in the end Julius Caesar won and became almost a king, a dictator.
Before this time Rome had been a republic, that is, it did not have a king but was ruled by men who had permission from the Senate. Some Romans did not want a king to rule Rome. They were not happy that Caesar had so much power. On the Ides of March - meaning the middle of that month - March 15 44 BC, Caesar was called to the Senate and was killed by a group of people including some Senators who had been his good friends before he died.
This led to another civil war, which was finally won by an army led by friends of Julius Caesar, including Octavian the son of Caesar's niece. Julius Caesar had been liked very much by the people of Rome who were now unhappy about the wars and deaths. After this, the Roman republic was no more. People wanted a king, perhaps to make things safer. Octavian became the first Roman emperor and took the name Caesar Augustus. Later Roman emperors also used Caesar as their title.
Personal life.
Caesar married three Roman women during his life and had one child called Julia. Caesar travelled to Egypt and met Queen Cleopatra. They fell in love and may have had a son named Caesarion. They could not marry according to the Roman Law. When Caesar died, without any legal children (Julia died in 54 BC), his niece's son, Octavian became his heir. This means Octavian got all the things that Julius Caesar owned, making him very rich.
Honours.
In the year 1599 CE, William Shakespeare wrote a drama "Julius Caesar" about the death of Caesar and what happened next. He told a story of how it may have happened, that a man's good friend helped people to kill him. This type of drama is called a tragedy, that is, a story where sad or bad things happen.
The Roman empire and its emperors were so important in history that the word "Caesar" was used as a title in some European countries to mean emperor, even long after the Roman empire was gone. For example, Germany's king was called a Kaiser up to the year 1919 CE and Russia's king was called a Tsar until the year 1917 CE.

Leon Trotsky
politics
(Russian: Лев Давидович Троцкий; also transliterated "Leo", "Lev", "Trotskii", "Trotski", "Trotskij" and "Trotzky") (October 26 (O.S.) = November 7 (N.S.), 1879 - August 21, 1940) was the public name of Leib or Lev Davidovich Bronstein. He was a Russian Revolutionary and Political Theoretician.
Trotsky was a socialist and a Marxist. In 1905 there was a revolution in Russia. Trotsky helped organize a committee of workers in St Petersburg which was called the Soviet. When the leader of the Soviet was arrested, Trotsky became leader of the Soviet in his place. Trotsky helped to expand on the idea of Permanent Revolution, which is a theory originally thought up by Karl Marx.
After the revolution Trotsky left Russia for his own safety. In 1917 he returned to Russia because of the Russian Revolution. He helped to bring about communism in Russia and defend it during the Russian Civil War. He was in charge of the army at this time. When the leader of the Bolsheviks (the party who lead the revolution) Vladimir Lenin died, Trotsky became involved in a power struggle with Joseph Stalin for the leadership of the party. He lost, and Stalin came to power. He had to leave Russia because of Stalin, who was now his own enemy and he wanted to harm Trotsky. Stalin had a spy murder Trotsky in Mexico in 1940.
People who believe in Trotsky's ideas are called Trotskyists and follow Trotskyism. Trotskyism is seen as being a more democratic form of communism than others, such as Stalinism and Maoism. The main Trotskyist organization today is the Socialist Workers Party in the UK and the International Socialist Tendency worldwide.
In the novel Animal Farm by George Orwell Trotsky is represented by Snowball the pig.

Second International
politics
The Second International (1889-1916) was an organization created in 1889 by socialist and labour parties who wanted to work together for international socialism. It continued the work of the dissolved First International, though taking out the still-powerful anarcho-syndicalist movement and unions, and was still there in 1916.
Among the Second International's most famous actions were its (1889) declaration of May 1 as International Labour Day and its (1910) declaration of March 8 as International Women's Day.
The International's permanent executive and information body was the International Socialist Bureau (I.S.B.), in Brussels and formed after the International's Paris Congress of 1900. Emile Vandervelde and Camille Huysmans of the Belgian Labour Party were its chair and secretary. Lenin was a member from 1905.

Ariel Sharon
politics
Ariel Sharon (born February 27 1928) a former Prime Minister of the state of Israel.
Ariel Sharon was in the Israel Army for many years. He fought in numerous battles, and in 1974 he left the army as General. After the army he decided to go to politics.
In 1977, he became Minister of Agriculture. In 1981 he became the Minister of Defence.
In 1983, he was sent away from the government as Minister of Defence after he was found to be guilty for not preventing a massacre in Lebanon where many hundreds of civilians were killed by other civilians.
In 2001, he was elected for Prime Minister after the war between Israel and Palestine started.
In 2004, he surprised many people when he said that Israel will get out of the Gaza Strip, which is the place where many Palestine people live.
In December 2005, Sharon was taken into hospital. On January 4, 2006, Sharon was again taken to the hospital. He had a big stroke (bleeding in the brain). Rumours spread immediately of his death, though these were denied by his physicians. Ehud Olmert, another member of Sharon's newly formed "Kadima" party, was acting Prime Minister until elections were held in Israel, after which Olmert became Prime Minister of Israel.

George Orwell
media
George Orwell (June 25, 1903–January 21, 1950) was an English writer. His real name was Eric Arthur Blair. He used the name George Orwell for his novels.
He was born in India in the times when The British Empire ruled India. He is best known for two novels that he wrote in the late 1940s, "Animal Farm" and "Nineteen Eighty-Four". In those works he criticized totalitarianism in general, and Stalinism in particular.
Orwell participated in the Spanish Civil War, in the antifascists troops.

Jan Peter Balkenende
politics
Jan Peter Balkenende (born 7 May 1956 in Kapelle) is a Dutch politician. He has been the Prime Minister of the Netherlands since 2002. He is a member of the Christian CDA party.
In other countries, he is perhaps most famous because he looks like Harry Potter. This makes him popular with young children, but many Dutch make jokes about it and call him "Jan Potter Balkenende" and other names like that.
Balkenende lives in Capelle aan den IJssel.

William the Silent
politics
William I of Orange-Nassau, (April 24, 1533 – July 10, 1584) was an important leader of the Dutch rebellion against the Spanish in the Eighty Years' War. He was the first leader of the Netherlands.
William of Orange is better known as William the Silent (in Dutch: "Willem de Zwijger"). It is not sure how he got this name. One story tells that when the kings of France and Spain proposed to William to kill all Protestants in his area, William didn't reply.
William was born in Nassau in Germany. The king of Spain made him stadtholder (a sort of leader) about several Dutch provinces. But William converted to Protestantism, the religion of the Dutch people and joined their struggle for independence. The king of Spain offered a reward for the person who would kill William. In 1584 William was shot by Balthasar Gerards in his house in Delft. William's last words were in French: "Mon Dieu, mon Dieu, ayez pitié de moi et de ton pauvre peuple" (My Lord, My Lord, have pity on me and your poor people). Balthasar Gerards never received his reward, because he was killed by the angry Dutch.
In the Netherlands, people often call him "Father of the fatherland". The Dutch national anthem, the Wilhelmus, is about William.

Franklin D. Roosevelt
politics
Franklin Delano Roosevelt (January 30, 1882 - April 12, 1945) was a Governor of New York and the 32nd President of the United States.
Early political career.
Roosevelt was the Assistant Secretary of the Navy under Woodrow Wilson. He was nominated the vice presidential candidate under James M. Cox in 1920. Cox and Roosevelt lost to Warren Harding and Calvin Coolidge.
Roosevelt was elected the Governor of New York in 1928.
Presidency.
Roosevelt was elected to be president in 1932, against incumbent (sitting president) Herbert Hoover, who was very unpopular because of the Great Depression. Roosevelt led the United States through the Depression, and was very popular. He started a series of popular programs known as the New Deal, which attempted to reverse the effects of the Great Depression. Because of this, he was re-elected in a landslide victory in 1936. He was re-elected two more times (in 1940 and 1944) and led the U.S. through World War II.
He contracted a crippling form of polio, a disease which makes it hard for people to use their muscles. His wife Eleanor Roosevelt nursed him back to health to the best of her abilities. Unfortunately, he ended up never having the use of his legs again.
While still president, he died April 12, 1945.

Stephen Hawking
science
Stephen William Hawking, CH CBE FRS (born January 8 1942) is an English theoretical physicist and mathematician. He is one of the world's leading theoretical physicists. A theoretical physicist is someone who uses information from experiments to make predictions about the world. Hawking writes many science books for the public, or the people who are not scientists.
Hawking is a professor of mathematics at the University of Cambridge (a position that Isaac Newton once had).
He has ALS or Lou Gehrig's disease, and because of that he can not move or talk very well. The illness has gotten worse over the years and he is now almost completely paralyzed. He uses a wheelchair to move and an Intel computer to talk for him.
He is one of the most clever living people.
Children's books.
Note: On, he criticises the unauthorized publication of "The Theory of Everything" and asks buyers to boycott the book.

The Star-Spangled Banner
music
"The Star-Spangled Banner" is the official national anthem of the United States. Francis Scott Key wrote the words to it in 1814 after seeing British ships attacking Fort McHenry in Baltimore, Maryland during the War of 1812.
The words are set to the music of a British drinking song called "To Anacreon in Heaven". The song has 4 stanzas but only the first one is usually sung.
Lyrics.
O say, can you see, by the dawn’s early light,
What so proudly we hailed at the twilight’s last gleaming,
Whose broad stripes and bright stars, through the perilous fight,
O’er the ramparts we watched, were so gallantly streaming?
And the rockets’ red glare, the bombs bursting in air,
Gave proof through the night that our flag was still there;
O say, does that star-spangled banner yet wave
O’er the land of the free and the home of the brave?
On the shore, dimly seen thro’ the mist of the deep,
Where the foe’s haughty host in dread silence reposes,
What is that which the breeze, o’er the towering steep,
As it fitfully blows, half conceals, half discloses?
Now it catches the gleam of the morning’s first beam,
In full glory reflected, now shines on the stream
’Tis the star-spangled banner. Oh! long may it wave
O’er the land of the free and the home of the brave!
And where is that band who so vauntingly swore
That the havoc of war and the battle’s confusion
A home and a country should leave us no more?
Their blood has washed out their foul footstep’s pollution.
No refuge could save the hireling and slave
From the terror of flight, or the gloom of the grave,
And the star-spangled banner in triumph doth wave
O’er the land of the free and the home of the brave.
Oh! thus be it ever, when freemen shall stand
Between their loved homes and the war’s desolation,
Blest with vict’ry and peace, may the Heav’n-rescued land
Praise the Pow’r that hath made and preserved us a nation!
Then conquer we must, when our cause it is just,
And this be our motto—“In God is our trust.”
And the star-spangled banner in triumph shall wave
O’er the land of the free and the home of the brave.

Viktor Yushchenko
politics
Viktor Andriyovych Yushchenko (Віктор Андрійович Ющенко) (born February 23, 1954) is the President of Ukraine. On November 26, 2004, he lost the Ukrainian presidential election. However, he and his followers argued that the election had been corrupted. They argued that the election results had been falsified by the Ukrainian government, in support of the opposing candidate Victor Yanukovych. They organized political demonstrations in autumn-winter 2004 that gathered millions of people all over the country. They called the demonstrations "The Orange Revolution". The Constitutional Court ordered a second round of elections, which Yuschenko won.
Yushchenko claimed to have been poisoned by political enemy's. Certainly, he was hospitalized and his appearance shows signs of a grave illness.
His political party is now part of the government with the political party of his old ally Yulia Tymoshenko. She is the leader of the government.

Viktor Yanukovych
politics
Viktor Fedorovych Yanukovych (Віктор Федорович Янукович) (born 1950), was Prime Minister of Ukraine from November 2002 until December 2004 (he was forced to resign (leave office early) on 31 December 2004). He again was Prime Minister of Ukraine from August 4, 2006 till December 18, 2007.
In November 2004, he won the presidential election. Viktor Yushchenko, his opponent, said the result was false. Large daily demonstrations suporting Viktor Yushchenko followed. They where named "The Orange Revolution". Ukrainian Judges decided that there would be new elections in December 2004. Victor Yuschenko won those elections and is now president of Ukraine.
Yanukovych was supported by Vladimir Putin of Russia and by the former Ukrainian president Leonid Kuchma.
Yushchenko claimed to have been poisoned in a bid to silence his "orange power" base. Certainly, he was hospitalized and his appearance showed signs of a grave illness.

Kofi Annan
politics
Kofi Annan (born April 8 1938 in Ghana) was the Secretary-General of the United Nations. His term began in January 1, 1997 and ended on January 1 2007. He was replaced by Ban Ki-moon.
Life.
The United Nations is where all member countries meet to talk about things with each other, to prevent wars. Annan has been Secretary-General of the United Nations since 1997. The Secretary-General is like the president of the United Nations.
Annan was born on April 8, 1938 in Kumasi, Ghana, to an elite family. His parents, Henry Reginald and Victoria Annan, are from the two major ethnic groups that make up the Akan -- one of the groups of indigenous people of Ghana.
His father was half Asante and half Fante; his mother was Fante. The Asante were gold merchants while the Fante tribe were the middlemen in the gold trade between the Asante and the British.
Annan, whose first name means "born on a Friday," also had a twin sister, who died in 1991 from a still yet unknown disease. In Ghanaian culture, twins are considered special and are adored.
Annan probably got his first lessons in politics and diplomacy early on from his family. Both of Annan's grandfathers and his uncle were tribal chiefs. Upon his retirement, Annan's father, who worked as an export manager for the cocoa exporter Lever Brothers, was elected governor of Ghana's Asante province.
In 1954, Annan attended Mfantsipim School, an elite Methodist boarding school in central Ghana established under British rule. The Secretary-General credits the school with teaching him "that suffering anywhere concerns people everywhere." At Mfantsipim, Annan led the student body in a hunger strike to get better food from the school cafeteria. It was a success.
In the early 1950s, while Annan was at boarding school, Ghana was undergoing radical changes. Under the leadership of Kwame Nkrumah, a movement for independence was gaining ground and by 1957 Ghana had become the first British African colony to gain independence. "It was an exciting period," Annan told The New York Times, "People of my generation, having seen the changes that took place in Ghana, grew up thinking all was possible."
His works at United Nations.
Annan became Secretary-General of the United Nations in January of 1997, succeeding Boutros Boutros-Ghali of Egypt. Annan was a U.N. veteran who took his first job with the organization in 1962 and worked his way up through various posts including Deputy Director to the U.N. High Commissioner for Refugees (1980-83) and head of the U.N.'s peacekeeping efforts (1995-96). Annan was the first Secretary-General chosen from the ranks of the U.N.'s staff. He is also the first black man to hold the post and the second African (after Boutros-Ghali). In 2001 he and the United Nations were awarded the Nobel Peace Prize for their ongoing work in global peace and cooperation. His second term began in 2002 and runs through the end of 2006.
Extra credit: Annan attended Macalaster College in St. Paul, Minnesota, graduating in 1961... He was a Sloan Fellow at MIT in 1971-72, receiving a master's degree in management... His wife Nane Annan, a lawyer and artist, is from Sweden...

Andris Piebalgs
politics
Andris Piebalgs (born September 17 1957 in Valmiera) is a Latvian politician. Since 22 November 2004 he has been the European Commissioner for Energy.
He was born in Valmiera and was educated at the University of Latvia in Riga. He worked as a teacher in Valmiera in the 1980s. After Latvia became independent from the USSR he was education minister (in charge of schools) from 1990 to 1993, and finance minister (in charge of money) from 1994 to 1995. He was Latvia's ambassador to Estonia from 1995 to 1997, and to the European Union from 1998 to 2003, when he helped Latvia join the EU. He also helped to start a political party called the Latvian Way.
He speaks Latvian, English, German, French, and Russian, and some Estonian.
Before he was made a European Commissioner Piebalgs worked for Sandra Kalniete, a member of the last Commission.

David Bowie
music
David Bowie was born on January 8, 1947. His real name is David Robert Jones. He was born in Brixton, London, England. He is an important Rock musician, and also sometimes is an actor in movies.
How David Jones became David Bowie.
David Bowie grew up in Bromley, Kent. He played the saxophone, and was a singer in London blues bands. He uses the alias "David Bowie" because "David Jones" sounded too much like Davy Jones (of the The Monkees). He took the name "Bowie" from Jim Bowie, who invented the "Bowie knife".
He became known to the public with the 1969 song "Space Oddity". This was released when men first landed on the moon. The song is based on the movie by Stanley Kubrick.
Ziggy Stardust.
His album "The Rise and Fall of Ziggy Stardust and the Spiders From Mars" was released in 1972. It is one of the best-known David Bowie albums. As a result of his performance, David Bowie became a leader of Glam Rock.
Ziggy Stardust became David Bowie's second personality (alter ego). For a press-conference he would show up as Ziggy. Bowie let Ziggy Stardust come to an end during a liveconcert in the Hammersmith Odeon theatre (London) on July 3, 1973. In 1983 this show was released as movie and soundtrack (Ziggy Stardust - The Motion Picture).
Los Angeles and Berlin.
David Bowie settled in Los Angeles. He experimented with drugs, especially cocaine. A new second personality was "The Thin White Duke". This was introduced on the "Station to Station" album in 1976. Some think this is his best album. The song "Golden Years" scored high in the pop charts.
After releasing "Station to Station" David Bowie moved to Berlin. He was interested in the German music scene, and wanted to end his drug abuse. In Berlin, he started to work with producer Brian Eno. David Bowie, in his turn, was producer for Iggy Pop. The "Berlin Albums" are "Low" (1977), "Heroes" (1977) and "Lodger" (1979).
David Bowie in The Eighties.
David Bowie left Berlin in 1980. The last album at that moment was "Scary Monsters... And Super Creeps". In 1981 he had a big hit with "Under Pressure", together with Queen.
Tin Machine.
In 1989 David Bowie formed a new band. This was his first real band since the seventies. The band was called "Tin Machine". With this band David Bowie recorded three albums: "Tin Machine" (1989), "Tin Machine II" (1991) and "Oy Vey, Baby" (1992).
From nineties to today.
By the nineties, David Bowie had become more interested in soul, jazz and hip hop. This was first noticed on the album "Black Tie, White Noise".
Genres.
David Bowie covers many genres including art rock, hard rock, glam rock, alternative rock, krautrock, protopunk, post-punk, electronica, Blue-eyed soul, New Wave, Industrial, Techno, Jazz, Dance music, Funk, Disco, Experimental rock, Folk, Instrumental, Ambient and house.

Benito Mussolini
politics
Benito Amilcare Andrea Mussolini (29 July 1883 - 28 April 1945) ruled Italy as a dictator from 1922 to 1943.
Mussolini's Life.
Benito Mussolini was named after Benito Juarez in Mexican history. Before being involved in politics, Mussolini was a newspaper editor (where he learned all his propaganda skills).
At first Mussolini was a socialist, but when he wanted Italy to join the First World War he was thrown out of the socialist party. He 'invented' a new ideology, Fascism. Fascism means a system where the state controls very much. Therefore it is called a totalitarian ideology. In 1922, he let his "black shirts" march on Rome. King Vittorio Emanuele III allowed him to form a government, and made him prime minister.
Mussolini wanted Italy to become a new Roman Empire. In 1923, he attacked the island of Corfu, and in 1924, he occupied the city state of Fiume. In 1935, he attacked the African country Abyssinia (now called Ethiopia). The breakout took place in Uol-Uol(source: H.A.Batowski "Between The Wars 1919-1939") His forces occupied it in 1936. Italy was thrown out of the League of Nations because of this aggression. In 1939, he occupied the country Albania.
In 1936, Mussolini signed an alliance with Adolf Hitler, the dictator of Germany. In 1940, he sent Italy into the Second World War on the side of the Axis countries. Mussolini attacked Greece, but he failed to conquer it. In 1943, the Allies landed in Southern Italy. King Vittorio Emanuel III deposed Mussolini and put him in jail, but he was set free by the Germans, who made him ruler of the Italian Social Republic puppet state. When the war was almost over, Mussolini tried to flee to Switzerland with his mistress, Clara Petacci, but he was captured and shot by partisans. Mussolini's dead body was hanged upside-down, together with some of Mussolini's helpers, in Milan.

Ziggy Stardust
music
Ziggy Stardust is a fictional character. Ziggy was created and used by David Bowie, from 1970 to 1973.
Bowie used Ziggy Stardust as a second personality (alter ego). Ziggy appeared to be neither male nor female.
Ziggy's 'life' came to an end in a live concert at Hammersmith Odeon, on July 3, 1973. This show was in 1983 released in a movie: "Ziggy Stardust - The Motion Picture". A 30th anniversary edition was released in 2003.

Jacques Chirac
politics
Jacques René Chirac (born November 29, 1932 in Paris) was the President of the French Republic from 1995 until 2007. He was re-elected in 2002. Before that, he was Prime Minister of France twice.

Bob Dylan
music
Bob Dylan is one of the most famous and successful popular singers of the last 40 years. His birth name was Robert Zimmerman, but he legally changed his last name to Dylan.
He was born in 1941 in Minnesota. As a youth he was a big fan of rock and roll, and formed several bands in high school. However, Dylan first became famous as a folk musician. In 1962, he released his first album, simply called "Bob Dylan". The next year, he released the folk song "Blowin' in the Wind", which became very popular. In 1965, he began playing rock and roll. That year, Dylan released "Like a Rolling Stone", which has been called the greatest popular music song of all time.
The next year, Dylan was in a motorcycle crash which broke his neck. His recovery took many months, and he released no new music or records during this time. Dylan re-examined his life while he recovered, saw what other musicians were doing, and made changes to his own style. His comeback album, "John Wesley Harding", was different from his earlier work. While he made many tours to perform during the mid-1960s, he made very few public appearances until the mid-1970s.
Dylan later became a Christian, then drifted away from Christianity, even re-exploring Judaism, which his family followed. Today he does not want to talk about his religion. Since the 1980s, he has concentrated on touring.
Also, Dylan is one of the famous people who appears on the cover of The Beatles's "Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band".

Diana Ross
music
Diana Ross is a famous American soul and pop singer. She was born in 1944 in Detroit, Michigan. Ross worked as a secretary for MotownRecords in Detroit. She first became successful with a Motown group as The Supremes. The Supremes were the most successful act on Motown in the 1960s. They sold millions of albums and made it possible for other African American musical acts to become famous with international audiences.
Diana Ross had a successful solo career from the 1970s on. She is a high-paid concert performer. She also starred in three movies: "Lady Sings The Blues", the story of the blues singer Billie Holiday; "Mahogany", a story about a fashion designer; and "The Wiz", an African-American version of the book "The Wonderful Wizard of Oz".

Jumanji
music
"Jumanji" is a 1995 movie starring Robin Williams, which was based loosely on a 1982 children's book of the same name by Chris Van Allsburg. It is about a boy who gets trapped in a game for 30 years, and must finish playing the game when he gets out. Other stars include Kirsten Dunst.
The game in the movie (titled Jumanji) has been made into a real game.

Arthur Conan Doyle
politics
Sir Arthur Ignatius Conan Doyle (May 22 1859 - July 7 1930) was a Scottish doctor and author. He is well known because he wrote short stories about the detective Sherlock Holmes. He also wrote science fiction and historical stories.
He was born on 22 May, 1859 in Edinburgh. His mother was named Mary Foley and she was Irish. His father was named Charles Altamont Doyle and he was English. He went to Stonyhurst College. He became an agnostic by the time he left. He studied medicine at Edinburgh University in 1876 to 1871. He wrote short stories in his spare time. In 1882, he started working as a doctor in Southsea. He carried on writing short stories while he waited for patients. His first story that was published was A Study in Scarlet. He died on 7 July, 1930.
Some of his most famous books include The Hound of the Baskervilles, The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes and The Memoirs of Sherlock Holmes.

Ray Charles
music
Ray Charles (born Ray Charles Robinson) (September 23, 1930 – June 10, 2004) was an American musician.
He went to the St. Augustine School for Deaf and Blind and while he was there his mother died. He played jazz, soul, and country music.
Ray Charles was 6 when he started going blind and was completely blind by age 7.
Charles never knew exactly why he lost his sight, though there are sources which suggest Ray's blindness was due to glaucoma. He attended school at the St. Augustine School for the Deaf and the Blind in St. Augustine, Florida. He also learned how to write music and play various musical instruments. While he was there, his mother died. His father died two years later.

Hunter S. Thompson
media
Hunter S. Thompson (July 18, 1937 – February 20, 2005) was an American writer.
He was known for a unique style of writing which he called Gonzo Journalism, where the writer writes about himself trying to write about what was happening around him. He was born and raised in Louisville, Kentucky and spent most of his adult life on his ranch in Colorado. His main topic was the health of the American Dream.

Elvis Presley
music
Elvis Aaron Presley (January 8, 1935 - August 16, 1977) was one of first and most famous American rock and roll's superstars. His fame lasted long after his death. He was also an actor who starred in many movies.
He was so popular that some people know him as only "Elvis". He is also referred to as "The King of Rock and Roll", or just "The king".

Frank Zappa
music
Frank Vincent Zappa (December 21, 1940 - December 4, 1993) was an American musician and composer. He was known for his strange style of music, which was often weird and funny. He made various types of music and many albums. Zappa worked with many other musicans, most notably his 1960s group The Mothers of Invention and his friend and blues singer Captain Beefheart.
Zappa was born in Baltimore, Maryland, but spent most of his life in Southern California. He grew up in the desert town of Palmdale, California. Zappa wrote a very funny song about his life there. It was called "Let's Make The Water Turn Black". It was a true story about two brothers who did some strange things. Zappa had four children with his wife Gail. They gave them all very unusual names: Moon Unit, Dweezil, Ahmet, and Diva.
His most popular song was probably a song he sang in the early 1980s with his daughter, Moon Unit, called "Valley Girl,". The song was based on Moon Unit making fun of some local girls at her school.
Zappa was openly against things like drugs, guns, and censoring music. He often tried to see what he could get away with, which sometimes got him in trouble.
Zappa died from Prostate cancer in 1993.

Thomas Jefferson
science
Thomas Jefferson (April 13, 1743 - July 4, 1826) was the third President of the United States, and author of the Declaration of Independence.
Early life.
Jefferson was born in Shadwell, Virginia. His parents were farmers. Jefferson was very smart and studied many things at school and college. He designed his own home, called Monticello. It was very advanced for that period of time.
Jefferson married Martha Wayles Skelton in 1772.
Political life.
Jefferson wanted the Thirteen Colonies to be independent of Great Britain. He was a leader of those who wanted the same thing. He was a member of the Second Continental Congress. He was chosen to be on the committee that wrote the Declaration of Independence and was its main writer.
Jefferson served as a legislator in Virginia and as Governor of Virginia.
Jefferson was minister to France from 1785-1789.
Jefferson was selected by George Washington as the first Secretary of State. Jefferson thought that the federal government should be small. He had the opposite view of Secretary of the Treasury Alexander Hamilton. He led the party that opposed Hamilton and the Federalist Party. This party was called the Anti-Federalist Party and would become the Democratic-Republican Party.
Jefferson ran for president against John Adams. He got the second highest number of votes and as was the law at the time, became vice-president.
Presidency.
Jefferson ran again as the Democratic-Republican candidate in 1800 and gained a narrow victory over Aaron Burr. He was reelected in 1804. Jefferson made the Louisiana Purchase. Jefferson sent the Lewis and Clark Expedition to explore the land gained by the Louisiana Purchase.
Jefferson had to deal with the threat of war during his second term. Great Britain and France were at war for almost all of Jefferson's time as president. Each side did things that could have made the United States enter the war. Jefferson worked to keep the United States out of the war and neutral.
Later years.
Jefferson created the University of Virginia.
The British burned Washington D.C. during the War of 1812. When they did, many books in the Library of Congress were burned. Jefferson sold his own personal library to replace the lost books.
Jefferson died on July 4, 1826, on the 50th anniversary of the ratification of the Declaration of Independence, the same day as John Adams. He is considered one of the greatest United States Presidents.

H. John Heinz III
politics
Henry John Heinz III (October 23, 1938 – April 4, 1991) was an American politician from Pennsylvania and the great-grandson of the founder of H. J. Heinz Company. He was a member of the United States House of Representatives from 1971 to 1977 and was a US senator from 1977-1991. He was killed in a plane crash in 1991.
Heinz married Teresa Simões-Ferreira on February 5, 1966 in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. The couple had three sons together: H. John Heinz IV, André, and Christopher.

Aquilino Pimentel, Jr.
politics
Aquilino Q. Pimentel, Jr. (born December 11, 1933), also known as Nene, is a politician in the Philippine. He was first elected as a delegate to the 1971 Constitutional Convention. He then went into exile when President Ferdinand Marcos declared martial law. He came back in 1980 and was elected as mayor of Cagayan de Oro City in Misamis Oriental but removed as mayor 1982. He returned as mayor again in 1984. He was elected as an Assemblyman in the Batasang Pambansa (National Assembly), serving from 1984-1986. After the EDSA Revolution, President Corazon Aquino appointed him as Minister of Local Government and Presidential advisor/chief negotiator with the Muslim insurgents in Mindanao. He then was elected Senator (1987-1992). As senator, he authored the seminal Local Government Code. He then launched a bid for the vice presidency in 1992, running under the Liberal Party with Jovito Salonga running for president, finishing fifth among the vice presidential candidates by garnering 9.9% of the vote. He was cheated of victory in the 1995 national elections after running for another term as senator; he took the case to the Supreme Court eventually winning the suit in 2004. In 1998, he ran successfully for another term in the Senate of the Philippines, from 1998-2004. He was also elected as the 19th Senate President, serving from 2000-2001. Most recently he won another seat in the Senate in the recently-concluded May 10 National Elections.
As chair of the Blue Ribbon Committee, he has recommended the prosecution of top government officials of previous administrations in relation to the Expo Pilipino centennial scam and the misuse of the funds of the Retirement and Separation Benefits Systems of the Armed Forces. He has also recommended the prosecution of certain personnel of the Land Registration Administration for involvement in faking of land titles. Recently his committee also conducted series of investigations into the allegation of Governor Luis "Chavit" Singson on jueteng scandal. As Chair of the Committee on Local Government, he has supported far-reaching amendments to further strengthen the role of local government units in national development. He has also gotten senate approval to return the police to the supervision of LGUs and has authored a law to fix the date for elections of ARMM officials.
He is the president and founder of the PDP-Laban party.

Alabama Song
music
The "Alabama Song" comes from the 1930 operetta "Rise and Fall of the City of Mahagonny". The music is by Kurt Weill; officially the lyrics are by Bertolt Brecht, but were probably actually written by Elisabeth Hauptmann. The lyrics for the "Alabama Song" are in English (although a specific type of English) and are performed in that language even when the opera is performed in its original German.
The song has often been covered, perhaps most famously in 1967 by The Doors; unsurprisingly, Jim Morrison changed the lyric "Show us the way to the next pretty boy" to "Show me the way to the next little girl."

Mickey Gilley
music
Mickey Gilley (born March 9, 1936) is a country musician and singer. He is a cousin of Jerry Lee Lewis and Jimmy Swaggart. He is best known for his nightclub "Gilley's" which was featured in the movie "Urban Cowboy" and his hit song "Don't The Girls All Get Prettier At Closing Time".

Jerry Lee Lewis
music
Jerry Lee Lewis (born September 29, 1935) is an American musician. He was born in Ferriday, Louisiana and is a cousin of Mickey Gilley and Jimmy Swaggart. Like other music players who were known by many people around the same time as him Johnny Cash, Elvis Presley, Roy Orbison, and Carl Perkins, he sang gospel and country music before becoming well-known for rock and roll. He was known for his wild style of piano playing and songs like "Whole Lotta Shakin' Going On" and "Great Balls of Fire".
Lewis got a career boost, when he performed on "The Steve Allen Show". His first son was named Steve Allen Lewis, as a tribute.
At a time when Lewis was very popular, people found out that his third wife, Myra Gale Brown, was a 13-year-old distant cousin of his. People thought this was bad, and his career came to an end. In the early 1960s, he made a comeback, but throughout the next two decades (groups of ten years) he suffered many personal problems, including health problems, divorce, people saying that he used drugs and had murdered, and the death of two sons.
Even though he has had problems, he is still active and people think of him as an icon and pioneer of popular music.
A 1989 movie, "Great Balls of Fire", starring Dennis Quaid and Winona Ryder, is about his life.

Jimmy Swaggart
music
Jimmy Swaggert (born March 15 1935) is a televangelist (a preacher who gives services on TV instead of at church). He was born in Ferriday, Louisiana, USA. He is a cousin of musicians Jerry Lee Lewis and Mickey Gilley. He preaches a message called "The Cross" which is that you can only get to heaven through Jesus.
He has also been a very controversial figure, too. He was caught with a prostitute in 1987, but later asked God (and the public) for forgiveness. He was caught again in 1991 and 1995. He also was accused for plagiarizing another minister in 2002 and in 2004, when he joked that he wanted to kill homosexual men.

Johnny Cash
music
Johnny Cash (born J. R. Cash, February 26, 1932 – September 12, 2003) was an American musician. He was often called "The Man in Black" and was best known for his rough voice and powerful music.

Andrew Lloyd Webber
music
Andrew Lloyd Webber, Baron Lloyd-Webber (born March 22, 1948) is a very successful English composer/songwriter of musical theatre. During his career he has produced 15 musicals, the scores to two films ("Gumshoe" and "The Odessa File") and a Latin requiem mass. He has also accumulated a number of honours of which the following are most notable: seven Tony Awards, three Grammy Awards, an Oscar, an International Emmy, six Olivier Awards, and a Golden Globe Award. He was knighted in 1992 and entered the House of Lords in 1997.
Lloyd Webber was married in the mid-1980s to the actress and singer Sarah Brightman whom he divorced in 1990 before marrying his current wife Madeleine Gurdon, a former three-day event horsewoman. His brother is the world-class cellist Julian Lloyd Webber.
Lloyd Webber's lyricists have included Tim Rice, Don Black, Christopher Hampton, Richard Stilgoe and Ben Elton.

Keanu Reeves
music
Keanu Charles Reeves (born September 2, 1964) is an American actor. He is known for his roles in films like the "Bill and Ted" series, "The Matrix" series and "Speed".

Kurt Cobain
music
Kurt Donald Cobain (February 20, 1967 - April 5, 1994) was the lead singer and guitarist of the grunge band Nirvana, which also included bassist Krist Novoselic and drummer Dave Grohl.
Cobain was very influential in popularizing what came to be known as grunge music - a style of rock music that formed in part as a reaction against what people saw as the shallow nature of 1980s stadium rock and over-the-top metal bands (hair metal) with preened images and elaborate stage shows. Nirvana's best known song is "Smells Like Teen Spirit", which was often referred to by the media as an anthem for Generation X and grunge itself. Among other well known Cobain songs are "Lithium", "In Bloom", "Come as You Are", "Heart-Shaped Box", "All Apologies", and the highly controversial "Rape Me".
Cobain suffered a drug addiction that started when he was a teenager. He was a persistent user of cocaine and heroin. Later in his career, he was admitted into rehab several times. On his final visit to a rehab centre, he jumped a wall and escaped to his home. His death was ruled a suicide in 1994. But there is a lot of talk and debate about it.

Mikhail Gorbachev
politics
Mikhail Sergeyevich Gorbachyov (Gorbachev) (Russian: Михаи́л Серге́евич Горбачёв; Pronunciation: mih-kha-ILL ser-GHE-ye-vich gor-bah-CHOFF) (born March 2, 1931), was the leader of the Soviet Union from 1985 until 1991. His attempts at reform led to the end of the Cold War, but although he was not trying to, this helped cause the end of the political supremacy of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union (CPSU), and the break-up of the Soviet Union into smaller countries. He was good friends with Ronald Reagan.
He was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 1990.

Michael Moore
media
Michael Moore (born April 23, 1954) is an American writer and filmmaker. He known for his strong liberal political views. He often uses humor and satire to tell people about his opinions.
Some of his films include the documentaries,
as well as "Canadian Bacon" (1994), a fictional comedy film starring John Candy and Alan Alda.

Shirley Bassey
music
Dame Shirley Veronica Bassey (born January 8, 1937) is a Welsh singer, she is best known for singing the theme songs for the James Bond films, "Goldfinger", "Diamonds are Forever", and "Moonraker".

Captain Beefheart
sports
Captain Beefheart AKA Don Van Vliet born Don Glen Vliet (1941-) was an American singer. He was best known for his collaborations and (sometimes) rivalry, with long time friend, Frank Zappa. He is quite underrated, but remains an inspiration to many "alternative" singers. He is retired from music due to illness and spends his time painting, these days. He was born in Glendale, California. His stage name came from a film project Zappa was writing, but soon abandoned, "Captain Beefheart battles the Grunt People". His acknowledged masterpiece was recorded in 1969, its title: Trout Mask Replica.
He and his group "Magic Band" also produced albums in the early 1980's that received positive critical attention.
Mr. Van Vliet is also a well known painter of abstract primitive art. His work has been shown in gallery presentations in New york U.S. and in Europe.

Theodore Roosevelt
politics
Theodore "Teddy" Roosevelt (1858–1919), was the 26th president of the United States. He was born in New York. He was a member of the Republican Party. Roosevelt passed many laws when he was president to help ordinary people. He used his power to stop big companies and rich people who owned them from making life hard for their workers.
As president, he was interested in what happened in other countries. In 1905, he helped end the war between the Russian and Japanese empires. He won a Nobel Peace Prize for it in 1906.
The popular stuffed animal doll, the "Teddy bear", was named after Roosevelt. He was so popular that his face was put on Mount Rushmore.

Henry VIII of England
music
Henry VIII (June 28, 1491 – January 28, 1547) was the King of England from 1509 until his death. He is best remembered for having had six wives.
Henry was born in Greenwich Palace on June 28, 1491 and was the second son of Henry VII of England and Elizabeth of York. He had one brother, who was called Arthur, Prince of Wales, and two sisters, who were called Margaret and Mary. Arthur should have been king after their father died, but Arthur died before his father, making Henry next in line for the throne. Henry ended up marrying Arthur's widow.
The most important event that happened in England when Henry was the king was the country's change in religion from Roman Catholic to Protestant. Because his first wife Catherine of Aragon had only had one daughter, and they did not have any sons to be his heirs, Henry asked the Pope to give them a divorce. The Pope did not want to do this, because he was afraid of what would happen next. Catherine's nephew was Charles V, Emperor of the Holy Roman Empire, and he was very powerful. Also, Catherine's family ruled Spain, and Spain was the largest Catholic country. Henry then chose a new Archbishop of Canterbury, a man called Thomas Cranmer. Henry knew that Cranmer would do what he wanted, and Cranmer agreed that Henry could have a divorce from Catherine. The Pope was so angry that he excommunicated Henry, meaning Henry was thrown out of the church. Henry fought back. In 1534, he passed the Act of Supremacy, which meant that the king, not the pope, was the head of the church in England. He then forced all priests and bishops to accept him as the new leader. Anyone who refused was punished.
Protestants thought that monasteries, in which Roman Catholic monks and nuns lived, had more money and land than the monks and nuns needed. Henry forced the monks and nuns to move out of the monasteries. Then Henry gave the money and land of the monasteries to men who supported him. Most of the men who received money and land from the closed monasteries were Protestants. This event was called the Dissolution of the monasteries.
After his divorce from Catherine of Aragon, Henry VIII married Anne Boleyn, who was younger than Catherine and still able to have children. When Anne, just like Catherine, only had a daughter and no sons, Henry soon grew tired of her and started looking for another wife. Henry's most loyal official, Thomas Cromwell, helped him to find a way to get rid of Anne, by finding people who said that she had been the lover of several other men. Anne was put on trial and found guilty, and she was executed by having her head chopped off.
Henry's third wife was Jane Seymour. She soon gave birth to a son called Edward. This made Henry very happy, but, after a few days, Jane died. Henry had loved her very much and he never got over his sadness at her death. He lost interest in everything, and became very fat. He became angry with Thomas Cromwell when Cromwell suggested that he should get married again after Jane's death.
After a while, Henry changed his mind. Because he still only had one son, he realised that it might be a good idea to marry again, and he agreed to marry Anne of Cleves, a German princess. When Anne arrived, Henry did not think she was as pretty as she looked in the pictures he had seen, and he was not satisfied with her. Anne was also unhappy, and agreed to be divorced from Henry after only a few months. In the meantime, Henry had noticed a young lady at court, called Catherine Howard, and thought that she might make a good wife. Catherine Howard was a cousin of Henry's second wife, Anne Boleyn. Henry and Catherine got married in 1540, but Catherine was much younger than Henry and she soon got tired of him and started to flirt with other men. After they had been married for just over a year, Henry found out that Catherine had been having an affair with someone else. She was found guilty of treason and was executed, just like Anne Boleyn had been a few years before.
Henry's sixth and last wife was called Catherine Parr. She was a woman in her thirties who had already been married twice. Her first two husbands had been much older than her, and both had died. Henry thought that she would be more sensible and faithful than his previous wives, and he turned out to be right. Catherine Parr stayed married to Henry for over three years, until he died, but they did not have any children.
Henry died on 28 January 1547. He was buried in Windsor Castle. Henry was the father of two queens and one king. They were Mary I of England, Elizabeth I of England and Edward VI of England. None of them had any children of their own.

Paul McCartney
music
Sir James Paul McCartney (born June 18, 1942 in Liverpool, England) is Britain's most successful musician and composer, and one of the most successful musicians in the world. He was a member of the rock band The Beatles, and with John Lennon wrote most of the group's songs.
The Beatles (1962-1970).
McCartney began writing songs before he was sixteen, and has written well over two hundred. His most famous song is "Yesterday", recorded by the Beatles in 1965. Since then around 2000 artists have recorded the song. Other songs written by McCartney for The Beatles are "Can't Buy Me Love", "Hey Jude", "Penny Lane", "Eleanor Rigby" and "Let It Be".
Often Beatles songs would have "Lennon/McCartney" written on the record, and it appeared that they had written it together. In fact, most Lennon/McCartney songs were composed by only one of them, or with one adding only small parts to the other's work. Each counted on the other to help make their songs better, so they agreed to share the credit equally.
Solo Music.
Since the Beatles had stopped working together in 1970, McCartney started a new band called Wings with his wife Linda. Wings also had many hit records, including "Band On The Run" and "Mull Of Kintyre". McCartney wrote "Live and Let Die", which became the theme song to a James Bond film with the same title. Wings disbanded in 1980.
Later McCartney recorded "Ebony and Ivory" with Stevie Wonder, then "The Girl is Mine" and "Say, Say, Say" with Michael Jackson. He and Jackson became friends, but this ended after Jackson outbid McCartney for ownership of the publishing company which owned most of the Beatles's music.
McCartney had other hit songs, and also appeared in a movie, "Give My Regards to Broad Street", with Linda. The theme song from the movie, "No More Lonely Nights", was also a hit, but the movie did poorly, and McCartney's popularity suffered. He had to work hard to prove his talent was still strong. He co-wrote new songs with Elvis Costello, and began touring more often than he had in years.
Along with popular music, McCartney also began composing classical music, including an oratorio about Liverpool. McCartney was knighted for his contributions to music and to British culture, and for his charity work. He bought John Lennon's former school, Quarry Bank, which he then turned into a performing arts school.
Personal Life.
McCartney married Linda Eastman, a photographer, in 1969. She had a daughter, Heather, whom he adopted. McCartney and Linda had three more children together, named Mary, Stella and James. Stella became a popular fashion designer after she grew up.
Linda died in 1998 of breast cancer, which had also killed McCartney's mother many years earlier. He remarried a few years later to a model named Heather Mills, who had a daughter with him named Beatrice. His second marriage wasn't as successful as his first. McCartney and Mills separated in 2006, and planned to divorce. After a long battle over a settlement, McCartney and Mills came to a divorce agreement in March 2008.

John Lennon
music
John Winston Ono Lennon (October 9, 1940 – December 8, 1980) was a member of the rock band The Beatles. After the Beatles stopped making records in 1970, he lived in the United States with his wife Yoko Ono, and continued his music career.
Early life and career.
Lennon started the Beatles in his hometown of Liverpool, with Paul McCartney and George Harrison. After Ringo Starr joined the band, they started to be very successful. People were excited by their music, and their live performances always pleased audiences. Manager Brian Epstein and record producer George Martin helped the Beatles become the most popular act in entertainment.
Lennon played the guitar, and later learned to play the piano. Most of the songs the Beatles recorded were written by Lennon and McCartney. Their songs were always credited as by "Lennon/McCartney" on Beatle records, but in fact they usually wrote their songs on their own. The two men often helped to make each other's songs better, so they liked to share writing credit. Famous songs written by Lennon for the Beatles are "A Hard Day's Night", "Help!", "Strawberry Fields Forever", "A Day In The Life" and many others.
The Beatles grew apart as the members got older. Lennon divorced his first wife, Cynthia Powell, and married Yoko Ono, while McCartney married Linda Eastman. Each wife had different ideas, and encouraged their husbands to depend less on each other. Later, some fans blamed Yoko and Linda for breaking the Beatles up.
Lennon's love for his wife was so strong, that he added her surname Ono to his own name, since she became Yoko Ono Lennon when she married him. He had never liked his middle name Winston (given him by his mother after Winston Churchill) and wanted to simply change it, but British law didn't allow this. He could add a new name though, so he did that. He never used the name Winston again, unless he had to for legal reasons (such as his resident alien "green card" in America). Otherwise he gave his "full name" as John Ono Lennon.
Later life and career.
Lennon and Ono moved to the United States in 1971, and settled in New York City. Ono had a daughter, Kyoko, from an earlier husband, Anthony Cox, who took her and disappeared. It was easier to look for Kyoko, and get the law's help to look, if they stayed in America. Ono and Lennon were also hurt emotionally by the way Ono was treated by many people in England. Some insulted Ono, and asked Lennon why he was with her. On the other hand, most of the people they met in America accepted them together.
Lennon recorded several albums and singles after the Beatles disbanded. The best-known one was "Imagine". He made many records with Yoko Ono. On some records they called themselves the Plastic Ono Band. Lennon and Ono worked with different musician friends, including Ringo Starr, Jim Keltner, Klaus Voormann, Harry Nilsson, Eric Clapton and Elton John. Lennon's solo music was different from his Beatles songs. He spoke more directly about his own feelings, and sometimes used harsh language or loud sounds. This upset a few fans, who wished for more Beatles music from him.
Lennon and Ono were also campaigners for peace in the world. They used Lennon's famous name to talk to the media (television, radio and newspapers) about their beliefs. Lennon and Ono were sometimes in trouble with people like politicians, who did not like the things they said. President Richard Nixon's administration even tried to deport Lennon, because of his political views.
The two things Lennon and Ono wanted most were to live permanently in the United States, and to have a child together. Their lives were stressful in the early 1970s for several reasons. There were the problems with immigrating to the United States, and with the search for Kyoko. The public were also sometimes negative toward Ono, her music, and her ideas. The couple had several miscarriages, caused partly by the stress.
Lennon also had business problems, because leaving the Beatles was not as simple as quitting an ordinary job. The Beatles had signed many contracts. They promised to do things in a certain way, meet deadlines, and work together, to be paid as musicians and songwriters. Many business deals had to be finished or changed, and new deals had to be made, to continue their music careers apart. This took time, and meant making many hard decisions. The four former Beatles could not always agree on what to do with the things they owned together. It took years to work out what to still own in common, what to divide up, and what to let go. The choices they had to make sometimes hurt their friendship.
Lennon and Ono separated for over a year, from late 1973 until early 1975, because of the stress in their lives, and their relationship. Each of them dated another person (Lennon pairing off with May Pang, his and Ono's personal assistant, and Ono with guitarist David Spinozza), and they were nearly divorced. They spoke nearly every day by telephone, however, and tried to work things out. They decided that they wanted to be together more than anyone else could want them apart, and they reunited.
When Richard Nixon faced the Watergate crisis in 1974, it became more important than pushing Lennon out of the country. The deportation case against him was dropped. Lennon won the right to stay in America in 1975. Lennon and Ono also finally had a son, Sean Lennon, that October. Father and son shared the same birthday.
Lennon and Ono stopped making music for five years, to be able to spend more time together, and give Sean as much attention as he needed. They lived on Lennon's income from the music he already made. Ono became Lennon's business manager, and invested his money in real estate and organic farming. Her office was downstairs in the Dakota, the apartment building where they lived, so they were never far apart. Lennon became a full-time father to Sean, and he was proud to call himself a "househusband". They also visited Ono's family in Japan several times, and made other trips.
In 1980 Lennon and Ono began to write new music, as Sean got old enough to begin school. They recorded a new album titled "Double Fantasy" that year. A single from the album, "(Just Like) Starting Over", was a hit, and people welcomed Lennon back. Even people who hadn't liked Ono earlier now respected her, and more of them began to like her music. Lennon and Ono planned to start fresh, do a world tour, and record more albums.
Death and Legacy.
In December 1980 Lennon was shot dead as he was going into his home, by a man named Mark David Chapman who was mentally ill. Even though he was ill, Chapman was still prosecuted for murder, because he killed Lennon. Chapman pled guilty to the murder the next year, and is still in prison. He admitted later he was jealous of Lennon's fame and success, while his own life disappointed him. Chapman thought that killing Lennon would give his own life more meaning. He is always refused for parole, and is infamous (hated by many people).
Fans all over the world mourned Lennon's death. It made them feel that a special part of their lives was gone. Many met in New York's Central Park, near where Lennon and Ono lived, to say their goodbyes. Some played recordings of Lennon's music. Politicians and celebrities everywhere were sorry Lennon had died, even if they disliked him, because his music meant so much to so many people. Radio stations in the Soviet Union, where rock music was rarely allowed to be played, gave an hour over to Beatles recordings.
There was no funeral for Lennon, but Yoko Ono asked people everywhere to observe ten minutes of silence and prayer for him on Sunday, December 14, 1980, at 2:00 PM. At two o'clock, the music playing in Central Park stopped, and people all over the world fell silent for ten minutes. Other tributes came later, including songs by George Harrison ("All Those Years Ago"), Paul McCartney ("Here Today"), and Elton John ("Empty Garden (Hey Hey Johnny)").
Lennon's music (with and after his Beatles years) is still played everywhere, and people are still touched by it. A series of radio programs was devoted to playing demoes of his songs. Young musicians play Lennon's records, and learn his music. Yoko Ono released an album of acoustic versions of many Lennon songs, to help musicians understand them better.
There is now a garden in Central Park in Lennon's memory called "Strawberry Fields" after one of Lennon's most popular songs, which in turn was named after a Salvation Army orphanage near his childhood home. On October 9, 1990, on what would have been Lennon's fiftieth birthday, "Imagine" was simulcast on radio and television stations all over the world, uniting people everywhere to remember Lennon and his music.

Yoko Ono
music
Yoko Ono (February 18, 1933) is a Japanese-born musician and artist. She is the widow of John Lennon. Before she married Lennon she was married to Toshi Ichiyanagi from 1956 to 1963, and Anthony Cox from 1963 to 1969. She has two children, Kyoko Chan Cox (with Cox) and Sean Lennon (with Lennon).
Ono went to London with Cox during 1966, to promote her career as an artist. John Lennon, who was a member of The Beatles, went to one of her art shows. He enjoyed the surreal (fantasy-like) quality of her work. Ono and Lennon became friends, and later lovers, as each lost interest in their spouses. Lennon wanted them to be together as much as possible. He broke a rule the Beatles had never to bring a wife or girlfriend to their recording sessions. He brought her along anytime he could. They were married in March 1969, after they were both divorced.
Many Beatles fans blamed Ono for "breaking up" the band through her influence on Lennon. He seemed to many people to have "gone crazy" since meeting her. The truth was, Ono simply encouraged Lennon to do things he'd already wanted to do, but let himself be talked out of doing in the past – including quitting the Beatles. Ono and Lennon started a new, part-time group they called the Plastic Ono Band.
Ono was Lennon's "muse", inspiring his music and his creative side, for the rest of his life. The two worked together on both his post-Beatles records, and Ono's wish to also have a music career. Ono was trained as a classical musician, studying piano and voice as a child. She was more interested in "avant-garde" music than in classical or popular music. Ono's songs and unique style sounded strange to most listeners. It was offensive to many people, who thought Lennon should have either stayed with the Beatles, or made more music in their style. Ono changed her style, and began to write and record more pop songs, but her music never became popular. Years later, some younger musicians (such as The B-52's) admitted they had liked Ono's music. They were inspired by it, as Lennon had been.
After Lennon's death in 1980, Ono recorded several solo albums. The first was titled "Season of Glass". Her later records were praised by some music critics. They were even enjoyed by some Lennon fans, but the albums never sold well. Ono gave up her own musical career, and became the "caretaker" of Lennon's estate (the things he left when he died) and his non-Beatles work.
When son Sean Lennon grew up, he also became a musician. He helped Ono to compile (collect and put in order) her old recordings, and make some new ones. Ono recently (2006) appeared at the opening of "Love", a Cirque du Soleil show featuring Beatles music, to help promote it.

George Harrison
sports
George Harrison (February 25, 1943 - November 29, 2001) was an English musician. He was born and grew up in Liverpool, England, and was first famous as a member of The Beatles. After the group broke up in 1970, he had a solo career. He made many albums and worked with other musicians including Eric Clapton, Bob Dylan, Phil Spector, Roy Orbison, Tom Petty, and Ravi Shankar. He was also known for his interest in Eastern mysticism and charitable causes.
Solo Music.
George's best-known album was "All Things Must Pass," which he made just after the Beatles broke up. Harrison owned a mansion in England called Friar Park, where he lived from 1970 until he died. He built his own recording studio inside the mansion, which for a time was better than Abbey Road Studios, where the Beatles had made their records. Having a private studio meant Harrison could work on songs and recordings anytime he wanted.
Ravi Shankar came to Harrison during 1971 with news about a war in Bangladesh, where thousands of people had died and millions more were refugees and starving. Shankar asked for Harrison's help to give a benefit to buy food for them. Harrison called on many of his musician friends, who put together an all-star charity concert to help the refugees. The "Concert for Bangla Desh", a live recording, became a best-selling album, raised money for the refugees, and brought worldwide attention to the problems in their country. It also inspired later benefits, including Live Aid in the 1980s.
Harrison found a new musical partner in the 1980s, when Jeff Lynne of Electric Light Orchestra began to write and record songs with him. The two men worked well together and became close friends. Harrison and Lynne formed another band, the Traveling Wilburys, with fellow musicians Bob Dylan, Tom Petty, and Roy Orbison. The Traveling Wilburys recorded two albums, which became hits.
Personal Life.
Harrison married a fashion model, Pattie Boyd, in 1966, but they were divorced a few years later, and had no children. Boyd left Harrison to be with his friend, guitarist Eric Clapton, but all three remained friends. Harrison married again in 1978, to American-born Olivia Trinidad Arias, who had worked for his record company. Arias became the mother of Harrison's son Dhani, whose name is comprised of the names of two notes in the Indian music scale. Dhani grew up to be a musician like his father, fronting the band thenewno2. He went to Brown University in the United States.
In the late 1970s Harrison formed a film production company, Handmade Films, which produced movies including Monty Python's "Life of Brian" and Terry Gilliam's "Time Bandits".
The grounds of Harrison's home, Friar Park, had been more or less open to the public, until the murder of his former bandmate John Lennon late in 1980. Harrison was very hurt and shocked by Lennon's death, and was afraid someone might try to harm him or his family. Afterwards, the gates were locked, and no-entry notices were posted. In December, 1999, an intruder did indeed break into his home, stabbing Harrison with a knife, but he and his wife Olivia stopped the intruder and called the police. Harrison recovered and the man who attacked him, who was mentally ill, was sent to a mental hospital.
Death.
In the 1990s, years of smoking cigarettes caused Harrison to develop throat cancer. He was treated, but the cancer came back later and spread, leading to Harrison's death in 2001. His family issued a last statement from him: "Everything else can wait, but the search for God cannot wait, and love one another." Even music was not as important to Harrison as his wanting people to learn to get along with each other, and to make the world a better place.
A year after Harrison's death, Jeff Lynne, Dhani Harrison, the two remaining Beatles (Paul McCartney and Ringo Starr), and other musicians held the "Concert for George", which remembered Harrison's music, his life, and his gifts to humanity. All the profits from the concert were given to charity.

Ravi Shankar
music
Ravi Shankar (born April 7, 1920) is one of India's most famous musicians. Shankar was one the first to bring aspects of traditional Indian music into Europe and American culture in the 1960s. He was a major influence on George Harrison, who was a member of The Beatles. Ravi Shankar is famous for playing the sitar, an Indian stringed instrument. Although very old now he still plays. In 2005 he played at The Proms. His daughters Norah Jones and Anoushka Shankar are also well-known musicians.

Friedrich Georg Wilhelm von Struve
science
Friedrich Georg Wilhelm von Struve (April 15, 1793 – November 23, 1864 (Julian calendar: November 11)) was a German-born Russian astronomer. He was born in Altona (now an area of Hamburg), Germany, but later lived in Russia. He was an expert on double stars and one of the first astronomers to measure stellar parallax (closely related to the work by Friedrich Bessel).
While director of Dorpat Observatory (1817–39) he wrote "Stellarum Duplicum et Multiplicum" (1837), which proved that double stars are not exceptional and that star systems are governed by the laws of gravity. Struve added a lot to the study of galactic structure and also engaged in notable geodetic operations such as the triangulation of Livonia and the measurement of an arc of the meridian. In 1839 he became director of the new Pulkovo Observatory and was one of the first three astronomers who almost simultaneously obtained an approximate stellar parallax. (One of the others being Bessel)
In 1822 he published the first of many double-star catalogues, the identifying numbers of which are still used today. Struve's stars, however, are now often named in his honor (for example, Struve 2398), whereas the original catalogue prefix was the Greek letter sigma. In 1833 he moved to Russia to set up the Pulkovo Observatory near St. Petersburg, of which he was director until his retirement in 1862, when his son took over in the post. In total, Friedrich Struve produced 272 astronomical works and 18 children; his great-grandson Otto, by contrast, produced 907 works but zero children.
His son, Otto Wilhelm von Struve (1819–1905) succeeded him as director (1862–89) of the Pulkovo Observatory.

Thomas Dolby
music
Thomas Dolby is a British musican and computer designer. He is probably most famous for his 1983 hit, "She Blinded me with Science".

Ralph Nader
politics
Ralph Nader (born February 27, 1934) is an American attorney, politician and political activist. He is most well-known for working for the rights of consumers, for his third party runs for President, and for helping George Bush get elected in 2000. He ran for President in 1996, 2000 and 2004, but failed to win. In the 2008 election, Nader placed third overall, with 660,094 votes, or about.5%. Nader was born in Winsted, Connecticut. His parents, Nathra and Rose Nader, were Lebanese immigrants.

Bob Marley
music
Robert Nesta "Bob" Marley (February 6, 1945- May 11, 1981) was an important Jamaican musician in the 1970s and 1980s. He made the style of Reggae music very popular all over the world. Before him Reggae was almost only known about in Jamaica. His music told stories of his home and the Rastafarian religion that he followed. Some songs were about religion and some songs were about politics.
Bob Marley was born to a black teenager, Cedella Booker, and a white man named Norvall Marley. He got into music in the 1960s with his group the Wailers, that he formed with two friends, Peter Tosh and Bunny Wailer. He was married to Rita Marley. She sang as one of his back-up singers. They had five children together, one is Ziggy Marley who is also famous.
His biggest hit is "No Woman No Cry". In Jamaica he is as famous as a folk hero.

Will Smith
music
Will Smith (September 25, 1968) is an American actor and rapper from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. He got his start as part of the rap duo DJ Jazzy Jeff and the Fresh Prince. He became an actor when he starred on the television show "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air" as Will Smith, a teenager from Philadelphia sent to live with his rich relatives in Southern California. He has appeared in many movies including "Independence Day", "Men in Black", "Ali", "Wild Wild West", and "I Am Legend".

Vladimir Putin
politics
(Russian: Влади́мир Влади́мирович Пу́тин, "Vladímir Vladímirovich Pútin") (born October 7, 1952 in Leningrad) is a Russian politician. He was been the President of Russia since January 2000-May 2007. Before becoming President of Russia, Putin was the Prime Minister of Russia. He had worked for the KGB, and was a lawyer. He is a member of the Russian Orthodox Church. Putin is married to Lyudmila Putina and has two daughters.
From 1985 to 1990 the KGB stationed Putin in Dresden, East Germany. Putin thinks of this as a minor position.
Following the collapse of the East German regime, Putin was recalled to the Soviet Union and returned to Leningrad, where in June 1990 he assumed a position with the International Affairs section of Leningrad State University, reporting to the Vice-Rector. In June 1991, he was appointed head of the International Committee of the St. Petersburg Mayor's office, with responsibility for promoting international relations and foreign investments.
The amount of the actual psychological, financial and, possibly, physical damages that he must have caused to the dissidents in the former Soviet Union and in East Germany is not a matter of any public records at present.
Putin formally gave up his position in the state security services on August 20, 1991, during the KGB-supported abortive putsch against Soviet President Mikhail Gorbachev. In 1994 he became First Deputy Chairman of the city of Saint Petersburg, a position he retained until he was called to Moscow, in August 1996, to serve in a variety of senior positions in Yeltsin's second Administration. He was head of the FSB (the successor agency to the KGB) from July 1998 to August 1999, and also served as Secretary of the Security Council from March to August 1999.
Mr. Putin pledged his support for United Russia party but is not a member of any party at all.

Paula Abdul
music
Paula Abdul (born June 19, 1962) is a American singer and dancer. She had a string of hit songs and choreographed (planned) many dances for herself and others. She is now a judge on the television show "American Idol".

Randy Bachman
music
Randall Charles Bachman (born September 27, 1943) is a Canadian musician. He was a member of the rock groups The Guess Who and later The Bachmann-Turner Overdrive.

J. M. Barrie
media
Sir James Matthew Barrie (May 9, 1860 - June 19, 1937) was a Scottish-born writer. His most famous work was "Peter Pan".

Max Planck
science
Max Karl Ernst Ludwig Planck (April 23, 1858 in Kiel - October 4, 1947 in Göttingen) was a physicist from Germany. He discovered quantum mechanics.
Life.
Plancks family was a family with a long tradition in research in several fields. His father was professor of laws. In his youth the family moved to Munich, because his father got a full professorship there.
School.
Up from 1874 Planck studied physics in Munich, he got his teachers exam in 1878. In 1879 he received his Ph.D., in 1880 he finished his habilitation.
Jobs.
In 1885 he became an extraordinary professor of theoretical physics in Göttingen. In 1889 he became a full professor in Berlin.
Achievements.
In 1900 Plack found out about the laws of thermic radiation and found the quantum theory in that way and in 1918 he got the Nobel Prize for Physics. Up from 1905 he was mentor of Albert Einstein but unlike Einstein, he stayed in Germany in the Nazi time.
Death.
He married 2 times and had 5 children, 3 who died young that left him with two sons.

Steve Martin
music
Stephen Glenn Martin (born August 14, 1945) is an American comedian and actor.
Early years.
Martin was born in Waco, Texas to Glenn Vernon Martin, a real estate salesman and aspiring actor, and Mary Lee Stewart, a housewife. Martin was raised in Garden Grove, California. He is of English, Irish and Scottish descent.
As a teenager, Martin started out working at the Magic Shop at Disneyland. There he developed his talents for magic, juggling, playing the banjo and creating balloon animals. He teamed up with friend and Garden Grove High School classmate Kathy Westmoreland to do a musical comedy routine. They performed at local coffee houses and at the Bird Cage Theater in Knott's Berry Farm. Martin attended Santa Ana College at the same time as actress Diane Keaton.
"It changed what I believe and what I think about everything. I majored in philosophy. Something about non sequiturs appealed to me. In philosophy, I started studying logic, and they were talking about cause and effect, and you start to realize, 'Hey, there is no cause and effect! There is no logic! There is no anything!' Then it gets real easy to write this stuff, because all you have to do is twist everything hard—you twist the punch line, you twist the non sequitur so hard away from the things that set it up, that it's easy... and it's thrilling."
Martin's girlfriend in 1967 was a dancer on "The Smothers Brothers Comedy Hour". She helped Martin get a writing job with the show by submitting his work to head writer Mason Williams. Williams initially paid Martin out of his own pocket. Along with the other writers for the show, Martin won an Emmy Award in 1969. Martin also wrote for John Denver (a neighbor of his in Aspen, Colorado at one point), The Glen Campbell Goodtime Hour, and The Sonny and Cher Comedy Hour. He also appeared on these shows and several others, in various comedy skits.
Martin also performed his own material, sometimes as an opening act for groups such as The Nitty Gritty Dirt Band and The Carpenters. He appeared at San Francisco's The Boarding House among other places. He continued to write, earning an Emmy nomination for his work on Van Dyke and Company in 1976.
Fame.
In the mid-1970s, he made appearances as a stand up comedian on The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson. That exposure, together with appearances on HBO's On Location and NBC's Saturday Night Live (SNL) led to his first of four comedy albums, "Let's Get Small". The album was a huge success.
His next album, "A Wild and Crazy Guy", was a bigger success. It reached the #2 spot on the sales chart in the United States. It created a catch phrase (the album's title). It was based on an SNL skit in which Martin and Dan Aykroyd played a couple of bumbling Czechoslovakian playboys. The album was a million seller.
Both albums won Grammys for Best Comedy Recording in 1977 and 1978 respectively.
Movie career.
Martin's first movie was a short, "The Absent-Minded Waiter" (1977). The seven-minute long movie, also featuring Buck Henry and Teri Garr, was written by and starred Martin. The movie was nominated for an Academy Award as Best Short Film, Live Action. His first feature movie appearance was in the musical "Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band". He sang the Beatles' "Maxwell's Silver Hammer".
In 1979, Martin wrote and starred in his first full-length movie, "The Jerk", directed by Carl Reiner. The movie was a huge success, grossing over $73 million. Martin was in three more Reiner-directed comedies after "The Jerk": "Dead Men Don't Wear Plaid" in 1982, "The Man with Two Brains" in 1983 and "All of Me" in 1984. In 1986, Martin joined fellow Saturday Night Live veterans Martin Short and Chevy Chase in "¡Three Amigos"!, directed by John Landis.
In 1986, Martin was in the musical movie version of the hit off-Broadway play "Little Shop of Horrors" as a sadistic dentist, Orin Scrivello.
In 1987, Martin joined comedian John Candy in the John Hughes movie, "Planes, Trains & Automobiles". That same year, the Cyrano de Bergerac adaptation "Roxanne" won him a Writers Guild of America award. In 1988, he did "Dirty Rotten Scoundrels" with Michael Caine and directed by Frank Oz.
In 2005, Martin wrote and starred in "Shopgirl". Martin played a wealthy businessman who strikes up a romance with a Saks 5th Avenue counter girl (Claire Danes). He also starred in "Cheaper by the Dozen 2" that year. Martin's latest work was in the 2006 remake of "The Pink Panther".

Windows Media Player
sports
Windows Media Player is a digital media player made by Microsoft. It is already installed on Microsoft Windows operating systems, and an older version is available for some Apple Macintosh operating systems. The program allows people to watch certain video files and play music files that are in a compatible format. How the program looks can also be changed with skins, and it can be made small enough to fit on the taskbar.

Socialist Party
politics
In some cases, those parties are more social-democrat than socialist.
See also: Democratic Socialist Party, Social Democratic Party, Socialist Labour Party, Socialist Workers Party, National Socialist Party, Communist Party, List of political parties.

Dave Grohl
music
David Eric Grohl, usually known as Dave Grohl, is an American rock musician and singer. He is best known as the lead singer of rock band Foo Fighters and the drummer of the grunge band Nirvana. He has also been in many other bands, and recorded songs with even more.
Early Life.
Dave Grohl lived most of his early life in and around Washington DC. He played in many local punk bands, on guitar. By 15 years old he was a drummer in the hardcore punk band, Scream. Scream toured all over the United States and Europe but broke up in 1989. After they broke up he tried out to be a drummer in a small band called Nirvana.
Nirvana.
Grohl joined Nirvana in 1990, along with Krist Novoselic and Kurt Cobain. They went on to be one of the most successful bands of the decade, selling over 50 million albums worldwide. Grohl joined shortly before the release of Nevermind. Nevermind proved to be a classic album, one that is still a big influence on the alternative metal and alternative rock scene. The band only recorded one more studio album though, In Utero in 1993. On April 8 1994, Kurt Cobain's body was found at his home in Seattle. He had shot himself in the head with a shotgun. This basically ended Nirvana and Grohl started his own band Foo Fighters in 1995.
Foo Fighters.
The original Foo Fighters album was recorded entirely by Grohl himself. He recorded the parts for each instrument one at a time and then combined them. Foo Fighters are now a multi grammy award winning rock band and sell out huge arenas when they go on tour.

Johnny Weissmuller
sports
Johnny Weissmuller (June 2, 1904 – January 20, 1984) was an American swimmer and actor. He was one of the world's best swimmers in the 1920s He won 5 gold and a bronze medal at the Olympics. He later played Tarzan in the series of movies in the 1930s. He played Tarzan for several movies, and had trouble getting parts in other movies because of this.

Salvador Allende
politics
Salvador Allende Gossens (June 26, 1908 – September 11, 1973) was a physician, senator, minister of health and the President of Chile from November 3, 1970 until his murder on September 11, 1973.
Family and early life.
Allende was born on June 26 of 1908 in the port city of Valparaiso, Chile. Like many Chileans Allende had a mestizo (mixed) racial background (European and other races mixed with Native Americans), his father Salvador Allende (senior) was of Basque descent and his mother Laura Gossens had a Jewish background (though converted to Catholicism).
School.
In 1918 his father sent Allende to study at the "Instituto Nacional" (National Institute) in Santiago, after completing his secondary schooling he does his compulsory military service. After completing his military service he enters the University of Chile to study medicine. Allende was a gifted, friendly and popular student; a great debater and public speaker and quickly becomes a student leader and vice-president of the FECH. (Student Federation of Chile). He graduated with a medical degree in 1933.
Distinguished political career.
He was one of the founders of the Socialist Party of Chile and in 1938 became a minister of health. He was a senator from 1945 until 1969 and was President of the Chilean Senate from 1966 until 1969.
Elections.
Allende first run for the presidency in 1952 but failed. Determined to succeed and win an election he tried again in 1958 and then in 1964. In both instances he failed again.
Allende would tour Chile from Iquique to Magallanes, for example one end to the other, speaking to peasants in the south and miners in the north and held rallies in the big cities. Allende found it hard to win an election because of the successful scare campaigns launched by opposing parties, many financed by large multi-national corporations and powerful national institutions such as private banks and schools.
Results.
Finally, and to the surprise of many working people - who had voted for him in previous elections and felt he would never win - in 1970 he won and became the President of Chile.
Goals.
Allende always ran for election on the same socialist platform (plan) proposing the same resolutions (things to be done), focusing on the persistent inequality in the country and the underdevelopment (poverty for large part of the population) which Allende saw as being rooted in the lack of control the Chilean people had over their natural resources and vital industries. (e.g. Banks, Copper mines, Electricity Companies etc.).
Allende promised that he would nationalize (put under control of government) vital industries and then create an advanced public health system and educational system that would be free and accessible to all. During the cold war (between the U.S. and the former U.S.S.R) many people feared that Chile would fall under the influence of the USSR and after the 1960s under the influence of Cuba.
Revolutionary change.
Allende’s speeches were also very radical (extreme) and Allende’s vision for Chile seemed completely different to the Chile that most people were familiar with. For example: Allende was an atheist and Marxist, for example he did not believe in Jesus or God and considered economic planning more important than anything else. This was odd in a country that was very catholic, held traditional family values, and in which people were taught that political freedoms (the freedom to elect politicians from different parties) was more important than solving problems such as extreme poverty or economic inequality (division between the poorest and the wealthiest people).
Allende also wanted revolutionary change, ie. he wanted deep changes to Chilean society very quickly, such forms of changes have always tended to cause great divisions in society between those who oppose the changes (called reactionaries) and those who support the drastic changes (revolutionaries). Through history such situation tends to always end up resolved violently. For example civil war (where one group of people fight another group of people of the same country), or military coup (when a government is overthrown before it finishes his term).
Results.
As a result many Chileans, especially professionals like University professors, doctors and business people left the country–this had a negative effect on Allende’s reforms. Eg. Allende increased health services and places at Universities for the underprivileged while many professors, specialists and doctors were leaving the country.
Peaceful revolution.
However, Allende was unique in that he did all he could to prevent this sort of violence, calling his revolution a “peaceful one within democracy” or calling it “the Chilean road to socialism.” In 1973 Allende’s enemies accused him of preparing a secret war and that his supporters were hoarding stocks of illegal weapons (in shanty towns and in rural areas) that were being sent from communist Cuba. To prove that this was not true, Allende allowed the Chilean Army to enforce a “weapons control’s law” that allowed the Chilean military to search and comb for any illegal weapons anywhere in the country. The Chilean army confirmed that after thoroughly searching for such weapons throughout the country they had found no significant stocks as the opposition was claiming. This ended up creating more support for Allende and allowed Allende to begin to focus on the upcoming election.
Allende's Mandate.
Allende came to power with a socialist plan. His vision for Chile was one in which the country's resources and wealth would be owned by Chileans and distributed more democratically. Allende started his program by nationalizing (put under control of government) major industries. Such as, Chile's copper mines (Chile had one of the largest copper mines in the World) but these mines were not owned by Chileans but by very powerful U.S. business people.
This created a serious problem with the U.S. government who saw Allende's nationalisation as an attack on U.S. interest and a threat to U.S. money investments in South America.
The coup, September 11, 1973.
The American Central Intelligence Agency was involved in the overthrowing of his government. Allende was a socialist. Many of his reforms and programs revolved around socialism. He created universal health care for all, made education better, and took a stronger level of control within the economy. He died in 1973. His death has been disputed for years; some feel that he took his own life by committing suicide, but others feel that he was murdered by Augusto Pinochet's militia. Pinochet would then become dictator of Chile.
Death and myth.
Allende was replaced by those who bombed him out of his post as president. The new ruling Junta justified their coup claiming that “Chile could no longer tolerate the cancer of Marxism”. The Pinochet regime claimed Allende had violated the Chilean Constitution–strange considering that Pinochet ended up writing a completely new one.
Legacy and place in history.
Allende became of interest to people all over the world because he was the first democratically elected socialist in Chile and the first democratically elected Marxist in the world. Many people felt Allende was the beginning of a new era in which great changes to society - especially in developing countries - could be brought about peacefully through an election

Winston Churchill
politics
Winston Leonard Spencer Churchill was an English politician, who was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom during and after the World War II. Many people say that he is the greatest British leader of the twentieth century. He was also a soldier, journalist, and author. He won the Nobel Prize for literature.
He was born on 30 November, 1874 at Blenheim Palace, Oxfordshire, England, and died on 24 January 1965. His family was rich and well known. His father, Lord Randolph Churchill, was a politician. His mother was American.
He went to a famous school named Harrow. He didn't get good results, but he was good at fighting.
He joined the British Army in 1893. He fought in a war in Sudan in 1898 as an officer in the cavalry. In 1899 he went to the Boer War in South Africa, to be a newspaper reporter. He was captured by the Boers, but managed to escape.
In 1900 he became a politician in the Conservative Party, and was elected to Parliament. In 1904 he changed parties and joined the Liberal Party, but later returned to the Conservative Party.
He married Clementine Hozier in 1908, and had 5 children named Diana, Randolph, Sarah, Marigold and Mary.
World War I.
In 1910 Churchill became Home Secretary, one of the most important members of the government. In 1911 he was made First Lord of the Admiralty, which made him in charge of the Navy. When World War I broke out, he stayed in that job. He organized an invasion in Gallipoli which went wrong, and because of this, he was made to leave the government. He joined the army and was sent to fight in France, although he was still a Member of Parliament. In 1917 he was made minister in charge of military supplies.
Between the wars.
After World War I Churchill was put in charge of war. In 1919 he was in charge of aircraft. In 1921 he was in charge of the colonies. Soon after, in 1922 he lost in an election. In 1924 he became a member of Parliament again, this time not as a member of any party. In 1925 he joined the Conservative Party again. He became Chancellor of the Exchequer (Minister of Finance) in 1924.
After 1929 Churchill disagreed with many things the Conservative party believed in. He was not given any job in the government. Instead he wrote books. One was called "Marlborough: His Life and Times", about his famous ancestor John Churchill, 1st Duke of Marlborough; another was "A History of the English Speaking Peoples", which was not published until after World War 2.
When Adolf Hitler came to power in Germany, Churchill warned that Britain should strengthen its military and oppose Hitler. However hardly any leaders agreed with him.
World War II.
At the start of World War II, Churchill was again put in charge of the Navy. In 1940 the war was going badly for Britain, and the Prime Minister resigned. Churchill was given the job. Some people thought that Britain could not win the war, and that they should make peace with Hitler. Churchill was sure that Britain could win and promised to continue the fight. He made famous speeches which are still remembered today.
He was friends with the President of the United States, Franklin D. Roosevelt. He persuaded Roosevelt to give supplies to Britain, and to help Britain out without fighting themselves. He had many meetings with Roosevelt and with Joseph Stalin, the leader of the Soviet Union, after they came into the war. They were called the "Big Three".
In 1945 his Conservative party lost an election. He stopped being Prime Minister.
In 1951 he became Prime Minister again.
In 1953 he became Sir Winston, and also won the Nobel Prize for Literature.
In 1955 he retired from being Prime Minister.
In 1964 he retired from Parliament.
In 1965 he died at the age of 90 with his wife Lady Clementine Churchill and other members of the family at his bedside.

Nelson Mandela
politics
Nelson Rolihlahla Mandela (born 18 July, 1918) was the first President of South Africa to be elected in a fully-represented democratic election.
Mandela was born in the Transkei region of South Africa. After his father died when Nelson was 7 years old he lived with the local regent, who sent him to school. After he left Fort Hare University in 1941, he went to Johannesburg. In 1944, he helped start the African National Congress Youth League. He was soon a leader in the group. The government saw him as a threat to their policy of apartheid, and they made it very hard for him to keep leading. He was put in jail for this in 1964. In 1990, he was let out of prison after 27 years. He got the Nobel Peace Prize in 1993 together with former President Frederik Willem de Klerk. Mandela was the president of South Africa from 10 May 1994 until 1999. He was considered one of South Africa's greatest leaders of all time and is respected around the world.
He wanted to free South Africa without violence, but when the government started killing and hurting protestors, he started Umkhonto we Sizwe (English: "Spear of the Nation", also MK) with Walter Sisulu and other people in the African National Congress. He admires Mahatma Ghandi and follows many of his teachings.
Mandela is a hero in South Africa and in most of the world because he helped end apartheid. He is also an example of racial equality.
"We stand here today as nothing more than a representative of the millions of our people who dared to rise up against a social system whose very essence is war, violence, racism, oppression, repression and the impoverishment of an entire people."

Archimedes
science
Archimedes (287 BC-212 BC) was a Greek scientist. He was an inventor, an astronomer, and a mathematician. He was born in the town of Syracuse in Sicily in what is now Italy. He was very famous during his life and he may be one of the most clever people who have ever lived. He is now said to be one of the most important scientists and the greatest mathematician of the ancient world.
His father was Phidias, an astronomer.and he may have been in the family of a king of Syracuse. Syracuse was a rich Greek city, on the sea shore in Sicily. When Archimedes was about ten years old, he left Syracuse to study in Alexandria, in Egypt in the school of Euclid, who was a famous mathematician. Not much is known about the personal life of Archimedes, for example, whether he was married or if he had children.
Archimedes in stories (legends).
There are many stories told about Archimedes. Some of them may be true, but many of them may be untrue, or only partly true.
The best known saying of Archimedes was that if he was given a long enough lever and a place to stand, he could move the world. This is meant to show the power of the lever. The lever is perhaps the simplest machine and can help a person to do more work than they would otherwise be able to do. Archimedes was not the first person to use a lever, but he did write about how it worked and what could be done to make it work better.
Another Archimedes story is that a king thought his crown was not pure gold. Archimedes proved that the crown was made from gold mixed with silver. The value of gold was more than that of silver, so the king was deceived. Archimedes was in a bath and thought about what happens when an item is put into water. He found out that different things (such as different metals) with the same weight move out different amounts of water. This is called water displacement and the different metals have different density. When he had this idea, he jumped out of the bath and ran with no clothes on through the streets of the town, shouting "Eureka!" - which means "I have found it"
Archimedes the scientist.
Archimedes is also well known for being the first person to understand statics, which is a part of the study of physics and is to do with loads that do not move, for example in buildings or bridges. He also understood and wrote about what happens when things float in liquids which is called buoyancy. He discovered, that is found out, how many things work and wrote down the new rules and laws that he found.
Archimedes, the inventor and engineer.
Archimedes is also famous as an inventor because he made new tools and machines. For example, he made a machine to lift water that could be used by farmers to bring water to their crops. This is still called the Archimedes' Screw.
Archimedes probably also invented a machine to measure distance, an odometer. A cart was built with wheels that turned four hundred times in one mile. A pin on the wheel would hit a 400-tooth gear, so it turned once for every mile. This gear would then make a small stone fall into a cup. At the end of a journey one could count the number of stones in the cup to find the distance.
Archimedes also made a machine by which one person could pull a large ship with just one rope. This was the compound pulley. This is an important machine even today. /
Archimedes at war.
He also invented or made many machines used in war, for example he made better catapults. This was during the Punic Wars, which were between Rome in what is now Italy and the city of Carthage in what is now North Africa. For many years he helped stop the Roman army from attacking Syracuse, his city. One war machine was called the "claw of Archimedes", or the "iron hand". It was used to defend the city from attacks by ships. Ancient writers said that it was a kind of crane with a hook that lifted ships out of the water and caused their destruction.
Another story about Archimedes is that he burned Roman ships from far away using many mirrors and the light from the sun. This is perhaps possible, but it is perhaps more likely that this was done with flaming missiles from a catapult.
After many years the Roman army took the city of Syracuse. One of the soldiers killed Archimedes, who was then an old man. The soldiers had perhaps been told to catch Archimedes alive, so it may have been a mistake. The story is that Archimedes was killed while drawing a mathematical diagram in the sand. He was so busy with his drawing that he did not see the soldier behind him. His famous last words were, “Don’t disturb my circles!”

Gretchen Wilson
music
Gretchen Wilson (born June 26, 1973) is a popular country music singer. Her career began in 2004.

Tim Rice
music
Tim Rice is a English songwriter and writer. He was born in 1944. Rice is probably best known for his work with Andrew Lloyd Webber on the shows "Joseph and the Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat", "Jesus Christ Superstar", and "Evita". He also co-wrote the shows "Blondel", "Chess" and the English lyrics for "Starmania".
He had a long-term relationship in the 1980s with the actress Elaine Paige.

Fibonacci
science
Fibonacci (around 1175 - 1250) was a famous Italian mathematician. His real name was Leonardo of Pisa or Leonardo Pisano. His nickname Fibonacci was taken from his father, whose name was Bonacci. Fibonacci means son of (a) Bonacci. His mother was Alessandra Larracocci. He was 9 when she died. He had a sister named Saminta. He is considered the "Father of Mathematics".
Fibonacci number sequence.
1, 1, 2, 3, 5, 8, 13, 21, 34, 55, 89...
In this list, a person can find the next number by adding the last two numbers together.
This series is also interesting because the ratio of two adjacent numbers in the series approaches the golden ratio, or Phi, as the numbers get bigger.

Jerry Reed
music
Jerry Reed (March 20, 1937 – September 1, 2008) is an American country music singer and actor. He is know for his songs "Amos Moses", "When You're Hot You're Hot", and "Eastbound and Down". He also acted in several films including "Smokey and the Bandit" and "The Waterboy". He was born in Atlanta, Georgia

Elton John
music
Sir Elton Hercules John (real name Reginald Kenneth Dwight, born March 25, 1947) is a British musician. His changed surname was a reference to actor John Inman
History.
He became famous in the early 1970s when he and songwriter Bernie Taupin wrote several songs which he performed and recorded. John became a huge star, not only for his musical abilities, but for his flamboyant stage personality. He also composed several musicals and the music for the films "The Lion King" (1994) and "The Road to El Dorado" (2000) and is active in charity work. In remembrance of Princess Diana, Elton re-released his hit "Candle in the Wind" in 1997, originally written about Marilyn Monroe. This went on to become the world's biggest selling single of all time.

Tupac Shakur
music
Tupac Amaru Shakur was a popular hip-hop artist, who sold many records. He was born on 16 June 1971 in Brooklyn, New York City in the USA. He was the son of Afeni Shakur, who was a member of the Black Panther party. She had just been released from jail a month before his birth. He died on 13 September 1996 after being shot in a "drive-by shooting" in Las Vegas, Nevada, seven days before. He was also called 2Pac, Pac, Makaveli and also called himself The Don Kiluminati. He also holds the Guinness World Record for the highest selling rap/hip hop artist, selling 74 million worldwide and 44 million in the US alone.

Gregg Allman
music
Gregg Allman (born December 8, 1947) is a rock musician. He was a member of the Allman Brothers Band with his brother, Duane Allman, which popularized Southern Rock in the 1970s. He married Cher, a well-known pop singer and actress after she divorced Sonny Bono in 1974. They had a son, Elijah Blue Allman, before divorcing in 1979. He continues to perform with his band Gregg Allman and Friends and resides in Georgia with his family.

Clint Eastwood
music
Clint Eastwood is an American movie actor and director. He was born in San Francisco on May 31 1930. He has appeared in many movies since the 1950s, most famous being the Dollars Trilogy of Spaghetti Westerns (1964-1966), "Dirty Harry" (1972), "Any Which Way You Can"(1979) and other similar movies. He also won critical acclaim as a director with the movies "Unforgiven" (1992), "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil" (1996), "Space Cowboys" (2000), "Mystic River" (2003), and "Million Dollar Baby" (2005). He lives with his family in Carmel-by-the-Sea, California. He was the mayor of Carmel-by-the-Sea for two years, starting in 1986.
Clint Eastwood was highly popular & loved by fans for numerous years.

The Da Vinci Code
science
"The Da Vinci Code" is a 2003 book by an American man named Dan Brown. It is about codes and secrets. The book is very famous and has been read by many people all over the world. As of 2006, over 60 million people had bought copies, which makes this book one of the most famous books in the world. There are many things in the book that are hard to understand, and it is hard to tell which parts of the book are about real things, and which parts are not true. Because of this, people like to talk about the book, which makes more people buy copies.
The book talks about a religious group called Opus Dei, a famous artist named Leonardo da Vinci, and some famous paintings he made called the Mona Lisa and The Last Supper.
According to Sharan Newman in "The Real History behind the Da Vinci Code", Dan Brown based "The Da Vinci Code" on a book called "Holy Blood, Holy Grail" by Baigent and Leigh. This book was based on some papers found in the National Library of France, and which were forgeries. The papers were written to show that the man who wrote them was really the true king of France and head of an ancient secret society.
In 2006, Columbia Pictures made a movie version. It was directed by Ron Howard and stars Tom Hanks as Robert Langdon.

Silvio Berlusconi
politics
Silvio Berlusconi (born September 29, 1936 in Milan) is an Italian politician, leader of a right-wing coalition named "Casa delle Libertà" (House of Freedoms) and leader of the right-wing party "Forza Italia".
He has been Head of the Italian Government in 1994 and a second time since 2001 until 2006, when he was defeated at the political elections by Romano Prodi, leader of the left-wing coalition named "L'unione" (The Union). This coalition won the elections only for few votes: 24,000 at the "Camera dei Deputati", one of the two Chambers of the Italian Parliament, and only 4 senators more than Berlusconi in the Senate.
Silvio Berlusconi is also the owner of many Italian enterprises, for instance the television network "Mediaset".

Michael Jackson
music
Michael Joseph Jackson (born August 29 1958 in Gary, Indiana) is an American pop singer, dancer, songwriter, record producer. He is known for popularising the 'Moonwalk.' He was married to Lisa Marie Presley, the daughter of Elvis Presley. He was famous first as the lead singer of The Jackson 5. He recorded the highest-selling album of all time, "Thriller", in 1982. "Thriller", which includes famous songs like "Beat It" and "Billie Jean", has sold 104 million copies worldwide. Jackson wrote other well-known songs such as "Bad", "Black or White", "Heal the World" and "Earth Song". He is also called the "King of Pop". He is currently working on an album of new song's, his first since "Invincible" (2001).
This new album is called Thriller 25, released early in 2008. This has all the songs from the original 'Thriller' album with new songs, and varied songs for 2008. A compilation album has also been produced called 'King of Pop' which is his greatest hits. This was released in mid-2008.
Studio albums.
NICK PENN is the best no home

Daily Mail
media
The Daily Mail is a large well-known newspaper printed in Britain. It is published, from a factory in London, every weekday and Saturday in London, England. It is not printed on Sundays. Its sister paper, the Mail on Sunday, is printed instead.
It is the second most sold newspaper in Britain and sells more than a million copies a day. Its political opinion is right-wing and supports the Conservative Party in elections. The newspaper is available in many countries outside Britain, such as Egypt and the USA. There is a different Scottish edition of the newspaper which is sold in Scotland only and differs mainly in the Sport pages. There is also an Irish version of the newspaper, but the main international version is the English one. It is the principal publication of the Daily Mail and General Trust, but the company also prints the Evening Standard, London Lite and Metro newspapers in the UK.

Javier Solana
politics
Dr. Javier Solana Madariaga (born July 1942) is the former Secretary General of the North Atlantic Treaty Organisation (NATO) and the current European Union foreign policy chief. Born in Madrid, Spain he became a physicist, studying in both the United Kingdom and the United States before returning to Spain with Nicolás Cabrera, and becoming a Profesor of solid state physics in the Complutense University.
Having already joined the banned PSOE left-wing party in 1964, he became one of its leaders when it became legal in 1977. He became a Cabinet Minister, serving first as Minister for Culture and party spokesman, then Minister for Education, then Minister for Foreign Affairs, before being made NATO boss in December 1995, just as the Dayton agreement saw the IFOR NATO peacekeeping mission enter the former Yugoslavia. He was also involved in the Kosovo bombings, and the negotiations that led to an eventual peace.

United Russia
politics
United Russia (Russian: "Единая Россия") is a Russian political party, which usually labels itself centrist. It backs the president Vladimir Putin and can be seen as his vehicle in the Duma.

Filippo Azzaiolo
music
Filippo Azzaiolo (1530 - 1569) was an Italian composer. He lived in 16th century. Azzaiolo worked in Bologna.
All his known songs are composed between 1557 and 1569. Azzaiolo's most famous song is "Chi passa".

Eminem
music
Eminem (Real name: Marshall Bruce Mathers III, stage names Slim Shady and Eminem) (born October 17, 1972) is a famous rap artist from Detroit.
Eminem has a daughter named Hailie Jade Scott Mathers and an ex-wife named Kimberley Anne Scott Mathers. Kim and Eminem married in 1999, but after debuting the 2000 hit, "Kim", they separated the following year.
Albums.
He is now thinking about what to do next. The rumor that he will retire may or may not be true, but it was denied by Eminem, who said that he is just taking time out to see what he wants to do next.
He has a movie called "8 Mile" that is semi-autobiographical (about himself). The song "Lose Yourself", which was from the movie, won an Oscar award and is his biggest hit to date.

Karlheinz Stockhausen
music
Karlheinz Stockhausen (August 22, 1928 - December 5, 2007) was a German composer. He was the most important German composer in the years after World War II. During this time composers were exploring many new ideas. Stockhausen used serialism in new ways, and he invented many ways of composing electronic music. His works include an opera cycle "Licht" which consists of seven operas.
Life.
Stockhausen was born near Cologne. His father was a village schoolteacher. His mother was put in a sanatorium in 1933 where she died in 1942. She was probably killed there because the Nazis thought people who were mentally ill should not be allowed to live.
Stockhausen was a young man during the war. He trained to be a teacher and was sent to work in a military hospital near where the army was. His father died fighting in the war. After the war, with no parents, he went to work on a farm. Then, in 1947, he went to study at the Cologne Musikhochschule. He played the piano in bars and clubs and he improvised at the piano when playing for a magician’s magic shows. He was thinking of becoming a writer.
At this time many of Germany’s important composers met every summer in Darmstadt. The course was called Darmstadt Holiday Course for New Music. Stockhausen went there in 1951. There he performed some modern music and met important people such as the music critic and philosopher Theodor Adorno. He heard the music of Messiaen and, soon after marrying, he went to Paris to study with Messiaen. In Paris he met Pierre Boulez and Pierre Schaeffer who was working on musique concrète. He experimented with different sounds that percussion instruments can make, and he started composing electronic music. When he went back to Cologne he worked in a studio for electronic music where he studied communications theory. By this time Stockhausen, Boulez and Nono were the leading composers of avant garde (experimental) music.
Stockhausen made Cologne an important centre for electronic music. He also helped to make the Darmstadt Summer Courses a famous centre for modern music. He did not invite John Cage to lecture there in 1958. This led to disagreements with Boulez and Nono. In California in 1967, Stockhausen married his second wife who was a painter. During the 1960s he bought land in the country near Cologne and had a house built there. Stockhausen did not design the house himself, because he was not an architect.
Stockhausen was by now world famous. He toured the United States and many other countries with a small group of musicians performing modern music. His music was not only listened to by fans of classical music but was also becoming part of popular youth culture. His picture was included on the front cover of the Beatles’s record Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band. The record company Deutsche Grammophon sold more copies of his music than of any other modern composer except Stravinsky.
During the 1970s Stockhausen became even more popular. This was partly because other music, like the other arts, had become political and very left-wing in the 1960s, which made people angry. It was also partly because audiences wanted a change from music that was very complicated, and Stockhausen's music had become much simpler. His most popular compositions are "Tierkreis" (1974–75) and "In Freundschaft" (1977). Stockhausen broke with his publisher and started to publish his music himself. From 1977 to 2003 Stockhausen composed "Licht" ("Light"), a set of seven operas named for the days of the week.
Stockhausen died on 5 December 2007.
His music.
In some student works Stockhausen used twelve tone composition. He became interested in Messiaen and his composition "Kreuzspiel" shows Messiaen’s influence. In "Kontra-Punkte" (1953) the music starts with very small bits played by ten instruments. Gradually these little bits come together and at the end the music concentrates on the piano.
From 1953 he worked seriously at electronic music. He thought that electronic music was going to be the music of the future. His "Gesang der Jünglinge" is a multi-track work, using 5 tracks (later reduced to 4). "Gruppen" ("Groups") is a work for three orchestras and three conductors. They sit in different parts of the concert hall and play at different speeds at the same time. His piano piece "Klavierstück XI" ("Piano Piece eleven") shows no influence of John Cage at all. The music is written on a huge sheet of paper and the pianist decides as he plays which part of the music to go to next and how to play it. This means that each performance of the work is different. This is not “chance” music, but "mobile" music.
He continued to experiment with new ideas. "Kontakte" is a work for piano, percussion and electronic music (the tape has been prepared beforehand). He composed “live electronic” music beginning in the 1960s. This means using electronics to change the sound of normal instruments that are amplified. His operatic cycle "Licht" was started in 1977 and took him 26 years to complete. There are seven operas: one for each day of the week. Some of the music for this includes microtonal scales, in which the notes are tuned so that they are less than a semitone apart.

Amerie
music
Amerie (her full name is Amerie Rogers) (born January 12 1980) is an American R&B singer.

Angela Merkel
politics
Dr Angela Dorothea Merkel (born 17 July 1954, in Hamburg) is a German politician, and the Chancellor of Germany since 22 November 2005.
She was born in Hamburg, and grew up in the German Democratic Republic (which was the old East Germany, before the two Germanys became one) where she lived until the Reuniting of Germany in 1990. Merkel is now married to Joachim Sauer, a professor of chemistry. Angela Merkel currently chairs (is in charge of) the German conservative party, the Christian Democratic Union of Germany (CDU).
Merkel became Germany's first female chancellor on 22 November 2005 in a coalition of the two biggest German political parties CDU/CSU and SPD.

Stevie Wonder
music
Stevie Wonder was born on May 13, 1950 in Saginaw, Michigan. His real name is Steveland Hardaway Judkins but he changed his last name to his mother's married name, Morris.
He is an American singer, songwriter, producer, musician, humanitarian, and social activist. He has been blind nearly since his birth. Wonder became one of the most successful and well-known artists on the Motown label. He has recorded 23 albums and many hit singles, and written and produced songs for many of his labelmates and other artists as well. Wonder plays the drums, guitar, synthesizers, congas, and most famously the piano, harmonica, and the keyboard.

The Times
media
"The Times" is a large well-known newspaper. It is printed in London, England.

Ringo Starr
music
Ringo Starr (born Richard Starkey on July 7, 1940) is a musician and actor. He is most famous as a member of the Beatles. He joined the group in 1962 as a replacement for their original drummer Pete Best. He quickly became well-liked and very popular. He sang lead on some of the band's songs including "Yellow Submarine", "Act Naturally", "Don't Pass Me By", and "Octopus's Garden".
After the group broke up he became a solo artist; his songs included "It Don't Come Easy", "Photograph" (cowritten with George Harrison), "You're Sixteen" (featuring Paul McCartney and Harry Nilsson), and "Only You (And You Alone)" (with John Lennon and again with Nilsson).
Starr acted in several movies aside from the ones he did with the Beatles, including "The Magic Christian" (1969), "That'll Be The Day" (1973), "Caveman" (1980), and the role of Mr. Conductor on the children's show "Shining Time Station", during its first season (1989). (Comedian George Carlin later took over the role). He also narrated the children's show "Thomas the Tank Engine and Friends" for the first two seasons (1984).

Lincoln Thompson
music
Lincoln Thompson (June 18, 1949 - January 23, 1999) was a Jamaican reggae musician, songwriter and Rastafarian. He spent 2 years in the Tartans as a teenager before working under Coxsone Dodd in the early 1970s. In 1974 he released his first record, "Humanity". While it produced hit singles it was not given commercial exposure until Thompson made a deal with Ballistics, a subsidiary of United Artists, in 1979. This album was released commercially and there were 2 follow-up albums that he recorded in 1979 and 1980. "Experience" was recorded in Jamaica, while the follow up "Natural Wild" was recorded in England with Joe Jackson. Ballistics went bankrupt, but Thompson was able to salvage enough to return to Jamaica, where he recorded a further album, "Ride with the Rasses" in 1982. The following year he took his family to live in London where he recorded a 5th album, "Rootsman Blues". He then set up an Ital food grocery shop in London. Thanks to an American sponsor a 6th album came out in 1996, called "21st century". He died of cancer.

Michael Nesmith
music
Michael Nesmith is an American musician, songwriter, actor, producer, novelist, businessman and philanthropist.
He was born in Dallas, Texas on December 30, 1942. His mother, Bette Nesmith Graham invented Liquid Paper in 1951 and made the family very rich. In the 1960s, he moved to Los Angeles to start a recording career, he wrote the song "Different Drum" which was a hit for Linda Ronstadt and the Stone Poneys. In 1966, he became a member of the Monkees, a made-for-TV rock band, he left the group in 1969 and started a solo career. He is considered one of the forefathers of the country-rock movement of the 1970s with his song "Joanne", he also worked as a producer and is considered one of the pioneers of the music video industry. Nesmith's 1981 video-film "Elephant Parts" won the first Grammy award for a music video

Peter Tork
music
Peter Tork is an American actor and musician. His real name is Peter Halsten Thorkelson and he was born on February 13, 1942. He started as a folk musician in Greenwich Village. In 1966, he became famous as a member of The Monkees. He was recommended for the group by his friend Stephen Stills. Shortly after The Monkees TV show was cancelled in 1968, he left. Although he played with the other members of the group sometimes, he still plays with his own bands and tours frequently.

Micky Dolenz
music
George Michael Dolenz (born March 8, 1945), better known as Micky Dolenz is an American actor, singer, director, and voice artist. He is most famous as a member of The Monkees.

Dominique de Villepin
politics
Dominique Marie François René Galouzeau de Villepin (born November 14, 1953), simply known as Dominique de Villepin, was appointed Premier (or Prime Minister) of France on May 31, 2005. He was made Premier by Jacques Chirac after the French President removed Jean-Pierre Raffarin from the premiership. Raffarin failed to gain the support of the French people for the European Constitution. Villepin stepped down as Prime Minister on May 17, 2007.
Dominique de Villepin said that his government's most important task would be job creation. He knew that the French people were concerned about the condition of the French economy. This was one of the reasons they had voted against the European Constitution in the referendum on May 29, 2005,

Francis Drake
sports
Vice Admiral Sir Francis Drake (around 1540 – January 28, 1596) was an English
sailor and explorer. Beginning around 1563, he and his cousin, Sir John Hawkins became the first Englishman to sell slaves from Africa in the New World. In Panama in 1573, he captured a fortune in silver and gold that the Spanish had seized from the Native Americans, and became the first Englishman to see the Pacific. He was also the first Englishman to sail all the way around the world. Because of this, he was made a knight by Queen Elizabeth I. Later, he was second in command of the English fleet which defeated the Spanish Armada in 1588.
Sir Francis Drake's ship was called 'The Golden Hind'.
Sir Francis Drake was the second man to sail around the whole world with two of his ships intact

Hank Aaron
sports
Henry Louis Aaron (born February 5, 1935) is a baseball player. He played baseball professionally for 22 years, and hit 755 home runs. No other baseball player has hit as many home runs as he has. Even though he has 755 home runs in his career, he never hit 50 or more in a season.

Lenny Kravitz
music
Leonard Albert "Lenny" Kravitz (born May 26, 1964) is an American singer, songwriter and musician.

Louis Braille
music
Louis Braille (born January 4, 1809, died January 6, 1852) was a French inventor who invented the "Braille" system, which helps blind people read. Braille is read by passing one's fingers over characters made up of an arrangement of one to six embossed points. It has been adapted to almost every known language.
Louis Braille was the child of a saddle-maker. He was the youngest of four children. He became blind at the age of three. He accidentally stuck an awl into one eye. There were no antibiotics and soon his injured eye was infected. It spread to his other eye and soon, he became blind in both eyes. He went to the Royal Institute of Blind Youth at the age of ten. Braille was a good student, especially when it came to science and music. Later he became a church organist. He was also a teacher at the Institute of Blind Youth. Louis Braille died at the age of 43 due to tuberculosis.

Eric Clapton
music
Eric Patrick Clapton (born on March 30, 1945, in The Green, Ripley, Surrey, England), is an English guitarist, singer and composer. Clapton was the son of a sixteen-year-old, Patricia Clapton, and Edward Fryer, a Canadian soldier stationed in England.
Early Years.
Clapton's father, who already had a wife, returned to Canada after World War II. His mother, was not able to bear the shame of raising an illegitimate child (a child of unmarried parents) in post-war Britain. She left Clapton with his grandparents Jack and Rose Clapp (Clapton by her first marriage) and moved to Germany where she married another Canadian soldier. Clapton was raised believing his mother was his sister. His grandmother did not tell him the truth until he was nine years old.
A polite and well-behaved boy, the young Clapton was an above-average student, though in 1956 he failed the eleven-plus and went to St. Bedes Secondary Modern School. Two years later however, he passed the review and went to 13-plus on the strength of my art accomplishment and got a scholarship to a school in Tolworth, near Surbiton. He liked art very much. He wanted to learn to play the guitar after watching Jerry Lee Lewis on television. Eric's obsession with playing Blues music caused him to be expelled from Kingston College of Art because he was playing the guitar in class.
Working as a labourer to pay his way, Eric spent most of his free time playing his electric guitar. Eventually he joined a local band, The Roosters. He later joined Casey Jones And The Engineers with fellow band member Tom McGuiness. In 1963, Clapton was asked to join The Yardbirds. It was in the Yardbirds that he earned his nickname of 'Slowhand'. The name came from his forceful string-bending that often caused broken guitar strings. He would replace the strings on stage while the crowd slowly clapped their hands.
After about 18 months with the Yardbirds, musical differences led Eric to move on to John Mayall's Bluesbreakers, where his talent grew even more. It was at this part in his career that Eric's fans gave him his second, and ultimate, nickname - "God"!
Cream.
In mid-1966 he left the Bluesbreakers, whose members had grown to include Jeff Beck and Jimmy Page. The band he formed with bassist Jack Bruce and drummer Ginger Baker would become Eric's best-known band - Cream. Cream became the "pre-eminent rock trio of the Sixties" (The best rock band if the 1960s). Problems between Baker and Bruce, and the increasing drug use of three members caused problems that eventually made the band breakup in 1969.
Also during 1969, Clapton worked with Beatle John Lennon and his new wife Yoko Ono. They called themselves the Plastic Ono Band. He performed with them onstage in Toronto that September. He also played guitar on "Cold Turkey", Lennon's song about heroin addiction. At that time, the Beatles were getting ready to break up. Lennon thought about asking Clapton to join his and Ono's new band, but decided not to have a permanent lineup.
1970's.
Clapton and Baker joined with Rick Grech and Steve Winwood to form rock's first ever supergroup, Blind Faith. Blind Faith lasted only a few months, and released one album. After Blind Faith broke up, Clapton formed another band, called Derek and the Dominoes. Their most popular song was "Layla". However, Clapton sank into Heroin addiction in 1971 and was inactive totally throughout 1972, as he became a recluse. However, he performed a comeback concert at the Rainbow Theatre in London on January 13, 1973. However, it was not until July 1974 when he launched a new album.
The inspiration for "Layla" was fashion model Pattie Boyd. She was married to Clapton's friend, fellow musician (and former Beatle) George Harrison. Clapton was in love with Boyd. He was not happy because he could not be with her because she was married to someone else. In time, Boyd and Harrison grew apart, and Clapton and Boyd got together. They got married in May 1979. All three remained friends, and Clapton and Harrison called themselves "husbands-in-law", though for some years afterwards, the friendship between them was understandably strained. Clapton and Boyd were divorced in 1989, after they also grew apart.
Later Years.
Along with his drug problems, Clapton had trouble with alcohol, sometimes drinking a whole bottle or more of liquor in a day. In the 1990s, he was finally able to stop drinking alcohol. He also found out more about his father, who had died, and about a half-brother (by his mother) he had never met, who was mentally challenged and lived in a hospital.
Clapton is still making music and performing, sometimes with other musicians such as B.B. King.

Lyndon B. Johnson
politics
Lyndon B. Johnson (August 27, 1908 – January 22, 1973) was the 36th president of the United States. He is probably best known for increasing U.S. involvement in Vietnam.
Johnson took over the presidency when President Kennedy was killed in November 1963.

Hillary Rodham Clinton
politics
Hillary Diane Rodham Clinton (born October 26, 1947) is the junior United States Senator from New York and President-elect Barack Obama's nominee for United States Secretary of State. She is married to the former President of the United States Bill Clinton. When her husband was president, she was given the title of First Lady of the United States. She was a candidate in the 2008 election of a new President. She is a member of the Democratic Party.
She is a lawyer and was the First Lady of Arkansas before being First Lady of the United States. She began her first term as Senator January 3, 2001.
Hillary Clinton was the first First Lady to win election to public office. She ran for re-election to the Senate in 2006, which she won, and was considered by many in the media and politics as having a good chance to win in the race for the Democratic Party's US presidential nomination in 2008, but she lost to Barack Obama.
Early life and education.
Hillary Diane Rodham was born in Chicago, Illinois. Her father's name is Hugh Rodham, Sr., and her mother is Dorothy Emma Howell Rodham. She has two brothers, Hugh and Tony.
She studied at Maine East High School and Maine South High School. She completed her schooling in 1965, and enrolled at Wellesley College in Massachusetts.
In 1969, Rodham entered Yale Law School. She received a Juris Doctor (J.D.) degree from Yale in 1973. Then, she began a year of post-graduate study on children and medicine at the Yale Child Study Center.
Marriage and family.
While working as a faculty member at the Law School of the University of Arkansas, she married Bill Clinton. Bill Clinton was also working as a faculty at the same university. Both knew each other and were classmates at the Yale Law School. Their only child is Chelsea Clinton, born on 27 February 1980.
First Lady of the United States.
When she was First Lady, she tried to change the health care system. Some people didn't like it when the planning meetings were kept secret away from the public. In the end, too many people did not want the changes that she wanted.
Another major event during the time she was First Lady was when the public found out that Bill Clinton was with another woman, Monica Lewinsky. There was stress in the marriage partly because Bill Clinton had to go to trial (impeachment) because he was accused of lying to the court (during a deposition).
Senate.
When she decided that she wanted to be Senator, she chose New York even though she never lived there. Some accused her of "carpetbagging" because of this. She went on to win the election and won a second term in 2006.
When the war between the United States and Iraq was about to start, she voted in favor of the war. Now she is opposed to the war and wants American troops to stop fighting rebel Iraqis.
Presidential campaign.
Hillary Clinton had raised more money than anybody else in the 2008 Presidential campaign, but later had big money problems for her campaign by May 7. She did not get picked by her party, the person who did was Barack Obama, but she campaigned for Obama after this.
United States Secretary of State nomination.
In mid-November 2008, Obama and Clinton talked about whether she could be the next U.S. Secretary of State in his presidency. On November 21, there were reports that said Hillary Clinton had accepted his offer.
On December 1, President-elect Obama announced that Clinton would be his nominee for Secretary of State.

Faith Evans
music
Faith Evans was born in Lakeland, Florida on 10 June 1973. She grew up in Newark, New Jersey. She is an American R&B singer. She used to have a husband named The Notorious B.I.G. but he died because he was shot. Once she was arrested for having the illegal drugs called cocaine and marijuana.

Barry Switzer
sports
Barry Switzer (born October 5, 1937 in Crossett, Arkansas) was an American football coach. He coached both professional and college football between 1962 and 1997. Switzer is one of only two head coaches to win both a college football national championship and a Super Bowl. He has one of the highest winning percentages in the history of college football.
After high school, Switzer went to the University of Arkansas. He played football there from 1956 to 1960. After graduation, Switzer join the US Army for a short time. After the Army, he returned to the University of Arkansas to work as an assistant coach.
After the 1966 season, Switzer became an assistant coach at the University of Oklahoma. He became head coach there in 1973. During his first two years as head coach, Oklahoma did not lose any games and won the national championship two time. They won the championship a third time in 1985. Switzer left Oklahoma in 1989. His record there was 157 wins, 29 losses and 4 ties.
In 1994, Switzer became the coach for the Dallas Cowboys. He led them to a win in Super Bowl XXX during the 1995 season. Switzer retired from coaching after the following season.
In 2002, Switzer was elected into the College Football Hall of Fame. On September 9, 2007, he began working with the FOX television network on its NFL pre-game show.

Paul Simon
music
Paul Simon (October 13, 1941) is an American musician and songwriter. He first became famous as a member of Simon and Garfunkel, with his friend, Art Garfunkel. He wrote their songs. The two went their separate ways in the early 1970s and since then Simon has become a successful solo artist.
Some of Simon's most famous songs include "Slip Sliding Away", "American Tune", "Late in the Evening", "Still Crazy After All These Years", "Me and Julio Down By the School Yard" and "50 Ways to Leave Your Lover". His 1986 album "Graceland" is very well-known. He is 65 now, and is still producing music. His newest album is called "Surprise."
Simon has received three honorary doctorates in music, including one from Yale University.

Shirley Jones
music
Shirley Jones (March 31,1934) is an American actress and singer. She appeared in movies like "Oklahoma!", "The Music Man", and "Carousel". She is perhaps most famous for her role as Shirley Partridge on the TV show, "The Partridge Family". She was married to Jack Cassidy, from 1956 to 1977, and had three sons with him, Shaun, Patrick, and Ryan. Her stepson is David Cassidy who co-starred with her on The Partridge Family. After she divorced Cassidy she married Marty Ingels on November 13, 1977.

Madonna (entertainer)
music
Madonna Louise Ciccone (born in Bay City, Michigan, United States, on August 16, 1958), simply known as Madonna, is a popular American singer, actress and author of books.
Madonna now lives in the UK. She has made many albums over the years; some of the more famous ones are "Like a Virgin", "Like a Prayer", and "Ray of Light".
She has also been an actress in many movies. She is a mother of two children, Lola and Rocco. She also recently adopted a Malawian child, David Banda. She has won six Grammy awards.
Her album, "Confessions on a Dance Floor", went to number one on music rating charts in many countries. Over the years she has sold 200 million albums.
Lourdes is Madonna's daughter real name. Lola would be a kind of nickname.
Madonna released a new album named "Hard Candy" in April 2008. She made it with Timbaland and Pharrell Williams. She called the CD "Hard Candy" because her favourite food is candy and it is hard. The leading single is called '4 Minutes' and it is a duet with singer Justin Timberlake. They both sing in the song since it's a duet. The second single is called 'Give It 2 Me' and Madonna made it with Pharrell Williams. Third and last single will be 'Miles Away'.

Brittany Murphy
music
Brittany Murphy (born November 10, 1977 in Atlanta, Georgia) is an American actress. She appeared in many movies and is the voice of Luann on the American television show "King of the Hill".

Václav Klaus
politics
Václav Klaus (born June 19, 1941) is the president of the Czech Republic.

Barbra Streisand
music
Barbra Streisand (born April 24, 1942 in Brooklyn, New York) is an American singer, actress, producer, and director. She has won multiple Emmy awards, Grammy awards and Golden Globe awards

Gary Burghoff
music
Gary Burghoff (born May 24, 1943) is an American actor, artist, and musician. He is probably best known for his role as Walter "Radar" O'Reilly a company clerck that had extraordinary hearing in the 1970 movie, "M*A*S*H" and on the television series of the same name.

James Taylor
music
James Taylor (born March 12, 1948) is an American singer and songwriter. He is popular for his songs "Fire and Rain", "You've Got a Friend", and "How Sweet It Is (To Be Loved By You)".

Otis Redding
music
Otis Redding (September 9, 1941 - December 10, 1967) was an American singer and songwriter. He wrote and sang many popular songs. He was killed in a plane crash at the age of 26. Shortly after his death, his song "Sittin' on the Dock of The Bay", went to # 1 on the charts.
He also wrote the song, "Respect," which became a smash hit for Aretha Franklin.

Frankie Avalon
music
Frankie Avalon (born Francis Thomas Avallone, in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania on September 18, 1939) is an American actor and singer. He is best known for his starring roles in a series of "Beach movies" in the 1960s.

Gianni Rodari
media
Gianni Rodari (October 23, 1920 in Omegna (Novara) - April 14, 1980 in Rome) was an Italian writer. He was famous for his books for children.

Willie Nelson
music
Willie Nelson (born April 30, 1933) is an American country singer and songwriter. He has also been an actor in a number of movies.

David Crosby
music
David Van Cortland Crosby (born August 14, 1941) is an American musician. He is most famous as a member of the bands The Byrds and Crosby, Stills, and Nash.

Janis Ian
music
Janis Ian (born May 7, 1951) is an American singer. Her most famous song is "At 17". The writing devices used in her poems are simile, imagery, hyperbole and irony.

Alexander Scriabin
music
Alexander Scriabin (also spelt: Skryabin) (born Moscow January 6 1872; died Moscow April 27 1915) was a famous Russian composer and pianist. He wrote music for the orchestra and for the piano. His music belongs to the Late Romantic period, but his later works sound quite modern, and he was influenced by Impressionism. He had some very unusual ideas about combining all the arts into one work.
Life.
Scriabin was the only child in a family which had an aristocratic background. He was always proud of having been born on Christmas Day (6 January is Christmas Day in the Russian Orthodox church). His mother died when he was a year old and his father spent most of his time abroad working as a diplomat. He was looked after by his aunt, grandmother and great-aunt, all of whom fussed over him so that he was a very spoilt child. When he grew up he was very short and his hands could only just stretch one octave (eight notes) on the piano.
Scriabin was educated in the Moscow Cadet Corps. He learned to play the piano and became friends with the composer Sergei Rachmaninoff who was just one year younger. He won the second gold medal ever to be awarded at the Moscow Conservatoire (Rachmaninoff had won the first one). He practised a piece called "Islamey" by Balakirev but damaged his right hand doing it. He still managed to continue his career as a pianist, but he wrote a few piano pieces for the left hand only. In 1895 he toured through many countries in Europe giving concerts and composing a lot of piano music. He married in 1897. He went with his wife to Odessa where he played his Piano Concerto and then spent several months in Paris. He taught at the Moscow Conservatoire and wrote some important orchestral music. Later he left his wife and children and went to Europe for several years with another woman. She inspired a lot of his music. Scriabin continued to travel and play the piano until the end of his life. When he was in London in 1914 he had a boil on his lip, which got steadily worse until he died a year later.
His music.
Scriabin liked the music of Chopin and he wrote a lot of short pieces called Preludes which show Chopin’s influence. As he got older his music became more and more personal. He was very egocentric (thought only about himself and not about other people) and he had some strange ideas. He wanted to write a work which combined all the arts and all the senses: music, dance, poetry, colours and even smells. He wanted this work to be performed beside a lake in India. This work was never finished or performed, and we do not know whether he seriously thought it would happen, but he did buy himself a sun helmet.
Scriabin tried using different harmonies in his music. He had a favourite chord which he called his “mystic chord” (from the bottom upwards: C, F sharp, B flat, E, A, D). He used it in lots of ways. His orchestral works include a Piano Concerto, 3 symphonies, "Le poème de l’extase" ("The poem of extasy") and "Prométhée, le poème du feu" ("Prometheus, the poem of fire"). He liked the music of French Impressionist composers like Debussy and they influenced his music which is often mysterious and dream-like.

Robert Mugabe
politics
Robert Gabriel Mugabe KCB (born February 21, 1924) has been the President of Zimbabwe since 1987. Before that time, he was Prime Minister of the country. Especially in the last few years, Mr. Mugabe has ruled his country in the style of a dictator.
His first years as leader were prosperous. He introduced land reforms, which were supposed to give the land claimed by white people back to the (original) black owners. This has had a serious impact on how the country is seen from outside. The reforms were done in 1998. In 2001, the United Nations imposed sanctions against Zimbabwe. This was done because human rights abuses came to the attention of the United Nations.
At present, people are unsure how the country can tackle its problems. Also, it is unclear what will happen after Mr. Mugabe dies, as there seems to be a vacuum. A struggle for who is to come after him would begin. The disastrous Socialist economic policies that Mugabe has adopted have produced extreme poverty, widespread suffering 1200% inflation and 80% unemployment.

Oscar Wilde
media
Oscar Fingal O'Flahertie Wills Wilde (October 16, 1854 – November 30, 1900) was an Irish playwright. He wrote "Salomé", "The Importance of Being Earnest", "An Ideal Husband", and "The Picture of Dorian Gray".
Wilde was a writer in the Victorian age. He was known for being part of the decadence trend of the late 19th century. Today, we know that Oscar Wilde was Gay or Bisexual. He went to prison for two years of hard labour because he had a sexual relationship with a younger man. This is believed to have contributed to his death at the age of 46.

Bono
music
Paul David Hewson, better known as Bono (born May 10, 1960 in Dublin, Ireland) is an Irish musician, best known as the singer for the rock band U2.
Career.
He became a member of the band U2 in October 1976, when he responded to a message that was placed on his school notice board by Larry Mullen Jr. to form a band.
The name "Bono" comes from the phrase "Bona Vox". This was a type of hearing aid and in Latin means "good voice". Bono went on to become the main singer for U2.
Bono married Alison Stewart and have four children. Jordan (b. 1989), Eve (b. 1991), Elijah (b. 1999) and John (b. 2001).

The Edge
music
David Howell Evans (born 8 August 1961 in London, England), more widely known as The Edge, is an English-born musician. He is known best as the guitarist, keyboardist, and backing vocalist for the Irish rock band U2.

Mariah Carey
music
Mariah Carey (born March 27, 1970) is a popular American musician, singer and songwriter. She has sold more albums than any other female artists.
Carey is the youngest child of Patricia Hickey, who is an opera singer and voice coach, and Alfred Roy Carey, who is an aeronautical engineer. She has an older sister called Alison and an older brother called Morgan.
She currently has had eighteen number one singles on the US Billboard Hot 100.

Todd Rundgren
music
Todd Rundgren (June 22, 1948) is an American singer, songwriter, and record producer. Two of his best-known songs are "I Saw The Light" and "Hello It's Me". Both were on his 1971 album "Something/Anything?". Most of the songs on that album were performed by Rundgren alone, using multitrack recorders and playing many musical instruments.
Apple Records hired Rundgren to produce an album, "Straight Up", for the band Badfinger during 1971. Badfinger had not heard of Rundgren and did not know his music, until they bought copies of some of his records. They liked what they heard, and when Rundgren met the band, they got along well, and worked well together.
In the early 2000s, Rundgren replaced Ric Ocasek as bandleader of The Cars, when they reunited to tour.
Rundgren is also the stepfather of actress Liv Tyler.

Vladimir Nabokov
music
Vladimir Nabokov (born April 10(22), 1899, died July 2, 1977) was a Russian author. He wrote his first books in Russian, and after he became very popular, he wrote in English.
In the 1919 he went to Europe. In the 1945 he became an American citizen. He wrote many books, including "Lolita" and "Pnin". There are Humbert Humbert likes little girls in the "Lolita". His last book was «The Original of Laura».

George Washington Carver
science
George Washington Carver (c. 1864-5 – January 5, 1943) was an American educator, botanist (someone who works with plants), and inventor. He is best known for his work with peanuts, sweet potatoes, and other crops. He was born into slavery. Carver used his imagination to come up with over 300 ways to use peanuts, including shampoo and shaving cream. He was also a Christian.

Horst Köhler
politics
Horst Köhler (born February 22, 1943 in Skierbieszów, Poland) became president of the Federal Republic of Germany July 1, 2004. Before that he was the director of the International Monetary Fund (IMF).
On March 4, 2004 he was nominated by members of the German political parties CDU, CSU, and FDP. They wanted him to be their common candidate for the presidential election on May 23, 2004. For this reason he gave up his position as director of the IMF.
Before his nomination he worked outside of Germany, so only 20% of the Germans knew him, and a German newspaper called 'Bild' headlined 'Horst Wer???' which means 'Horst Who???'.
On May 23, 2004 the German "Bundesversammlung" (Federal Assembly), which consist of 1.205 members, chose Horst Köhler as the new "Bundespräsident" (President of Germany) with 604 votes. That was one vote more than the needed absolute majority.

John Williams
music
John Towner Williams (February 8, 1932-) is an American composer and conductor; he is best remembered for his scores (soundtracks) for movies such as "Jaws", "Star Wars", "Superman", "E.T.", "Indiana Jones", "Home Alone", "Jurassic Park" and "Harry Potter". He was also lead conductor for the Boston Pops Orchestra and conducts for them a few times each year especally around Christmas time.

James Brown
music
James Brown (May 3, 1933 - December 25, 2006) was an American R&B and funk singer. He was known as the "Godfather of Soul", not to be confused with Marlon Brando's character in the movie "The Godfather". He was born in Barnwell, South Carolina.

Frank Lampard
sports
Frank James Lampard, Jr. is an English football player, son of Frank Lampard Senior. He was born June 20, 1978 in Romford, London, England. He went to Brentwood School in Essex, where amongst other subjects, he studied Latin and gained an A* grade. He is an English Premier League football player currently at Chelsea, and plays for England too. He is a midfielder and wears the number 8. Currently, Lampard is Chelsea's current highest goalscorer with 115 goals. Lampard is also the goal scorer in the Premier League for a midfielder.
Career.
Frank Lampard started his football career at West Ham United F.C. Lampard joined West Ham, where his father was the assistant coach, as an apprentice in July 1994 as part of their youth system, and signed his professional forms a year later. He was loaned to Division Two team Swansea City in October 1995, and debuted in a 2-0 win over Bradford City. Lampard made nine league appearances for Swansea before returning to West Ham in January 1996, with whom he played his first match at the end of the month against Coventry City F.C., and spent the remainder of the season as a reserve.
The next year, a broken leg suffered in a March game against Aston Villa prematurely put an end to Lampard's 1996-97 season after thirteen appearances. He had to wait until the '97-98 campaign to score his first goal for West Ham, which came in a road victory over Barnsley F.C. He became a starter in 1998-99 and appeared in every match as West Ham finished fifth in the Premiership standings.
Following the sale of teammate and friend Rio Ferdinand to Leeds United after the 2000-01 season, combined with the departures of his father and Redknapp, Lampard followed suit and left West Ham, but chose to stay home in London by joining Chelsea for an £11 million fee.[2]
Chelsea.
Lampard made his debut for Chelsea on August 19 2001. He has since been a regular on the team sheet.
Personal Life.
Lampard lives in Surrey with his Spanish fiance Elen Rives and their two daughters Luna and Isla.

Dian Fossey
science
Dian Fossey (January 16, 1932 – December 26, 1985) was an American zoologist. She is most famous for studying gorillas in Rwanda, Africa.
Fossey studied the lives of mountain gorillas for many years. Some of the people who lived in the area did not like her because of her beliefs about how the gorillas should be treated. She did not want them in zoos or to be killed. Many people all over the world now think she is a hero for what she did to help gorillas. There is a movie that was made based on what she experienced in Africa. It is called "Gorilla in the Mist". Her book, also named "Gorillas in the Mist" is the best selling book on gorillas of all time.
She later was recognized for saving mountain gorillas and started the successful fund to help raise money for gorillas everywhere.
Her death.
Fossey was murdered in her cabin on December 26, 1985. Her head was cut by a panga, a local weapon used by poachers. Many people think poachers did this but there are other people who believe her murder was because of her beliefs against using the gorillas for tourism and financial gain. Fossey was buried at the site she created as a graveyard for the gorillas.

Billy Paul
music
Billy Paul (born Paul Williams on December 1, 1934 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania) is an American R&B singer. His biggest hit was "Me and Mrs. Jones".

Carole Bayer Sager
music
Carole Bayer Sager (born March 8, 1947) is an American songwriter and singer.

Elvis Costello
music
Elvis Costello (born August 25, 1954) is a English singer and songwriter. His real name is Declan Patrick McManus and he was born in London. He was an important musician in the late 1970s punk rock and new wave music styles. In the 1980s, he played an original style of rock and roll. Later he wrote and performed music in a number of different styles from classical to jazz.
After two earlier marriages he married jazz pianist Diana Krall in 2003.

Prince (musician)
music
Prince Rogers Nelson (better known as Prince) (born June 7, 1958) is an American singer and musician. He was born in Minneapolis, Minnesota. He has been known for blending erotic lyrics with funk rock and technology.

Duane Eddy
music
Duane Eddy (born April 26, 1938) was Grammy Award-winning American rock guitarist. Many people enjoyed his music and tried to play the same way as he did. He is best known for the music that he played without singing words. Few years after his Rebel Rouser hit, he was one of the first rock artists to sell whole albums instead of only single songs.

Ozzy Osbourne
music
Ozzy Osbourne (born December 3, 1948) is a British heavy metal singer. He was born in Birmingham, England on December 3, 1948. He was the lead singer for Black Sabbath between 1968 and 1978. He bit the head off of a bat on stage once. His wife Sharon and he have three kids, named Aimee, Kelly and Jack. He also has three children from his first marriage, named Elliot, Jessica, and Louis.

Dinah Shore
music
Dinah Shore (real name: Frances Rose Shore, March 1, 1917- February 24, 1994) was an American singer and host of her own talk show.

Bryan Adams
music
Bryan Adams OC, OBC, (born Bryan Guy Adams on November 5, 1959) is a Canadian rock singer-songwriter and photographer. Adams won two awards in 1992 at the 34th Grammy Awards, including "Best Pop Instrumental Performance" and "Best Song Written for a Motion Picture, Television or Other Visual Media" for his work on the ' soundtrack. He has also been nominated for several Grammy Awards; Adams was first nominated at the 28th Grammy Awards for "Reckless" and "It's Only Love". He has been awarded the Order of Canada and the Order of British Columbia for his contribution to popular music and his philanthropic work. During his career, he has sold an estimated sixty-five million records. Adams was inducted into Canada's Walk of Fame in 1998 and in April 2006, he was inducted into the Music Hall of Fame at Canada's Juno Awards. He was recently nominated for his fifth Golden Globe in 2007 for songwriting on the film "Bobby" and has been nominated three times for Academy Awards for his music in film.
Early years: 1959 - 1979.
Adams was born in Kingston, Ontario, Canada, to English parents. From his grandmother he also inherited a Maltese ancestry. As Adams' father was a diplomat, he grew up travelling around the world with his parents. Most of his youth was spent in Europe, part of the time in Birre, Portugal, situated close to Lisbon. In 1973, Adams' family returned to Canada and settled down in North Vancouver, BC. His musical goals began during his teenage years, and as he explained to Carlo D'Agostino from "Rolling Stone" magazine, "In high school, I was too far into my music to even pay attention to girls." He washed dishes, sold pet food, and worked in record stores, and at the age of 15, Adams quit school to play in nightclubs with bands like Shock and Sweeney Todd, who released an album called "If Wishes Were Horses" with the fifteen year old Adams as lead singer.
A serendipitous meeting with drummer Jim Vallance in a Vancouver music store led to a song-writing partnership that continues to this day. Adams and Vallance were both disenchanted with the club scene and both worked in Vancouver studios doing sessions. As O'Hara from "Maclean's" magazine phrased it, "Vallance was looking for a singer, Adams was looking for a route to musical respectability, and the two hit it off immediately."
In 1978, at the age of 18, Adams sent a few demo recordings to A&M Records in Toronto, and was signed to them not long afterwards for the sum of one dollar. He has released sixteen albums since then. Some of the first demos written in 1978 have surfaced over the years, most notably "I'm Ready" (recorded for both the album "Cuts Like a Knife" and later his release for MTV Unplugged) and "Remember", which was recorded on his first album. Both songs were covered by other artists even before his first album was released. Also recorded during this time was a demo of the song, "Let Me Take You Dancing".
1980 - 1983.
The self-titled debut album was released in February of 1980, and marked the beginning of what was to become a long songwriting partnership between Adams and co-writer Jim Vallance. With the exception of "Remember" and "Wastin' Time", most of the album was recorded from October 29 to November 29, 1979 at Manta Studios in Toronto and co-produced by Adams and Vallance. The album was certified gold in Canada in 1986.
Adams' second album, "You Want It You Got It", was recorded in New York City in two weeks and it marked Adams' first album co-produced by Bob Clearmountain. It was released in 1981 and contained the FM radio hit, "Lonely Nights", but it was not until his third album that he achieved international recognition, popularity and sales.
"Cuts Like a Knife" released in January 1983, was Adams' breakout album due mainly to the lead singles. "Straight from the Heart" was the most successful song from "Cuts Like A Knife" reaching number ten on the Billboard Hot 100. Another single, "Cuts Like a Knife" charted at number fifteen. "This Time" also placed on the Hot 100. Music videos were released for four of the singles from the album. "Cuts Like a Knife" arguably became Adams' most recognizable and popular song from the album. Its music video received heavy airplay on music television. The album peaked at number eight on the Billboard 200 album chart and achieved three times Platinum status in Canada, platinum in the United States and gold in Australia.
1984 - 1987.
Adams best-selling album, "Reckless" co-produced by Adams and Bob Clearmountain, peaked at number one on the Billboard 200. The album was released in November 1984 and featured the singles "Run to You", and "Summer of '69". The hit single "It's Only Love" was nominated for a Grammy Award for Best Rock Vocal Performance by a Duo or Group. In 1986, the song won an MTV award for Best Stage Performance. After the release of the album, Adams was nominated for Best Male Rock Performance. The album is Adams best-selling album in the United States and was certified five times platinum.
"Reckless" included the hit singles "Run to You", "Heaven", "Summer of '69", "One Night Love Affair", and "It's Only Love". All the singles had accompanying music videos and all charted on the Billboard Hot 100 but only "Run to You", "Summer of '69", and "Heaven" peaked in the top ten. "Heaven" would become the most successful single from "Reckless" at the time of its release on the pop charts, reaching number one on the Billboard Hot 100 and number nine on the mainstream rock chart.
In December 1984, Adams and his touring band which consists of Keith Scott, Dave Taylor, Pat Steward and Johnny Blitz played concerts in Chicago, Detroit, New York and Philadelphia. In early 1985, Adams' started a tour throughout the United States, then later Japan, Australia, Europe and at last Canada. After winning four Juno Awards Adams started a Canadian tour through major cities across that country. Later he headed south towards the American West Coast, culminating with two dates at the studded Paladium in Los Angeles.
After the tour in the United States, Adams traveled to Ethiopia to aid famine relief in the country. Adams later headed back to Europe for a fifty-city concert tour with rock singer Tina Turner, culminating in April with his return to London to headline three sold-out shows at the Hammersmith Odeon in London. Adams began the first leg of his tour entitled "World Wide in 85" which started in Oklahoma and ended in October 1985. Adams would later visit Vancouver, Canada, and afterwards returned to the American East Coast to play two sold-out concerts in New York.
The follow up album to "Reckless" was "Into the Fire" which was released in 1987 (see 1987 in music). The album was recorded at Cliffhanger Studios in Vancouver, British Columbia and mixed at AIR Studios in London and Warehouse Studio in Vancouver. This album contained the hit songs "Heat Of The Night" and "Hearts On Fire".
1991 - 1992.
Adams next album, "Waking up the Neighbours", co-produced by Adams and Mutt Lange, sold over ten million copies worldwide and peaked at number six on the Billboard 200. The album was released in September 1991 and featured the hit singles "Can't Stop This Thing We Started" and "(Everything I Do) I Do It for You". This song was also used in the film ', starring Kevin Costner and Alan Rickman. The album and single topped the charts in many countries with "(Everything I Do) I Do It For You" spending a record-breaking sixteen weeks at number one on UK Singles Chart and topping the charts in almost every country in the world. It also achieved record-breaking sales of four million copies in the US. Canadian content regulations were revised in 1991 to allow radio stations to credit airplay of this album towards their legal requirements to play Canadian music. Adams won a Grammy Award in 1991 for Best Song Written Specifically for a Motion Picture or for Television.
Adams further supported the album with his tour, Waking Up the World which started on October 4, 1991, in Belfast, Northern Ireland. On December 18, 1991, Adams played two first-ever shows in Reykjavik, Iceland and then performed in the U.S. with a concert at the Ritz Theatre on the 10th of January. It was a sell-out in less than twenty minutes. In attendance were music legends Ben E. King and Nona Hendrix. The Canadian leg of the ‘Waking Up The World’ Tour kicked off in Sydney, Nova Scotia on January 13, 1992, and wrapped up with a standing room only concert in Vancouver, Canada, on the 31st. In February 1992, he started touring in New Zealand and Australia for seven dates—kicking off with a press conference in Sydney. On February 21, the tour headed to Japan for approximately a dozen shows in six cities. Bryan taped an interview with Much Music’s Terry Dave Mulligan in Calgary, Alberta and the air date was scheduled for mid-March. The tour continued through several European countries in June of 1992, including Italy, Germany, Holland and Scandinavia, and in July 1992, Bryan performed for the first time in Hungary and Turkey. In September through December of 1993, the tour took place in the US. The Asian tour headed to Thailand, Singapore, Japan, and Hong Kong in February, 1993, before returning to the US during March through May.
1993 - 1999.
Released in June 1996, the album "18 til I Die" contained the hit singles "Lets Make a Night to Remember" and the number one song "Have You Ever Really Loved A Woman", and the album peaked at number thirty-one on the "Billboard" 200 in the United States and held that position for three weeks. Even more successful in Canada, "18 til I Die" would reach number four. The album was released in Australia, Europe and New Zealand in late June 1996. It reached the UK top five and peaked at number one which would be Adams' second in a row. It continued the trend of lower-charting albums when it was released. Although "18 til I Die" reached the top ten in the Netherlands, Belgia, Switzerland, Finland, Norway, Austria, Sweden, Germany and Australia, it was a moderate top twenty success in France and Ireland.
The album has been certified platinum in the United States and is Adams last studio effort which has been certified by the RIAA. "18 til I Die" was certified three times platinum in Canada and Australia and two times platinum in the UK.
In December 1997, Adams released "MTV Unplugged" with three new tracks: "Back to You", "A Little Love" and "When You Love Someone". "Back to You" was the first single, followed by "I'm Ready", an acoustic version of the "Cut's Like A Knife"'s track.
"On a Day Like Today" was released in 1998 and was the first studio album since "Cuts Like a Knife" which wasn't certified by the RIAA. However it was certified platinum in the UK and generated two top-ten singles: "Cloud Number Nine" and "When You're Gone", a duet with Melanie C, from Spice Girls, that was a smash-hit in the UK (douple platium) and throughout Europe.
After the release of "On A Day Like Today" Adams' released "The Best of Me", a greatest hits collection that includes two new songs, the title track "The Best of Me" and the dance track "Don't Give Up". The album was certified three times platinum in Canada and Platinum in the UK. The single from the album, "The Best of Me" became a very successful hit with the exception of the US, where it was not released as a single.
Later years: 2000 - present.
Six years after the release of "On a Day Like Today", "Room Service" was released on September 2004 and peaked at number four in the UK, selling 440,000 copies in its first week in Europe. The single, "Open Road", was the most successful single from the album and peaked at number one in Canada and number twenty-one in the UK. In May 2008, the album was also released in the US and charted at number one hundred thirty-four on the Billboard 200.
In 2005, "Anthology, the first 2-disc compilation was released, containing two new tracks. The US release features a new version of "When You're Gone", a duet with Pamela Anderson.
In 2006, Adams contributed to the soundtrack of the film, "The Guardian" starring Kevin Costner and Ashton Kutcher. Adams wrote and performed the theme song "Never Let Go" which was featured in the closing credits. Adams also co-wrote the song "Never Gonna Break My Faith" for the film "Bobby". The song was performed by the R&B singers Aretha Franklin and Mary J. Blige and earned him a Golden Globe Nomination in 2007.
Adams released his eleventh effort "11" internationally on March 17, 2008. The album was released in the US exclusively at Wal-Mart and Sam's Club retail stores on May 13, 2008. The first single released from the album was "I Thought I'd Seen Everything". Adams is planning an 11-day, 11-country acoustic promotional tour for the support of the album in Europe. The album debuted at number one in Canada (making it his first album to reach that position since "Waking Up the Neighbours" in 1991). In the United States the album charted at number eighty.
Social activist.
Since the 1980s, Bryan Adams has been a noted social activist, participating in concerts and other activities to help raise money and awareness for a variety of different causes. His first high profile charity appearance came in 1985 when he opened the US transmission of Live Aid from Philadelphia. In June of the next year, Adams participated in the two-week Amnesty International "A Conspiracy of Hope" tour alongside Sting, U2 and Peter Gabriel. His next appearance for Amnesty was in February 1987 on Rock For Amnesty with Paul McCartney, Sting and Dire Straits, among others.
Playing in the U.S. section of Live Aid, Adams did not get the chance to play at Wembley Stadium; however, another opportunity came in June 1987 when Adams played there at the 5th Annual Prince's Trust Rock Gala along with Elton John, George Harrison, Ringo Starr and others. Adams was to return to Wembley Stadium the following year when he performed at the Nelson Mandela birthday party concert.
Adams helped commemorate the fall of the Berlin Wall when, in 1990, he joined many other guests (including his songwriting partner Michael Kamen) for Roger Waters' massive performance of "The Wall" in Berlin, Germany. He performed on the song, "The Tide Is Turning" with Waters, Joni Mitchell, Cyndi Lauper, Van Morrison, Paul Carrack and others.
On January 29, 2005, Adams joined the CBC benefit concert in Toronto for victims of the 2004 Indian Ocean earthquake. Twenty years after performing at Live Aid in the USA, Adams played at Canada's Live 8 show in Barrie, Ontario. Later that year, he performed in Qatar and raised an astonishing £1.5M ($2,617,000) from the concert and the auction of a guitar that had been signed by many of the world's most prominent guitarists for this occasion. The money went to Qatar's "Reach Out to Asia" campaign to help the underprivileged across the continent. Money raised also went to some of his own projects like rebuilding a school in Thailand and building a new sports center in Sri Lanka, both of which had been devastated by the Indian Ocean tsunami.
On January 29, 2006, Adams became the first Western artist to perform in Karachi, Pakistan, in conjunction with a benefit concert to raise money for underprivileged children to go to school. Some of the proceeds of that concert also went to victims of the 2005 Pakistan earthquake.
On October 18, 2007, Adams was billed to perform in Tel Aviv and Jericho as part of the OneVoice Movement concerts, hoping to aid in solving the Israeli-Palestinian conflict. The peace concert for supporters of a two-state solution to the conflict with Israel was called off because of security concerns.
In the mid 1990s, Adams successfully campaigned for the Southern Ocean Whale Sanctuary with Greenpeace Chairman David McTaggart (the two distributed over 500,000 postcards at concerts around the world encouraging politicians to vote "yes" for the creation of the sanctuary).
Adams wrote a letter on behalf of the animal rights group PETA to protest KFC's treatment of chickens. He wrote to KFC Canadian CEO in November 2007 asking them to become leaders in using more modern and more humane methods of killing. Adams has been a vegan for 17 years and was also featured as a nominee for PETA's Sexiest Vegetarians of the Year.
On May 25, 2005, Adams raised £1.3M with cousin Johnny Armitage, from a concert and auction entitled Rock by the River for the Royal Marsden Hospital in London. On May 15 of the next year, Adams returned to London to attend the Hope Foundation's event (hosted by designer Bella Freud), helping to raise a portion of the £250,000 to support the Palestinian refugee children. The following June, he offered individuals from the public the chance to bid to sing with him live in concert at three different charity auctions in London. Over £50,000 was raised with money going to the NSPCC, Children in Need, and the University College Hospital. On February 28, 2008 he appeared in One Night Live at the Air Canada Centre in Toronto, Canada with Josh Groban, Sarah McLachlan, Jann Arden and RyanDan in aid of the Sunnybrook Hospital Women and Babies Program.
To support the peace in Georgia, Adams played a special outdoor concert in Tbilisi, on September 19, 2008.
As a photographer.
Adams has had his photographs published in British Vogue, L'uomo Vogue, Vanity Fair, Harper's Bazaar, Esquire, Interview magazine and i-D, among others. His other photographic efforts include publishing Zoo Magazine, the fashion/art magazine based in Berlin, Germany. On June 1, 2005, he published his first book of photos in the United States with Calvin Klein called "American Women"; proceeds from this book go to breast cancer research for programs at the Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center in New York City. He released a similar book of photos called "Made In Canada" in December 1999 followed by Haven in 2000. All of his books were dedicated to his friend Donna, who died of the disease.
As a photographer, Adams has worked with many of his musical peers, including Mick Jagger, Rod Stewart, Robert Plant, Joss Stone, Placido Domingo, Celine Dion, Billy Idol, Moby, Amy Winehouse, t.A.T.u., Annie Lennox, Peter Gabriel, Lenny Kravitz and Morrissey to name a few. On November 27, 2000 Bryan played onstage with The Who at the Royal Albert Hall. A DVD of the concert was issued. Bryan photographed the band and his photos appear in the DVD booklet.
In 2002, Adams was invited, along with other photographers from the Commonwealth, to photograph Queen Elizabeth II during her Golden Jubilee; one of the photographs from this session was used as a Canadian postage stamp in 2004 and again in 2005 (see Queen Elizabeth II definitive stamp (Canada)), another portrait of both Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip is now in the National Portrait Gallery in London.
Bryan Adams supports the "Hear the World" initiative as official photographer in its aim to raise global awareness for the topic of hearing and hearing loss. Adams has been shooting the covers for their magazine, a quarterly culture and lifestyle publication dedicated to the topic of hearing.

Johnny Horton
music
John Gale "Johnny" Horton (April 30, 1925- November 5, 1960) was an American country singer.

Roy Orbison
music
Roy Orbison (April 23, 1936- December 6, 1988) was an American singer.

Taylor Dayne
music
Taylor Dayne (born as Leslie Wonderman on March 7, 1962) is an American singer. She is best known for her song, "Tell it to my heart".

Stephen Stills
music
Stephen Stills (January 3, 1945-) is an American singer and songwriter. He is most famous as a member of the groups Buffalo Springfield and Crosby, Stills & Nash.

Paul Anka
music
Paul Anka (born July 30, 1941) is a Canadian-born singer and songwriter of Lebanese origin.
Anka is famous for such songs as "Diana" (1957) and "Lonely Boy" (1959)

Neil Young
music
Neil Percival Young (born November 12, 1945) is a Canadian musician. He is known for his country and rock songs. Sometimes people call him the Godfather of Grunge because the style of some of his songs led to the kind of music called grunge music that started to be popular in the early 1990s. Many of his songs have a political and/or personal message. He was also a member of the groups Buffalo Springfield and Crosby, Stills, Nash & Young.
Some of his best-known songs are "Heart of Gold", "Helpless", "After the Gold Rush", "Rockin' in the Free World", "Cinnamon Girl", "Southern Man" and "Like a Hurricane".
Young has explored many different styles of music during his career, and not all his records have been popular. During the 1980s, he was sued by his record company, Reprise Records, who believed he was purposely making records that would not sell. Young won out over Reprise in court.

IPod
sports
The iPod is a range of portable music players made by the company Apple Inc. The iPod comes with computer cables so that the user can put music from their computer onto the iPod, and play music from it using headphones. Newer iPods allow a user to view pictures and videos, too.
The first iPod was simply named the iPod. This was released in 2001. Apple still makes iPods like this today, but they are now called "iPod Classic".
Apple makes a smaller iPod called the iPod nano. It is much smaller than the iPod, but does not hold as many songs. It uses flash memory, a special kind of memory for very small electronics, instead of a hard drive. It replaced a version of the iPod called the iPod Mini.
Another type of iPod, called the iPod shuffle, is very small, and it uses flash memory, like the iPod nano but it has no screen. It is the least expensive iPod.
The most expensive iPod is called the iPod Touch. It has a touch screen, like the iPhone. The first iPod Touch was released in 2007.
iPods often contain songs downloaded from an online music store, using a program called iTunes. (The name of Apple's music and video store is the iTunes Store.) Songs are sold in AAC file format, not MP3 or WMA. These are popular formats for compressing (making smaller) music until it does not take up much space and can easily be put on a media player such as the iPod.

Amy Grant
music
Amy Lee Grant (November 25 1960) is an American singer. She is known for her Christian pop music. She released her first album in 1977 at the age of 16.

Dalida
music
Dalida (real name: Yolande Christina Gigliotti) (January 17, 1933 - May 3, 1987) was an Egyptian-born Italian/French singer and actress.

Kris Kristofferson
music
Kris Kristofferson is an American singer, songwriter, and actor. He was born in Brownsville, Texas, on June 22, 1936. He is known for writing country songs for other people or singing them himself. He is also a well-known actor and appeared in movies like "Star is Born","Bring Me the Head of Alfredo Garcia", "Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore", "Blade", and "Planet of the Apes".

Christina Aguilera
music
Christina Maria Aguilera (born December 18, 1980), sometimes known under the stage name Xtina is an American pop singer and song-writer. She is of Hispanic descent. She was born in Staten Island New York. Aguilera made her debut on the Ed McMahon show "Star Search" in 1990 and, three years later, starred on "The New Mickey Mouse Club". She was signed to RCA Records after making the song "Reflection" for the film Mulan.
Her first album Christina Aguilera (1999) was a success. It earned her a Grammy Award for Best New Artist in 2000. Aguilera made two other albums then. They were a Latin pop album "Mi Reflejo", and a Christmas album "My Kind of Christmas". They both sold well and Mi Reflejo won a Latin Grammy Award.
Aguilera had more control over her second album "Stripped", sent to stores in 2002. It had mixed reviews and earned Aguilera a Grammy Award. But her very sexual image at the time was looked down on. Her third album "Back to Basics" (2006) mixed parts of soul, jazz and blues music. It was given good sales and reviews. It also earned Aguilera her fourth Grammy Award.

Nat King Cole
music
Nathaniel Adams Coles, professionally known as Nat King Cole, (March 17, 1919 - February 15, 1965) was an American jazz musician, singer and songwriter. He was born in the southern city of Montgomery, Alabama. His father was a Christian minister. Millions of Nat King Cole’s recordings were sold while he was alive. He died of cancer of the lung in February, 1965. He was only forty-five years old. People around the world still enjoy listening to the music of one of America’s greatest performers of popular and jazz music.
Early years.
When Cole was four years old, his parents moved the family north to Chicago, Illinois. He learned to play the piano when he was very young. His mother was the only piano teacher he ever had. He gave his first public performance when he was four. By the time he was twelve, Cole was playing piano at his father’s church.
His interest in jazz.
Cole played piano in New York City and Los Angeles, California when he was a young man. In 1937, he formed a group that played jazz music. Oscar Moore played the guitar and Wesley Prince played the bass. The trio reportedly did not need a drummer because Cole’s piano playing kept the beat so well. They named the group, The King Cole Trio. At the same time, Cole also changed his name into Nat King Cole. The trio soon became very popular. Nat sang some songs, but mostly played the piano.
Well-known popular singer.
By the middle 1940s, Nat King Cole was beginning to be known as a popular singer as well as a jazz piano player. He was one of the first musicians to record with new Capitol Records.
The first song he recorded for Capitol was “Straighten Up and Fly Right.” He wrote the song. The words were based on his father’s teachings. The song became one of the biggest hits of 1943. It sold more than 500,000 copies.
Nat recorded hundreds of songs. Some of the most popular include “Sweet Lorraine,” “Nature Boy,” “Those Lazy-Hazy-Crazy Days of Summer,” “When I Fall in Love,” and “Mona Lisa.” In 1950, the American film industry gave him an award for his recording of “Mona Lisa.” That song made him famous as a singer.
Nat King Cole also acted in movies. The best known one is "Saint Louis Blues". He played the part of the jazz composer W.C. Handy. He also appeared in a movie about himself called "The Nat King Cole Story".
In the 1950s, he sang with some of the best known orchestras of the time.
He received many awards during his life. He also received many more after his death. One was a 1990 Grammy Award for lifetime achievement.
His success as a black man.
By 1956, Nat King Cole was known internationally. He signed an agreement to perform at the Sands Hotel in Las Vegas, Nevada.
Cole often performed in places that only admitted white people. Black leaders did not like this about him. Cole said he tried to take legal action against those places but often failed.
Cole earned more money and moved to California. He bought a house in an area where white people lived. At that time, many white Americans did not want to live near blacks. White home owners nearby protested the purchase of a house by a black family. Cole and his family refused to leave and lived in the house without problems.
Cole was the first black man to have his own television program. His program began on NBC Television in 1956. NBC agreed to support "The Nat King Cole Show" for a while. It hoped American companies would pay to sell their products on the program. However, major companies were not willing to advertise on a program that had a black performer. They believed that white people in the southern part of the United States would not buy their products. Many Americans watched the show, but NBC stopped production after a year.
His family.
Nat King Cole was married two times. In 1936, he married a dancer, Nadine Robinson. Their marriage failed. In 1948, he married Maria Ellington. They had three children. They also adopted and raised two other children.
Nat’s daughter, Natalie followed her father as a singer. She recorded many songs after her father died. In 1991, Natalie Cole recorded an album called "Unforgettable". It contains 22 of Nat King Cole’s songs, including the song “Unforgettable.” Modern technology made it possible to mix her voice with a recording of her father singing the same song.

George Gershwin
music
George Gershwin (September 26, 1898 – July 11, 1937) was an American composer.
Childhood.
His family immigrated to the United States. Gershwin, his two brothers and sister had a close, happy family life. George liked playing games on the streets of New York. He liked exploring the city, but he did not like school or studying.
While exploring the city, Gershwin heard jazz and blues music spilling out of public drinking places. However, he did not become seriously interested in music until he heard another boy playing the violin in a concert at his school. Gershwin began to take piano lessons. His teacher was a fine classical musician. He immediately recognized Gershwin's unusual ability. The teacher wrote about him to a friend: "I have a student who will make his mark in music, if anybody will. The boy is a genius, without doubt."
Younger days as a student.
Gershwin studied classical piano, but his strongest interest continued to be jazz and popular music. At the age of fifteen, he left school and went to work in the music business. The New York City street where most music publishers had their offices was called "Tin Pan Alley."
The phonograph and radio had been invented in the late eighteen hundreds. But it would be many years before there were musical recordings or regular radio broadcasts. Tin Pan Alley publishers needed another way to sell new songs, so they employed people to play the piano to do this.
The piano players played the songs all day long to interested singers and other performers. Gershwin was one of the youngest piano players in Tin Pan Alley. Soon, he was considered one of the finest there. He was already writing his own songs. He succeeded in getting one published when he was only eighteen years old. It had a long title: "When You Want 'Em, You Can't Get ‘Em, When You've Got 'Em, You Don't Want 'Em. "
Success as a songwriter.
Gershwin was now a real composer. The rest of his life was an unbroken record of success. He wrote song after song. His ideas were so endless that he was not even troubled when he once lost some music he had been writing. "There is plenty more where that came from," he said.
Gershwin had his first big hit in 1919, when he was twenty-one years old. It was a song called "Swanee." A popular entertainer, Al Jolson, sang the song. "Swanee" was made into one of the first musical recordings. Gershwin was suddenly famous.
Music critics note that "Swanee" is not like most of Gershwin's music. Later, he wrote true love songs. Some were light and funny. Some were full of intense feeling. Many of these songs were written for the popular musical theater. One of his most emotional love songs never became part of a musical play, however. It is called "The Man I love."
His brother Ira.
Gershwin's older brother, Ira, wrote the words to that song. As George became famous, Ira wrote the words to more and more of his songs.
The two brothers were very different. Ira, the writer, was quiet and serious. George, the musician, was outgoing -- the life of any party. But George wrote better songs with Ira than with anyone else.
As a songwriter.
One of many examples of the Gershwin's combined work is the song "They Can't Take That Away From Me." The Gershwins wrote the song for dancer and actor Fred Astaire for the film "Shall We Dance." That was George and Ira Gershwin's first movie musical.
Many of George Gershwin's songs were first written for musical plays performed in theaters in New York City. These comedies, with plenty of songs, were a popular form of entertainment in the 1920s and 1930s.
One of Gershwin's musical plays, "Girl Crazy," introduced a young singer named Ethel Merman. She became one of the most celebrated performers in America. In the play, Merman sang a song George Gershwin wrote just for her. It was called "I Got Rhythm".
Many songs that George Gershwin wrote for musical plays and movies have remained as popular as ever. Over the years, they have been sung and played in every possible way -- from jazz to country.
One example is the song, "Someone to Watch Over Me." It was written for the 1926 musical "Oh, Kay!"
Jazz and his music.
In the nineteen twenties, there was a debate in the United States about jazz music. Could jazz, some people asked, be considered serious music?
In 1924, jazz musician and orchestra leader Paul Whiteman decided to organize a special concert to show that jazz was serious music. Gershwin agreed to compose something for the concert before he realized how little time he had to do it. The concert was just a few weeks away. Gershwin got busy, and, in that short time, he composed a piece for piano and orchestra. He called it "Rhapsody in Blue."
Gershwin himself played the piano part of "Rhapsody in Blue" at the concert. The audience included some of the greatest classical musicians of the time. When they heard his music, they were electrified. It seemed to capture, for the first time, the true voice of modern American culture. Today, we can still hear Gershwin playing "Rhapsody in Blue." An old mechanical piano recording has been reproduced exactly on this recording.
"Rhapsody in Blue" made George Gershwin famous all over the world. Several hundred thousand copies of the printed music sold immediately. Gershwin was satisfied that he had shown that jazz music could be both serious and popular.
Musical works and opera.
Gershwin also wrote an opera, "Porgy and Bess. " It was based on a book by DuBose Heyward. It is a tragic love story about black Americans along the coast of South Carolina.
"Porgy And Bess" opened in Boston, Massachusetts in 1935. Audiences loved it. But most critics did not know what to think of it. It was not like any other opera or musical play they had ever seen.
Gershwin was not affected by the critics' opinions. He believed some of his greatest music had gone into the opera. He said he had created a new musical form -- an opera based on popular culture.
Another well-known Gershwin piece is "An American in Paris. " It is a long tone poem for orchestra. Its first public performance was by the New York Philharmonic Orchestra in 1928.
Once again, opinion was mixed. Most people loved "An American in Paris," as they loved all of Gershwin's music. Some critics liked it, too. They called it happy and full of life. Others hated it. They called it silly and long-winded. Still, it remains one of his most popular works.
Last days.
George Gershwin died in 1937, just days after doctors learned he had brain cancer. He was only thirty-eight years old. Newspapers all over the world reported his death on their front pages. Everyone mourned the loss of the man and all the music he might have written. Gershwin is still considered one of America's greatest composers. His works still are performed by many singers and groups. They are probably performed more often than any other serious American composer.
Austrian composer Arnold Schoenberg was one of the people who praised George Gershwin. Schoenberg said Gershwin was a man who lived in music and expressed everything through music, because music was his native language.
Also see - media files.
Gershwin's story and music can be downloaded here; and.
For help with any trouble in downloading or playing, please see
The article above is a reuse and modification from a and availabele as public domain under of Voice of America.
George Gershwin was 38 when he died and had brain cancer.

Aaron Copland
music
Aaron Copland (1900-1990) was an American composer who wrote modern music.
Aaron Copland wrote many kinds of music. He wrote music for the orchestra, piano, and voice. He wrote music for plays, movies, and dance. Copland also was a conductor, pianist, speaker, teacher, and author.
Music critics say Copland taught Americans about themselves through his music. He used parts of many old American folksongs in his work. He wanted to do this after studying music in France. He said that composers there had a very French way of writing music. He said Americans had nothing like that in this country. So he decided to compose music that was truly American.
Early days of Copland.
Aaron Copland was born November 14, 1900 in Brooklyn, New York. He died at the age of 90 on December 2, 1990. He was the youngest of five children. His parents had come to the United States from eastern Europe. They owned a store in Brooklyn. Aaron began playing the piano when he was a young child. He wrote his first song for his mother when he was eight years old. His dreams of becoming a composer began when he was young. When he was sixteen, he asked his parents to let him study composing with Rubin Goldmark. Goldmark had taught the composer George Gershwin.
When he was in his early twenties, Copland went to Paris, France, where he studied music with Nadia Boulanger. She was one of the most important music teachers of the time. He returned to New York in 1924.
Known classical works.
The famous conductor of the Boston Symphony Orchestra, Serge Koussevitzky, learned about Copland's music. Koussevitzky led the orchestra for the first performance of Copland's early work, "Music for the Theater", in 1925. Koussevitzky also conducted Copland's "Concerto for Piano and Orchestra" in 1927. This work was unusual because Copland used ideas from jazz music in his concerto.
Copland later wrote the music for two ballets about the American West. One was about the life of a famous gunfighter called Billy the Kid. Copland used music from American cowboy songs in this work. This piece from "Billy the Kid: Ballet Suite" is called "Street in a Frontier Town".
In 1942, the conductor Andre Kostelanitz asked Copland to write music about a great American, Abraham Lincoln. Copland wrote "Lincoln Portrait" to honor America's 16th president. Copland's music included parts of American folk songs and songs popular during the American Civil War. He added words from President Lincoln's speeches and letters.
"Lincoln Portrait" has been performed many times in America. Many famous people have done the speaking part.Eleanor Roosevelt, the wife of President Franklin D. Roosevelt, was one of them. Here, actor James Earl Jones performs in Copland's "Lincoln Portrait."
In 1942 the music director of the Cincinnati Symphony Orchestra asked 18 composers to write music expressing love for America. For the competition, Copland composed "Fanfare for the Common Man. " This music is played in America during many national events, including some presidential inaugurations (when they become presidents).
Experts say "Fanfare for the Common Man" was an example of the way Copland changed the kind of music he wrote during the 1940s. He began writing music that was more easily understood and more popular. Copland wrote about this in 1941 in his book, "Our New Music".
He wrote that the radio and record player was helping people who had never listened to music before to enjoy music. He said that there was no reason to continue writing music as if these things had not been invented. So he decided to write music in a simpler way.
His interest and activities beyond music.
Copland spread his ideas about music in other ways. He taught at the New School for Social Research in New York City and at Harvard University in Cambridge, Massachusetts. One of the many awards he received was the Pulitzer Prize. He won it in 1945 for his famous music for a ballet called "Appalachian Spring." It is one of his most popular works. The last part of the ballet is based on a traditional song, "A Gift to be Simple".
Copland also wrote music for several major motion pictures. He won an Academy Award in 1950 for composing the music for the film, "The Heiress." Then he began experimenting with what is called the twelve-tone system. His music was no longer as easy to understand, nor as popular.
Copland stopped composing at the end of the 1960s. Yet he continued to be active as a conductor and speaker. In 1982, Queens College of the City University of New York established the Aaron Copland School of Music.
Copland was a strong supporter of liberal ideas. In the early 1950s, he and other famous writers, actors and intellectuals were accused of supporting communism. Public opinion changed, though. In 1964, President Lyndon B. Johnson presented him with the Presidential Medal of Freedom. It is America's highest award to civilians. Aaron Copland died in 1990 at the age of 90. But his music lives on.
The article above is a reuse and modification from a available as public domain under of Voice of America.

Rod Stewart
music
Rod Stewart (January 10, 1945-) is a English pop singer. He was born in London. When he started singing in the 1960s, he was player for the Brentford F.C., a football (soccer) team. He started singing in local R&B groups, in the 1970s he began a solo career which made him very famous.

Sean Connery
sports
Sir Thomas Sean Connery (August 25, 1930-) is a Scottish actor. He was born in Edinburgh. He was born as "Thomas Connery", but later added Sean to his stage name which is what most people call him. He is known for his charm and good looks, which have made him very famous. He is best known for playing James Bond in the first several films in the famous series of movies.

Roberta Flack
music
Roberta Flack (born February 10, 1939) is an American R&B singer.

Billy Preston
music
Billy Preston (born September 2, 1946 in Houston, Texas; died June 5, 2006), is an American R&B musician. He is best known for his piano and organ playing.
Preston began playing piano when he was three years old. He worked with many other musicians including Aretha Franklin, Sammy Davis Jr., Quincy Jones, Eric Clapton, the Jackson 5 and the Rolling Stones.
He worked on The Beatles's last album, "Let It Be", in 1969, including the song "Get Back". Many people thought that Preston would join the group, but the Beatles broke up shortly afterwards. He later worked with George Harrison, who had been a Beatle.
Billy Preston's biggest success also came from working with another musician. He did a duet with Syreeta Garrett on "With You I'm Born Again" in 1979. It sold over a million copies and reached Number 2 in the United Kingdom singles chart.

Ernest Hemingway
media
Ernest Miller Hemingway (July 21, 1899 - July 2, 1961) was an American writer. Some people say that, of the many people he created in his books, the author himself was his own best creation.
Very early days.
Ernest Hemingway was born in 1899. He grew up in Oak Park, Illinois, near the middle western city of Chicago. He was the second child in a family of six. His father was a doctor. His mother liked to paint and play the piano.
Each summer, the family travelled to their holiday home in northern Michigan. Ernest's father taught him how to catch fish, hunt, set up a camp, and cook over a fire.
At home in Oak Park, Ernest wrote for his school newspaper. He tried to write like a famous sports writer, Ring Lardner, and he made his writing skills better.
Start as a news reporter.
In 1917, Hemingway decided not to go to a university. The United States had just entered World War I and he wanted to join the Army, but they rejected him because his eyesight was not good enough.
Ernest found a job with the "Kansas City Star" newspaper in Kansas City, Missouri. He reported news that happened at the hospital, police headquarters, and the railroad station. One reporter said: "Hemingway liked to be where the action was."
The Kansas City Star told its reporters to write short sentences, and to report unusual details of an incident. Hemingway quickly learned to do both.
His life outside of America.
Hemingway worked for the newspaper for nine months. He then joined the Red Cross to help on the battle fields of Europe. His job was to drive an ambulence and to take wounded soldiers off the battlefield.
The Red Cross sent him to Italy. There, he soon saw the first wounded. This was when a weapons factory in Milan exploded. Later, he was sent to the battle front. He went close to the fighting to see how he could act in the face of danger. Soon, he was seriously wounded.
Soon after healing, the war ended. Hemingway returned to the United States. After less than a year he had changed forever: he needed to write about what he had seen.
Gone to Chicago.
Some time later, Hemingway left home for Chicago to prove to himself, and to his family, that he could earn a living from his writing.
But he ran out of money and began to write for a newspaper again. The Canadian newspaper, the Toronto Star, loved his reports about life in Chicago. They hired him and paid him well.
In Chicago, Hemingway met Sherwood Anderson. Anderson was one of the first American writers to write about common people. Hemingway saw that Anderson's stories showed life as it really was. This was similar to what he wanted to do.
Anderson gave Hemingway advice about his writing. He told Hemingway to move to Paris. Life was less costly there. He said that city had many young artists and writers from many nations.
In return for Anderson's kindness, Hemingway wrote a book called "The Torrents of Spring". It makes fun of his friend and the way he wrote. Hemingway felt he could not say "thank you" to anyone. He had to believe he did everything for himself, even when he knew others helped him.
In Paris.
Hemingway decided to move to Paris. Before he did, in America, he married a woman he had recently met. Her name was Hadley Richardson.
Paris was cold and grey when Hemingway and his new wife arrived in 1921. They lived in one of the poorer parts of the city. Their rooms were small and they did not have water from pipes. But the "Toronto Star" employed him as its European reporter, so they had enough money for the two of them to live. That job gave Hemingway time to write his stories.
Hemingway enjoyed exploring Paris, learning French customs, and meeting friends. Some of these new friends were artists and writers who had come to the city in the 1920s. Among them were poet, Ezra Pound, and writers Gertrude Stein, John Dos Passos, and F. Scott Fitzgerald. Seeing that Hemingway was a good writer, they helped him publish his stories in the United States. He was thankful for their support at the time, but later denied that he had received their help.
Hemingway travelled all over Europe. He wrote about politics, peace conferences, and border disputes, as well as sports, skiing, and fishing. Later he would write about bullfighting in Spain. The "Toronto Star" was pleased with his work, and wanted more of his reports, but Hemingway was busy with his own writing.
He said this: "Sometimes, I would start a new story and could not get it going. Then I would stand and look out over the roofs of Paris and think. I would say to myself: 'All you have to do is write one true sentence. Write the truest sentence you know.' So finally, I would write a true sentence and go on from there. It was a wonderful feeling when I had worked well."
His first success in 1925.
Hemingway's first book of small stories was called "In Our Time". One of its stories, "Big Two Hearted River," told of the effects of war on a young man who was taking a long fishing trip in Michigan. Hemingway had learned from his father, when he was a boy, about living in the wild.
The story is about two kinds of rivers. One is calm and clear, and is where the young man fishes. The other is a dark, threatening swamp.
The story shows its main character trying to forget his past, as well as the war. He does not talk much about the war. The reader learns about the young man, not because Hemingway tells his readers what the man thinks, but because he shows that man learning about himself.
One of the best modern American stories, it is often published in collections of best writing.
After the book was published in 1925, Hadley and Hemingway returned to the United States for the birth of their son, after which they quickly returned to Paris.
A book: The Sun Also Rises.
Hemingway was working on a long story. He wanted to publish a novel so he would be recognized as a serious writer. And he wanted the money a novel would earn.
The novel was called "The Sun Also Rises". It is about young Americans in Europe after World War One. The war had destroyed their dreams and had given them nothing to replace those dreams. The writer Gertrude Stein later called these people members of "The Lost Generation. "
The book was an immediate success. At the age of 25 Ernest Hemingway was famous.
Many people, however, did not like Hemingway's art because they did not like what he wrote about.
Hemingway's sentences were short, the way he had been taught to write at the Kansas city star newspaper. He wrote about what he knew and felt. He used few descriptive words. His statements were clear and easily understood.
He had learned from earlier writers, like Ring Lardner and Sherwood Anderson, but Hemingway brought something new to his writing. He was able to paint in words what he saw and felt. In later books, sometimes he missed. Sometimes he even looked foolish. But when he was right he was almost perfect.
Marriage with Pauline Pfeiffer.
With the success of his novel, Hemingway became even more popular in Paris. Many people came to see him. One was an American woman, Pauline Pfeiffer. She became Hadley's friend. Then Pauline fell in love with Hemingway.
"When I saw Hadley again, I wished I had died before I ever loved anyone but her. She was smiling and the sun was on her lovely face. "
But the marriage was over. Ernest Hemingway and Hadley separated. She kept their son. He agreed to give her money he earned from his books.
In later years, he looked back at his marriage to Hadley as the happiest time of his life.
At twenty-five, Hemingway was living in Paris. He was a famous writer. But the end of his first marriage made him want to leave the place where he had first become famous.
Much later he said, "the city was never to be the same again. When I returned to it, I found it had changed as I had changed. Paris was never the same as when I was poor and very happy."
Hemingway and his new wife returned to the United States in 1928. They settled in Key West, an island with a fishing port near the southern coast of Florida.
His well-known books.
Before leaving Paris, Hemingway sent a collection of his stories to New York to be published. The book of stories, called "Men Without Women", was published soon after Hemingway arrived in Key West.
The Killers.
Nick opened the thingy and went into the room. Ole Andreson was lying on the bed with all his clothes on. He had been a heavyweight prizefighter and he was too long for the bed. He lay with his head on two pillows. He did not look at Nick.
"I was up at Henry's," Nick said, "and two fellows came in and tied me up and the cook, and they said they were going to kill you."
It sounded silly when he said it. Ole Andreson said nothing, "they put us out in the kitchen," Nick went on. "They were going to shoot you when you came in to supper."
Ole Andreson looked at the wall and did not say anything. "George thought I ought to come and tell you about it."
"There is not anything I can do about it," Ole Andreson said.
Any new book by Hemingway was an important event for readers. But stories like "The Killers" shocked many people. Some thought there was too much violence in his stories. Others said he only wrote about gunmen, soldiers, fighters, and drinkers.
This made Hemingway angry. He felt that writers should not be judged by those who could not write a story.
Hemingway was happy in Key West. In the morning he wrote, in the afternoon he fished, and at night he went to a public house and drank. One old fisherman said: "Hemingway was a man who talked slowly and very carefully. He asked a lot of questions. And he always wanted to get his information exactly right."
A Farewell to Arms.
Hemingway and his wife Pauline had a child in Key West.
Soon afterwards, he heard that his father had killed himself. Hemingway was shocked. He said, "My father taught me so much. He was the only one I really cared about."
When Hemingway returned to work there was a sadness about his writing that was not there before.
His new book told about an American soldier who served with the Italian army during World War One. He meets an English nurse, and they fall in love. They flee from the army, but she dies during childbirth. Some of the events are taken from Hemingway's service in Italy. The book is called "A Farewell to Arms".
"At noon we were stuck in a muddy road about as nearly as we could figure, ten kilometres from Udine. The rain had stopped during the forenoon and three times we had heard planes coming, seen them pass overhead, watched them go far to the left and heard them bombing on the main highroad....
"Later we were on a road that led to a river. There was a long line of abandoned trucks and carts on a road leading up to a bridge. No one was in sight. The river was high and the bridge had been blown up in the center; the stone arch was fallen into the river and the brown water was going over it. We went up the bank looking for a place to cross.... we did not see any troops; only abandoned trucks and stores. Along the river bank was nothing and no one but the wet brush and muddy ground. "
Death in the Afternoon.
"A Farewell to Arms" was very successful. It earned Hemingway a great deal of money. It permitted him to travel.
One place he visited was Spain, a country he loved. He said, "I want to paint with words all the sights and sounds and smells of Spain. And if I can write any of it down truly, then it will represent all of Spain."
He wrote a book called "Death in the Afternoon". It describes the Spanish custom of bull fighting. Hemingway believed that bull fighting was an art, just as much as writing was an art. And he believed it was a true test of a man's bravery, something that always concerned him.
The Snows of Kilimanjaro.
Hemingway also travelled to Africa. He had been asked to write a series of reports about African hunting. He said, "Hunting in Africa is the kind of hunting I like. No riding in cars, just simple walking and feeling the grass under my feet."
The trip to Africa resulted in a book called "The Green Hills of Africa" and many smaller stories.
One story is one of Hemingway's best. The story, called "The Snows of Kilimanjaro", tells of Hemingway's fears about himself. It is about a writer who betrays his art for money and is unable to remain true to himself.
For Whom the Bell Tolls.
In 1936, the Civil War in Spain gave him a chance to return to Spain and test his bravery again. He agreed to write about the war for an American news organization.
It was a dangerous job. One day, Hemingway and two other reporters were driving a car near a battlefield. The car carried two white flags to show they were not fighting. But rebel gunners thought the car was carrying enemy officers. Hemingway was almost killed. Later he said that "bullets are all the same. If they do not hit you, there is no story. If they do hit you, then you do not have to write it. "
The trip to Spain resulted in two works: a play called "The Fifth Column", and a novel called "For Whom the Bell Tolls". The novel tells the story of an American who has chosen to fight against the fascists. He realizes that there are lies and injustice on his side. But he sees no hope except the victory of his side. During the fighting, he escapes his fear of death and of being alone. He decides that "he can live as full a life in seventy hours as in seventy years."
Later days and his married life.
The book was a great success. Hemingway enjoyed being famous. His second marriage was ending. He divorced Pauline and married reporter Martha Gellhorn. He had met her while they were working in Spain. They decided to live in Cuba, near the city of Havana. Their house looked out over the Caribbean Sea.
But this marriage did not last long. Hemingway was changing. He began to feel that whatever he said was right. Martha went on long trips to be away from him. He drank heavily to forget his loneliness.
When America entered World War Two, Hemingway went to Britain as a reporter. Later he took part in the invasion of Europe and the freeing of Paris.
During the war, Hemingway met another reporter, Mary Walsh. In 1945, when his marriage to Martha was legally over, he married Mary.
After the war, Hemingway began work on his last important book, "The Old Man and the Sea". It is the story of a Cuban fisherman who refuses to be defeated by nature.
Hemingway said, "I was trying to show the experience of the fisherman so exactly and directly that it became part of the reader's experience."
In 1954, Hemingway won the Nobel Prize for Literature. But he was too sick to take part in the ceremony.
Ernest Hemingway was 60 years old, but he said he felt like he was 86. Even worse, he felt that he no longer was able to write. He seemed to be living the story about the writer who had sold his writing skill in order to make money.
"To stay in places and to leave... to trust, to distrust... to no longer believe and believe again... to watch the changes in the seasons... to be out in boats... to watch the snow come, to watch it go... to hear the rain... And to know where I can find what I want."
Ernest Hemingway owned many cats, especially cats with extra toes. Today these cats are sometimes called "Hemingway cats" in his honor. His house in Key West, Florida is now a home for his cats and their kittens.
The article above is a rewriting of public domain material, provided by Voice of America Special English.

Muhammad
politics
Muhammad (in Arabic: محمد) (c. 570 - June 8, 632 AD) was an Arabian religious and political leader who Muslims believe to be the last prophet of God. Believed to be a descendent of Ishmael, a son of Abraham, he is considered the most important person in the religion of Islam.
Childhood.
Muhammad was born about April 20 570 AD in Mecca. (It is practiced in Islam to say or write "Sallallahu Alaihe Wa Sallam" (Sm), which means "Peace be upon him" after saying, hearing or writing the name of the Prophet Muhammad). His father, whose name was Abdullah, died a couple of months before Muhammad's birth. His mother, Amina, died when he was three years old, and his foster mother, a Bedouin woman, died when he was six. So, his grandfather, Abd al-Muttalib, took care of him for two years. After his grandfather's death, his uncle Abu Talib took care of him, and was a support to him for many years of his adult life.
Beginning of the Prophecy.
Muhammad ran back home scared at first. However new revelations came to him commanding him to preach what was being sent down from God. When Muhammad first started teaching, many of the people of Mecca, who were pagans and worshipped idols, did not like the things that Muhammad said. But there were also people who listened to his preaching and obeyed his messages. These people were the first of the followers of Islamic law. Muhammad's uncle Abu Lahab, who was a leader of Mecca, started to punish and torture all followers of Islam. Some followers of Islam were put to death. Muhammad was often insulted, but was not physically harmed.
No matter how hard they tried, more people were willing to enter Islam. But then, the people of Mecca were told to throw all Muslims into the desert without their belongings. They stayed there for three years without enough food or water. Then, Muhammad's wife, Khadijah. and his uncle, Abu Talib, died in the same year. Muhammad was left without protection against the people of Mecca.
The Hijra.
When Muhammad thought he had failed, people from Medina learnt about him and his followers. They welcomed him into their city, but Muhammad wanted them to convert to Islam in exchange. They agreed, and most of his followers went to Medina. This movement from Mecca to Medina is called the "Hijra". The Hijra was also the beginning of the Muslim calendar. Muhammad stayed behind until all of his people left Mecca safely.
As Muhammad stayed in Mecca, Abu Lahab was training seven men to kill him in his sleep. But, no one saw him leaving Mecca. The men went into his house and found his cousin, Ali. So, Abu Lahab and his horsemen went to the desert to look for him and his friend, Abu Bakr.
His stay in Medina.
Muhammad and Abu Bakr arrived in Medina safely. The people of Medina welcomed Muhammad with a song:"Tala al badru alaina..." Today, this song is famous in Muslim populations. Muhammad had many people welcoming him to their homes, but he used his camel to show everyone where he would build his house. Also, the first mosque of Medina, a small place for prayer, was built at the back of the house.
But then, many things began to happen. Not everyone was happy about the new changes in Medina. A strong Jewish tribe in Medina felt that Muhammad's new rules would change their lifestyle for the worse. So, they told their allies in Mecca to sell of all the things and homes the Muslims of Mecca left behind. Then the Muslims, and those from Mecca, were being advised to fight to get their belongings back. But, Muhammad did not advise them to do so.
Then one day, Muslims were called all over Medina to gather at the mosque that Muhammad prayed in. They were told to fight against the pagans of Mecca, who threw Muslims out of Mecca long ago. Having no income, the Muslims who originally came from Mecca then attacked caravans from Mecca. Then in A.D. 624, Muhammad himself led a large group of some three hundred warriors to attack a caravan.
The wars.
The Quraysh pagans of Mecca heard about this, and they sent a larger army numbering 1000 warriors to fight the Muslims. They met in Badr, but the pagans were defeated and Abu Jahl, one of the pagan leaders, was also killed.
But, the Muslims lost the second war at Uhud. One year after the fight at Badr, the army of Mecca had outside help. Muslim archers failed to listen to Muhammad's instructions and Khalid ibn al-Walid cleverly took advantage of that. Hamza, Muhammad's last uncle, was killed when a slave from Mecca threw a spear into his chest. Muhammad himself was injured.
Then in 627, Abu Sufyan led the Quraysh and its allies to attack Medina itself. However, they could not pass the trench that the Muslims had dug around Medina. After several weeks, the coalition broke up and went home. The Medinians were considered victors.
The truce with Mecca.
After the pagans of Mecca failed to gain control of Medina, the Muslims became stronger. The pagans then decided to sign a truce with the Muslims. This means that they would not fight each other for ten years. The Muslims used this as a chance to talk to other people all over Arabia. In three years, many people changed their religions to Islam.
But, this truce did not last for long. After three years of it, a small group of horsemen from Mecca attacked a Muslim camp and killed a few of them. The Muslims in Medina heard of this, and the truce was cancelled. Abu Sufyan, third leader of Mecca in Muhammad's lifetime, tried to resume the truce, but Muhammad politely refused the offer. Muhammad told his followers to be ready to capture Mecca.
The capture of Mecca.
Abu Sufyan heard this in his home. From this, he learnt that Muhammad forgave him. At that time, Muhammad and his followers removed and broke all idols from the Kaaba. The idols were statues that the pagans worshipped as gods. At the end, Bilal climbed to the top of the Kaaba and called for prayer. This was Muhammad's victory in spreading Islam all over Arabia. But, because he was old, he would not live for long.
His death.
Although Muhammad (Sm) died, Islam soon spread all over the Middle East. Then, centuries later, it continued till it reached Africa, Asia and Europe. Islam has become one of the world's biggest religions.

Carlos Menem
politics
Carlos Saúl Menem (born in La Rioja, July 2, 1930) was the president of Argentina from July 8, 1989 to December 10, 1999.

Thomas Edison
science
Thomas Alva Edison (February 11, 1847 - October 18, 1931) was an American inventor, who invented many things. Most people think he invented the electric light bulb, but he really only improved it, to make it last long enough to help people see in the dark.
Edison holds the record for the most number of patents: 1093.
Thomas Alva Edison was born in Milan, Ohio. When Edison was 7, he moved with his family to Port Huron, Michigan. Edison started school late, because of an illness. Three months later, Edison was removed from school, because he could not pay attention to his teacher. His mother, who was a teacher in Canada, taught Edison at home. Edison's mother helped him become motivated and he was a good student with her.
When Edison was 14, he contracted scarlet fever. The effect of the fever, as well as getting hit on the head by an angry train conductor, caused Edison to become completely deaf in his left ear, and 80 percent deaf in the other. He learned Morse code and the use of the telegraph, and began a job as a "brass pounder" (telegraph operator). At age 16, Edison came up with his first invention, called an "automatic repeater." It sent telegraph signals between unmanned stations, allowing almost anyone to easily and precisely translate code at his own speed and convenience.
In 1868 Edison moved East and began to work for the Western Union Company in Boston, Massachusetts as a telegraph operator. He worked 12 hours a day, six days a week, and continued to "moonlight" (work until late at night) on his own projects. Within six months, he had applied for and received his first patent for an "electric vote-recording machine". It made the voting process faster.
Then, Edison moved to New York, New York and began to work for a company fixing their machines. At night, he continued to work on his projects. At age 29, Edison began working on the carbon transmitter, which made the sound from Alexander Graham Bell's new telephone invention louder. In 1877, Edison invented the phonograph, the first machine that could record and play sound. That invention made him internationally famous.
Thomas Edison is most famous for inventing the light bulb, but he really didn't invent it. He just made a 50-year old idea better. In 1879, Edison made a light bulb that lasted longer. Because of this, light bulbs became more popular and are now in almost every building in the world.
Family.
He married Mary Stilwell in 1871. He had 3 children in that marriage: Marion Estelle Edison (also called Dot), Thomas Alva Edison, Jr. (also called Dash) and William Leslie Edison. Mary Edison died in 1884. Thomas Edison bought some land in Florida and built a house. When he was 35, Edison married Mina Miller, who was 19. He had 3 children in that marriage: Madeleine Edison, Charles Edison (who took over the company when his father died and was later elected Governor of New Jersey), and Theodore Miller Edison.

FIFA World Cup
sports
The FIFA World Cup is the most important competition in the sport of soccer football (association football, or football). The Fédération Internationale de Football Association (FIFA) organizes the World Cup every four years. More people watch the World Cup finals than any other sporting event in the world -- even more people than the Olympic Games.
The "finals tournament" is held every four years. On the other years there are only "qualifying tournaments" ("qualifiers"). Over 160 national teams play in the qualifiers. The best teams from the qualifiers win a place in the finals. The finals now include 32 teams (before 1998, only 24 teams were allowed). Many years before each World Cup, FIFA picks the host nation, the country where the finals will be held. The 32 teams in the finals then play for four weeks in the host nation to determine the champion (tournament winner).
List of champions.
+Was supposed to be Colombia, but pulled out because of money problems.

Comedy Central
media
Comedy Central is an American cable television channel that specalises in showing comedy and humorous TV shows and movies, as well as stand-up comedy. It was launched on April Fool's Day, 1991 as a merger between MTV Networks' HA! and HBO's Comedy Channel.
The station's most successful programs include "South Park", "Mystery Science Theater 3000", "Win Ben Stein's Money", "The Daily Show with Jon Stewart" and "The Dave Chappelle Show".

Andy Gibb
music
Andy Gibb (March 5, 1958- March 10, 1988) was a pop singer popular in the 1970s. He was the younger brother of Barry, Maurice, and Robin Gibb, The Bee Gees. He died of a heart problem in 1988, shortly after his 30th birthday. While his years of alcohol and cocaine abuse were not the direct cause of death, they certainly did not help his condition.

Donovan
music
Donovan Phillips Leitch (born May 10, 1946) is a Scottish-born pop singer and guitarist, who was popular in the 1960s. Early in his career he was compared to Bob Dylan, but he developed his own musical style, which included elements of jazz and Indian music. (Donovan and Dylan met during 1965, and became friends.)
Donovan's best-remembered songs include "Catch The Wind", "Mellow Yellow", "Sunshine Superman", "Happiness Runs", and "Hurdy Gurdy Man". He helped The Beatles with their song "Yellow Submarine", and two Beatles (John Lennon and Paul McCartney) sang on his song "Atlantis".
After the 1960s, Donovan's music was not as popular as it had been, but it is remembered now as part of the flower power era. Many of his songs now appear in television commercials. He continued to make albums regularly through the 1980s, and sometimes in the 1990s. He also continued to tour, and some of his later albums are of live performances.
Two of Donovan's children, Donovan Leitch and Ione Skye, are actors.

Peter Tosh
music
Peter Tosh (real name:Winston McIntosh October 19, 1944- September 11, 1987) was a Jamaican reggae musican. He was a member of the Wailers with Bob Marley and Bunny Livingston. He was a Rastafarian and sang very political songs. His songs were a lot more radical than his friend, Bob Marley's, whom he often criticized for selling out to the white mainstream. He also toured with the Rolling Stones and sang a duet with Mick Jagger. He was murdered in his home in Kingston during a robbery in 1987. His biggest claim to fame was a song titled "Legalize it" in relation to marijuana laws.
Compilations.
These are the highest rated compilation albums on Allmusic.

Billy Joel
music
Billy Joel (born May 9, 1949) is a famous American singer and songwriter. He produced successful pop songs for two decades, from 1973's "Piano Man" to 1993's "River of Dreams" which marked his retirement. As well as writing classical music, he has frequently been on the road, usually with Elton John.
Joel was born in the Bronx and grew up in Hicksville, located in Long Island near New York City. He joined his first band The Echoes (Later known as The Lost Souls) at age fourteen, and in the late 1960s he teamed up with The Hassles. The Hassles when on to release two albums. In 1970 After parting ways with The Hassles Joel and Hassles Drummer Jon Small Formed a two man duo Attila. 1971, his solo debut, "Cold Spring Harbor", was released. (The title takes its name from a town in Long Island.)
In 1988, Joel played a New York City dog named Dodger in the Disney animated cult movie, "Oliver & Company".
In his career, the singer had several car accidents, some of which came from his alcohol influence.

Live album
music
A live album is an album that has live songs. These live songs are played on stage at a concert, instead of recorded in a studio. People record the songs and put them on a CD.

Marvin Gaye
music
Marvin Gaye (born:Marvin Pentz Gay, Jr., April 2, 1939-April 1, 1984) was an American soul and R&B singer and songwriter who found international fame as an artist recording on the Motown label during the 1960s and 1970s. One of the first Motown artists to break free from the label's controlling assembly-line-like production, Marvin established himself as an independent artist thanks to the release of his 1971 album, "What's Going On" album. His albums afterwards produced a collection of political, social and sexual topics hereafter. After a period of exile in Europe in the late 1970s, Marvin scored a comeback hit with 1982's "Sexual Healing", a record that won him two Grammys and became his longest-running number-one hit on any chart easily making it his biggest hit to date. His comeback was eventually cut short by his 1984 death at the hands of his clergyman father. He was posthumously inducted to the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 1987.
Early life and career.
Marvin Pentz Gay, Jr. was the eldest son of a Pentecostal minister and the second of four children born and raised in a predominantly African-American community in Washington, D.C. Dealt with childhood abuse at the hands of his father, young Marvin used music as an outlet for his abuse first playing instruments in church and singing gospel music in his father's church. As a teenager, Marvin became a fan of doo-wop and joined a succession of groups before dropping out of high school at the start of his senior year. In 1956, the seventeen-year-old left home and enlisted in the U.S. Air Force where he would later be honorably discharged the following year with the words, "Marvin Gay can't adjust to regimentation and authority". Moving back to D.C., Marvin formed the Marquees, and was a co-lead singer of the group. Being discovered by rock pioneer Bo Diddley, the group recorded the songs "Good Morning Little Schoolgirl" and "Wyatt Earp" on the Okeh record label before they were discovered by Harvey Fuqua, member and founder of the popular doo-wop group The Moonglows. Having broken up the original group, Fuqua saw an opportunity to rebuild the Moonglows as a completely new group and changed the Marquees name to Harvey Fuqua and the New Moonglows. The group's "Mama Loocie", released in 1959, featured Marvin's first recorded lead as a vocalist. The following year, the new Moonglows split and with Harvey as his mentor, Marvin traveled with Harvey to Detroit where they got in contact with Berry Gordy, who had formed Motown Records. Impressed by Marvin's instrumental talent as a piano player and drummer, Gordy signed him as a session drummer and throughout his early years with the label, Marvin played drums on a majority of Motown's early hits for artists such as The Marvelettes, Mary Wells, the Miracles and a teenage Stevie Wonder. In 1961, Gordy signed Marvin as a recording artist and, hopeful he could become the next Frank Sinatra, released the big band/standard-heavy "The Soulful Moods of Marvin Gaye", in June of 1961. The album tanked as did his first three singles, produced by Gordy under the same R&B sound of his label mates.
Early stardom.
Marvin's first big taste of stardom came when he co-wrote the Marvelettes' top twenty hit, "Beechwood 4-5789". In the fall of 1962, Marvin finally hit success on his own merit when he released the self-penned and autobiographical "Stubborn Kind of Fellow", which peaked at the top fifty of the pop chart and number eight on the R&B side. His first top 40 single, the dance number, "Hitch Hike", made him a teen idol, as did his third hit, his first top ten pop hit, "Pride & Joy". These early singles and those featured on his second release, "That Stubborn Kind of Fellow", featured Martha and the Vandellas in the background before they became a hit-making group for Motown. A couple years later, Marvin would co-write the group's biggest hit, "Dancing in the Street", which landed at number-two. Marvin's early success continued with "Can I Get a Witness", "Baby Don't You Do It", "You Are a Wonderful One" and "Try It Baby". In late 1964, Marvin recorded the Holland-Dozier-Holland composition, "How Sweet It Is (To Be Loved By You)", which peaked at the top ten of the U.S. pop charts and became one of his first hits abroad reaching the top fifty in the UK. Marvin's collaboration with longtime friend Smokey Robinson resulted in the number-one singles, "I'll Be Doggone" and "Ain't That Peculiar".
Duets with female artists.
After his early success, which Marvin had struggles with, Motown began to widen his role as a ladies man, having him record duet albums with Mary Wells, Kim Weston and Diana Ross. His first album with Wells, "Together", became Marvin's first charted album, and yielded two popular hits, while his single with Weston, the Sylvia Moy-penned "It Takes Two", hit the top twenty on both sides of the Atlantic. But it would be his collaboration with Philadelphia R&B singer Tammi Terrell that landed him his biggest known success in his duet work. Building on songs written by Ashford & Simpson, the team of Marvin and Tammi scored a multitude of hits including their original version of "Ain't No Mountain High Enough", "Your Precious Love", "Ain't Nothing Like the Real Thing" and "You're All I Need to Get By". Sadly, their success would be short-lived following Tammi's collapse during a show at Virginia in October of 1967. Having complained of headaches, Tammi was rushed to the hospital that night and was diagnosed with a brain tumor. Terrell braved it out but by the release of their third and last album together, "Easy", was losing her fight with the tumor. Tammi died in March of 1970 at the age of 24 from complications of her brain cancer. Marvin was said to be so devastated by Tammi's death that he said he felt a piece of him died with her, and reports state at her funeral, Marvin talked to her remains as if she was gonna respond. Promising not to tour again and not to record another duet album after that, Marvin went into a self-imposed seclusion that ended briefly. In 1973, Marvin would work on his final duet album with Diana Ross. Their recording was hampered by arguments between them as Marvin refused to stop smoking marijuana in the studio as Diana was then pregnant. The resulting album, "Diana and Marvin", became a top twenty U.S. success and reached the top ten in the U.K.
Breakthrough from Motown.
In 1968, Marvin returned to the top of the charts as a solo act with the Norman Whitfield-penned "I Heard It Through the Grapevine". The song, originally recorded in 1967, was initially blocked from release since Berry Gordy disapproved of the song. Instead, one of its cover versions by Gladys Knight & the Pips was released, and it ended up reaching number-two. Whitfield was determined to get Gordy to release Marvin's, and in October 1968, Motown finally issued "Grapevine" as a single where it eventually reached number-one in December of that year, it also reached number one in the U.K. and became the biggest-selling single in Motown history during the sixties. During this period, Marvin used his "Grapevine" success to produce a collection of singles for his background group the Originals. Those songs, "Baby I'm for Real" and "The Bells" became top 40 recordings. After two more top ten hits that followed, Marvin began working on a more personal production. Inspired by Tammi Terrell's death, his brother Frankie's Vietnam stories, footage of the Vietnam War and race riots in the U.S., Marvin's success with his first productions and a rough draft of a song composed by Four Tops member Obie Benson, Marvin recorded an introspective single titled "What's Going On". Like "Grapevine", Motown refused to release it due to it being "uncommercial" and "risky" since Gordy couldn't find a song to match anything with and also because Gordy was against anyone in his company to talk openly about serious issues. In spite of releases by the Temptations, the Supremes and Edwin Starr, which opened about inner city struggle, illegitimate pregnancy and wars respectively, Motown was afraid the song would ruin Marvin's squeaky-clean teen pop image. Marvin, confident in his own abilities, stood his ground, and in January of 1971, the song was released quickly becoming a hit single reaching number two on the Billboard pop chart and number one on the Cashbox pop chart, also hitting number-one on the Billboard R&B chart. A follow-up album of the same name was quickly released that May and with accompanying top ten singles "Mercy Mercy Me" and "Inner City Blues", songs that also talked about social issues including environmentalism, the album sold over a million copies and permanently made Marvin one of the first independent artists on the label. Inspired by Marvin's success, Stevie Wonder refused to renew his contract with Motown in May of 1971 after releasing the non-Motown approved "Where I'm Coming From", an album that also dealt with social issues. In 1972, Motown signed Marvin to a $1 million contract, making him at the time the highest-paid black recording artist in music history. Marvin celebrated the contract by releasing the pro-political single "You're the Man", which attacked the Nixon administration. Moving from Detroit to Los Angeles that year, he recorded the soundtrack to the movie, "Trouble Man". The soundtrack and its title track became top twenty and top ten hits on the charts respectively. In 1973, Marvin dramatically changed direction from social topics to sexual politics with the release of "Let's Get It On". The song became Marvin's second number-one Billboard hit and was the biggest-selling R&B single of that year. Its subsequent album became another critical milestone as "What's Going On" had been and with his new look as a wool hat-wearing, studded jean outfit, bearded "messiah", Marvin had become an icon of early seventies soul music.
Decline.
In 1974, Marvin returned officially to touring after a four-year sabbatical following the death of Tammi Terrell and began to suffer from the effects of a long-developing cocaine addiction, which started in the late sixties. Marvin went a year without producing a record though through yet another new Motown contract, he built a recording studio in the middle of Sunset Boulevard. In 1976, Marvin released the erotic "I Want You" album, an album that had been delayed by his first wife, Anna Gordy's divorce case against him. The divorce was finalized after Marvin agreed to remit a portion of his royalties from his next album to Ms. Gordy. The result was the controversial "Here, My Dear" project, which came out in early 1979 after two years of holding the project from release. Marvin recorded a disco hit in 1977 titled "Got to Give It Up". The song hit number-one marking his third pop hit to reach the spot and his twelfth on the R&B side. It would end up being his last major hit with the Motown label. Following the release of "Here, My Dear", the album tanked and Marvin, already run dry by dwindling finances, numerous lawsuits, a troubling marriage to a second wife and an even more troubling cocaine addiction, eventually left his wife, three children, and the U.S. settling first in Hawaii and then settling in London in 1980 after a European promoter advised him to tour Europe. Recording most of his final Motown release, "In Our Lifetime", in London, the album was rush-released by Motown in early 1981 much to Marvin's chagrin: he complained that the label had edited certain songs, including one that seemed unfinished, and had taken off a question mark that he put at the end of the title to ask a question about life. Marvin stated he would no longer record for Motown and was granted his wish when CBS Records brought him out of his contract in April of 1982.
Return from exile.
In 1981, Marvin settled in Ostend, Belgium thanks to a former Belgian sports promoter and with his encouragement began rebuilding his life cutting away from drugs and also rebuilding his music career. After a successful European tour, Marvin signed with CBS Records and began work on a new album in his adopted home. After his friend and biographer David Ritz arrived to interview him, Marvin and David collaborated on a reggae-styled track in which Ritz titled "Sexual Healing" after a conversation between the two evolved into pornography. The song was one of eight Marvin worked on to fit into his comeback release, "Midnight Love". Boosted by its Caribbean flavor, the song returned Marvin to the top of the charts, hitting number-one on the R&B chart for a period of ten weeks and also becoming a top ten hit in several countries including number-three in the U.S. pop chart and number-four in England. It also hit number-one in New Zealand. Selling over two million copies, it became Marvin's biggest-selling single to date and won him his first couple of Grammys in 1983. Marvin's comeback was cemented with his emotional performance of the national anthem at the NBA All Star Game and a reunited showcase at "Motown 25", where Marvin was reunited with his old Motown buddies. Marvin's performance consisted of him playing piano while speaking on the illustrious history of black music before singing "What's Going On" to a receptive audience. That year, Marvin went on the road to promote the "Midnight Love" album. It would end up being his final tour.
Death and aftermath.
Settling in his parents' Los Angeles home after the tour, Marvin reportedly struggled with drug abuse and his troubling relationship with his father continued spiraling downwards. On the morning of April 1, 1984, Marvin and his father got into an argument after his father verbally assaulted Marvin's mother while they were arguing over misplaced business documents. The two men clashed and Marvin reportedly shoved his father to the ground during the struggle. After returning to his room, Marvin's father reentered Marvin's room with a loaded shotgun Marvin had bought for him for Christmas and shot him twice with one fatal shot to his chest. At approximately 1:10 pm, Marvin Gaye was pronounced dead on the scene at Cedars Sinai Medical Center. He was one day shy of his forty-fifth birthday. Marvin's death shocked his fans though family members and friends knew of Marvin's depression. Over 10,000 well-wishers paid their last respects at a star-studded funeral in Los Angeles. Marvin's ashes was spread to the beaches of the Atlantic Ocean. In 1985, Motown and CBS collaborated on two posthumous records while Motown re-released Marvin's famed material. In 1987, Marvin was posthumously inducted to the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame confirming his status as one of the greatest artists in music history.
Personal life.
Marvin first dated Anna Gordy in 1961. Anna was said to be the inspiration behind Marvin's sixties hits including "Stubborn Kind of Fellow" and "You Are a Wonderful One". He married her in 1964 and the couple adopted a boy they named Marvin Pentz Gaye III in 1965. Their marriage was rocky by the time Marvin began courting a beautiful seventeen-year-old high-school student named Janis Hunter in 1973. Hunter was reportedly the inspiration behind the song "If I Should Die Tonight" as he had sung the song to her in the studio. His 1976 album, "I Want You", was dedicated to Janis, who married him in 1977. The couple had two children together, daughter Nona and son Frankie. They divorced in 1981.

Confucius
sports
Confucius (in Chinese: 孔夫子) (born 551 BC, died 478 BC) was an important Chinese educator and philosopher. His original name was Kong Qiu (in Chinese: 孔丘) or Zhong Ni (in Chinese: 仲尼). He was born in Lu State (魯), China on day 27 of month number eight in the Chinese Lunar calendar in 551 BC. His father was Shu Liang He (叔梁纥), and his mother was Yan Zheng Zai (顏徵在). When he was 3 years old, his father died, and he lived with his mother after that.
As a child, he was eager to learn about everything, and was very interested in rituals. Once he grew up, he worked as a state official who handled farms and cattle. Then he became a teacher.
Confucius lived in a time when many states were fighting wars in China.
This period was called the Spring and Autumn period of the Zhou Dynasty.
Confucius did not like this and wanted to bring back order to society.
Teaching.
Like Socrates, Confucius sometimes did not answer philosophical questions himself.
Instead he wanted people to think hard about problems and to learn from others, especially from history.
Confucius also thought that people should get power because they were good and skilled, and not just because they came from powerful families.
Confucius wanted people to think about other people more than about money or what they owned.
However he also felt that there should be strong rules in society and that people needed to obey them.
Confucius thought that there were five relationships people could have, and that they all had their own rules.
These were traditional relationships called the 'five prototypes'.
Confucius said that in all these relationships, both people must obey rules.
For example a subject must obey a prince, but also a prince must listen to a subject and must rule him well and fairly.
Confucius said that people should only do things to other people if they would be OK with other people doing those things to themselves.
This is sometimes called the Golden Rule and was also taught by Jesus Christ.
His students wrote down small stories about him, and things that he said.
These were put together to make a book called The Analects.
Cultural influence.
Confucius' birthday, September 28, is a holiday in China. On that day people celebrate teachers.

Kenny Rogers
music
Kenny Rogers (born August 21, 1938 in Houston, Texas) is a Grammy Award winning country music singer and songwriter. His best known songs include "The Gambler" and "Lucille". He also acted in several movies and television series and owns a franchise of roast chicken restaurants called "Kenny Rogers Roasters"

Republican Party (United States)
politics
The United States Republican Party is one of the two biggest political parties in the United States of America. The other large party is the Democratic Party. The United States also has many other small parties known as third parties.
The Republican National Committee coordinates most of the activities of the Republican Party in all 50 states.
The Republicans are often called "the right" or "conservatives". The Republican Party itself is also known as the G.O.P., which stands for "Grand Old Party."
The symbol of the republican party is the elephant. This symbol was first used in 1874 in a political cartoon "(pictured)".
Traditionally, the Republican Party has supported conservative causes, and has wanted to lower taxes and to make the government smaller.
U.S. presidents.
The last United States president, George W. Bush, was a Republican.

Boyz II Men
music
Boyz II Men is an American boy band from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. They were popular in the early 1990s. Founded in 1988 as a quintet (group of five people), Boyz II Men found fame as a quartet (group of four), with members Nathan Morris, Michael McCary, Shawn Stockman, and Wanya Morris, on Motown Records during the early 1990s.
Based on sales, Boyz II Men is the most successful R&B male vocal group of all time. It has recorded five #1 R&B hits between 1992 and 1997 and has since sold more than 90 million albums and 50 million singles. Three of its #1 hits, "End of the Road", "I'll Make Love to You", and "One Sweet Day" (with Mariah Carey), set and broke records for the longest period of time a single remained at #1 on the Billboard Hot 100.

Johnny Nash
music
John Lester "Johnny" Nash Jr. (August 19, 1940-), is a American reggae and soul singer. He was born in Houston, Texas USA.
His biggest hit was "I Can See Clearly Now" in 1972.
In his late teens Johnny Nash came to the attention of Arthur Godfrey and put in many appearances on his TV show. He also had a featured role in the motion picture "Take A Giant Step". Johnny began recording for the ABC Paramount label, and under the guidance of arranger producer Don Costa, he made a number of albums of standards. Including "Johnny Nash", "Let's Get Lost", "The Quiet Hour", "Studio Time" and "I Got Rhythm". Even though he posessed a superb singing voice, it seems that in the early 1960's, all young black male ballad singers were overshadowed by another Johnny. Johnny Mathis. Johnny Nash never really came into the forefront of pop music. He made a couple of obscure jazz tinged albums for the Argo label. Then after being off the scene for a couple of years, he emerged with a new music genre, the reggae, soul and caribbean type song stylings. This was the mid 70's and he found new fans and a new popularity.

Linda Ronstadt
music
Linda Ronstadt (July 15, 1946-) is an American singer. She is famous for performing in many different styles of music including Pop, Folk, Country, and Latin. She was born in Tucson, Arizona. Linda Maria Ronstadt (born July 15, 1946 in Tucson, Arizona) she is an American popular vocalist and entertainer who has earned multiple Grammy Awards, an Emmy Award, numerous United States and internationally certified gold, platinum and multiplatinum albums, a Tony Award and Golden Globe nominations. A singer-songwriter and record producer, she is better known as a definitive interpreter of songs.[1][2] Ronstadt has recorded over 30 studio solo albums, and has made guest appearances on over 100 other albums.[3] She became the first female artist in music history to have highly anticipated arena and stadium tours - coinciding with a string of blockbuster albums, thus making her able to command sell-out concerts.[4][5]
Ronstadt has recorded studio albums in many genres outside the rock field and is known throughout the music industry as one of the most versatile, durable, and commercially successful female pop singers of all time. Branching out, she has recorded Traditional Pop, mariachi, jazz, folk, Broadway and opera. However, her most commercially successful period was during the 1970s and 1980s. As she moved on to other genres in the 1980s she maintained her consistent commercial success and remained one of the best-selling solo album artists of this decade. From the 1990s on till the 2000s Ronstadt has continued her success, releasing many Grammy winning recordings and remaining one of the most celebrated recording artist to date. Ronstadt has 27 top 100 albums, 10 of which have reached top 10, and three of those hit the top of the Billboard 200 pop album chart. She also has 21 Top 40 hits on the Billboard Hot 100, 10 of which have reached the top 10, three peaking at No. 2, and the No. 1 hit, "You're No Good."

Jana Gana Mana
music
Jana Gana Mana (Thou Art the Ruler of the Minds of All People) is the national anthem of India. Rabindranath Tagore wrote the song. He is a bengal poet, who wrote many plays also. The song's original version is in the Bengali language, but the Hindi language version is much more widespread in India because Hindi is India's official language.
The Hindi lyrics are transliterated below.

Bob Dole
politics
Robert Joseph Dole (born July 22, 1923) is a former United States Senator from Kansas. He was the Republican leader of the Senate from 1985 until 1996. In 1996, he ran against Bill Clinton for President, and lost. After that, he retired from politics at age 72.
In 1976, President Gerald Ford chose him to be his Vice Presidential choice for the November, 1976 election. They lost the election so Bob Dole never became Vice President.
Shortly after the 1996 election, he famously appeared in a Pepsi commercial, saying, "I just cannot win". He has also done commercials for Viagra.
Bob Dole has a habit of talking in the third person, or using his own name instead of "I" when he talks about himself. This habit is the basis for many jokes about Dole.
An episode of "The Simpsons" had Bob Dole in it. The episode takes place during the election of Bill Clinton and Bob Dole, and they get abducted by aliens.

Lionel Richie
music
Lionel Richie (born June 20, 1949) is a popular American pop singer, most famous for his 1980s songs. Richie started his career with The Commodores; between him and the band, "Three Times a Lady" is their best remembered effort.
His self-titled debut album was one of the biggest music successes of 1982. More successful was its follow-up, "Can't Slow Down".
In 1984, as a surprise guest, he sang "All Night Long" to a worldwide audience of over two billion at the Los Angeles Summer Olympics.
In 1990, three years after he retired, Richie adopted Nicole Escovedo. Now Nicole Richie, she has recently appeared on Fox's "The Simple Life" along with Paris Hilton.
The singer returned to the music industry in 1996 with "Louder than Words". Another album of his, "Renaissance", came out four years later.

Philip Glass
music
Phillip Glass is a famous American composer who has written many pieces in his life. He was born on January 31, 1937. He has created operas, music for concerts, dances and much more. He is known for writing minimalism music.

Petula Clark
music
Petula Clark (born November 15, 1932 in Surrey, England) is a British singer, actress, and composer. She began her career as a child and was popular in Britain during World War II. In the 1950s, she became a successful pop singer, first in the UK, then in continental Europe, and finally in the United States in the mid-1960s. Her most famous song is "Downtown," which was recorded in four languages and sold nearly five million copies worldwide. Her films include "The Card" (1952), "The Runaway Bus" (1956), "Finian's Rainbow" (1968), and "Goodbye, Mr. Chips". She continues to record and perform in concert.

Ibn Khaldun
science
Abdul Rahman Ibn Khaldun was an influential Arab thinker of the 14th century. Born in Tunis in 1332, Khaldun served the government of the day in many ways. He died in Cairo as a judge in 1406.
Two of the things Khaldun wrote are Muqaddimah (Proglemena) and Autobiography.
Khaldun is the founder of sociology. Ibn Khaldun was one of the greatest writers of Islam in the Middle Ages.

Johnny Winter
music
John Dawson Winter III (February 23, 1944-) is an albino blues musician from Beaumount, Texas, United States. His brother Edgar Winter is also a famous musician.

Edgar Winter
music
Edgar Winter (born December 28, 1946) is an albino musician from Beaumont, Texas. He is the brother of Johnny Winter who is also a famous musician. He mostly plays keyboards and the saxophone.

Paco de Lucía
music
Paco de Lucia (real name: Francisco Sanchez Gomez, born December 21, 1947) is a famous Flamenco guitar player from Spain.

Bruce Springsteen
music
Bruce Springsteen (born September 23, 1949) is a American rock musician from New Jersey. His songs include "Born to Run" and "Born in the USA". For over 30 years he has been a singer. Jon Landau, a music writer for "Rolling Stone" magazine, once said: "I have seen the future of rock and roll, and its name is Bruce Springsteen." Springsteen won an Oscar for his song "Streets Of Philadelphia", written for the Tom Hanks' film "Philadelphia".
"What you do if someone does not understand your song, is to keep on singing your song." This statement comes from the singer himself.

Rosa Luxemburg
politics
Rosa Luxemburg (March 5, 1870 or 1871 - January 15, 1919) was a Polish-born German Marxist. Her birth name was Rosalia "Luxenburg". She was born into a Jewish family. She was the fifth child of her parents. Her father was a wood trader/timber trader. His name was Eliasz Luxemburg III. Her mother's name was Line (maiden name: Löwenstein). She organised a socialist uprising in Germany but was killed by the fascists.

Olivia Newton-John
music
Olivia Newton-John (September 26,1948-) is a British-born Australian singer and actress.

Georges Brassens
music
Georges Brassens (October 22, 1921 - October 29, 1981) was a french singer and songwriter. He sang "La mauvaise réputation" (the bad reputation) and "Le gorille" (the gorilla).

Leonard Bernstein
music
Leonard Bernstein (August 25, 1918 – October 14, 1990) was an American composer and conductor. He is best known for conducting the New York Philharmonic and for composing "West Side Story" and "Candide".

Phil Collins
music
Phil Collins (born January 30, 1951) is an English singer and drummer. He was born in Chiswick. He plays with the band Genesis.

Charlie Christian
music
Charles Henry "Charlie" Christian (29 July 1916 – 2 March 1942) was an American jazz guitarist. He is important, because he was one of the first musicians to use an electric guitar.

Alexander Hamilton
politics
Alexander Hamilton (born January 11, year unknown - probably 1755 or 1757–died July 12, 1804) was the United States' first Secretary of the Treasury, and was known for the creation of a national bank.
Early Life.
Hamilton was not born in the United States. He was from the Carribean island of Nevis. His father was named James Hamilton and his mother was named Rachel Fawcett Lavien. Hamilton's mother had a child from a previous marriage that she left behind when she moved to Nevis. At the time, this meant that Hamilton was illegitimate since his mother and father were not legally married. He was very sensitive about this fact.
Education.
Hamilton graduated from Columbia University, which was known then as Kings College. He wanted to go to Princeton but wasn't accepted.
Legacy.
Hamilton is shown on the face of the U.S. Ten dollar bill. He is one of only two non-Presidents (the other is Benjamin Franklin) honored on commonly used notes.

Wendy Carlos
music
Wendy Carlos (Born Walter Carlos) is an American composer and musician. She was born November 14, 1939 in Pawtucket, Rhode Island. She is known as one of the first people to use electric instruments to make music. In 1968, she released her music album "Switched on Bach". This album used many new electric instruments including the Moog Synthesizer. She also did the music for movies like A Clockwork Orange, The Shining, and Tron. In 1972, Carlos had a medical operation to change her body from male to female.

Justin Timberlake
music
Justin Randall Timberlake (born January 31, 1981 in Memphis, Tennessee, United States) is an American rhythm and blues singer. Timberlake first became famous when he appeared in the television series "Mickey Mouse Club" and later when he was part of the Grammy Award-winning boy band *NSYNC. He started his own career as a solo musician in 2002 and has recorded two albums, "Justified" and "FutureSex/LoveSounds".
Early life.
Timberlake's ancestors were British and he grew up in the Baptist religion. His parents divorced in 1985 and since then, both have remarried. He grew up in Millington, Tennessee, a small town north of Memphis.
In 1993, Timberlake joined the "Mickey Mouse Club", a television series featuring young teenage performers. This was the first time he had a taste of being a celebrity. Timberlake was featured in the sixth and seventh seasons of the series. During the show, he met future girlfriend Britney Spears, future tourmate Christina Aguilera, and future bandmate JC Chasez. When the show ended in 1995, Timberlake joined with Chasez and others to form an all-male singing group, *NSYNC.
Music career.
Justin Timberlake was one of the singers in the boy band *NSYNC. The group formed in 1995. The group released three albums, all of which were very popular in the United States and Europe. The band also had a few singles that were popular in many parts of the world. The group split up in 2002, and Timberlake started his solo career.
Right after the band split, he recorded his first album, "Justified". His first single from the album was "Like I Love You". He first performed the song at the MTV Video Music Awards in August 2002. He later released the album in November. It sold over seven million copies around the world. Timberlake later went on a tour with Christina Aguilera called the "Justified/Stripped Tour". Other singles released the album were "Cry Me a River", "Rock Your Body" and "Señorita".
In 2004, he performed at the Super Bowl XXXVIII (38) halftime show with Janet Jackson. At the end of the performance, he tore a part of Jackson's costume, revealing one of her breasts. This incident received many complaints from viewers. Many complained because many children watch the halftime show. Timberlake and Jackson said sorry after the event, saying that it was not planned and it was because of a "wardrobe malfunction". The phrase, which describes the accidental showing of a private body part, later became well known and is now often used in popular culture.
Due to the event at the Super Bowl, both Timberlake and Jackson were banned from attending the Grammy Awards in 2004. However, Timberlake won two Grammy Awards for the success of his first album.
Justin Timberlake also recorded songs with other musicians, including "Where is the Love?" and "My Style" with the Black Eyed Peas, and "Signs" with Snoop Dogg.
A second album, "LoveSounds", was recorded in 2005 and released in 2006. Many singles were released and were very popular. They were "SexyBack", "My Love", "What Goes Around...Comes Around", "Summer Love" and "LoveStoned". The first three singles topped the music charts in the United States. In support of his album, he went on a worldwide tour called the "FutureSex/LoveShow". Timberlake was also featured in the song "Give It to Me" with Nelly Furtado and Timbaland, which was very popular worldwide.
He won two more Grammy Awards in 2007, both for his work on his second album.
Personal life.
Timberlake had two early romances when he was a teenager, one with a schoolmate and then with pop singer Veronica Finn, but both ended unhappily. He later entered a relationship with Britney Spears when they met at the "Mickey Mouse Club". This relationship gained high public attention. It ended suddenly in 2002 when Timberlake claimed that Spears cheated on him with choreographer Wade Robson.
Later in 2002, he dated actress-dancer Jenna Dewan and actress-singer Alyssa Milano. In April 2003, he started dating actress Cameron Diaz after they met at the Nickelodeon Kids' Choice Awards. There were many rumors afterwards that the two broke up, but he stated on December 16, 2006 on "Saturday Night Live" that they had split up.
In 2007, it was revealed that he had a romantic relationship with actress Jessica Biel.
Film career.
Timberlake also works in the film industry. He is the voice of King Arthur in the recently released movie "Shrek the Third". He is also in the movies "Alpha Dog" and "Black Snake Moan".

Industrial Revolution
science
The Industrial Revolution is the name historians have given to the period in history when there was a large and rapid change in the way things were made. This meant that instead of things being hand made in small workshops, they were made more cheaply in large quantities in large factories using machines.
Things could now be mass-produced instead of making them one by one and many people began to move from a agricultural based life to intercity. Suddenly, factories and commercial enterprise became the name of the game and focus was lost from hand weaving and loom work.
It began in Great Britain in the middle of the 18th century, and spread to Europe and the Americans by the early 19th century. It meant that instead of most things being made by hand in small workshops, they were made more cheaply in large quantities by powered machines in factories.
New ideas and inventions were also taken up in mining, the working of metals, and in the transportation of goods. The most important new invention of the industrial revolution was the steam engine. The steam engine, invented by James Watt, was used to power the factories and pump out the deeper mines. It was also used in railway engines. The heat from burning coal became the main source of power.
Some historians see the industrial revolution as finishing about 1820, but they agree this was only the start of change in the way we make things, which continues right up to the present time.
Historians still disagree on why the Industrial Revolution happened when it did, and why it happened in England first. It built on a new spirit of studying things through science in the 17th century, a period called the Enlightenment by historians. England also was a politically stable country throughout the 1700s with no wars at home (although it had many abroad).
England was also lucky that it had many of the raw materials needed to make and power the new machines close by within its borders. It also had an overseas empire that would buy the goods it made and provide it with a cheap source of other raw materials such as cotton and sugar. At the time of the industrial revolution slavery was practiced in many British Empire lands, this supplied a source for some of the money which could be spent on building the new industries. Slavery was finally ended in 1834 as machines eventually replaced the slaves. The slaves now became salaried workers who were paid for their work. That meant that the living standards rose and people generally became richer and healthier. But that in turn led a strong growth of number of people in England, leading into difficult social problems.

Jo Whiley
media
Johanne "Jo" Whiley (born 4 July, 1965 in Northampton) is an English radio DJ on BBC Radio 1, and a television presenter. Starting in February 1997, she had a weekday lunchtime show, called "The Jo Whiley Show" and later "The Lunchtime Social". When Simon Mayo left Radio 1 for Radio Five Live in February 2001, Whiley's show was moved to mid-morning.

Trent Reznor
music
Trent Reznor (born Michael Trent Reznor) (May 17, 1965) is an American singer and musician. He is the lead singer and only regular member of the band Nine Inch Nails (often called NIN.) He sings and plays most of the music himself. He also writes all of the lyrics.
Reznor started playing music when he learned the piano, which he started when he was five years old. He was so good he could maybe have become a pianist if he had wanted to. He also learned saxophone and tuba.
He joined his first band when he was in college, called Option 30. He moved to Cleveland, Ohio, USA in 1985 and joined a band called The Innocent where he played keyboard. In 1986 he joined another band, The Exotic Birds.
He got a job as a cleaner at a music recording studio called Right Track Studio which is now called Midtown Recording. He sometimes used the studio to record songs which later went on his first album "Pretty Hate Machine". When the studio heard how good he was, he quit his job as a cleaner and made the band Nine Inch Nails. Their albums since then have been "Broken" (1992), "The Downward Spiral" (1994), "The Fragile" (1999), "With Teeth" (2005), "Year Zero" (2007), "Ghosts I-IV" (2008), and "The Slip" (2008).

Terry Jacks
music
Terry Jacks (born March 29, 1944) is a Canadian musician. He is most famous for his song "Seasons in the Sun" which was a huge hit in 1974. He now works as an environmental activist.

Confucianism
science
Confucianism is the philosophy based on the teachings of Confucius (511 BC - 479 BC), who was an important Chinese philosopher. Confucianism has a complex system of moral, social, political, and religious thought, and has had a large influence on the history of Chinese civilization.
Confucianism was made to stop the fall of Chinese society. After the Zhou Dynasty fell, people cared only for themselves and didn't have any respect for others. Confucianism became a social order for China, teaching that social relationships are the most important. People slowly started to believe in it, because they wanted to have peace, but they had to care for themselves too. As a result, Confucianism brought the people love, harmony, and respect for one another.
Confucianism was started in Ch'u-fu, Confucious's birthplace. Today, Confucianism is spread all the way around the world, but is still more pronounced in China.

Mohammad Khatami
politics
Seyyed Mohammad Khatami (سید محمد خاتمی), born October 14, 1943 was President of Iran from August 2, 1997 to August 2, 2005 and was followed by Mahmoud Ahmadinejad. He was heralded as a reformist, but was unable to change much under the regime of Khamenei.

Otto von Bismarck
politics
Prince Otto Eduard Leopold von Bismarck-Schönhausen Duke of Lauenburg (April 1, 1815 – July 30, 1898) was a very well known aristocrat and statesman of the 19th century in Europe. As Prime Minister of Prussia from 1862 to 1890, he was mainly responsible for unifying the many independent German countries and founding the German Empire in 1871. He became the first chancellor of the new Empire.
He was "Graf von Bismarck-Schönhausen" (Count Bismarck-Schönhausen) in 1865, then since 1871 "Fürst" von Bismarck (Prince Bismarck) and since 1890 the "Herzog von Lauenburg" (Duke of Lauenburg). First he did not want the duke title, but accepted it later.
Bismarck was very conservative and he was strongly connected to the monarchy. He was not a big supporter of democracy. His most important goal was to make Prussia stronger and he achieved that through the unification of Germany. Bismarck tried to stop the socialist movement and to reduce the power of the Catholic Church. One way to stop socialism was to make the working class happy. He did that by introducing many social reforms like public health and accident insurance, as well as pensions for old people.

Carly Simon
music
Carly Simon (June 25,1945-) is an American singer and songwriter. She has a song called "Let the River Run"

Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky
music
Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky (Russian: Пётр Ильич Чайкoвский, "Pëtr Il’ič Čajkovskij";) (born Kamsko-Votkinsk, 7 May 1840; died St Petersburg, 6 November 1893) was a Russian composer who lived in the Romantic period. He is the most popular of all Russian composers. He wrote melodies which were exciting and dramatic and full of emotions. He learned a lot from studying the music of Western Europe, but his music also sounds very Russian. His compositions include 11 operas, 3 ballets, orchestral music, chamber music and over 100 songs. His ballets ("Swan Lake", "The Nutcracker " and "Sleeping Beauty") have some of the best known tunes in all classical music.
Early Years.
Tchaikovsky’s father was a Ukrainian whose job was a mining engineer. His mother’s grandfather was a Frenchman who had moved to Russia. She was a nervous woman and Tchaikovsky may have got his nervous character from her. Tchaikovsky was only five when he started taking piano lessons. He was soon better than his teacher. The family had an orchestrion (a kind of musical box) which played some tunes from classical music by Mozart, Bellini, Donizetti and Rossini.
In 1848 the family moved to St. Petersburg. Tchaikovsky was unhappy and unsettled as he was often separated from his family who moved several times. In 1854 his mother died. He tried to comfort himself by playing music. He spent nine years at the School of Jurisprudence. When he left school he had to get a job. For four years he worked as a clerk in the Ministry of Justice. Then the composer and pianist Anton Rubinstein helped him to become a music student at the newly opened conservatory in St. Petersburg. He learned to play the flute and the organ as well as the piano and learning all about composition. In 1866 he moved to Moscow where Nikolai Rubinstein, the brother of Anton, encouraged him to write music with a Russian character. He worked very hard, and was often exhausted, but he managed to finish his First Symphony which was performed in 1868.
Tchaikovsky met some famous musicians including the French composer Berlioz who was visiting Moscow. He also became friendly with the Russian composer Mily Balakirev who was very helpful and persuaded him to rewrite one of his works several times until it was really good. The result was a piece for orchestra called "Romeo and Juliet" which soon became internationally known. Balakirev had four friends who were composers. This circle of friends is often called “The Five” or “The Mighty Handful”. They were interested in using Russian folktunes in their music. Tchaikovsky was never a member of the group, although he liked their ideas. Tchaikovsky was different to them: he had learned music at the Conservatoire where he had studied Western music. The harmonies that he used in his works were often not suitable for Russian folktunes. He wrote lots of songs which are very romantic in character. One of them, "None but the lonely heart", is especially well-known in English.
By now Tchaikovsky was writing works which were to bring him great fame. He wrote two more symphonies, and his First Piano Concerto, one of the most popular of all piano concertos, was given its first performance in Boston. He was also writing operas and chamber music.
Years of fame.
In 1875 Tchaikovsky started to make a long tour of Europe. He liked Bizet’s opera "Carmen", but Wagner’s operas from the "Ring cycle " bored him. In 1877 he finished "Swan Lake", the first of his three ballets. The audience did not like it at first because the dancers were not very good.
In the summer of 1877 Tchaikovsky decided to marry. His wife was called Antonina Milyukova. The marriage was a disaster. Tchaikovsky was not interested in women and only married to try to stop people gossiping about the fact that he was gay (homosexual). A few weeks after the marriage he ran away and never lived with her again. Gradually he started to accept his sexual orientation.
Another woman was to become important in his life, but in a very different way. It was to be a very unusual relationship. Her name was Nadezhda von Meck. She was the wife of a rich man. She loved Tchaikovsky’s music and promised him that she would pay him a lot of money every month so long as he promised her that he would never try to meet her. Tchaikovsky no longer needed to work. He was able to give up his teaching job at the Conservatory. For several years he spent the winters in Europe and the summers in Russia. Nadezhda and Tchaikovsky wrote long letters to one another, often quite passionate and dreamy,they talked about love,life and how they wanted it to change,but they never saw one another. He had plenty of time to write music: he wrote several operas including "Eugene Onegin" and his Fourth and Fifth Symphonies, the Violin Concerto, the Serenade for Strings, "Capriccio Italienne" and the "1812 Overture". Tchaikovsky loved Nadezhda very much but never actually told her his true feelings.
His Last Years.
By 1885 Tchaikovsky had got tired of travelling around. He rented a country house in Klin, just outside Moscow. He lived a regular life, reading, walking in the forest, composing during the day and playing music with his friends in the evenings. He started to have more confidence as a conductor and toured Europe twice, conducting in Leipzig, Berlin, Prague, Hamburg, Paris and London. In 1889 he finished his second ballet, "The Sleeping Beauty" and the next year, while staying in Florence, he wrote his famous opera "The Queen of Spades" based on a story by Pushkin. Later that year Nadezhda von Meck wrote to him that she had lost nearly all her money and could not continue to support him.
In the spring of 1891 he was invited to conduct in New York where the Carnegie Hall was being opened. He also conducted concerts in Baltimore and Philadelphia. When he returned to Russia he wrote his last ballet "The Nutcracker" and his Sixth Symphony, known as the “Pathétique”
which was dedicated to his nephew with whom he was passionately in love. This work is often considered his best. It was performed in St Petersburg on 16 October 1893. Five days later he suddenly became ill. A lot of people in the city had a terrible illness called cholera. The germs of this illness can be spread through water. Tchaikovsky died four days later. Many people think that he committed suicide by deliberately drinking contaminated water. He may have wanted to (or even been forced to) commit suicide in order to avoid a scandal because he was having a relationship with a nephew of an important aristocratic man. Exactly what happened will always be a mystery.

Peter Frampton
music
Peter Frampton (Born April 22, 1950) is a English guitarist. He is best known for the album "Frampton Comes Alive".

Carl Radle
music
Carl Dean Radle (born June 18, 1942 Tulsa, Oklahoma, died May 30, 1980) was an American musician, best known for being the bassist in Derek and the Dominos. Radle worked with many well-known artists and worked on many gold and platinum singles and albums. Radle is thought by many to have been the best bass guitar sideman in the music business.
In May 30, 1980, Radle died at age 37, of problems from a kidney infection caused by his alcoholism and drug addiction.
Biography.
Radle took clarinet and piano lessons when he was young. While at Edison High School in Tulsa, Radle fell in love with rock and roll. By the time he graduated in 1960, Radle had a bought an old guitar and taught himself how to play. As he became more skilled, he began playing in Tulsa clubs in the area with friends and musicians David Gates, Leon Russell, J.J. Cale, Jim Markham, Tommy Crook, Jim Karstein, Chuck Blackwell, Larry Bell, and many others. This group would be considered the starters of what a style of music known as The Tulsa Sound (a mix of Rockabilly, Rock and Roll, and Blues sounds of the lates 1950s and early 1960s.) After graduating high school, they began to go to California to try to get into the music business.
Leon Russell was one of the first to go to California, and his home/stubio on Skyhill Drive in Hollywood, became a place for young Tulsa musicians and different friends to stay. They mostly played as back-up musicians in clubs, with soon to be well known singers like Bobby Rydell fronting the act. Radle, during this time, recorded with pop duo Skip & Flip; with Radle they released the single "Tossin' and Turnin' / Everytime I Have to Cry".
After finding it very hard to make a living in the music world, Radle came back to Tulsa in 1964 and joined the Air National Guard. Radle was stationed in Texas for about a year, and was released (discharged) from the Air National Guard in 1965. After that, he came back to Tulsa again, once he returned, Russell called Radle from California, offering a job as the new bass guitarist for Gary Lewis & the Playboys.
Radle gave the music business another chance and moved back to California. Radle recorded and toured with Gary Lewis & the Playboys for about a year. During that time he was on television shows such as "The Ed Sullivan Show", "Shindig", "Hullabaloo", and "The Tonight Show". Other Tulsan musicians Jimmy Karstein and Tommy Crook also were members of this group. During this time they had many top ten sings like "Everybody Loves a Clown" and "Count Me In". Radle worked on fourteen of Gary Lewis's albums. This trip ended in January of 1967 when Gary Lewis was drafted into military service, and the band ended.
Radle stayed in California doing studio work and pick-up gigs, including working behind Dobie Gray in clubs. He recorded some with John Lee Hooker. Radle was on two albums in 1968 with The Colours, "The Colours" and "Atmosphere", which also had Tulsan musician Chuck Blackwell. In 1969, Leon Russell introduced Radle to Delaney and Bonnie Bramlett to help form the group Delaney & Bonnie and Friends. This group included Leon Russell, Rita Collidge, and Dave Mason. On tour the group was the opening act for Blind Faith, a supergroup which Eric Clapton was apart of. Once Blind Faith broke up, Eric Clapton joined Delaney & Bonnie and Friends for a tour and an album. Radle worked on writing and arranging two of the groups hit songs, "Get Ourselves Together" and "Never Ending Song of Love".
Delaney & Bonnie and Friends split up after about a year, and in early 1970 some of the former members, including Radle, joined Leon Russell, who formed the Joe Cocker Mad Dogs and Englishmen ensemble. The group had more than two dozen artists and performers. The tour went through forty-six cities in fifty-six days. This tour was one of the biggest in rock history. A major movie and a gold-selling album came from this same tour.
During that tour, Bobby Whitlock became friends with Eric Clapton, who wanted to put together a group to tour and promote his first solo album. This group would turn into Derek and the Dominos. Whitlock called in Radle and Los Angeles drummer Jim Gordon to join the group. They took time in May and July of 1970 to work with George Harrison on his album "All Things Must Pass", which had the hit singles "My Sweet Lord" and "What is Life". During a break in June, Clapton, Gordon, Whitlock, and Radle began serious work and completed their first single as Derek and the Dominos, "Tell the Truth" with "Roll it Over" on the B-side. After the George Harrison sessions finished in late summer of 1970, the new group continued sessions at Criteria Studios in Miami, Florida, with Tom Dowd as producer. During this time Duane Allman joined the group, and one of the greatest rock albums of all time, "Layla and Other Assorted Love Songs", came from this work.
The group took time off in August of 1971 to help George Harrison in the Concert for Bangladesh. Artists that were present at that concert included Bob Dylan, Billy Preston, Ringo Starr, Leon Russell, Jim Keltner, and many others.
Derek and the Dominoes began work for another group of songs, but disliking the new songs, and the tensions between the band, the band ended. For the next three years, Radle continued session work on projects with artists such as Art Garfunkel, Duane Allman, John Lee Hooker, Rita Collidge, Leon Russell, Bobby Whitlock, Donovan and Freddie King.
In April of 1974, Eric Clapton returned, recovered from a heroin addiction, and formed a new band. Its members including Radle, George Terry, Jaime Oldaker, Dick Sims, and Yvonne Elliman on vocals. The group recorded again at Criteria Studios under Dowd's production, to create the album "461 Ocean Boulevard". Radle arranged the track "Motherless Children" for the same album. For the next five years, Clapton's group, along with Radle (and vocalist Marcy Levy) worked closely together on many very successful gold and platinum albums.
By the second half of 1970s, Radle's health had started to turn bad, mostly from his large amount of drinking and drug use. In 1978, Clapton broke up the band and all the musicians went on to other things. Radle worked for awhile with Peter Frampton, but returned to Tulsa. On May 30, 1980, Radle died at age 37, of problems from a kidney infection caused by his alcoholism and drug addiction. At the time, his passing was barely noticed by Clapton's fans, or the music press.

Arthur C. Clarke
science
Sir Arthur Charles Clarke (born December 16, 1917; died Colombo 19 March, 2008) was a British author and inventor, most famous for his science fiction novel ', and for working with director Stanley Kubrick on the film of the same name. Clarke is considered one of the Big Three of science fiction, along with Robert A. Heinlein and Isaac Asimov.

Anthony Burgess
music
Anthony Burgess (1917-1993) was an Englishman who wrote many long stories, called novels.
One of these was named "A Clockwork Orange". It was about Evil. He had the idea for the story after a group of bad young men attacked and beat his dear wife for no reason.
Burgess also made songs and music. And he wrote a lot about writers he loved, such as James Joyce, a novelist, and Gerard Manley Hopkins, a poet.
Burgess was born in the city of Manchester, in the north of England. Before he became a writer, he was a soldier, then a teacher. When he was 37 years old, he left his home country to work in Malaysia and Brunei. Later, he lived in the USA, Italy, and France.
He was born very poor, the son of a man who made a meagre living out of selling cigarettes to workmen. But when Burgess died, he had grown rich. This was because he worked so hard at his art, which is the art of literature. He wrote at least 1,000 words every day of his life. But he always found time to be kind to other writers. He was friendly to the many people who came from afar to visit with him at his seaside home in Monaco.
The books by Burgess that people say they like the most are called "Earthly Powers", about the Pope; "Enderby", about a poet; and "Nothing Like the Sun", about William Shakespeare.

Brian Russell
sports
Brian Russell is an American music producer. He is the former husband of musician Brenda Russell. He is currently married to Cheryl Ladd.

Paul Karrer
science
Paul Karrer (April 21, 1889 – June 18, 1971) was a Swiss biochemist best known for his work on vitamins. He and Walter Norman Haworth won the Nobel Prize for Chemistry in 1937.

Smush Parker
sports
William "Smush" Parker (born 1 June 1981 in New York, New York) is a professional player in the American National Basketball Association.
Parker was not selected in the NBA player draft after a college career at Fordham University, and has played for the Cleveland Cavaliers, Detroit Pistons and Phoenix Suns, signing a contract with the Los Angeles Lakers during the 2005 offseason.

Doris Day
music
Doris Mary Ann von Kappelhoff (born April 3, 1924) is an American singer, actress, and animal welfare activist. She was known for her blonde wholesome image.

Johnny Rivers
music
Johnny Rivers (born John Ramistella on November 7, 1942 in New York City and grew up in Louisiana) is an American rock and roll musician. He was popular in the 1960s and 1970s for his songs like "Secret Agent Man", "The Poor Side of Town", "Baby I Need Your Lovin", "The Midnight Special", and "Swayin' To The Music (Slow Dancin')".

Otto Struve
science
Otto Struve (August 12 1897 – April 6 1963) was a Russian astronomer. He was the grandson of Otto Wilhelm von Struve and the great-grandson of Friedrich Wilhelm von Struve.
Struve's education at the University of Kharkov was interrupted by World War I and the Russian Civil War, which left him a refugee in Turkey. He went to the United States in 1921, obtained a Ph.D. from the University of Chicago and eventually became head of the astronomy department there. In 1932, he was made joint director of the University's Yerkes Observatory and McDonald Observatory (which he founded and where a telescope is named after him). Struve may be regarded as the father of modern SETI. He was one of the few eminent astronomers in the pre-Space Age era to publicly express a belief that extraterrestrial intelligence was abundant.

Dusty Springfield
music
Mary Isabel Catherine Bernadette O'Brien (or Dusty Springfield) (April 16, 1939 – 2 March 1999) was a British pop singer. She recorded over 200 songs and her career lasted over 30 years. She died of breast cancer in 1999.

Aretha Franklin
music
Aretha Franklin (born March 25, 1942) is an American soul and R&B singer. She is called the "Queen of Soul". She is best known for her songs "Respect", "Think", "Chain of Fools", and "(You Make Me Feel Like) A Natural Woman".

Mark Hoppus
music
Mark Hoppus is an American musician. He was born March 15, 1972. He is most famous for being a member of the band Blink 182. He played the bass guitar and sang. After Blink 182 broke up, he started another band, called "+44", with Blink 182's drummer, Travis Barker. When he was younger he played in bands called Pier 69 and the Attic Children. He has a wife named Skye and a son named Jack. Today he plays in +44 and produces music for other bands.

Lou Gehrig
sports
Henry Louis Gehrig (born Ludwig Heinrich Gehrig; June 19, 1903 — June 2, 1941) was an American baseball player. He played with Babe Ruth and the New York Yankees who were thought the best team of that time. He played with the Yankees for most of his playing time which started in 1923 and ended in 1939. He played in 2,130 games without a rest, which was the most of any player until Cal Ripken, Jr. in 1995. When he stopped playing as well, he went to a doctor who found out Gehrig had amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS — which is now sometimes called Lou Gehrig's disease). The doctor told Gehrig he had only a short time to live. On July 4, 1939, there was a special observation of Gehrig by the other Yankees, and Gehrig gave a public talk that became well-known. When he spoke that day he said he was "the luckiest man on the face of the earth". The mayor of New York City congratulated him for his teamwork. He died less than two years later.

Freddie Mercury
music
Freddie Mercury (born Farrokh Bulsara September 5 1946 - November 24 1991) was the lead singer for English rock band Queen.
Mercury was born in Stone Town in Zanzibar in Africa. His parents were Jer and Romi Bulsara. They were both Persian. His father worked as a High Court cashier in the government. Mercury also had a younger sister named Kashmira. She was born in 1952. His friends at school gave him the name "Freddie." His family then began calling him Freddie too.
At the young age of eight, Mercury was sent to a boarding school in India. The school, St. Peters English Boarding school, was around 50 miles outside of the city of Bombay (now called Mumbai). He grew up to be an amazing artist, and sportsman. At the age of ten he was named the school champion of Table Tennis. At the age of twelve he received a trophy called the Junior All-rounder.
Mercury was more interested in music than anything else. He listened to anything he could find. He soon got the schooling he needed to be able to help his music career. He joined a choir and started learning how to play the piano. Like any young school-bound music prodigy, he liked music much more than his school work. He had a 3.5 octave vocal range. That is very large for anyone, but especially large for a man.
Mercury moved to London for his musical career. While in London, he became very fond of a woman named Mary Austin. Although they never had a relationship together, they lived together before and after the band Queen took off and moved to a house in London nicknamed "The Court of King Freddie". Mary still lives in that house and allows fans to visit the house on the day of Freddie's death each year.
Mercury was in love with a local barber when he died. They were happy in a loving relationship of 6 years when it was learned by the media that Mercury had AIDS. Two days after the news was found out, Freddie passed away. He died of health problems caused by AIDS on November 24, 1991.

Gordon Lightfoot
music
Gordon Meredith Lightfoot (born November 17, 1938) is a Canadian singer and songwriter. He first became well-known in Canada in the late 1960s; some of his songs were even sung by Elvis Presley and Johnny Cash. Some of his most famous are "Sundown", "If You Read My Mind", and "The Wreck of the Edmund Fitzgerald".

Aphex Twin
music
Aphex Twin (born Richard David James, August 18, 1971 in Limerick, Ireland) is an Irish-born English musician. He lives and works in the United Kingdom. He is very famous for making electronic music (this means that he does not use instruments (for example, guitars and pianos) to make music).
Aphex Twin is not his real name. His real name is Richard David James. His name is a combination of Aphex Systems Limited, a brand of audio signal processingequipment and the word Twin to remember his twin brother. His twin was stillborn, but given the name Richard James.
Biography.
Aphex Twin was born in Limerick, Ireland. He grew up in Cornwall, England. He started to make music when he was a teenager. In 1991, he formed a record label called Rephlex Records.
After he became well known, he moved to London. This was so he could be in a place that was closer to other people. He still makes a lot of music today.
Other websites.
This is Aphex Twin's record label.

Gene Pitney
music
Gene Francis Alan Pitney (17 February 1940 - 5 April 2006) was a famous American pop singer and songwriter. He was born in Hartford, Connecticut. Some of his most well known songs are "Town Without Pity", "The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance" and "Twenty Four Hours From Tulsa". He died in 2006 while on tour in the UK.

Arnold Schoenberg
music
Arnold Franz Walter Schoenberg (September 13, 1874 – July 13, 1951) was an Austrian born composer. He was known for his twelve-tone system
History.
Schoenberg came from a strict Jewish family who had moved to Austria from Hungary. They were quite poor and Schoenberg taught himself about music. When he was grown up he had to do a lot of teaching to try and earn enough money to live. In later life he went to live in the United States. It took a long time before he was recognized world-wide as a great composer. His two most famous pupils were Alban Berg (1885-1935)] and Anton Webern (1883-1945). He taught them how to write twelve-tone music and they became famous composers.
When Arnold Schoenberg was a young man he was living in the late 19th century. In art and music the 19th century is often called the age of Romanticism. If you look at the way composers wrote music at this time you will find that their compositions became more and more chromatic. This means that more and more sharps and flats were used during the piece, and the music went from one key to another (modulated) very quickly. Richard Wagner wrote very chromatic music, especially in his opera "Tristan and Isolde".
Early work.
Schoenberg’s early works are typically Late Romantic. His piece "Verklärte Nacht" (which can be played by six string instruments or by a whole orchestra) has very beautiful harmonies which go quickly from one key to another. Gradually Schoenberg’s music changed. It became so chromatic that it was no longer in any key at all. Music like this (called “atonal”) is much harder to understand. His "Five Orchestral Pieces" were played by the conductor Sir Henry Wood at a Promenade Concert in 1912. The audience did not like it at first and took some time to get used to the sound.
Twelve-tone system.
In 1923 Schoenberg developed the twelve-tone system for which he is famous. This is music which is based on a particular row of notes. Twelve-tone music is atonal because there is no feeling of being in any key.

Mason Williams
music
Mason Williams (born August 24, 1938) is an easy listening guitarist. His most famous work is "Classical Gas".

The Secret of NIMH
music
"The Secret of NIMH" is an animated movie from director Don Bluth's studio, released in 1982 by United Artists.
"Tagline'": Right before your eyes and beyond your wildest dreams."
Story.
In Bluth's first movie, a widowed mouse named Mrs. Brisby does what she can to move her home, a stone block, before humans invade her place with a tractor. To do that, she must find help from a comic, love-seeking crow and a group of very smart rats from NIMH, the National Institute of Mental Health. In order to get the task done, she must see the leader of the rats, an old magician named Nicodemus, for a glowing red amulet that could rescue her home and her children (Martin, Teresa, Cynthia and a sick Timothy). She also learns, from him, a secret about his group that could forever change her life.
The movie was based on Robert C. O'Brien's children's book "Mrs. Frisby and the Rats of NIMH". (The main character's name was changed to "Brisby", so that its audiences would not take its sound for the Frisbee toy.)
In spite of its critical success, "NIMH" gained mediocre attention at the box office, because of a much bigger rival, Steven Spielberg's E. T. (Ironically, Spielberg saw the Bluth movie and asked its director to work on "An American Tail", which would come out in 1986.)
Many fans and critics have called "NIMH" Don Bluth's most important work. Yet "An American Tail" and 1997's "Anastasia" would become, business-wise, his most successful works in later years.
A 1998 direct-to-video sequel, "Timmy to the Rescue", has been avoided seriously by fans of the first one, due to its clichés and familiar story. Another one, "The Beginning", has been rumoured to come out in 2001; no such movie, however, exists yet.

The Care Bears Movie
music
"The Care Bears Movie" is an animated movie that came out on March 29, 1985. It was produced by Nelvana Limited of Canada, and was distributed by The Samuel Goldwyn Company. It was the first in a trilogy(or set of three) of big-screen movies that had the Care Bears in lead roles, and the first to be based directly on a toy line. The movie's success led to a spin-off television series that premiered on ABC a year after its release.
There were well-known celebrities among the movie's starring line-up, such as Carole King, who wrote and sung its opening theme. John Sebastian and NRBQ also contributed to its score. The movie also had the voices of Mickey Rooney, Canadian actress Georgia Engel, and voice actress Cree Summer.
It was made as a full-length commercial for the title toys, and had mixed views from critics. But its $23 million gross at the box office made it the biggest animated work outside the Disney market when it came out. It is one of the most profitable releases in the animation industry (its cost was $3 million). The movie saved Nelvana from closing down when "Rock & Rule", the company's first production, did not do well.
Facts.
"The Care Bears Movie" holds financial records for non-Disney animation (at the time it first came out), for Canadian moviemaking (only rivalled by "Porky's" and, more recently, "The Wild"), and for its distributor Samuel Goldwyn.
Its director, Arna Selznick, was one of three women to ever lead the production for a full-length cartoon. To this day, she is proud of these efforts, though she was aware of the strategy to promote it.
Plot.
In this movie, an orphanage caretaker named Mr. Cherrywood tells the story of how the Care Bears come to help two children who do not care for anyone (Kim and Jason). The Care Bears live in Care-a-lot, a cloud-filled place up in the sky. As the two of them become friends with the Bears, a carnival magician's helper, Nicholas, turns from good to bad, because of an evil spirit he got from an old book.
When the boy's evil grows more and more, the Care Bears and their Cousins (from the Forest of Feelings), along with Kim and Jason, come back to Earth to end his evil doings. In turn, the carnival and the whole world will be saved.

Aarre Merikanto
music
Aarre Merikanto (June 29, 1893 - September 29, 1958) was a Finnish composer. His parents were Liisa Häyrynen and the composer Oskar Merikanto.
Merikanto was born in 1893. He studied music in Helsinki (1911), Leipzig (1912-1914) and Moscow (1916-1917). He tried composing an opera for the first time when he was 18 years old. The result was "Helena", which was completed in early 1912. The opera had one act and its libretto was written by Jalmari Finne. In the 1920s Merikanto created his own modernist style. Merikanto was a professor of composition in the Sibelius Academy, Helsinki from 1951 to his death. Merikanto died of lung cancer in Helsinki in 1958.

Anne Murray
music
Morna Anne Murrary (born June 20, 1945) is a Canadian Pop and Country musician. She was born in Nova Scotia. She was a teacher, but also sang and made records. One of her records, "Snowbird", became a hit late in 1970. The song was not about Christmas, but was popular during the Christmas season. The record became a perennial through association with the holiday.
Murray later had hits with remakes of Beatles ("I'm Happy Just to Dance With You") and Monkees songs ("Daydream Believer"). She also recorded "Shadows in the Moonlight" and "A Little Good News", which became popular.

Hatikvah
music
Hatikvah (also transliterated as Hatikva, or, without vowels, H-t-k-v (Hebrew: התקווה "The Hope"') is the national anthem of Israel. The song tells about the 2000-year-old hope of the Jewish people to return to their homeland, Israel. The song lyrics (words) were originally a 9-stanza poem called "תקותנו" (Tikvatenu), or "Our Hope". The first stanza was changed, and put to music. The music was written by Samuel Cohen, a Jewborn in Galicia, an area of Spain. It is in the minor key, which is usually not used for national anthems, because it sounds sad, but the words to the song tell that the song is supposed to be happy.
Literal Translation.
As long as in the heart, within,
And onward, towards the ends of the east,
An eye still looks toward Zion;
Our hope is not yet lost,
The hope of two thousand years,
To be a free nation in our land,
The land of Zion and Jerusalem.

Lou Christie
music
Lou Christie (February 19, 1943-) is an American singer. He was popular in the 1960s.

Carlo Azeglio Ciampi
politics
Carlo Azeglio Ciampi was born in 1920 in Livorno, Italy.
He was 10th President of the Italian Republic, his work started in 1999 and ended in 2006. He was followed by Giorgio Napolitano
He is appreciated very much by the Italian people because of his equality and rightness.
Since 1979 he had been President of the Bank of Italy, but his task ended in 1993.
He was also Prime Minister of the Italian government, but his task lasted just a few months, because it was just a technical government,which purpose was to lead the country in a moment of difficulty.

Nancy Sinatra
music
Nancy Sinatra is an American singer. She was born June 8, 1940, in Jersey City, New Jersey. She is the daughter of Frank Sinatra. She is best known for the song "These Boots Were Made For Walking".

Percy Sledge
music
Percy Sledge is an American R&B singer. He was born November 25, 1940, in Leighton Alabama. He is best known for his song "When a Man Loves a Woman".

Tommy Roe
music
Tommy Roe (born May 9, 1942) was a popular singer in the 1960s. His best known songs were "Sweet Pea" and "Dizzy".

Bob Chiarelli
politics
Robert (Bob) Chiarelli (born September 24, 1941)is the current mayor of Ottawa, Canada. He grew up in Ottawa, and was married to the late Carol Chiarelli.
He was first made mayor of the new Ottawa on November 13, 2000.

Upton Sinclair
politics
Upton Beall Sinclair (1878-1968) was a writer of many works from the United States. His most famous book, "The Jungle" from 1906, was about the American meat-packing industry.
Upton Sinclair had political opinions and was a socialist. Most of Sinclair's books, including "The Jungle", dealt with social injustice.
He wrote many other books. His book "The Flivver King" was about the Ford Motor Company. "The Flivver King" was written at the time when workers at Ford factories were trying to start a labor union. He wrote a series (many books in a row) with Lanny Budd as the main character. There were eleven (11) Lanny Budd books. The Lanny Budd books were about current events in the World at the time.
He later joined the Democratic Party and ran for governor of the state of California in 1934. He wanted California to start new businesses which would be run by the state government. This was to help people who were unemployed (did not have jobs) because of the Great Depression. He lost the election.
He retired in the town of Buckeye, Arizona.

Carmen Miranda
music
Carmen Miranda (February 9, 1909 - August 5, 1955) was a Portuguese born Brazilian singer and actress. She was best known for her exotic costumes and hats made of fruit.

Roy Hodgson
sports
Roy Hodgson is an English football manager. He was born August 9, 1947 in Croydon. Today, he works for Premier League football team Fulham.

Stephen Crane
media
Stephen Crane (November 1, 1871 - June 5, 1900) was an American author in the late 19th century. He was born in Newark, New Jersey. For a while, he was a reporter in the slums of New York. Then, he wrote The Red Badge of Courage, which is about the American Civil War, and other stories such as The Open Boat and.

George Newbold Lawrence
science
George Newbold Lawrence (October 20, 1806 - January 17, 1895) was an American businessperson and amateur ornithologist (bird expert).
Lawrence counted birds for Spencer Fullerton Baird and John Cassin, and the three men wrote "Birds of North America" in 1858.
Lawrence left his 8,000 bird skins to the American Museum of Natural History. The Lawrence's Goldfinch "Carduelis lawrencei" was named for him by Cassin.

Sarah McLachlan
music
Sarah McLachlan (born January 28, 1968) is a Canadian singer and songwriter who is known for her beautiful, emotional music. She was raised in Halifax, Nova Scotia. She went to the Nova Scotia College of Art and Design, then moved to Vancouver, British Columbia.
Her recording company, Nettwerk, released her first album in 1988. After recording several albums, she organized the all-female music festival Lilith Fair in 1997, 1998, and 1999. Some of the money made from these concerts went to women's charities. McLachlan received the Elizabeth Cady Stanton Visionary Award in 1998 for helping women's music.
She married her drummer, Ashwin Sood, in 1997. They have a daughter, India, born in 2002.
McLachlan has been written about in magazines such as Rolling Stone, Time, and Entertainment Weekly. She has won Grammy and Juno awards for her music.
She funds a Vancouver program that helps poor children learn music. She has played at charity concerts, such as for victims of the December 26, 2004 tsunami and at the 2005 Live 8 concert in Philadelphia, USA.
Some of McLachlan's best-known songs include "The Path of Thorns", "Into the Fire", "Possession", "Building a Mystery", "Sweet Surrender", "Adia", "Angel", and "World on Fire".
Live albums.
Live EPs (shorter albums) were released in 1992 and 2004.

Joseph Beuys
politics
Joseph Beuys (pronounced "boyce") (May 12, 1921–January 23, 1986) was a German artist who made arts in many forms including sculpture, performance art, video art, and installations. He was one of the most important artists in the second half of the 20th century.
Early life.
Beuys was born in Krefeld and grew up in the near-by city Kleve. He first saw modern art when visiting the studio of Achilles Moortgat. He was interested, but studied medicine. With the beginning of World War II, he became a soldier in the German air force. There, he was a rear gunner (gunner in the back) in a military airplane.
Beuys often used the materials felt and fat. Many people believe that this is because of something that happened in the war. Beuys was shot down while flying over the Crimea and was rescued by Tatars. They kept him warm by covering him with fat and wrapping him in felt.
In actual fact, he was a radio operator on the military planes and, after a horrific crash, was rescued by a German commander. However he later said that he piloted the plane before The Crash and was rescued by Tartars who wrapped him in felt and fat to keep him alive because there is no denyng that his wounds were serious.
Development as artist.
After the war Beuys studied at the academy in Düsseldorf from 1946 to 1951. For most of the 1950s he was mostly drawing.
In 1961 he became professor of sculpture there, but was fired in 1972 because he said that his classes must be open to anybody who wanted to take them. He thought that classes should be free and he worked in his classes with everybody who wanted. His students protested when he was fired, so he was allowed to hold his studio there, but he still lost his job.
In 1962 Beuys met the "Fluxus movement". They made art together by drawing, sculpting, making music, and literature. Beuys became a member of the group but he was more interested in performances. He believed that art has a larger role to play in society.
Politics.
Beuys believed that arts has an important rule in society.
His first problems with politicians were when he lost his job as professor.
In the 1980s he was part of the Peace Movement and protested against nuclear missiles in Germany. He was one of the first members of the Green Party in the 1980s.
Works.
In 1979, a large retrospective of Beuys' work at the Guggenheim Museum in New York City confirmed his reputation as one of the most important artists of his time. He died in 1986 in Düsseldorf.
Pop cultural references.
The web comic makes frequent reference to Joseph Beuys, including his art () and.

Edvard Grieg
music
Edvard Grieg (born 15 June 1843 Bergen, Norway; died 4 September 1907) was a Norwegian composer and pianist who composed in the Romantic period. He is Norway’s most famous composer. He is best known for his Piano Concerto in A minor and for his incidental music to Henrik Ibsen's play "Peer Gynt" which includes movements called "Aubade" and "In the Hall of the Mountain King". He was usually at his best when writing shorter pieces, such as the collection of piano pieces called "Lyric Pieces". He also wrote some very lovely songs to Norwegian and to German words.
Early Life.
Grieg was born in Bergen on 15 June 1843. His ancestors were Scottish people who had moved to Norway around 1770. The original family name was spelt "Greig".
Grieg came from a musical home. His mother was his first piano teacher. He went to several schools, and started composing when he was young. He used to take his compositions to school, but the teacher did not show much interest in them.
In the summer of 1858 Grieg met the great Norwegian violinist Ole Bull, who was a friend of the family, and whose brother was married to Grieg's aunt. Bull noticed the 15-year-old boy's talent and persuaded his parents to let him go to Leipzig in Germany to study music.
Grieg enrolled in the conservatory, concentrating on the piano, and enjoyed all the concerts and recitals given in Leipzig. He did not like the discipline of the conservatory course of study, but he still got very good grades. The first piano recital he gave was in Sweden. In 1862 he finished his studies in Leipzig and went back to Bergen where he gave another recital.
In 1863 Grieg went to Copenhagen, Denmark, and stayed there for three years. He met the Danish composers J. P. E. Hartman, and Niels Gade. Gade told him to go and write a symphony. Grieg did not feel happy writing a long symphony although he did try. He also met the Norwegian composer Rikard Nordraak who had composed the Norwegian national anthem. Nordraak showed Grieg how wonderful Norwegian folk music was. Grieg had hardly heard any Norwegian folk music until then. When Nordraak died, Grieg composed a funeral march in his honour.
Mature years.
On 11 June 1867, Grieg married his first cousin Nina. The next year their only child, Alexandra, was born. The following summer, Grieg wrote his Piano Concerto in A minor while on holiday in Denmark. Edmund Neupert gave the concerto its first performance on 3 April 1869 in the Casino Theater in Copenhagen. Grieg himself was unable to be there because he was conducting in Christiana (now called “Oslo”).
In 1870 he met Franz Liszt in Rome. Liszt had made it possible for Grieg to get a travel grant. They played Grieg's Violin Sonata No. 1 together, which Liszt liked very much.. On a second visit, in April, Grieg brought with him the manuscript of his Piano Concerto which Liszt played by sight. Liszt gave him some advice about the orchestration.
In the summer of 1869, Grieg's daughter Alexandra became ill and died, at the age of 13 months.
Grieg spent most of his time conducting and playing the piano in concerts. He often travelled, and in 1876 he went to Bayreuth to hear the first performance of Wagner’s Ring cycle. He wrote a review of the operas for a Norwegian newspaper.
In 1876, Ibsen asked Grieg to write some incidental music for the first performance of the play he had written about the Norwegian hero Peer Gynt. Many of the pieces from this work became very popular. They are played by orchestras as well as in arrangements for piano or for piano duet.
Later life.
In 1883 he and wife parted for a while, although friends managed to persuade the couple to come together again and they spent four months in Rome. They built a house called Troldhaugen in Bergen, with a view of the fjord. They moved into the house in 1885 and Grieg lived there for the rest of his life. They continued to travel and give concerts. Nina had a good voice and sang her husband’s songs. Grieg only performed his own works at concerts. During his last years he received many honours.
In his later life Grieg became famous, although never rich. The Norwegian government gave him a pension. Grieg made some recordings of his piano pieces. These are some of the very first gramophone recordings that were made. The sound is not very good, but they show that Grieg was an excellent pianist. He also recorded music rolls on a pianola.
Edvard Grieg died in the autumn of 1907, aged 64, after a long illness. He had suffered from respiratory problems ever since he was very ill in 1860 as a student in Leipzig. At his funeral thousands of people went out on the streets of his home town to honour him. Following his wish, his own funeral march for Rikard Nordraak was played, as well as the funeral march by Frederic Chopin. His and his wife's ashes are buried in a mountain crypt near his house, Troldhaugen.
Music.
Grieg was often inspired by Norwegian folk music. This can be heard in his songs and some of his instrumental music. His chamber music includes 3 violin sonatas and a cello sonata as well as a piano sonata and many shorter piano pieces. However, he has become very well known all over the world through his Piano Concerto and his music for "Peer Gynt". Another popular work is his "Holberg Suite" which was originally written for the piano but later arranged for string orchestra.
Trivia.
The famous opening of Grieg’s Piano Concerto featured in a comedy sketch by Morecambe and Wise in the 1970s. The conductor André Previn was their special guest in the sketch which has become a classic.

Leopold Poetsch
politics
Leopold Poetsch was a German professor and a high school teacher of Adolf Hitler who influenced the future leader's later views.
Poetsch came from the southern German border area. There, political fights between Slavs and ethnic Germans angered him and made him one who was for the Pan-German movement. He started to teach in Maribor, Slovenia and later moved to Linz, Austria to teach history.
Hitler was very interested in what Poetsch said. Poetsch hated the Habsburgs and argued that all ethnic Germans should be united by a single government. He said that the Aryan race was stronger, in better health, and more fit to rule than all other people. Poetsch said that Jews and Slavs were what he called "inferior races". (This view was held a lot in Germany after World War I.)
Hitler began reading an anti-Semitic newspaper in his area. In his later years, Hitler spoke of Poetsch as a "great man." As dictator of Germany, Hitler tried to get all German-speaking people together and persecuted Slavs, Jews, Gypsies, and others. Hitler later tried to kill them all in the "Final Solution."

Alejandro Toledo
politics
Alejandro Toledo is the current president of Peru. He won the 2001 election for President.
He is from the town of Chimbote in Ancash Region, Peru. He is married to Eliane Karp of Belgium.

Evo Morales
politics
Juan Evo Morales Aima (born October 26, 1959) is the President of Bolivia. He is an Aymara Native American, and is politically a leftist. He is the founder and leader of the Movement toward Socialism (or MAS) political party. "Movimiento al Socialismo" is its Spanish name. On January 22, 2006, he became President of Bolivia. His party has declared that he is the first indigenous person to be president of Bolivia. Not everyone believes this to be true because of his mestizo heritage and similar backgrounds of several past Bolivian presidents. Nonetheless, he is likely the first "culturally" indigenous president of Bolivia.

Konstantin Chernenko
politics
Konstantin Ustinovich Chernenko (Russian language: Константи́н Усти́нович Черне́нко September 24, 1911 – March 10, 1985) was the leader of the Soviet Union for a very short time. He became the leader in 1984, and ruled for 13 months until his death in 1985.

Terry Bradshaw
sports
Terry Bradshaw was an American athlete and sports presenter. He was born September 2, 1948 in Shreveport, Louisiana. Bradshaw was a former quarterback with the Pittsburgh Steelers in the National Football League, and a television and American football host. Over six years, he won four Super Bowl titles with Pittsburgh (1975, 1976, 1979 and 1980). He went into the Pro Football Hall of Fame in 1989.

Montreal Canadiens
sports
The Montreal Canadiens are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). Their nickname is the "Habs" (short for the French "habitants", meaning inhabitants - people who live in a certain place). They have won the Stanley Cup championship 24 times, more than any other team.
Origin.
The Canadiens (who use the French spelling of "Canadian") were formed in 1909, as part of the National Hockey Association.
Early games.
They won their first Stanley Cup in 1916, with star players such as Edouard "Newsy" Lalonde and goaltender Georges Vezina. The Canadiens joined the NHL in 1917; Canadien Joe Malone won the first NHL scoring title (Art Ross Trophy). They won the Cup again in 1924, with players such as Billy Boucher. Howie Morenz was a big star in the early years of the NHL. He was a great skater. Morenz won the Hart Trophy, as the league's top player, three times. Goalie George Hainsworth played at the same time, and along with others such as Aurel Joliat, they won the Stanley Cup in 1930 and 1931.
It took 13 years before they won the Cup again. A young Maurice "The Rocket" Richard, star goalie Bill Durnan,Hector "Toe" Blake, and Elmer Lach led the Canadiens to the cup again in 1944, as well as 1946. Richard scored 50 goals in a 50-game season in 1944-45. No one did that again for 36 years. He led the NHL in goals five times.
Later games.
The Canadiens became a very powerful team in the 1950's. Led by legendary center Jean Beliveau, Doug Harvey (who won seven Norris Trophies as best defence, six on Montreal), Bernie "Boom Boom" Geoffrion, Dickie Moore, Jacques Plante (who won seven Vezina Trophies for goalies), and Richard (along with his younger brother, Henri, the "Pocket Rocket"), the team won the Cup in 1953, and five times in a row, 1956 through 1960. They won again in 1965, 1966, 1968, and 1969.
New members.
New players led the team in the 1970's: Guy Lafleur, Ken Dryden, Bob Gainey, Larry Robinson, and Yvon Cournoyerled them to the cup in 1971, 1973, and four times in a row, 1976 through 1979. By 1979, they had won the Stanley Cup 16 times in 27 years.

Adolph Rupp
sports
Adolph Frederick Rupp (September 2, 1901-December 10, 1977) was one of the most successful college basketball coaches in history. He coached the University of Kentucky's basketball team from 1930 to 1972, 42 years. He helped the team win 4 national NCAA championships. Rupp Arena in Lexington, Kentucky is named after him.

Miami Dolphins
sports
The Miami Dolphins is an American football club in the National Football League team based in Miami, Florida, USA. The Dolphins began playing in 1966 and in 1972 they had the only perfect season in NFL history and won a Super Bowl, with Bob Griese leading the team as quarterback. Another quarterback, Dan Marino, is a more recent famous player for this club.

Antonio Meucci
science
Antonio Meucci (Florence, April 13, 1808 – October 18, 1889) is an Italian born American inventor. He invented of one of the first types of telephone. In 2002, the United States House of Representatives ruled that he invented the first working telephone, although many people believe Alexander Graham Bell invented it.

Macy Gray
music
Macy Gray (born Natalie Renee McIntyre on September 9, 1970) is an American singer and actress. She started her career after moving to Los Angeles in 2000. Gray is best known for her 1999 single, "I Try", which came off of her first album, "On How Life Is".

Vince Lombardi
sports
Vincent Thomas Lombardi (June 11, 1913, in Brooklyn, New York, USA—September 3, 1970) was an American football coach that never had a losing season. Lombardi was named "NFL Man of the Decade" in the 1960s, and won five NFL championships, including winning the first two Super Bowls.
The yearly trophy given to the Super Bowl champion was renamed the "Vince Lombardi Trophy" ("right") in 1971, the same year Lombardi was named to the Pro Football Hall of Fame. He was head coach of the Green Bay Packers and the Washington Redskins.

Snoop Dogg
music
Snoop Dogg is a rapper (a musician who does hip hop music) and actor. He is most famous with the West Coast hip hop scene. He was born in Long Beach, California, USA on October 20, 1971. The reason why he is called "Snoop Dogg" is because his mother named him after a character called "Snoopy", because Snoop Dogg was a fan of the "Peanuts" cartoon, which has the Snoopy character.

Nikola Tesla
science
Nikola Tesla (July 10, 1856 – c. January 7, 1943; Serbian Cyrillic: Никола Тесла) was a Serbian-American inventor, physicist, mechanical engineer, and electrical engineer. He was born in Smiljan, in Austria-Hungary, now in the Republic of Croatia.
He invented the radio. His main discoveries were in the fields of magnetism and electricity. He is best known for his contributions that lead to the development of Alternating current. The reason alternating current is better than non-alternating current is that less of it is lost when the current is transmitted over long distances.
The SI unit measuring magnetic flux density or magnetic induction (commonly known as the magnetic field formula_1), the tesla, was named in his honour (at the "Conférence Générale des Poids et Mesures", Paris, 1960).
Although Tesla was very famous for his discoveries, he died a poor man. What is more, he did not get credit for inventing the radio until after he died. Most people regarded Tesla as a mad scientist. Tesla got his first job in Budapest, working at a telephone company. Even in his early life, he was always inventing things. He invented a loudspeaker for telephones. Tesla also had mental problems starting from an early age. He suffered form obsessive-compulsive disorder.
He had a nervous breakdown while working in Budapest.

Rudolf Hess
politics
Walter Richard Rudolf Hess (Heß in German) (April 26, 1894 – August 17, 1987) was a High Ranking Nazi
leader, and one of Adolf Hitler's closest men.
Early life.
Rudolf Hess was born in Alexandria, Egypt, but moved back to Germany in 1908.
He joined the army in World War I and was trained as a pilot.
He flew to Scotland during World War II and was arrested. After the war he was tried at the Nuremberg Trials, and sentenced to life imprisonment.
He died in the Allied Military Prison, Spandau, Berlin in 1987. Since 1966 he had been the only prisoner, his death was caused by a strangulation cord but officials recorded it as a suicide.

Nobuo Uematsu
music
Nobuo Uematsu (植松 伸夫; Uematsu Nobuo, born March 21, 1959) is a Japanese composer of video game music. He stays busy making lots of different types of music for games. A lot of the music he makes is for games produced by Squaresoft and Square Enix, including the "Final Fantasy" series of role-playing games, and some music for "Chrono Trigger".

Walter Sisulu
politics
Walter Max Ulyate Sisulu (18 May, 1912 - 5 May 2003) was a South African freedom fighter. He fought against apartheid. Sisulu was the Secretary-General of the African National Congress from 1949 until 1954. Over the next 10 years he was put in prison seven times. He was one of many people, including Nelson Mandela to be found guilty of treason during trials between 1956 and 1961. He was sent to prison for 6 years because of this. While free on bail, he went into hiding. He was found in 1963 and put on trial again. In 1964, he as sent to prison for the rest of his life. He was released from prison in 1989. In 1991, he became the Deputy President of the African National Congress. He held the position from July 1991 until 1994.

Hans Enoksen
politics
Hans Enoksen (born 1956) is the Prime Minister of Greenland. He was elected Prime Minister December 14, 2002.

Benjamin Franklin
science
Benjamin Franklin (January 17, 1706 - April 17, 1790) was one of the "Founding Fathers" of the United States, and one of the country's earliest politicians. He had a very important part in shaping the American Revolution, even though he was never elected to any official position. As a leader of the Enlightenment, he influenced European scientists. He even was the first thing many Europeans associated with America at the time. His success with the French military was an important factor in America's win over Great Britain.
Most people see Franklin as one of history's greatest inventors. Some of his greatest creations include the lightning rod, bifocals (a type of eyeglasses), the idea of unity in the Thirteen Colonies, and the idea of America itself.
The city of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania (where he lived) marked his three hundredth birthday in 2006.
Franklin is frequently seen on the United States' hundred-dollar bill as a mark of brilliance and a tribute to our past.

Marcha Real
music
La Marcha Real (English translation: "The Royal March") is the national anthem (country's song) of Spain. It is one of the few national anthems in the world (our planet Earth) to have only music, and no words.

La Marseillaise
music
La Marseillaise is the national anthem of France.
It was written by Rouget de Lisle in Strasbourg on April 26, 1792. It was first called "Chant de guerre pour l'armée du Rhin" ("Marching Song of the Rhine Army").
le jour de gloire est arrivé!
Ils viennent jusque dans vos bras
Quotation in music.
Composers have often quoted La Marseillaise in their music, for example Tchaikovsky uses it in the 1812 overture.

Sigmund Freud
science
Sigmund Freud (May 6, 1856 - September 23, 1939) was an Austrian neurologist (a person who treats sicknesses of the nervous system) and famous psychologist. Many people call him "the father of psychoanalysis."
He was born as Sigismund Schlomo Freud, but in 1877 at the age of 21 he changed his name to Sigmund Freud.
Freud is important in psychology because he was the first person to study the unconscious scientifically. The unconscious is a part of a person's mind which he does not know is thinking, and he cannot control it easily. Many people did not like this idea, and many people did not like Freud because he said people had hidden thoughts that they didn't know about.
After Freud wrote his first book, he got married, to Martha Belnays. They had six children, and the youngest (Anna Freud) became another famous psychologist.
Freud thought sex was the most important need for human beings after staying alive. He called this need the libido. He thought that sometimes people would do something they did not really want to do because the libido made them do it.
Freud lived in Germany in the 1930s. Because he was Jewish, Hitler did not like him. He made people burn Freud's books in public. Some of the Nazis wanted to hurt Freud. Because Freud and his family did not feel safe anymore, they left Vienna and went to England in June 1938.

Buckminster Fuller
science
Richard Buckminster "Bucky" Fuller (July 12, 1895 – July 1, 1983) was an American philosopher, architect, and inventor.
One of his most visible inventions was the geodesic dome.

Bill Harry
media
Bill Harry is an English author, from Liverpool. He went to college with John Lennon and Stuart Sutcliffe, who were members of The Beatles. Using the name The Dissenters, they promised to make Liverpool famous with Lennon's music, Sutcliffe's paintings and Harry's writing. The Dissenters did not get far together, but each member later became well-known.
Harry founded "Mersey Beat", a newspaper about the local music scene in Liverpool, in 1961. He was the first person to write news articles about the Beatles.
Over the years, Harry has been on over four hundred television and radio shows in Britain, America, Europe and Asia. Shows he has been on include "Good Morning", "Good Morning America", BBC News, Sky News, CNN, ITV and many television documentaries and movies about the Beatles. The British Council had him represent them for their Beatles exhibitions in Hong Kong. Harry has also appeared as a guest at Beatles conventions in Britain, Europe and America.
Harry moved to London in 1966, when he was a music journalist for "Weekend Magazine", and columnist for the Fleetway magazines "Marilyn" and "Valentine".
He was given an award by the British Academy of Songwriters, Composers and Authors for everything he has done for the music business in his lifetime.
Artists worked with.
In London, Harry worked with many entertainers. His job as their publicist was to deal with the media.

Diana Krall
music
Diana Krall (born November 16, 1964) is a Canadian jazz singer and pianist from Nanaimo, British Columbia.
Krall began to play the piano when she was four years old. She began to play in restaurants when she was 15. When she was 17, she won a Vancouver Jazz Festival scholarship (student money award) to study music at the Berklee College of Music in Boston. She later moved to Los Angeles to study with Jimmy Rowles. In 1990, she moved to New York City.
Krall's 1996 album "All For You," was a tribute (way to honour someone) to the Nat King Cole trio. It was on the Billboard jazz charts for 70 weeks. The album was considered for a Grammy Award. She won a Grammy in 1999 for "Best Jazz Musician of the Year". Her 2001 album "The Look of Love" was #1 in Canada. It also won the Juno Award as Canadian album of the year. Her 2002 album "Live in Paris" won the Grammy for Best Vocal Jazz Record. Also in 2002, Krall won the Juno for Canadian artist of the year. Her version of the Tom Waits song "Tempation" made #1 on the World Jazz Charts in 2004.
Krall married British musician Elvis Costello in December 2003.

Toronto Maple Leafs
sports
The Toronto Maple Leafs are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL).
Origin.
They were formed in 1917 as one of the five original NHL teams. They were called the Toronto Arenas, but changed their name to St. Patricks, then to Maple Leafs, in the 1920s.
History.
The Maple Leafs have won the Stanley Cup championship 13 times, more than any team except the Montreal Canadiens. However, they have not won since 1967.
Early years.
They won in their first year, 1918, and then again in 1922 and 1932. In their early years, they had many NHL scoring champions: "Babe" Dye in 1923 and 1925, "Ace" Bailey in 1929, Harvey "Busher" Jackson in 1932, Charlie Conacher in 1934 and 1935, and Gordie Drillon in 1938. However, no Toronto player has been scoring champion since then.
Winnings.
They were a strong team in the 1940s. They won the Stanley Cup in 1942 against the Detroit Red Wings, four games to three, even though they were losing three games to none at one point. This was the first of six championships in ten years; they also won in 1945, then three years in a row: 1947, 1948, and 1949, and again in 1951. Some of their best players in that time included goaltender Turk Broda, forward Syl Apps, and defence "Babe" Pratt, who won the Hart Trophy as the most valuable player in 1944. Ted "Teeder" Kennedy won the Hart Trophy in 1955; but no other Maple Leaf has won that award.
The team won four Stanley Cups in the 1960s: three in a row - 1962, 1963, and 1964 - and again in 1967. Frank Mahovlich, a left winger, was the star player. They were also led by defenceman Tim Horton (who began the Tim Horton's doughnut shops), center Dave Keon, goaltender Johnny Bower, and winger George Armstrong. Keon won the Conn Smythe Trophy as the top player in the playoffs in 1967.
Later years.
In the late 1970s, the Maple Leafs were a good team, with players such as centre Darryl Sittler (who scored a record 10 points in one game) and Swedish defence Borje Salming (one of the first Europeans to play in the NHL). However, there were 18 NHL teams by then, so it was hard to come first. Wendyl Clark was a strong player in the 1980s; he became the team's all-time top scorer. Mats Sundin was another Swedish star in the 1990s and 2000s. They also had some good goaltenders around this time: Curtis Joseph, then Ed Belfour.

Wayne Gretzky
sports
Wayne Gretzky (born January 26, 1961 in Brantford, Ontario) was a Canadian ice hockey player in the National Hockey League (NHL) for 20 seasons. He is now coach and part-owner of the NHL's Phoenix Coyotes. He also managed Canada's Olympic hockey teams in 2002 and 2006, as well as Canada's 2004 World Cup of Hockey team.
Gretzky was a star junior player with the Sault Ste. Marie Greyhounds of the Ontario Hockey League. In 1978, when he was 17, he began playing as a professional with the Indianapolis Racers of the World Hockey Association (WHA), but was sold to the Edmonton Oilers after only a few games. He was third in WHA scoring and rookie of the year.
The WHA folded in 1979, and the Oilers team joined the NHL. At the age of 19, Gretzky won his first Hart Trophy as the NHL's most valuable player (MVP). He won this trophy nine times. In 1981, he won his first of ten Art Ross Trophies as NHL scoring champion. He set many records in the 1980s, including most goals (92), assists (163), and points (215) in a season. No one else came close to his scoring ability. In the 1981-82 season, he scored 50 goals in 39 games, when the record had been 50 games. He was named as Sports Illustrated athlete of the year in 1982. His amazing ability earned him the nickname "The Great One".
Gretzky won four Stanley Cup championships with the Edmonton Oilers: 1984, 1985, 1987, and 1988. He won the Conn Smythe Trophy as MVP in the playoffs in 1985 and 1988. Then, in 1988, he was traded to the Los Angeles Kings. He helped them to the finals in 1993. In 1996, he was traded to the St. Louis Blues, and signed with the New York Rangers at the beginning of the 1996-97 season. He retired, and was inducted into the Hockey Hall of Fame, in 1999.
When he retired, he had 2857 career points, over 1000 more than the next highest player. To this day, no one else has reached 2000. He still holds the record for most career goals (894) and assists (1963) (he has more assists than anyone else has points). He holds many other records, such as most 100-point seasons (15), most points in the playoffs (47 in one year and 382 career), and most games in a row with at least one point (51). He was named to the first or second all-star team 15 times and was MVP of the NHL all-star game three times. He had 61 official NHL records when he retired.
Gretzky's number, 99, was retired by the entire league. He was named Canada's male athlete of the 20th century. He has also been honoured with Canada's highest honour for a civilian: the Order of Canada.
Gretzky married American actress Janet Jones in 1988. They have five children: Paulina, Ty, Trevor, Tristan, and Emma.

Disney Channel
media
Disney Channel is a cable television network that is owned by The Walt Disney Company. The channel shows programs that are made for family audiences, most of it for teenagers.
The channel began on the morning of April 18, 1983. Its programs ran for eighteen hours a day until December 1986.
It received a special citation from President Ronald Reagan in 1984.
in 1999 Disney Channel Begin With Boomerang Disney Channel.

Jon Bon Jovi
music
Jon Bon Jovi (born John Francis Bongiovi on March 2, 1962 in Perth Amboy, New Jersey, USA) is a musician and actor. He is most famous as lead singer of the group, Bon Jovi.

Maxi Priest
music
Maxi Priest (born Max Alfred Elliot on June 10, 1962) is a English reggae singer.

Heinz Fischer
politics
Heinz Fischer (born 9 October 1938) is the current president of Austria. His wife is Margit Fischer.

Carl Friedrich Gauss
science
(April 30, 1777 – February 23, 1855) was a famous mathematician from Göttingen, Germany.
Childhood.
He was born in Braunschweig. That city was then part of the duchy of Braunschweig-Lüneburg. Today the city is part of Lower Saxony. As a child, he was a prodigy, meaning he was very clever. When he was 3 years old, he told his father that he had incorrectly measured something on his complicated payroll. Gauss was correct. Gauss also taught himself to read.
When he was in elementary school, his teacher once tried to keep the children busy, telling them to add up all the numbers from 1 to 100. Gauss did it quickly, like this: 1 + 100 = 101, 2 + 99 = 101, 3 + 98 = 101, and so on. There were a total of 50 pairs, so 50 × 101 = 5,050. The formula is formula_1. According to, the problem given to Gauss was actually more difficult to do.
The Duke of Brunswick gave Gauss a fellowship to the Collegium Carolinum, where he attended from 1792 to 1795. This meant that the Duke paid for the education of Carl Friedrich Gauss at the Collegium. After this, Gauss went to the University of Göttingen, from 1795 to 1798.

Alberto Fujimori
politics
Alberto Fujimori (born July 28, 1938) was the President of Peru from 1990-2001.
He is still remembered in Peru for defeating Shinning Path, the peace with Ecuador and recovering the economy after the presidency of Alan García.
In 2001, Fujimori's head of intelligence, Vladimiro Montesinos, was accused of doing illegal things. People thought that Fujimori was also involved. After that, Fujimori resigned to the Presidency of Peru.
Valentín Paniagua was elected president by the Congress soon after Fujimori resigned. Fujimori went to Japan, because he is a citizen there. Japan protected him from Peruvian law since they do not find any valid accusation.
In 2005, Fujimori was detained in Chile. The Peruvian government is now trying to bring him back to Peru in order to have him face trial

Vancouver Canucks
sports
The Vancouver Canucks are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL).
Early games.
The Canucks were first an amateur team in the Pacific Coast Hockey League (PCHL), winning the championship in 1946 and 1948. In 1952, the PCHL joined with the Western Canada Senior Hockey League to form the minor-league Western Hockey League. The Canucks won the championship in this league in 1958, 1960, 1969, and 1970.
Beginning.
The Canucks joined the NHL in 1970. They were not a good team at first, though they won their division in 1975. Andre Boudrias was a star for the team at this time. The team made the Stanley Cup finals in 1982, which surprised many people, since they had finished below average in the regular season. Goaltender Richard Brodeur, along with forwards Stan Smyl, Thomas Gradin, and Darcy Rota, led the team. Coach Roger Neilson and some players raised white towels on top of their hockey sticks to "surrender" to the referees, who they thought were unfair (a white flag means surrender or "I give up"). After that, the fans all waved white flags during Canucks playoff games. The team lost four games to zero in the finals to the New York Islanders.
Comeback.
In the late 1980s, players such as Toni Tanti and Petri Skriko led the team. They made the finals again in 1994, due to players such as goaltender Kirk MacLean, the "Russian Rocket" Pavel Bure (who scored the most goals in the NHL that year), Trevor Linden, and Cliff Ronning. However, they lost four games to three to the New York Rangers.
Problems.
The Canucks did poorly in the late 1990s, but improved in the 2000s. Markus Naslund came second in scoring in 2002 and 2003, and was named the Pearson Trophy winner as players' choice for the best player in 2003. Todd Bertuzzi, Matthias Ohlund, and Ed Jovanovski were also important players who helped lead the team to the division title in 2004. However, they lost in overtime of deciding game seven to the Calgary Flames in the first round of the playoffs (just as they had done in 1989), and the Flames went to the finals (just like 1989).
The Canucks just missed the playoffs in 2006. Two of the young stars, identical twins Daniel and Henrik Sedin, along with players such as Anson Carter, were important to the team that year.

Mi Reflejo
music
"Mi Reflejo" is the first Spanish-language album by American pop singer Christina Aguilera. It was released on 2000. There are 11 songs in this album. Six of them are new songs. Five of them are from her first album "Christina Aguilera" but in Spanish.
This album won a Grammy Award as Best Latin Pop Album in 2001.

Engelbert Dollfuss
politics
Engelbert Dollfuss ("German": Dollfuß) (October 4, 1892 – July 25, 1934) was the Chancellor of Austria from 1932 until 1933. He led the country as a dictator from early 1933 until 1934.
He studied law in Vienna, and Economics in Berlin. During World War I, he served in the Alps and briefly became a Prisoner of War in 1918.
He became Chancellor on May 20, 1932 as head of a right-wing coalition government. He wanted to solve the problems caused by the Depression. He had problems finding majorities in parliament. The measures he liked to take to deal with inflation were not well liked. In March 1933, he suspended the Austrian parliament. He then governed by decree.
With Adolf Hitler as Chancellor in Germany, Dollfuss feared that the influence of the NSDAP would grow. This would then lead to a growth in popularity for its Austrian counterpart. Because of this, he banned the NSDAP in June 1933. He also banned the SDAPÖ in February 1934.
In September 1933 he formed an umbrella grouping to support the regime, the "Vaterländische Front" (Fatherland Front) and merged the Christian Social Party with the para-military Heimwehr (Home Guard), a Nationalist paramilitary group. The regime which was put intp power by him and remained in power until 1938 is often called "Austrofascism". The form of state he employed was called the "Ständestaat".
On July 25, 1934 eight Austrian Nazis entered the Chancellery building and shot and killed Dollfuss in an attempted coup, as a prelude to Anschluss. The Nazis surrendered and were executed. Kurt Schuschnigg became the new dictator of Austria.

Robert Hooke
science
Robert Hooke was born in England in 1635, and died in 1703. He discovered Hooke's law of elasticity. He was known for his work in both physics and biology. He found out all living things are made of cells and how they impact physical characteristics.

Halldór Ásgrímsson
politics
Halldór Ásgrímsson (born September 8, 1947) is the Prime Minister of Iceland. The leader of the Progressive Party since 1994, he took over as Prime Minister on September 15, 2004, from the Independence Party leader, Davíð Oddsson.
He has been very active in politics in Iceland.

Nikita Khrushchev
politics
Nikita Sergeyevich Khrushchyov (Russian: Ники́та Серге́евич Хрущёв) IPA:, commonly spelled in English as Khrushchev) April 17, 1894 – September 11, 1971) was the leader of the Soviet Union after the death of Joseph Stalin. He ruled from 1953-1964.
Nikita was born in the town of Kalinovka in Russia. He later moved to Ukraine. He worked in mines, and became part of the Bolshevik movement.
He moved his way up in the Communist Party, eventually becoming trusted by President Joseph Stalin. When Stalin died, Khrushchev became the leader of the Soviet Union.
"De-Stalinization".
When Nikita became the leader of the Soviet Union, he began something he called "De-Stalinization". He took down all posters and statues of Joseph Stalin. Also, he moved Stalin's grave to a place where people could not see it in the Kremlin wall, he buried Stalin deep. This was all a part of an effort to make the people of the Soviet Union forget about Stalin.
He helped unravel truth behind Katyn tragedy where over 22000 of Polish inteligentisa were killed by Stalin and Beria's orders.
Relations with the "West".
He also had better contacts with the western countries like the USA, Britain, and France. This means the USSR and the west were more friendly. He visited America in 1959.
But the USSR and the US still did not trust each other. In 1962 America and the USSR had problems over missiles being in Cuba (near the US), and could have had a war. Khrushchev took the missiles away from Cuba and this problem was ended.
Relations with China.
Also, during this time, the Soviet Union became a lot less friendly with China. Because the Chinese leader Mao Zedong liked Stalin, and did not like it when Khrushchev became more friendly with the west, and when Nikita Khrushchev began a "destalinization" campaign. That's when Mao started the Sino-Soviet Split

Ólafur Ragnar Grímsson
politics
Ólafur Ragnar Grímsson (born May 14, 1943, in Ísafjörður, Iceland) is the fifth and current President of Iceland, from 1996 to present, re-elected without opposition in 2000, and was re-elected for a third term in 2004.
From 1962 to 1970, he studied economics and political science at the University of Manchester. He was a professor at the University of Iceland for political science, served as a Member of the Althing, and was the Minister of Finance (1988–1991).
He married Guðrún Katrín Þorbergsdóttir in 1974, who gave birth to twin daughters the following year. Guðrún Katrín was very popular in Iceland, and her charm is without a doubt one of the main reasons her husband was elected; she charmed the nation from the start of his campaign. Her death from cancer in 1998 was a shock to the nation and her family.
Ólafur's second marriage was to Dorrit Moussaieff to whom he had been engaged since May 2000. This took place on his 60th birthday May 14, 2003.

Brenda Lee
music
Brenda Mae Tarpley or Brenda Lee (born December 11, 1944 in Atlanta, Georgia) was an American pop singer popular in the 1960s.

Buddy Clark
music
Buddy Clark (July 26, 1912 - October 1, 1949) was a pop singer popular in the 1930s and 1940s.

Walter Murphy
music
Walter Murphy is a classically trained pianist. He was born in New York City, USA in 1952. He had a hit song in the late 1970s, "A Fifth of Beethoven".

Mel Brooks
music
Mel Brooks (born June 28, 1926) is a Jewish American actor, comedian, writer, film director, and producer.
Two of his most popular films are "Young Frankenstein" (co-written with Gene Wilder) and "Blazing Saddles" (co-written with Richard Pryor).
Brooks is one of the few people to have won Oscar, Emmy, Tony, and Grammy Awards.

Qazi Muhammad
politics
Qazi Muhammad (1893-1947) was the Nationalist and Religious Kurdish leader and the Head of Republic of Mahabad (Republic of Kurdistan), the second modern Kurdish state in the Middle East (after Republic of Ararat). He acted as the president of the Russian backed Republic of Mahabad, in Kurdistan of Iran (Eastern Kurdistan) in 1946. He was also the founder of the Kurdish Democratic Party of Iran. A year later, the Kurdish national movement (Komeley Jiyanewey Kurd) that he helped organize was crushed by Iran's central government. The Iranian military court sentenced him to death, and he was hanged in Chuwarchira Square in the center of city of Mahabad at March 30 1947. Mustafa Barzani, the father of nationalist Kurdish movement in Iraqi Kurdistan (Southern Kurdistan), was the defence minister in his cabinet. One of his sons Ali Qazi is today an active member in the kurdish movement.

Constantine Maroulis
music
Constantine Maroulis (born September 17 1975) is an American singer, actor and writer from New York. He was on the popular television program "American Idol", in which he almost won. With his past work experiences, he stands out from other "American Idol" singers. Before he was on television, he sang in the rock band Pray for the soul of Betty. Right now, he is taking a break from his band to sing on his own. He is the first "Idol" alum to sign a contract for the making of a new television sitcom.

Sean Lennon
music
Sean Taro Ono Lennon (born October 9 1975) is the son of John Lennon and his second wife Yoko Ono. He is half Japanese and half Welsh, Irish, and English, this makes him Eurasian. He has the very same birthday as his father, John Lennon.

Buddy Holly
music
Charles Hardin Holley or Buddy Holly (September 7,1936 - February 3, 1959) was an American rock and roll singer, composer, and musician. He was from Lubbock, Texas. Buddy Holly is thought to be an important person in the history of Rock and Roll music and Rockabilly music. Holly played several different types of instruments. His short career of only 18 months affected much of the music world.
Buddy Holly died February 3 1959 when an airplane he was on crashed into a soy field near Mason City, Iowa. Also on the plane with him were Richie Valens and J.P. Richardson, "The Big Bopper". All three passengers and the pilot were killed in the crash.
Singer Don McLean's popular 1971 song "American Pie" made February 3 famous as "The Day the Music Died."

John Denver
music
John Denver (born Henry John Deutschendorf, Jr.) (December 31, 1943 – October 12, 1997), was an American musician and songwriter. He was very popular in the 1970s.

Rocky
music
"Rocky" is a 1976 movie. It was written by, and starred, Sylvester Stallone. The movie is about a man living in Philadelphia, who is trying to become a great boxer. It won three Academy Awards, for Best Picture, Best Director, and Film editing (it was nominated for seven other Awards), and was ranked #78 in AFI's 100 Years... 100 Movies list. It was followed by 5 sequels, the most recent came out in 2006.

The Deer Hunter
music
"The Deer Hunter" is a 1978 movie. It told the story of 3 friends affected by the Vietnam War. It won the Academy Award for Best Picture.

A Portuguesa
music
"A Potruguesa" "A Portuguesa" (pronounced IPA:) is the national anthem of Portugal. Only the first part of the lyrics is the national anthem. The other parts, or "stanzas", are part of the song, but not part of the anthem.
Lyrics.
"Que hão de guiar-te à vitória!"
"Sobre a terra, sobre o mar"

Bill Cosby
sports
William Henry "Bill" Cosby, Jr., Ed.D (July 12, 1937), known to many as Bill Cosby, is a famous American comedian. He has been a regular star of movies and television as well.
Cosby is the creator of such shows as Filmation's animated "Fat Albert", NBC's "The Cosby Show" (in which he played a doctor named Heathcliff Huxtable) and Nick at Nite's "Fatherhood" (with Blair Underwood).
On television, he starred in the 1960s spy spoof "I Spy", and has also advertised Jell-o products.
On the big screen, he appeared in "Leonard Part 6" (1987), "Ghost Dad" (1990), and "The Meteor Man" (1993).

Hosni Mubarak
politics
Muhammad Hosni Said Mubarak (Arabic: محمد حسنى سيد مبارك) (born May 4, 1928), commonly known as Hosni Mubarak (Arabic: حسنى مبارك), has been the fourth President of Egypt for twenty four years, since 14 October 1981.
Mubarak became the Vice-President of the Republic of Egypt after moving up the ranks of the Egyptian Air Force. Then he became the President after President Anwar Sadat was assassinated on 6 October 1981.
As President of Egypt, Mubarak is thought to be one of the most powerful leaders in the region. Under the 1971 Constitution of Egypt, President Mubarak has exercised strong control over the country.
Some people think Mr. Mubarak is a dictator. In 2005, he called a free election. He won that election.

Euclid
science
Euclid of Alexandria (Greek:) (about 325 BC–265 BC) was a Greek mathematician who lived in Alexandria, Egypt. Little is known about this person, but people think he lived there when Ptolemy I was the pharaoh.
Many people see Euclid as "the father of geometry", which is an important part of mathematics. His most popular work is "Elements". Many people see the book as history's most successful textbook, that is a book which teaches people.
In the book, he starts out from a small set of axioms (that is, a group of things that everyone thinks are true). Euclid then shows the properties of geometric objects and of whole numbers, based on those axioms. He proves new higher ideas are true from these lower ideas. This is the same method as modern mathematics uses. It is called the axiomatic method.
Euclid also wrote works on perspective, conic sections, spherical geometry, and possibly quadric surfaces.
It is not known where or when he is born or why he died.

Lou Reed
music
Lou Reed (born March 2, 1942) is an American rock and roll musician. He is originally from Brooklyn, New York and spent most of his life in New York City.

Charlie Parker
music
Charlie Parker (born August 29, 1920 in Kansas City, Missouri), also known as "Bird" or "Yardbird", is considered one of the greatest jazz saxophonists, specifically alto saxophonist. Parker is thought to have created bebop.

Yitzhak Rabin
politics
(יצחק רבין in Hebrew, other spellings: Yitschak Rabin,Yitzchak Rabin) (March 1, 1922 – November 4, 1995) was an Israeli politician and general. He was the fifth Prime Minister of Israel from 1974 until 1977 and again from 1992 until his assassination in 1995 by Yigal Amir, a right-wing activist who had strongly opposed Rabin's signing of the Oslo Accords and to peace with Palestine. He was the first local-born Prime Minister of Israel, the only Prime Minister to be killed and the second to die in office (following Levi Eshkol).
In 1994, Yitzhak Rabin was one of the three recipients of the Nobel Peace Prize. The others were Yasser Arafat and Shimon Peres. All three got the prizes for trying to make peace in the Middle East.

Hugh Hefner
media
Hugh Hefner (born April 9, 1926) founded "Playboy Magazine" in the 1950s. He owns a multi-million mansion called the Playboy Mansion.

Abdullah Öcalan
politics
Abdullah Öcalan is the leader of Kurdistan Workers Party (PKK), a Communist group banned by the government of Turkey. Turkey branded Abdullah a terrorist, although many Kurds look to him for leadership and call him "Apo" or "uncle." "Öcalan" means, in Turkish, "he who takes revenge"
He was born on April, 4th 1949 into a poor peasant family in the village of Omerli, Urfa. He studied at vocational school and then pursued a course at the School of Political Science, Ankara University. He became involved in militant Maoist politics and was first arrested in 1973. In 1975 he returned to Kurdistan and in 1978 he was one of the founder members of the PKK. At the First Congress in November 1978 he was elected leader.
He left Turkey in 1979, before the military coup of September 1980, which led to the imprisonment of thousands of members and sympathisers of the party. In 1982 the PKK decided to resume an armed struggle inside Turkey and in August 1984 the military wing, the Liberation Units of Kurdistan (HRK), began operations. In 1985 the political wing was renamed the National Liberation Front of Kurdistan (ERNK) and in 1986 the HRK became the Peoples Liberation Army of Kurdistan (ARGK). Öcalan's pronouncements had become increasingly moderate through the 1990s, publicly he stated his desire to move the PKK away from violence and towards a political approach.
He was forced out of his group's base in Syria, following pressure from Turkey, in November 1998. He fled to Russia and then Europe, he was arrested after arriving from Moscow at Rome's Fiumicino Airport. He was soon released while he appealed for political asylum, Italian law forbids the extradition of someone to a country where they would face a death sentence. An extradition request from Germany also collapsed amid political maneuvering. He left Italy on 16 January 1999 and returned to Russia but soon left for Greece, apparently intending to fly from there to The Hague. He was refused entry to a number of European states and instead, on February 3 (?) the Greek authorities flew him to Nairobi, Kenya.
On February 15, 1999 Turkey succeeded in kidnapping or arresting him in Nairobi and quickly transported him to Turkey. The details of his capture remain unclear. On February 16, across Europe, Kurdish supporters responded with protests, acts of violence and terrorism. Öcalan was charged with treason in Ankara, Turkey on February 23.
Öcalan is held as the only inmate on the prison island of Imrali. He was tried before a military court on the island from May 31, 1999. The trial had six days of proceedings and following various adjournments he was sentenced to death on June 29. His appeal was rejected in November but the sentence was suspended while there was a review by the European Court of Human Rights. In September 2002 a Turkish court finally reduced his sentence to life imprisonment. The country had abandoned the death penalty in August 2002 as part of the process towards joining the European Union.

Lilo & Stitch
music
"Lilo & Stitch" is an animated movie, released by Disney in 2002. The movie was written by and directed by Chris Sanders and Dean DeBlois.
The song used by Disney to advertize the movie was Suspicious Minds, performed by Gareth Gates who became famous on the UK TV program, Pop Idol.

Hilary Duff
music
Hilary Erhard Duff (often mistakenly spelled as Hillary Duff) (born September 28, 1987) is an American actress and singer. She got famous by being in the television show "Lizzie McGuire". Since then, she has gone onto a movie career, with roles in mainstream pictures. Among the films she plays in are "Cheaper by the Dozen" and independent movies such as "Material Girls". Duff has also ventured into a music career as a pop musician.

Louis Armstrong
music
Louis Daniel Armstrong (usually pronounced "Louee") (August 4, 1901 – July 6, 1971) (also known by the nicknames Satchmo and Pops) was an American jazz musician. He sang the blues and played the trumpet and was famous in many countries for it.

Manmohan Singh
politics
Manmohan Singh is the Prime Minister of India.

Indira Gandhi
politics
Indira Gandhi (19 November 1917 – 31 October 1984) was the first woman to become Prime Minister of India. She is the daughter of Jawaharlal Nehru, who was also Prime Minister of India. Her son, Rajiv Gandhi, also later became Prime Minister of India. Born Indira Nehru, she married Feroze Gandhi, who had changed his name from "Feroze Khan" and was not related to the famous civil rights leader, Mahatma Gandhi, who helped India gain freedom.

Piero Gobetti
media
Piero Gobetti (born 1901 – died February 1926) was a young journalist, intellectual, and radical liberal person. He was a very active critic during the years of crisis in Italy after the First World War and during the early years of Fascist rule. He had to leave Italy and settled down in Paris, where he soon died. He died because his health was bad, after the Fascists had terrorized him.

Sky Sports
media
Sky Sports is a group of 9 channels - Sky Sports 1, Sky Sports 2, Sky Sports 3, Sky Sports Xtra, Sky Sports News, Sky Sports HD 1, Sky Sports HD 2, PremPlus and At the Races. The channels are owned by a major company named British Sky Broadcasting. It is the most powerful sports television company in the United Kingdom.
Sky Sports is known for its major football coverage and help launched the FA Premier League.
Sky Sports has a series of well known shows such as "Soccer AM", which is a morning chat show with jokes, "Gillette Soccer Saturday" and "You're on Sky Sports".
On August 22, 1999 Sky Sports launched Sky Sports Active. The first game was Arsenal vs Manchester United. It gave the viewer to focus on one player, or look at different camera angles. It soon proved to be successful, and Sky decided to continue it. It can be accessed by pressing the Red Button on your Sky Digital Remote.
On November 24, 2002, Sky Sports won the rights to air the UEFA Champions League, with ITV. They had beaten channels such as the BBC and Channel 4 to win it. Part of the deal had stated that ITV would air two games on a Tuesday and Sky Sports would air 2 games on a Wednesday. Sky soon launched an 8-screen 'Champions League Interactive' channel which showed 8 live games.

Hamas
politics
Hamas (Arabic: حماس, acronym of Harakat al-Muqawama al-Islamiyya, Arabic: حركة المقاومة الاسلامية, literally "Islamic Resistance Movement") is a Palestinian Islamist Sunni organisation. It was started in 1987 during the First Intifada by Ahmed Yassin and Abdel Aziz al-Rantissi as the Gaza branch of the Muslim Brotherhood organziation in Egypt. In the 2006 Palestinian election, Hamas got 74 of 132 seats in parliament and controls the Gaza Strip. The group wants to build a Palestinian state based on Islamic ideas in the area that is now Israel, the West Bank, and Gaza Strip. Hamas does not recognise the State of Israel.
Name.
"Hamas" is an acronym of the Arabic phrase حركة المقاومة الاسلامية, or Harakat al-Muqawama al-Islamiyya or "Islamic Resistance Movement".
Izz ad-Din al-Qassam Brigades.
Hamas is known for its military wing, the Izz ad-Din al-Qassam Brigades, which plans and carries out attacks on Israel and its citizens. Because of numerous suicide bombings and attacking of civilians in Israel, the United States, and other countries call it a terrorist organisation. The country of Jordan has made the group illegal. However, the international press, including the Israeli English-language daily newspaper, call Hamas members by the more neutral term "militants."
Popularity.
In early 2006, Hamas won a clear victory in the vote for the Palestinian parliament. Voters saw Hamas as an alternative to exchange the long-ruling Fatah party, the main part of the PLO. Fatah had not improved the Palestinian people's conditions and reached statehood, and was thought to be corrupt.
Charitable Work.
Hamas has shown its organizational ability by building health, education, and social services to help the population in the West Bank and the Gaza Strip, where there is much poverty. Such efforts have increased its support. In the first half of 2007, Hamas gained political control of the Gaza Strip, while Fatah keeps its headquarters in the West Bank.
Hamas is also associated in some way with Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine headed by Ahmed Jibril.

The Guardian
media
The Guardian is a British newspaper. It is published every day, except on Sunday.
History.
The newspaper was founded in 1821. It was founded by textile traders and merchants. The Guardian was seen as ‘an organ of the middle class’, or in the words of C.P. Scott’s son Ted ‘a paper that will remain bourgeois to the last. "I write for the "Guardian"," said Sir Max Hastings in 2005, "because it is read by the new establishment", reflecting the paper's growing influence.
Three of the four people who wrote leaders for the "Guardian", joined the Social Democratic Party on its foundation in 1982. The paper supported Tony Blair when he wanted to lead the Labour Party, ("Guardian" leader, 2 July 1994) and to become Prime Minister ("Guardian" leader, 2 May 1997).
Characteristics.
Those who read it have a centre-left political orientation.
The Guardian is considered British centre-left (described by American conservatives as "left-wing" as US politics are generally further to the right of the UK).

Louis Pasteur
science
Louis Pasteur (December 27 1822 – September 28 1895) was a French microbiologist and chemist. He and also his wife, Marie, are best known for their experiments supporting the germ theory of disease, and he is also known for his vaccinations, most notably the first vaccine against rabies. He made many discoveries in the field of chemistry, most notably the asymmetry (different shapes) of crystals. He is also well known for his way of keeping milk and wine from going sour for longer. That process is called pasteurization.

Terry Pratchett
media
Terence David John Pratchett (born April 28, 1948, in Beaconsfield, Buckinghamshire, England) OBE is an English author. Best known for his fantasy works, including the famous "Discworld" series. His first novel, "The Carpet People", was published in 1971. He was the UK's best-selling author of the 1990s.

Bic Runga
music
Bic Runga (born January 13, 1976) is a singer from New Zealand. She has sold lots of music albums in New Zealand.

Spider-Man
science
Spider-Man is a character in a comic book made by Marvel Comics. He was created by Stan Lee and Steve Ditko. Spider-Man is a superhero with spider-like powers. Some of these powers are being able to cling to walls, produce webs, and have a "spider sense" that warns him when danger is coming. His real name is Peter Parker also known as "Pete". He is just an average man. He works for the Daily Bugle, a newspaper where his job is a photographer. He got his powers when he was bitten by a radioactive spider. He can sense danger with his "Spider-sense". There have been animated series and movies based on the character.
Publication.
The first time that Spider-Man aka Peter Parker appeared was in the last Amazing Fantasy comic book. Because of the success it had, Spider-Man obtains his own series called The Amazing Spider-Man.
History.
Peter Benjamin Parker was a 15-year-old boy. He has been an orphan since his parents, Richard and Mary Parker, were been killed in a plane crash. Peter will discover later that they were spies and worked for the US Government. He has been raised by his uncle Ben and his aunt May and has always been loved.
At Midtown High School, Peter is a brilliant student, who particularly loves sciences. His classmates don't really love him for that reason, and also because he is shy and out of the way. One day, he was at a museum watching Dr. Connors(who later becomes The lizard) preform a science experiment, he was bitten by a spider during this event. This spider had been hit by a ray during the issue and were radioactive. This event changed Peter into The Amazing Spider-Man.

Eddie Cantor
music
Eddie Cantor (January 31, 1892 - October 10, 1964) was an American comedian, singer, actor, songwriter. He was the original singer of 1929 hit song "Makin' Whoopie".

Cardinal Richelieu
politics
Armand Jean du Plessis, better known as Cardinal Richelieu (9 September 1585–4 December 1642) was a French clergyman, noble, and statesman.
He was consecrated as a bishop in 1607. He later entered politics and became a Secretary of State in 1616. Richelieu soon rose in both the Church and the state. He became a Cardinal in 1622. He became King Louis XIII's chief minister in 1624. He remained in office until his death in 1642; then Jules Cardinal Mazarin became chief minister.
The Cardinal de Richelieu was often known by the title of the King's "Chief Minister". As a result, he is sometimes said to be the world's first Prime Minister. He sought to consolidate royal power and crush domestic factions. By restraining the power of the nobility, he transformed France into a strongly centralised state. His chief foreign policy objective was to check the power of the Austro-Spanish Habsburg dynasty; although a Roman Catholic cardinal, he did not hesitate to make alliances with Protestant rulers. With these alliances, he tried to achieve this goal. His tenure was marked by the Thirty Years' War that engulfed Europe.
As an advocate for Samuel de Champlain and of the keeping of Quebec, he founded the Compagnie des Cent-Associés and saw the Treaty of Saint-Germain-en-Laye return Quebec to French rule under de Champlain, after the settlement had been captured by the Kirkes in 1629. This in part allowed the colony to eventually develop into the heartland of French-speaking culture in North America.
Richelieu was also famous for his patronage of the arts; most notably, he founded the Académie française, the learned society responsible for matters of the French language. Richelieu is also known by the sobriquet "l'Éminence rouge" ("the Red Eminence"), from the red shade of a cardinal's vestments and the style "eminence" as a cardinal.

William Randolph Hearst
politics
William Randolph Hearst (April 29, 1863 – August 14, 1951) was an American newspaper magnate, born in San Francisco, California.
William Randolph was the only child of George Hearst, a successful miner who became a multi-millionaire, and later U.S. Senator from California, and Phoebe Apperson Hearst, a former school teacher from Missouri.
Hearst was a media tycoon. He started a newspaper empire, now the Hearst corporation. He has become known for sensationalist stories. Those stories were often false, or only very loosely based on true events.
The film Citizen Kane by Orson Welles tells the story about William Randolph Hearst.
A modern-day equivalent of Hearst would probably be Silvio Berlusconi.

Joseph Pulitzer
media
Joseph "Joe" Pulitzer (April 10, 1847 – October 29, 1911) was an American publisher. Most people will link the word Pulitzer to the Pulitzer Prizes. These prizes were established by his will, after his death. He is also known (along with William Randolph Hearst) for originating yellow journalism.
Early days: The Post-Dispatch.
Joseph Pulitzer was born in Makó, in present-day Hungary. Originally, he wanted to do a a military career, but was turned down by the Austrian army. They said his health was bad and that he did not see too well. He went to live in the United States in 1864 to serve in the American Civil War. After the war he settled in St. Louis, Missouri. In 1868 he began working there for a German-language daily newspaper, the "Westliche Post". He joined the Republican Party and was elected to the Missouri State Assembly in 1869. In 1872, Pulitzer bought the "Post" for $3,000. Then, in 1878, he bought the "St. Louis Dispatch" for $2,700 and merged the two papers, which became the "St. Louis Post-Dispatch", which remains St. Louis' daily newspaper. It was at the Post-Dispatch that Pulitzer developed his role as a champion of the common man with exposés and a hard-hitting populist approach.
The New York World.
By 1883 Pulitzer had made a lot of money. In that year, he bought the "New York World". That newspaper had been losing $40,000 a year. He paid $346,000 to Jay Gould, the owner. Pulitzer shifted its focus to human-interest stories, scandal, and sensationalism. In 1885, he was elected to the U.S. House of Representatives, but resigned after a few months' service. He did not like politics. In 1887, he recruited the famous investigative journalist Nellie Bly. In 1895 the "World" introduced the immensely popular Yellow Kid comic by Richard F. Outcault. This was the first newspaper comic printed with color. Under Pulitzer's leadership circulation grew from 15,000 to 600,000, making "the New Your World" the largest newspaper in the country.
Health problems.
The editor of the rival "New York Sun" attacked Pulitzer in print. He calling him "The Jew who gave up his religion".This was in 1890. This was intended to turn away Pulitzer's Jewish readership. Pulitzer's already failing health deteriorated rapidly, and he left the newsroom. He continued to actively manage the paper from his vacation retreat in Bar Harbor Maine and his New York mansion.
In 1895, William Randolph Hearst purchased the rival "New York Journal", which led to a circulation war. This competition with Hearst, particularly the coverage before and during the Spanish-American War, linked Pulitzer's name with "yellow journalism".
After the "World" exposed a fraudulent payment of $40 million by the United States to the French Panama Canal Company in 1909, Pulitzer was indicted for libeling Theodore Roosevelt and J. P. Morgan. The courts dismissed the indictments, in a victory for freedom of the press.
Tries to set up a school for journalism.
In 1892, Pulitzer offered Columbia University's president, Seth Low, money to set up the world's first school of journalism. The university initially turned down the money, evidently unimpressed by Pulitzer's unscrupulous character. In 1902, Columbia's new president Nicholas Murray Butler was more receptive to the plan for a school and prizes, but it would not be until after Pulitzer's death that this dream would be fulfilled. Pulitzer left the university $2 million in his will, which led to the creation in 1912 of the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism, but by then the first school of journalism had been created at the University of Missouri. Columbia's Graduate School of Journalism remains one of the most prestigious in the world.
Joseph Pulitzer died aboard his yacht in the harbor of Charleston, South Carolina in 1911. He is interred in the Woodlawn Cemetery in The Bronx, New York. In 1917, the first Pulitzer Prizes were awarded, in accordance with Pulitzer's wishes.
In 1989 Pulitzer was inducted into the St. Louis Walk of Fame.

Bobby Orr
sports
Robert Gordon "Bobby" Orr (born March 20, 1948 in Parry Sound, Ontario) is a retired Canadian ice hockey defenceman.
Bobby Orr's ice hockey skills were evident at a very early age. He was signed by theBoston Bruins at twelve. As a 14-year-old, he played junior hockey against eighteen, nineteen and twenty-year-olds. He signed his first pro contract with the Boston Bruins in 1966.
In his first professional season, he won the Calder Memorial Trophy as top rookie in the league. Orr only played 46 games in the 1967-68 NHL season because he was injured, but won the Norris Trophy. In the 1969-70 season, he scored 120 points and became the only defenseman in history to win the Art Ross Trophy, for leading the league in scoring. He also won the Hart Memorial Trophy and the Conn Smythe Trophy. In 1976, Bobby Orr was named the most valuable player in the inaugural Canada Cup Tournament. Orr was traded to the Chicago Blackhawks in 1976. He would only play 26 games over the next three seasons because of problems with his knees.
Orr was inducted in the Hockey Hall of Fame in 1979.

Klaus Wowereit
politics
Klaus Wowereit (*1 October 1953 in Berlin) is a German politician. He has been the SPD Governing Mayor of Berlin, Germany since 2001. He and his party won 31.4% of the votes in the 2001 state elections], and he started a coalition government with Linkspartei.PDS. He was President of the Bundesrat in 2001/02. He was re-elected as Governing Mayor in 2006, and has carried on the coalition.
He supports Kurt Beck as "Kanzlerkandidat", the SPDs nominee for the Chancellorship of Germany. Many people wanted Wowereit to be the candidate, not so many after he decided to stay in coalition with Die Linke after the 2006 elecctions.
Background.
Until 1973, Klaus Wowereit went to the Ulrich-von-Hutten-Oberschule in Berlin, then he went up to the Free University Berlin to study law. He took his first State Exams in 1981 and the second set in 1984).
Political career.
After university Woweriet spent three years as a civil servant in the Senate Office (that is, Ministry) of the Interior. At the age of 30, he was became the youngest councillor in the city of Berlin when he was elected a councillor of Tempelhof Borough. After eleven years he stood for the Berlin House of Deputies Abgeordnetenhaus which is City's Landtag or state legislature in 1995. In December 1999, he was elected chairman of the SPD parliamentary group in the Abgeordnetenhaus. Since June 2001 he has served as Governing Mayor, "Regierender Bürgermeister", of Berlin.
Sexual orientation.
Wowereit is one of the most famous German politicians who has openly declared himself homosexual. He came out at a convention of the Berlin SPD just before the 2001 mayoral elections, when he said "Ich bin schwul, und das ist auch gut so." "I am gay, and it's ok that way"). This is now a famouse quotation in German. He probably came out so that the tabloid newspapers could not publish what they thought were embarrassing stories about him.
Wowereit is not the only gay mayor of a large European city. Bertrand Delanoë, the mayor of Paris, is openly gay, and Ole von Beust, the mayor of Hamburg, is also gay.
In September 2007, Wowereit published an autobiography called "...und das ist auch gut so.", after his famous coming out phrase.

Kwame Nkrumah
politics
Dr. Kwame Nkrumah (born Francis Nwia-Kofi Ngonloma, September 21, 1909 – April 27, 1972) was an African political leader. He was well known for being the first Prime Minister (later President) of Ghana, and his vision for a united African continent. On March 6, 1957, after ten years of campaigning for Ghanaian independence, Nkrumah was elected and Ghana gained independence from British rule.
Early life and activism.
Nkrumah was born Francis Nwia-Kofi Ngonloma in Nkroful, a town in Gold Coast (the British colony that was to become Gold Coast) to Kofi Ngonloma, a goldsmith, and Elizabeth Nyaniba, a salesperson, who he saw as a great inspiration.
Education.
Nkrumah was first named Francis Nwia-Kofi, but later changed his name to Kwame Nkrumah in 1945 in the UK. He was born on Saturday.
He attended Elementary School at Half Assini where his father worked as a goldsmith. A German Roman Catholic priest called George Fischer significantly influenced his elementary school education.
Timeline.
The Osagyefo, Dr. Kwame Nkrumah authored over 20 books and publications. (See) and he is a lead authority on the Political theory and Practical Pan-Africanism.

Scott Joplin
music
Scott Joplin was a well-known ragtime musician and composer.
Joplin was born in the U.S. state of Texas sometime between June 1867 and January 1868, and died in 1917.
He may be most commonly known from the Marvin Hamlisch adaptation of his composition "The Entertainer" which was used in the 1973 movie "The Sting" starring Paul Newman and Robert Redford. His best-known song while he was alive was "Maple Leaf Rag". " The entertainer was a great piece it was a record breaking hit.

Hikaru Utada
music
Hikaru Utada (宇多田ヒカル "Utada Hikaru", born January 19 1983 in New York City), is an American-born Japanese singer and songwriter. Because she was born in the United States, she can speak English perfectly. She is the daughter of the 1970s Enka singer Keiko Fuji. Her first Japanese album, "First Love", was very popular. It sold more copies than any other Japanese singer ever. She is also known in the west for singing the theme songs for "Kingdom Hearts" and "Kingdom Hearts II"; "Simple and Clean" and "Sanctuary".
When Hikaru was little, she did not want to become a singer. She saw how busy her mother and father's lives were, and did not want that for herself. When she was 10-years-old, her parents asked her if she wanted to write songs. She did not want to, but tried doing it. She wrote a song called "I'll Be Stronger". During this time, Hikaru went to school in New York. Her classmates were not able to say her name right (Hee-ka-roo) so they shortened it to 'Hikki'. 'Hikki' became Hikaru's nickname. Her fans in Japan call her that. The name is not promoted very much in the United States because it sounds too much like 'hickey'.
In 1996, Hikaru started to record an album, when she was only 13 years-old. It was in English. The album was in the R&B style. It was written all by herself. The album was going to be released on the EMI' record company, but since the company fell apart, it was never sold in the United States. A man called Akira Miyake from Japan heard the album, and wanted to release it there. Hikaru agreed, and the album was released in Japan in 1998.
The album sold okay, but it was not until later when Hikaru started to sing Japanese songs that she became famous. Her music still sounded very R&B, but at this point it sounded more pop. Her first single, "Automatic / Time Will Tell", reached #2 on the single charts in Japan. A while later, after another single, she released her first Japanese album, "First Love". This sold a very large amount (over 9 million copies) and became the most sold album by a Japanese singer.
Hikaru went on to release two more albums, "Distance" (2001), and "Deep River" (2002). In each album, her style changed slightly. Each album was less R&B, and more Pop. In 2004, she released an album made of all her old single songs. She next released an album in English called "Exodus". "Exodus" was released under the record label Island Def-Jam. It was sold in Japan, the United States, and the United Kingdom. She sung, wrote and made the music for the whole album herself (except for when she got hip-hop producer Timbaland to help her). The album sold many copies in Japan, but it did not sell that well in the United States. However, many famous people and music critics thought that the album was good (for example, Elton John thought it was interesting).
Hikaru has started to make new Japanese music again, but continued on making all the music herself. Usually, a singer/songwriter will only write the music and the lyrics, but Hikaru decided she wanted to arrange her songs all by herself as well. She released her new album, "Ultra Blue", in mid-2006. Soon after, she went on tour all across Japan. This is the second time she has ever done this (despite her singing for eight years).

Diego Maradona
sports
Diego Maradona is a former Argentine football player. He was born October 30, 1960 in Lanús, Buenos Aires). He was nicknamed "El Diez", "Pelusa", "El Diego" and "El pibe de oro", He won the World Cup in Mexico in the year of 1986.
Fame.
He is regarded by many people, along with Brazilian Pelé, as the best player in the history of the game.
Problems.
In his life, he had problems and addictions to drugs. But after his drug abuse,he returned to play for Napoli of Italy for a short period. However, he failed another drug test and was banned for another year and on his 37th birthday finally announced that he was retiring from football. In 2001 he was voted player of the century. In his career, he scored 356 goals.

José Luis Rodríguez Zapatero
politics
José Luis Rodríguez Zapatero (born August 4, 1960 in Valladolid) is the President of the Government of Spain. His party, the Spanish Socialist Workers' Party (PSOE), won the general election on March 14, 2004. He succeded to Jose Maria Aznar. Notable actions of his government have included withdrawing Spanish troops from Iraq and legalizing same-sex marriages.

Ben Bradshaw
politics
Benjamin Peter James Bradshaw (born 30 August 1960) is an English politician and the Member of Parliament for the Exeter constituency in the United Kingdom. He was elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a Minister of State in the Department of Health and Minister for the South West and was one of the first openly gay MPs.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Demo (music)
music
A demo, in music, is the first version of a song or album.
It can also refer to an album made by the band as a "sample" in hopes of getting a record deal.

Richard Trevithick
science
Richard Trevithick (April 13,1771 - April 22, 1833) was a English inventor and engineer. He is best known for making the first working steam locomotive.

Fantasia Barrino
music
Fantasia Barrino is an American singer. She was the winner of the third season on "American Idol".

Duke Kahanamoku
sports
Duke Kahanamoku (August 24, 1890 – January 22, 1968), was a Hawaiian athlete who is called the inventor of modern surfing. He was also on the United States Olympic team as a swimmer, and won several silver and gold medals. Contrary to some misinformation on the internet, Duke is not known as the Big Kahuna. He himself rejected that term, because he knew it's meaning. The Big Kahuna is a character in the Gidget story, which is based on a portrayal of Tube Steak Tracy, a famous surfer of the 40's & 50's in Malibu.

Vyacheslav Molotov
politics
Vyacheslav Mikhailovich Molotov (Russian: Вячесла́в Миха́йлович Мо́лотов) (March 9 [O.S. February 25] 1890 – November 8, 1986) was a Soviet politician and diplomat. He was a leading figure in the Soviet government from the 1920s, when he came to power. He was a protégé of Joseph Stalin, until the 1950s. Nikita Khrushchev dismissed him from office. He was the main Soviet signatory of the Molotov-Ribbentrop pact of 1939. This pact was signed between Germany and the USSR, and it was a promise not to attack each other. The pact lasted about two years, until Germany started the invasion of the Soviet Union on June 22 1941.

Joachim von Ribbentrop
politics
Ulrich Friedrich Wilhelm Joachim von Ribbentrop (born Ulrich Friedrich Wilhelm Joachim Ribbentrop) (April 30, 1893 – October 16, 1946) was Foreign Minister of Germany from 1938 until 1945. He was executed through hanging for war crimes after the Nuremberg trials.

Andrei Sakharov
science
Andrei Dmitrievich Sakharov (Russian: Андре́й Дми́триевич Са́харов, May 21 1921 – December 14 1989), was a Soviet nuclear physicist. He was also a well-known dissident and human rights activist. Sakharov was an advocate of civil liberties and reforms in the Soviet Union.

Shania Twain
music
Shania Twain (August 28, 1965-) was born in Timmins, Ontario, Canada. She is a very successful singer/songwriter in the country and pop music genres.
Discography.
She has released thirty-five singles from four studio albums, one greatest hits album, and one soundtrack album.

Dionne Warwick
music
Dionne Warwick (December 12, 1940) is a well known American R&B singer.

Leonid Brezhnev
politics
Leonid Brezhnev was a leader of the Soviet Union. Born in 1906, Brezhnev was dictator of the Soviet Union from 1964 until his death in 1982. During the Second World War in Russia, Brezhnev acted as a spy, instead he spied on his own countrymen for political reasons.

Jared Diamond
science
Jared Mason Diamond (born September 10, 1937) is an American author and scientist. He is famous for writing a book named "Guns, Germs, and Steel", which in 1997 won a Pulitzer Prize.
Life.
Diamond was born in Boston, Massachusetts. His father was a doctor and his mother was a teacher. He received his college degree from Harvard University in 1958, and then he received a doctorate degree from the University of Cambridge in 1961.
In 1966, he became a teacher at UCLA, a university in Los Angeles, California. He has also traveled to some islands called New Guinea, which are far away from the United States, in the South Pacific Ocean. Diamond is famous for knowing a lot about the birds that lived on that island, and he has traveled there many times.
Writing.
Diamond is very famous for the things that he writes. He is able to write about science in ways that many people can understand, and he has written many articles for famous magazines like "Discover" in the United States.
He also writes books. One of his first books was called "The Third Chimpanzee", which talked about the way that people evolved from monkeys, and how many things are the same between humans and monkeys.
His most famous book is "Guns, Germs, and Steel". In his book, Diamond explained why he thought that different parts of the earth had people on them at different times, and why some people in some parts of the world had more science or farming than people in other parts of the world. The book went over thousands of years of human history.
In 2004, he wrote another book, called, "Collapse: How Societies Choose to Fail or Succeed." In this book, Diamond wrote about why he thought that some groups of people from many hundreds of years ago were able to have their groups get very big and strong, while other groups fell apart. His book talked about what people today can maybe learn from the studying the problems from history.

Hannibal
politics
Hannibal (247 BC – 183/182 BC) sometimes known as Hǎnnibal Barca) was a Carthaginian statesman and general. He was the biggest enemy of the Roman Republic. He is most famous for what he did in the Second Punic War. He marched an army from Iberia over the Pyrenees mountains and the Alps mountains into northern Italy and defeated the Romans in a series of battles. He kept an army in Italy for many years. A Roman invasion of North Africa made him return to Carthage. He lost and the Romans made him leave Carthage. He lived at the Seleucid court, and convinced the Emperor to fight Rome. When he lost a naval battle, Hannibal fled to the Bithynian court. When the Romans told him to give up, he killed himself.
Hannibal is listed as one of the greatest military commanders in history. Military historian Theodore Ayrault Dodge once called Hannibal the "father of strategy" because even his greatest enemy, Rome, copied his military ideas.
Background and early career.
Hannibal, which means "mercy of Baal", was the son of Hamilcar Barca. After Carthage lost the First Punic War, Hamilcar began to try to make Carthage have better luck. Hamilcar began to conquer the tribes of Spain. Carthage at the time was in a poor condition. Its navy could not carry his army to Iberia (Hispania). Hamilcar had to march towards the Pillars of Hercules and ferry it across the strait. According to a story, Hannibal went to his father while he was making a sacrifice to the gods. Hannibal was quite young. He begged to go with his father. Hamilcar said yes and made Hannibal promise that he would never be a friend of Rome. Hannibal told his father
" "I swear so soon as age will permit...I will use fire and steel to arrest the destiny of Rome." "
In (221 BC), Hannibal became the leader of the army. He spent two years consolidating his holdings and finishing the conquest of Iberia south of the river Ebro. Rome feared the growing strength of Hannibal. They made an alliance with the city of Saguntum and claimed to be protecting the city. Saguntum was south of the river Ebro. Hannibal attacked the city because of this. It was captured after eight months. Rome wanted justice from Carthage. The Carthaginian government saw nothing wrong with Hannibal's actions. The war Hannibal wanted was declared at the end of the year.
Overland journey to Italy.
Hannibal's army was made up of as many as 75,000 foot soldiers and 9,000 horsemen. Hannibal left New Carthage in late spring of 218 BC. He fought his way north to the Pyrenees. He defeated the tribes through clever mountain tactics and stubborn fighting. After marching 290 miles and reaching the Ebro river, Hannibal chose the most trustworthy and loyal parts of his army of Libyan and Iberian mercenaries to keep going with him. He left 11,000 troops to keep watch over the newly conquered region. At the Pyrenees, he let go of another 11,000 Iberian troops. Hannibal entered Gaul with 50,000 foot soldiers and 9,000 horsemen.
Hannibal needed to cross the Pyrenees, the Alps, and many important rivers. In the spring of 218 BC, he fought his way to the Pyrenees. He made peace deals with the Gaulish leaders and reached the Rhône River. Arriving at the Rhône in September, Hannibal's army numbered 38,000 infantry, 8,000 horsemen, and thirty-seven war elephants.
Hannibal got away from a Roman force sent to fight him in Gaul. He then went up the valley of one of the streams of the Rhône River. By autumn, he reached the foot of the Alps. His journey over the mountains is one of the most famous achievements of any military force. After this journey, Hannibal came down from the foothills into northern Italy. He had arrived with only half the forces he had started with and only a few elephants. Hannibal had lost as many as 20,000 men crossing over the mountains.
Battle of Trebia.
Publius Cornelius Scipio commanded the Roman force sent to stop Hannibal. He did not expect Hannibal to cross the Alps. He expected to fight Hannibal in Spain. With a small army still in Gaul, Scipio tried to stop Hannibal. He moved his army to Italy by sea in time to meet Hannibal. Hannibal made the area behind him safer by defeating the tribe of the Taurini (modern Turin). The opposing forces fought at Ticinus. Here, Hannibal forced the Romans to get out of the plain of Lombardy. This victory did much to weaken Roman control over the Gauls. The Gauls decided to join the Carthaginians. Soon all of northern Italy was unofficially allied. Gallic and Ligurian troops soon raised his army back to 40,000 men. Hannibal’s army was ready to invade Italy. Scipio retreated across the River Trebia. He camped at the town of Placentia and waited for more troops.
The senate had ordered Sempronius Longus to bring his army from Sicily to meet Scipio and face Hannibal. Hannibal was in position to head him off. Sempronius avoided Hannibal and joined Scipio near the Trebbia River near Placentia. At Trebia, Hannibal deafeated the Roman infantry by a surprise attack from an ambush in the flank.
Battle of Lake Trasimene.
Arriving in Etruria in the spring of 217 BC, Hannibal decided to lure the main Roman army led by Flaminius into battle. Hannibal found Flaminius camped at Arretium. Hannibal marched around his opponent’s left side and cut Flaminius off from Rome. Hannibal made Flaminius chase him. On the shore of Lake Trasimenus, Hannibal destroyed Flaminius's army in the waters or on the nearby slopes. He killed Flaminius as well. He had gotten rid of the only force that could stop him from getting to Rome. He realized that without siege engines he could not hope to take the capital. He decided to comtinue on into central and southern Italy. He hoped this show of strength would create a revolt against the Roman government. After Lake Trasimene, Hannibal said, "“I have not come to fight Italians, but on behalf of the Italians against Rome.”"
Fabius "Cunctator".
Rome was put into an immense state of panic. They appointed a dictator named Quintus Fabius Maximus. He was an intelligent and prudent general.
Fabius adopted the Fabian strategy. He refused open battle with his enemy while placing several Roman armies in Hannibal’s vicinity to limit his movement. Fabius sent out small detachments against Hannibal’s foraging parties. Residents of small northern villages were told to post lookouts. They could gather their livestock and possessions and take refuge into fortified towns. This would wear down the invaders’ endurance.
Hannibal decided to march through Samnium to Campania. He hoped that the devastation would draw Fabius into battle. Fabius refused to let himself be drawn into battle. His troops became irritated by his "“cowardly spirit”". The epithet "cunctator" means "delayer." His policies were not liked. Romans were used to facing their enemies in the field. The people wanted to see a quick end to the war.
The rest of autumn continued with frequent skirmishes. After six months, Fabius would be removed from his position in accordance with the Roman law.
Battle of Cannae.
In the Spring of 216 B.C. Hannibal captured the large supply depot at Cannae in the Apulian plain. He had placed himself between the Romans and their source of supply. The Roman Senate resumed their Consular elections in 216. They chose Caius Terentius Varro and Lucius Aemilius Paullus as Consuls. The Romans raised a new army that was much larger than ever before. The total strength of the army which faced Hannibal was between 90,000 and 100,000 men.
The Roman army marched southward to Apulia. After a two days’ march, they found Hannibal at the Audifus River. The Consuls had to switch their command on a daily basis. The Consul Varro was a man of reckless and hubris nature. He was determined to defeat Hannibal. Hannibal drew him into trap. The Roman army had no was to escape. Due to brilliant tactics, Hannibal surrounded and destroyed all but a small remainder of this force. It is estimated that 50,000-70,000 Romans were killed or captured at Cannae. Among the dead were eighty senators. The Roman Senate was comprised of no more than 300 men - this was 25%–30% of the governing body. This makes the Battle of Cannae one of the worst defeats in the history of Ancient Rome. It is also one of the bloodiest battles in all of human history in terms of the number of lives lost within a single day. After Cannae, the Romans refused to fight Hannibal in battles. They tried instead to defeat him by attrition. They relied on their advantages of supply and manpower.
Because of this victory most of southern Italy joined Hannibal's cause. During that same year, the Greek cities in Sicily revolted against Roman control. The Macedonian king, Philip V supported Hannibal. This started the First Macedonian War against Rome. Hannibal made his new base in Capua, the second largest city of Italy.
Stalemate.
Without the resources from his allies or reinforcements from Carthage, Hannibal could not do much more. Hannibal began losing ground. He continued defeating the Romans whenever he could bring them into battle but was never able to complete another decisive victory.
End of War in Italy.
In 212 BC conspirators in Tarentum let Hannibal into the city. They then blew the alarm with some Roman trumpets. This let Hannibal's troops pick off the Romans as they stumbled into the streets. Hannibal told the Tarentines to mark every house where Tarentines lived. The houses not marked were looted. The citadel held out. This stopped Hannibal from using the harbor and Rome was slowly gaining ground over Hannibal. In the same year, he lost Campania.
In 211 BC the city of Capua fell. In summer of that year, the Romans destroyed the Carthaginian army in Sicily. Meanwhile, Hannibal had defeated Fulvius at Herdonea in Apulia, but lost Tarentum. With the loss of Tarentum in 209 BC and the Romans capturing of Samnium and Lucania, his hold on south Italy was almost lost.
In 207 BC he retired into Bruttium. These events marked the end to Hannibal's success in Italy. In 203 BC, Hannibal was recalled to Carthage to lead the defence of his homeland against a Roman invasion.
The Battle of Zama.
Both Scipio and Hannibal met on the field of Zama. Hannibal had about 50,000 infantry and 4,000 cavalry. Scipio had 34,000 infantry and 8,700 cavalry. For years, Hannibal had won victories with his experienced army. He now faced the best of the Roman army, while he led a makeshift army. They did not do well against the Romans.
Hannibal was defeated. 20,000 men of Hannibal’s army were killed at Zama. The same number of men were taken as prisoners. The Romans lost as few as 500 dead and 4,000 wounded. With their best general defeated, the Carthaginians accepted defeat and surrendered to Rome.
Exile and death (195–183 B.C.).
Seven years after the victory of Zama, the Romans demanded Hannibal's surrender. Hannibal went into voluntary exile. He journeyed to Tyre, the mother-city of Carthage, and then to Ephesus and Syria.
In 190 BC he was placed in command of a Phoenician fleet but was defeated in a battle off the Eurymedon River. Hannibal went to Crete, but he soon returned to the Asia Minor. At Libya on the eastern shore of the Sea of Marmora, he was going to be turned over to the Romans. Rather than letting himself be taken, he drank poison. The precise year of his death is not certain. It is believed to be 183 BC. He died in the same year as Scipio Africanus.

Veganism
science
Veganism is a philosophy that says people should not use animals in any way.
Veganism is a lifestyle. Vegans choose not to eat food that comes from animals, including meat, eggs and dairy products (like milk, cheese, and yogurt). A vegan diet is sometimes called a strict vegetarian diet. Vegans also do not eat honey. Vegans try not to use any other animal products, such as leather, wool, feathers, bone, or pearl. They also try to avoid products that have been tested on animals. Some vegans campaign for animal rights.
Vegans do eat all kinds of fruits, vegetables, beans, grains, nuts, and seeds, and things made from them like vegan sweets, vegan cheese and vegan cakes.
Some people become vegan because they find about the bad treatment of animals in the modern animal farm industry. Other reasons to become vegan are health, to protect the environment, for religious reasons, or because of world hunger. Animals use most of the food they eat for their own life, not to 'grow' meat, milk or eggs. So a lot of food, land and water is wasted by keeping animals for food.

Dinah Washington
music
Dinah Washington (born Ruth Lee Jones August 24, 1924-December 14,1963) was an American R&B and Jazz singer.

Alex Haley
media
Alexander Palmer Haley (August 11, 1921 – February 10, 1992) was an African-American writer. He was also Irish and Cherokee. He is best known for the "The Autobiography of Malcolm X", which he helped Malcolm X write, and his book ', which was about his family history and inspired a television mini-series.

Edward Kasner
science
Edward Kasner (1878–1955) is an American mathematician (person who studies math). He is famous for creating the word googol and the word googolplex.
Kasner went to Columbia University and received his Ph.D. in 1899.
Around 1920, Kasner decided to make a good, catchy name for a very big number (one, followed by a hundred zeros). While he was walking with his nephews Milton (c. 1911–1980) and Edwin Sirotta in New Jersey's Palisades, Kasner asked them to think of good names. Milton was the one who said "googol".
In 1940, with James Roy Newman, Kasner made a book about math called "Mathematics and the Imagination" ISBN 0486417034. It was in this book that the name "googol" was first used.
In modern times, the website Google was based on Kasner's number googol.

Levi Eshkol
politics
Levi Eshkol (born:Levi Shkolnik) (1895–1969) was the 3rd Prime Minister of Israel.

Rugby World Cup
sports
The Rugby World Cup is the most important competition in the sport of rugby union. The cup happens every four years. The first one was in 1987. The next one is being held in 2011, in New Zealand. The competition is one of the biggest sporting events in the world (along with the FIFA World Cup and the Olympics).
There are only 20 spots available in a Rugby World Cup, so teams must compete for them in a qualifying competition. Teams that reached the knockout stages of the previous tournament automatically qualify for the next tournament.
The current champions are South Africa.

Chris Martin
music
Chris Martin is an English singer for the band Coldplay. He was born in Devon, England on March 2, 1977. He is married to Gwyneth Paltrow and together they have two children, a daughter called Apple and a son who is called Moses.

Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band
music
Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band was an album released by The Beatles. It was the 9th Beatles album to be released in Britain. It was released on June 1st, 1967, and stayed at the top of the charts for twenty-seven weeks. It has lots of well-known songs such as McCartney's "When I'm Sixty-Four" and "A Day in the Life," which Lennon and McCartney worked on together. For a while before this album came out, the Beatles had been trying new things when they made records, but this album made a much bigger change in the way they sounded. In the first two songs, Ringo Starr uses the alias of Billy Shears.
Songs on the album.
All songs are by Lennon/McCartney unless otherwise specified.

Jennifer Lopez
music
Jennifer Lynn López (also known as J. Lo) is a Grammy-nominated American singer, actor, dancer, and fashion designer. She was born 24 July, 1969. She's most known for her performances in "Selena" (a tribute movie to the late Mexican singer Selena), "Out Of Sight" (co-starring George Clooney)," The Cell", and recently "An Unfinished Life", with Robert Redford and Morgan Freeman.
Her first album "On The 6" was released in 1999. It contains the hit singles "If You Had My Love", "No Me Ames", "Waiting For Tonight", and "Feelin' So Good and Let's Get Loud". She released "J.Lo" in 2001, her most successful album to date. "J to Tha Lo! The Remixes" and "This is me...Then" were released in 2002. Her latest album is "Brave" which was out in 2008. Lopez has sold more than 40 millions copies of her albums so far.
She has many records, including record for having a movie and album ("The Wedding Planner", and "J.Lo") both #1 on the same week. Also, she is recently known for having the biggest re-entry on the Billboard charts, for the single "Control Myself" (2006) by LL Cool J and where she's featuring. After a peak at #89 and going out of the charts, it made a high re-entry again, at #4, some weeks after.
Lopez has had problems with People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals (PETA) and other animal activist groups because she often uses fur in the clothing she designs and the clothing she wears.

Ottawa Senators
sports
Ottawa Senators is the name of two teams that have played ice hockey in the National Hockey League (NHL).
The first team, then known as the Ottawa Silver Seven, won the Stanley Cup in 1903. In those days, other teams could challenge for the cup at any time. The Silver Seven won nine challenges, keeping the cup until 1906. The team changed its name to Senators, and then won the cup again in 1909, 1911, 1920, 1921, 1923, and 1927. Its star players included goaltender Clint Benedict, and forwards Cy Denneny and Frank Nighbor. The team moved to St. Louis in 1934, where they played for one year.
The current Ottawa Senators began playing in 1992. They won the President's Trophy as the top team in the regular season in 2002-2003. Some of their best players have included Daniel Alfredsson, Alexei Yashin, Marion Hossa, and Dany Heatley.

Calgary Flames
sports
The Calgary Flames are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They began in 1972 in the city of Atlanta, and moved to Calgary in 1980. They won the Stanley Cup in 1989. They also made the Stanley Cup finals in 1986, losing to the Montreal Canadiens, and in 2004, losing to the Tampa Bay Lightning four games to three. The Flames won the President's Trophy as regular season champion in 1988 and 1989.
The Flames play in the Saddledome arena in Calgary, Alberta, Canada. It is called the "Saddledome" because the roof is shaped like a saddle.
Some of the top players to play for the Flames include Al MacInnis, who won the Conn Smythe Trophy as most valuable player in the playoffs in 1989; Jarome Iginla, who won the Art Ross Trophy as top point scorer in 2001-02, and the Richard Trophy as top goal scorer in 2001-02 and 2003-04; Lanny MacDonald, who scored 500 career goals, mostly on Calgary; Gary Suter, who won the Calder Trophy as rookie of the year in 1985-86; goaltender Mike Vernon; and forwards Joe Mullen, Joe Nieuwendyk, and Theoren Fleury. Recently, the Flames have become a strong team because of goaltender Miikka Kiprusoff from Finland. Many people consider Kiprusoff to be the best goalie in the world.

Edmonton Oilers
sports
The Edmonton Oilers are an ice hockey team in the National Hockey League (NHL). They joined the NHL in 1979, after seven years in the World Hockey Association. The Oilers have won the Stanley Cup five times, in 1984, 1985, 1987, 1988, and 1990. They also won the President's Trophy as top team in the regular season in 1984, 1986, and 1987. They lost the 1983 Stanley Cup final to the New York Islanders and the 2006 Stanley Cup Final to the Carolina Hurricanes.
Wayne Gretzky won the Hart Trophy as the NHL's most valuable player (MVP) eight times on the Oilers. He also won the Art Ross Trophy seven times on Edmonton, the goal-scoring title (now known as the Richard Trophy) five times, and the Conn Smythe Trophy as MVP in the playoffs twice. Gretzky set many NHL records on the Oilers, including most goals (92), assists (163), and points (215) in a season.
The Oilers have had many other great players: Mark Messier won the Hart Trophy in 1990 and the Conn Smythe Trophy in 1984; Paul Coffey won the Norris Trophy as best defenceman in 1985 and 1986; Grant Fuhr won the Vezina Trophy as best goaltender in 1988; Jari Kurri led the NHL in goals in 1986; and Bill Ranford won the Conn Smythe Trophy in 1990. Glenn Anderson and Curtis Joseph are among their other top players.

Kurt Gödel
science
Kurt Gödel (April 28, 1906 Brno, then Austria-Hungary, now Czech Republic – January 14, 1978 Princeton, New Jersey) was a logician, mathematician, and philosopher of mathematics.
Impact.
Some people believe, Gödel was one of the most significant logicians of all time. Gödel's work has had a big impact on scientific and philosophical thinking in the 20th century. Many people, such as Bertrand Russell, A. N. Whitehead, and David Hilbert, tried to use logic and set theory at that time. They wanted to understand the foundations of mathematics.
Fame.
Gödel is best known for his two incompleteness theorems. The theorems were published in 1931. He was 25 years of age, and had just finished his doctorate at the University of Vienna one year earlier.
The more famous of the two theorems says that if there are consistent axiomatic systems that are powerful enough to describe themselves, there will be true propositions in those systems that can not be proved within the system itself.
Proof.
To prove this theorem, Gödel developed a technique now known as Gödel numbering, which codes formal expressions as natural numbers.
He also showed that the continuum hypothesis cannot be disproved from the accepted axioms of set theory, if those axioms are consistent. He made important contributions to proof theory. He did this by clarifying the connections between classical logic, intuitionistic logic, and modal logic.
Later life.
Later in his life, Gödel probably suffered from Paranoia. He thought that some people would come and poison him in his food. So when his maid was no longer able to prepare his food, he stopped eating food. He probably died of starvation.
His theory in simple words.
To put his theories in simple terms: What he discovered was that some theorems in mathematics may be true, but they cannot be proved to be true.
Therefore, we found a contradiction. "This sentence is false" is a proposition that is called undecidable. We cannot say if it is true or false.

David Hilbert
science
David Hilbert (January 23, 1862, Wehlau, East Prussia–February 14, 1943, Göttingen, Germany) was a German mathematician. Most people think he was one of the most influential mathematicians of the 19th and early 20th centuries. He got his reputation as a great mathematician and scientist by inventing or developing a several ideas, such as invariant theory, the axiomization of geometry, and the notion of Hilbert space.This is one of the foundations of functional analysis. Hilbert and his students supplied significant portions of the mathematic infrastructure neded for quantum mechanics and general relativity. He is one of the founders of proof theory, mathematical logic. He was also one of the fist people to make the distinction between mathematics and metamathematics, and warmly defended Cantor's set theory and transfinite numbers. A famous example of his world leadership in mathematics is his 1900 presentation of a set of problems that set the course for much of the mathematical research of the 20th century.He also wrote a book in 1899 which then broght to new editions.

Sid Vicious
music
Sid Vicious (May 10, 1957 - February 2, 1979) was an English punk musician. His real name was "John Simon Ritchie-Beverly". He was a member of the band The Sex Pistols from February 1977 to January 1978, but played his instrument (the bass guitar) very badly. His bad behavior was more important to the band than playing his instrument well.
On October 22, 1978 his girlfriend Nancy Spungen was killed with a knife. It is still not clear if Sid Vicious killed her. Before he had to go to court, he killed himself by using drugs.

Lee Hsien Loong
politics
Lee Hsien Loong is the current prime minister of Singapore.

Charlotte Eagles
sports
The Charlotte Eagles are a soccer club that plays in Charlotte, North Carolina. The team's first season was 1993. They play in the 2nd Division of the United Soccer Leagues.

Carolina Panthers
sports
The Carolina Panthers are an American Football team in Charlotte, North Carolina that play in the National Football League. They played at Bank of America Stadium and played their first game in 1995.

Nicolaus Copernicus
science
Nicolaus Copernicus (Niklas Koppernigk, in Polish: "Mikołaj Kopernik", February 19, 1473 – May 24, 1543) was an astronomer. People know Copernicus for his ideas about the sun and the earth. His main idea was that our world is "heliocentric", from helios - sun. He wrote about his theory that the sun was in the middle of the solar system in his epochal book, "De revolutionibus orbium coelestium" (On the Revolutions of the Heavenly Spheres).
Copernicus was born in 1473 in the city of Thorn (Toruń), in Royal Prussia, a mainly German-speaking region that a few years earlier had become a part of the Kingdom of Poland. He was taught first in Cracow and then in Italy, where he graduated as lawyer of the church. He studied also medicine to serve his fellow clerics. Copernicus spent most of his life working and researching in Frauenburg (Frombork), Warmia, where he died in 1543.
Copernicus was one of the great polymaths of his age. He was a priest, mathematician, astronomer, doctor, jurist, physician, classical scholar, governor, administrator, diplomat, economist, and even lead soldiers. During all these jobs, he treated astronomy like a hobby. However, his formula of how the sun, rather than the earth, is at the center of the universe is thought to be one of the most important scientific hypotheses in history. Many people believe it was the beginning of modern astronomy.

Bob Geldof
music
Robert Frederick Xenon "Bob" Geldof, KBE (born 5 October 1954) is an Irish singer, songwriter, and political activist. Geldof was a member of the band the Boomtown Rats. He also helped to organise the Live Aid and Live 8 events, and to form the Band Aid charity group.
He has an honorary knighthood. Because he is not a British citizen, he should never be called "Sir" Geldof.

Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
politics
, also written Ahmadinezhad, (محمود احمدی‌نژاد in Persian; born October 28, 1956), is the sixth President of the Islamic Republic of Iran. He became president August 3, 2005.
Ahmadinejad became the mayor of Tehran, the capital of Iran, on May 3, 2003. He was chosen to be the president in elections on June 24, 2005. Many people think he is very religious. Because of that, the religious leadership in Iran supported him in many ways when he was elected.
Ahmadinajad's political power comes from the Alliance of Builders of Islamic Iran, also known as "Abadgaran". This is an alliance between Islamic parties and organizations.
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad has a Master of Science in Civil engineering from the Iran University of Science and Techology. He also has a PhD in transportation engineering from the same university.

Janet Jackson
music
Janet Damita Jo Jackson (born May 16, 1966, in Gary, Indiana) is an American pop singer, dancer, actress, and songwriter. She is the younger sister of Michael Jackson, and has had many popular songs such as "Nasty," "Rhythm Nation," and "That's The Way Love Goes."

Jamie Lynn Spears
music
Jamie Lynn Marie Spears (born April 4, 1991 in Kentwood, Louisiana) is an American actress and singer. She is the younger sister of pop singer Britney Spears. She plays the lead role in the television series "Zoey 101". In late December of 2007 it was revealed that Jamie Lynn is pregnant. Jamie Lynn had her baby, a girl, Maddie Briann Aldridge around 9:30 on June 19, 2008

Felix Mendelssohn
music
Felix Mendelssohn-Bartholdy (born Hamburg February 3 1809; died Leipzig November 4 1847) was a German composer. He was one of the great composers of the Romantic period. He loved the music of earlier composers like Bach, Handel and Mozart and he built on the traditions they had made. Mendelssohn was a child prodigy. He was already composing great music when he was a teenager. He wrote music for orchestra, chamber music and music for the piano and organ as well as music for singing. His violin concerto is one of the most popular concertos ever written and is played by all the famous violinists. Two of his tunes are known by almost everybody: the hymn tune "Hark the Herald Angels Sing", and the "Wedding March" which is played so often at the end of weddings.
His Life.
Mendelssohn’s family had plenty of money. They were also very interested in music, literature, painting etc. His grandfather Moses Mendelssohn was famous in German national literature. His father was a banker and his mother came from a family who owned a lot of factories in Berlin. The young Felix was educated at home by his parents. Although the family was Jewish his parents had Felix baptized and his father became a Christian a few years later. The Mendelssohn family added the name of Bartholdy to their name at this time.
Soon Felix was being taught by private tutors including Ludwig Berger who taught him the piano. He also learned music theory and composition. He played the piano at a concert when he was nine, and started to compose little plays with music (called a Singspiel in German). In 1821 he was taken to meet the famous writer Goethe in Weimar. It was to be the first of several visits and Goethe’s way of thinking and his works of German literature had a big influence on the young Mendelssohn. He composed several works at this time including Singspiels, symphonies and chamber music. He travelled with his father and met many famous musicians.
In 1825 the family moved to Berlin. They had regular concerts on Sunday mornings in their large house. Many rich and famous people were invited to their private concerts. In October 1825 he wrote a "String Octet" (a piece for eight string instruments) which is one of his best works. He studied the music of Johann Sebastian Bach (1685-1750) whose music people had almost forgotten. He found the music of Bach’s "St Matthew Passion" and conducted a performance of it in 1729. It was a famous performance in music history, because people suddenly realized how great Bach was. Bach’s music has never been forgotten again since then.
During the years 1829 to 1835 Mendelssohn travelled all over Europe. He visited London several times and he also performed Beethoven’s "Emperor Concerto" there. He travelled to Scotland where he sailed to Fingal’s Cave in the Hebrides. This inspired him to write the overture called "The Hebrides". When he was returning the coach had an accident and he hurt his knee. He stayed with the composer Thomas Attwood for some time before he could return to Berlin. Next he travelled to Italy where he wrote the "Italian Symphony". In Italy he met Berlioz and on his way back he met Chopin.
He spent some time in Düsseldorf where he performed several oratorios by Handel as well as his own music. In Frankfurt am Main he stayed with a family who had two daughters. He married one of them, Cécile Charlotte Sophia Jeanrenaud, in 1837. They had a happy marriage and had five children.
Felix and his young wife went to live in Leipzig where he became the conductor of the famous Leipzig Gewandhaus Orchestra. This was one of the highest musical jobs in Germany. He conducted a lot of music by 18th century composers who had been forgotten. He also gave the first performance of Schubert’s Symphony in C major which had been discovered by Schumann nine years after Schubert’s death. Mendelssohn got some of the most famous musicians to come to Leipzig and perform with the orchestra: Clara Schumann, Franz Liszt, Anton Rubinstein, the young violinist Joseph Joachim and the Swedish soprano Jenny Lind. Mendelssohn improved the playing of the orchestra, making them one of the best orchestras in the world. He also made sure that the players were paid well.
In the early 1840s Mendelssohn spent some time in Berlin. The new king, Friedrich Wilhelm III, King of Prussia, was very keen on music and had lots of ideas about new plans for concerts. He wanted Mendelssohn to be in charge of this. The king wanted to see Greek plays performed and Mendelssohn had to write incidental music for the performances of "Antigone".
In June 1842 Mendelssohn was twice received by Queen Victoria at her palace in London. Mendelssohn thanked the Queen by dedicating his "Scottish Symphony" to her. He continued to conduct in Leipzig and helped to make Berlioz’s music famous in Germany. He became director of the new Conservatoire in Leipzig. In Berlin the king asked him to provide incidental music for Shakespeare’s play " A Midsummer Night’s Dream ". He had already written some of this music 17 years earlier but now he finished it and performed it in 1843.
During his last years Mendelssohn suffered from bad health. He continued to work and travel as much as he could, but after a stroke in 1849 he died in Leipzig aged 38. His body was taken by a special train to Berlin where he was buried near the grave of his sister Fanny.
His Music.
Mendelssohn’s most famous works are his 5 symphonies (especially the "Scottish" and "Italian" symphonies), his concertos (especially his violin concerto), his overtures (especially "The Hebrides") and his Incidental Music to "A Midsummer Night’s Dream" which includes the famous "Wedding March". He wrote some very good chamber music: string quartets and piano trios and two very famous oratorios: "Elijah" and "St Paul". His piano music includes a large collection of short pieces called "Songs without Words" (German: "Lieder ohne Worte") which many pianists like to play. His organ music shows his love for J.S.Bach, often sounding more Baroque than Romantic. After his death Mendelssohn’s music became less popular for a time. This may have been because of the rise of anti-semitism in the mid-19th century, it may also have been because some musicians played Mendelssohn’s music in a rather sentimental way. But many great musicians saw his greatness and his music is well-loved today.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie, 1980; ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Giorgio Napolitano
politics
Giorgio Napolitano (born in Naples, Italy on June 29, 1925) is the 11th President of the Italian Republic.
He was elected on May 10, 2006 on the fourth ballot, with 543 votes out of 1009 (the required number was 505), but he took office as President only on May 15, 2006, after Carlo Azeglio Ciampi's time was finished.
He was voted mostly by the left-wing coalition led by Prime Minister Romano Prodi, head of the Italian Government.
Napolitano was preceded at his job by Carlo Azeglio Ciampi.

Niccolò Paganini
music
Niccolò Paganini was a Italian composer and violin player. He is believed to be one of the best violinists who ever lived. He was born October 27 1782 in Genoa, Italy and died May 27, 1840.
Paganini was the perfect virtuoso during his time although many other violinists slowly approach and some appear to be as virtuosic as him too. He was said to be a show off during his time and many wanted to challenge his violin skills. Paganini once broke all of the strings on his violin except the G-string and played a piece just on one string to show how good he was. He was the master of violin technique and invented many new techniques such as ricochet bowing, flying staccatos, left hand pizzicato etc. His 24 caprices are his most famous compositions. Paganini was good friends with Franz Liszt who was also an equally magnificent virtuoso, only that he played the piano. They both came together and composed the etude "La campanella", also known as "the clock" in English.* - Niccolò Paganini

Bolesław Prus
media
Bolesław Prus (pen name of Aleksander Głowacki; August 20, 1847 - May 19, 1912) was a Polish writer.
He was born in Hrubieszów and died in Warsaw. As a 15-year-old high-school student, he fought in Poland's January 1863 Uprising.
Prus is best know for his novels, "Lalka" (The Doll) and the historical novel "Faraon" (Pharaoh). He also wrote "Anielka," "Placówka" (The Outpost), "Emancypantki" (The New Woman), and many other stories and novels. He was an advocate of Positivist philosophy and social progressivism.
Prus is regarded as one of the greatest Polish writers, and one of the world's most prominent.

Lindsay Lohan
music
Lindsay Dee Lohan (born July 2, 1986) is an American actress and singer. She has acted in movies such as "Freaky Friday", "Parent Trap".
Career.
The movies "Freaky Friday", "Parent Trap" and "Mean Girls" made Lindsay popular in the United States. They also showed her talent in singing. She plays the guitar and has done many singing parts.
Music Career.
She first sang in the soundtrack of the movie "Confessions Of A Teenage Drama Queen".
In 2004, she released her first album named "Speak". In 2005, her second album, "A Little More Personal (RAW)" was released. Now, she is working on a new album with Ne-yo, Snoop Dogg, Timbaland. This album may be released at the middle or the end of 2008.

Herb Alpert
music
Herb Alpert (born March 31, 1935 in Los Angeles, California) is an American musician. He is known for his trumpet playing with his group, Tijuana Brass. He is also the co-founder and one of the heads of A&M Records (The "A" stands for Alpert, the "M" is Jerry Moss).

Lincoln Chafee
politics
Lincoln Davenport Chafee (born March 26, 1953) was a junior U.S. Senator from Rhode Island.
He was born in Providence, Rhode Island. Before he became Senator he was Mayor of Warwick (1993-1999). His father, John Chafee, was also a Senator from Rhode Island and member of the liberal wing of the Republican Party.
After his father was died in office Chafee was appointed to fill his vacancy. He was elected to his first full term in 2000.
He was probably the most liberal Republican Senator. He is strongly pro-choice, and supports gay rights and gun control. He was only Republican Senator in 2002 who voted against intervention in Iraq. In 2004 he didn't endorse the reelection bid of President George W. Bush, and urged other Republicans to write-in in the November election George H. W. Bush, not his son.
In January 2006 he was also the only Republican Senator to vote against Samuel Alito to the United States Supreme Court.
He was, however, defeated for reelection in 2006 by Democrat Sheldon Whitehouse.

Sascha Fischer
sports
Sascha Fischer (born 24 December 1970) is a German rugby player. He started with volleyball, then he began to play rugby for DSV 1878 Hannover (Niedersachsen, Germany). Right now he is playing in France as a pro for C.A. Périgueux-Dordogne. With his former team, C.S. Bourgoin-Jallieu, he took part at Heineken Cup. He is 6 feet, 8 inches tall (2.08 meters) and one of the tallest rugby players in Europe. He is a 27 time national player for Germany. He is a very aggressive player and with his height, he can overlook the whole rugby field.

Sheryl Crow
music
Sheryl Crow (February 11,1962) is an American singer and songwriter. She can also play guitar and bass guitar.
Many of her songs have reached high ranks and are still popular. Some of the most famous are "The First Cut Is the Deepest", "Soak Up the Sun", "If It Makes You Happy" and "All I Wanna Do".

Chubby Checker
music
Ernest Evans (born October 3, 1941) or Chubby Checker is a pop singer from the United States. He is most famous for his dance songs. His best-known song, "The Twist," was popular in the early 1960s.

Claude Debussy
music
Achille-Claude Debussy (born St Germain-en-Laye, August 22, 1862; died Paris, March 25, 1918) was a French composer. He is one of the most important composers of the early 20th century. Most of his compositions are for orchestra or for piano. He also wrote some songs, chamber music and one opera. He made his music very different from the Romantic style that other composers were using at the time. He is often called an Impressionistic composer because he was influenced by the group of painters called “Impressionists”. They were not so much interested in making their paintings look exactly like the real world, but preferred to paint things such as the effect of the sunlight shining on water. Debussy often did this in his music, which creates a special atmosphere.
Life.
Claude Debussy did not have an easy childhood. His father was a travelling salesman and his mother worked as a seamstress. He learned the piano when he was young and went to the Paris Conservatoire. For a time it seemed that he would become a concert pianist, but he did not do well enough in his examination. After winning an important prize, the Prix de Rome, he went to Rome for two years but he did not enjoy it. He visited Bayreuth in 1888 and 1889 to hear Wagner’s operas but he did not like them. He preferred sounds like that of the Javanese gamelan which he heard in Paris at the World Exhibition.
In 1899 he married a young woman named Lily Texier. He got a job as music critic of a journal called "La revue blanche". He wrote his opera "Pélleas et Mélisande" which was performed at the Opéra-Comique. It was extremely successful and was performed 100 times there during the next ten years. He wrote exciting music for orchestra: "Fêtes galantes" and a work called "La Mer" ("The Sea") which he worked at while staying in Brighton on the south coast of England. It is one of the most exciting pieces of music about the sea.
Debussy was now starting to become very famous. His personal life changed. He left his wife because he had fallen in love with Emma Bardac who was an amateur singer for whom Gabriel Fauré had written a song cycle "La Bonne Chanson". Her husband was a banker. She bought an apartment and Debussy lived with her there for the rest of his life. They had a daughter called Chou-Chou, born in 1905. They married in 1908.
Debussy’s next orchestral work was called "Images". He began composing a set of preludes for piano. Other works followed: "Khamma", "Le martyre de St Sébastian" and the ballet "Jeux", which was produced in 1913 by Dyagilev’s company. People soon forgot about this work because only two weeks later the same ballet company produced Stravinsky’s "Rite of Spring" which caused a riot.
By this time Debussy was already ill with cancer. His visit to London in 1914 was his last trip to another country. He wrote more piano works: a set of Études and a piano duet called "En blanc et noir" ("In black and white"). He planned to write six sonatas, each for a different group of instruments, but he only wrote three of them: one for cello and piano, one for flute, viola and harp and one for violin and piano. The "Sonata for violin and piano" (1917) was the last work he played in public (he played the piano part). He became very ill and died in 1918.
His music.
Debussy is often thought of together with Ravel, but really they composed in very different ways. Between 1892 and 1894 Debussy worked on a short orchestral piece called "Prélude à l'après-midi d'un faune". It is about a fawn waking up and seeing the world around him. It is based on a poem by Mallarmé, a poet who belonged to the group known as the Symbolists. It is a wonderful piece of music, but many people at the time did not understand it. Saint-Saëns, for example, did not understand the way that the musical ideas flowed gently into one another. He was always an enemy of Debussy.
There is a lot of variety in Debussy’s piano music.　Some of it is very difficult to play, e.g. the "Études" and pieces such as "L’isle joyeuse" ("The happy island"). Other collections are much simpler, e.g. "Suite bergamasque" which includes the very popular piece called "Clair de lune" ("Moonlight"). He wrote two books of preludes. Each of the pieces has a title, but the titles are printed at the end of each piece, as if he did not want the listener to know what it was about until afterwards.
Debussy wrote wonderfully for the voice, making the music just right for the rhythm of the French language. This can be heard in his songs and his opera. Using melodies and harmonies which are often quite simple he creates a special kind of dream-world which can be very powerful. He often uses the whole tone scale and the pentatonic scale which give the music a hazy feeling because it does not seem to be clearly in one particular key. He liked to use unusual chords just for their own sake, not in order to make them lead to a particular key. He also used the old scales known as the church modes.
Debussy’s music had a great influence on many composers in the 20th century. Cage, Messiaen, Boulez and Stockhausen all learned from listening to his music.

Chopper Read
music
Mark Brandon "Chopper" Read (born November 17, 1954) was an Australian mobster who during his career in the Melbourne mafia scene, was convicted of many crimes, for example; armed robbery, assault and kidnapping. Read retired from the life of crime and wrote a series of fiction books based on his life as a criminal. More recently he has begun making music.
Read started his criminal career as a child; robbing drug dealers as a teenager. During this time he was the leader of a gang. While in prison as an adult Read made a friend cut off his ears so he could leave prison where a gang wanted to have him killed. Read claims that he killed 19 people during his time as a criminal. His first book was written in 1991 while he was in prison. In 2000 a film called Chopper was made; about Read's life and based on his books, it starred Eric Bana as Chopper.

Cyprus Mail
media
Cyprus Mail is an English language newspaper based in Cyprus. It is made every day, except Monday. Some of it is on the internet.

Adult Swim
media
"Adult Swim" (also called [adult swim]) is a group of television shows for adults older than 17 that is shown on Cartoon Network. It began on September 2, 2001 and was created by Williams Street Studios. On March 28, 2005, Nielsen Media Research shows that Adult Swim is now separate from Cartoon Network (like Nickelodeon's Nick at Nite). Adult Swim is part of Turner Broadcasting System. It is known for showing mature, adult anime, or Japanese-style animation.

Aaliyah
music
Aaliyah Dana Haughton (better known as Aaliyah) (January 16, 1979 – August 25, 2001, in an airplane crash) was an American rhythm and blues singer and actor. Her parents moved with her to Detroit, Michigan when she was twenty years old. She was going to be in the new "The Matrix Reloaded" film, but the filmmakers had to use another person after she died.

Serj Tankian
music
Serj Tankian (born on August 21, 1967 in Beirut, Lebanon) is an Armenian-American musician who lives in Los Angeles. He was the lead vocalist of System of a Down. He is now a solo artist and he released an album, "Elect the Dead" in 2007.

Axl Rose
music
Axl Rose (Born February 6, 1962) is an American hard rock singer and songwriter. He was born William Bruce Rose, Jr. in Lafayette, Indiana, and grew up under the name William 'Bill' Bailey. He is most well known for being the lead singer for rock band Guns N' Roses.

Brian Eno
music
Brian Eno (born 15 May 1948) is a musician from England. He was one of the original members of the band Roxy Music. He makes music called electronic music, which is music made using computers and other electronic devices, like the synthesizer. Brian Eno has worked with other famous musicians and groups like David Bowie and U2.

John Adams (composer)
music
John Coolidge Adams is an American composer. He was born in 1947. His music is often very exciting, using minimalism with large orchestras and lots of different sounds.
He studied music at Harvard University. After he had graduated he packed all his belongings into his Volkswagen and drove all the way across the United States to California where he got a job as a fork-lift operator. Soon he became part of the musical scene of San Francisco. He listened to the music of minimalist composers like John Cage, Terry Riley and Morton Feldman. By the mid-1980s he was earning a living as composer and conductor. The piece that made him famous was called "Harmonium". At times the music is made to sound like a harmonium instrument, but the title also refers to "harmony", showing that he is writing tonal music unlike some modern composers at the time whose music was getting harder and harder to understand because it was not in any key.
Adams wrote several short pieces such as "Short Ride in a Fast Machine" and "The Chairman Dances". This last piece is music from his opera "Nixon in China" which was widely performed but made some people angry because the Chinese leaders Chou En-lai and Mao Tse-tung are shown as human beings who deserve a certain amount of sympathy.
Adam's Violin Concerto has been performed over 100 times by many of the world's famous violinists.

Ernest Rutherford
science
Ernest Rutherford, 1st Baron Rutherford of Nelson, OM, PC, FRS (August 30, 1871 – October 19, 1937) was a New Zealand physicist, who won a Nobel Prize for his work on nuclear physics, and for the theory of the structure of the atom.
Rutherford was one of the first researchers in nuclear physics, after the discovery of radiation by a French physicist by the name of Antoine Henri Becquerel in 1896. Rutherford discovered the three parts of radiation which he named Alpha, Beta, and Gamma. Rutherford also discovered that alpha particles were helium nuclei. Rutherford's study led to what we know today about the atomic structure, where the atom is a nucleus and electrons orbit around it.
In 1919, Rutherford made the world's first artifical nuclear reaction, where he put alpha particles with nitrogen gas and created particles of oxygen isotopes and protons. The important thing about the experiment was the fact that he changed nitrogen gas into oxygen gas.
Rutherford was the leader of the Cavendish Laboratory in Cambridge. He said that the nucleus was made up of protons and neutrons. In 1932 James Chadwick made an experiment at the Cavendish Lab that showed Rutherford was right.
See also.
he mistake was that he thought atom was the smallest thing iin hte world

Frédéric Chopin
music
Frédéric Chopin (February 22 or March 1 1810 - October 17 1849) was a Polish virtuoso pianist who composed some of the greatest piano music ever performed. He is the most important composer from Poland. Some of his music for the piano is very difficult to play, but it is admired as some of the most poetic music ever written. He planned to have a concert on New Year's day 1.1.1850 but he died before he could perform on his special day.
Chopin was born in the village of Żelazowa Wola, 60 km from Warsaw. His father Mikołaj (Nicolas) Chopin was French. He moved to Poland in 1787 where he married Tekla Justyna Krzyżanowska. They named their son Fryderyk Franciszek. Sometimes Chopin's date of birth is given as February 22 because this is what his birth paper says, but this was written by the priest at Chopin's christening eight weeks later and was probably a mistake. Chopin and his family always celebrated his birthday on March 1.
Chopin's musical ability was clear when he was very young, and newspapers in Warsaw described him as a "second Mozart". He was given private music lessons by several important musicians.
In 1829, Chopin heard the violinist Niccolò Paganini play, and met the pianist Johann Nepomuk Hummel. He also visited Vienna, where he played a couple of concerts. In December he performed his piano concerto in E minor. He first performed his other piano concerto, in F minor, in March 1830.
In 1830 he visited Vienna again, and when he heard of the troubles of the November Uprising back home he decided not to go back to Poland. He went to Paris instead, and made his home there. He started calling himself by the French version of his name, "Frédéric François". In Paris he made friends with some other important composers, including Hector Berlioz, Felix Mendelssohn, Charles-Valentin Alkan, and Vincenzo Bellini.
In 1836 Chopin was going to be married to a Polish girl called Maria Wodzinska. Her family did not like Chopin very much. Her mother made the couple keep their love secret, and finally stopped them from getting married. At about this time Chopin met the woman writer Amandine-Aurore-Lucile Dupin, the Baroness Dudevant, better known as George Sand. Eventually Chopin started a relationship with her that lasted until 1847. They visited Mallorca together in the winter of 1838-1839, where the bad weather and damp rooms made Chopin ill. He had breathing problems before, but this was so bad that they had to come home. He never got completely better.
In 1847 Chopin and Sand split up. In 1848 he visited England and Scotland to play in concerts, but he was very ill and had to return home. He died in Paris, at about 2 o'clock in the morning on October 17 1849, surrounded by loved ones.
Nearly all of the pieces of music written by Chopin are for the piano as the main instrument. He wrote piano sonatas (of which the "Funeral March" sonata is very famous), two piano concertos, studies, ballades, nocturnes, mazurkas, polonaises, waltzes, and a set of preludes. His music was praised in his lifetime. Robert Schumann once wrote about Chopin, "Hats off, gentlemen! A genius." Nowadays every skillful pianist has probably played some Chopin, and audiences really enjoy listening to it.

Mikhail Glinka
music
Mikhail Ivanovich Glinka (1804-1857) was a Russian composer, regarded as the first to become very famous.
Russia is a very large country. In the 18th century there was a lot of music in Europe, but Russian people had not yet heard it. A lot of them were very poor and modern transport did not exist. By the time Glinka was born Russian people in the large towns like Saint Petersburg were becoming very interested in European music.
Mikhail Glinka was born in a little village called Novospasskoye. His father was a rich landowner. Glinka was brought up by his grandmother who looked after him very carefully. She was always afraid he would be cold, so she wrapped him up in a fur coat in a room which was kept at 77°F. He was not often allowed to play in the fresh air. Later in his life Glinka was always worrying about his health.
It was a long way to the big cities from where the child lived. There was no radio in those days, and no CDs. The only music he heard was the church bells, and the singing of the peasants (the simple people who worked on the land). They sang folksongs and made up harmony underneath the tunes.
After his grandmother died he was allowed to travel 6 miles to his uncle’s home. His uncle had a group of musicians who played music by European composers like Haydn, Mozart and Beethoven. He had never heard such music before.
When he was 13 he went to school in St Petersburg. Now he could hear lots of music and meet some good musicians. He had piano lessons and spent a lot of time at parties. He started to compose some songs.
In 1830 he went to Italy. Italy was famous for its music, especially for opera. Glinka met famous composers like Mendelssohn and Berlioz as well as Italian composers like Donizetti and Bellini. He like their music, and decided he wanted to write opera as well, but he wanted to make his music sound very Russian.
Glinka went back to Russia. He wrote two great operas. The first one was called "Ivan Susanin". The story of the opera, set in 1612, is about a poor peasant Ivan Susanin who dies to save the life of the Tsar (the Tsar was the ruler of Russia, like a king or emperor). The Tsar liked the opera and thought that it should be called "A Life for the Tsar". It was a big success when it was first performed in 1836.
He soon wrote his second opera: "Ruslan and Lyudmila". The story comes from a tale by the famous Russian poet Pushkin. The man who wrote the words for him did it very quickly while he was drunk, so the story is a bit muddled, but the music is wonderful. It is a fairy tale about a nasty dwarf Chernomor who has taken away a princess called Lyudmila. In the end Ruslan, the hero, rescues her. Some of the music sounds quite oriental. The overture that starts the opera is very famous.
Glinka also wrote piano music, songs and chamber music.
Glinka’s music is important because he was the first Russian composer to write music that sounded Russian. Later composers like Tchaikovsky were influenced by his music.

Joseph Haydn
music
Joseph Haydn was an Austrian composer. He was born on March 31 or April 1 1732 and died on May 31 1809. He was one of the most famous composers in the Classical music period. He is often called the "Father of the Symphony".
Early years.
We do not know much detail about his life. Mozart, who lived at the same time, wrote lots of letters to his family so we know a lot about what he did and thought. The only letters of Haydn that we still have were business letters, so we do not know much detail about how he lived.
Haydn was born in 1732 in a small village called Rohrau in Austria near the border with Hungary. His father was a wheelwright (someone who makes wheels). His parents liked music and wanted their son to be musical, so they sent him to a boarding school several miles away when he was only six. Two years later the school was visited by a man called Georg von Reutter. He was travelling round the country looking for boys who could sing well because he wanted them for the choir of the cathedral (St Stephen’s) in Vienna. He was very impressed with Haydn and so young Joseph was taken to Vienna where he spent the rest of his childhood in the cathedral choir. He was taught music there and learned the harpsichord and violin. He does not seem to have been taught any music theory. Haydn had to teach himself how to compose.
Haydn’s treble voice broke when he was about 17 or 18 (boys’ voices broke much later in those days) so he had to leave school. For the next ten years he did not have much money. He lived in an attic room and gave music lessons to young pupils. He started to compose, writing short pieces for his pupils to play. He also played in bands and orchestras. It was probably in 1757 that he got a good job: he became music director for Count Karl von Morzin. He had to conduct the orchestra and write symphonies for them. Then, in 1761, he got a very good job as assistant Director of Music for Prince Esterhazy.
Years at Esterhazy.
Haydn spent 30 years working for Prince Esterhazy who was one of the most important princes in the Austrian Empire. A lot of princes and other noblemen kept orchestras at their palaces just to show off, but Prince Esterhazy really was musical and played an instrument called the baryton which looked a bit like a cello with lots of strings. In 1766 Haydn was made Kapellmeister (Director of Music).
Like all the other musicians at the prince’s court, Haydn was a servant and had to wear livery (uniform). In the winter the prince liked to be in his palace in Vienna, but in the summer he liked to go to his new palace in the country in what is now Hungary. Haydn had a busy job. He had to compose music whenever the prince wanted it. He had to conduct and organize the orchestra, play in small instrumental groups (chamber music) and even put on operas. These operas were often performed with puppets. Haydn was not really interested in writing music for puppet operas, but he had to do what he was told. His best pieces were his symphonies and string quartets.
Haydn wrote at least 104 symphonies. These are pieces of music for orchestra, usually with four movements. He also wrote lots of string quartets: pieces for two violins, viola and cello. Haydn is often known as the “Father of the Symphony”, and even “Father of the String Quartet”. He did not invent them, but he was the first really great composer who wrote them.
Many of his symphonies and string quartets have nicknames. Symphony no 45 is called the “Farewell Symphony”. The reason was that one autumn the musicians were fed up with being in the country palace and wanted to go back to Vienna. The prince wanted to stay on. So Haydn wrote a symphony in which, towards the end, the musicians stop playing one by one, blow out their candles, and walk off the stage. The prince took the hint, and ordered everyone to return to Vienna. Another symphony is called the “Surprise” symphony. Haydn was playing a trick on the people in the audience who often fell asleep during the music. The music is very quiet indeed, then suddenly there is a VERY LOUD CHORD!
One of his string quartets has a tune which became the Austrian national anthem.
Haydn married in 1760, but his wife did not like music. They never had children, and Haydn often felt lonely. He had a lady friend, a singer called Luigia Polzelli, and he often wrote to her when he was on his travels..
Around 1781 Haydn became friendly with Mozart. Mozart was 24 years younger than Haydn, but they learned a lot from one another. They often played string quartets together with two friends.
The London journeys.
In 1790, Prince Nikolaus died and his son became prince. His son was unmusical and a lot of the musicians lost their jobs. Haydn was put on a pension. This had a good side: he was free to travel whenever he wanted. He went to England and stayed in London where he wrote twelve symphonies during two visits. He was greatly admired by the British audiences.
Final years in Vienna.
Haydn nearly stayed in England to live, like Handel had done almost a century earlier. In the end he decided to retire to Vienna. There he spent his last years writing religious works for chorus and orchestra. He wrote "The Creation" and "The Seasons" which are both oratorios.
He died in 1809 while Vienna was being attacked by the French army under Napoleon.

Stairway to Heaven
music
Stairway to Heaven was a 1971 song by Led Zeppelin. In 1993 Rolf Harris released a cover version.

Arnold Rosé
sports
Arnold Josef Rosé (October 24, 1863–August 25, 1946) was a famous violinist. He was the leader (concertmaster) of the Vienna Philharmonic Orchestra for 50 years.
Arnold Rosé was born in Iaşi (Jassy) in what is now Romania. His family was Jewish. Their name at that time was Rosenblum. He had three brothers. All four boys were musical and so his parents decided to move to Vienna which was a big city in Austria where there was lots of music. Arnold’s father was a carriage builder. In those days people often travelled by horse and cart. His father made good quality carriages and he made plenty of money from his business.
When Arnold was seven he started music lessons. When he was ten he was good enough to study the violin at the Vienna Conservatorium which was a special school for musical pupils.
In 1881 he played a violin solo with a famous orchestra and famous conductor: the Vienna Philharmonic under Hans Richter. The piece he played was the Violin Concerto by Otto Goldmark. Soon he was offered the job of orchestral leader. This was a very important position for such a young man. He stayed in that job for 50 years!
Rosé did other things as well as playing with the orchestra. He gave violin lessons to talented pupils. He like to play string quartets and he got together with three other players to make up the Rosé String Quartet. They were very good and for more than half a century people said they were the best string quartet in Europe. Arnold’s brother Eduard was the cellist in the quartet. They played works by lots of composers, especially Haydn, Mozart and Ludwig van Beethoven. Rosé knew the composer Johannes Brahms and they played some of Brahms’s compositions when they had only just been written, e.g. the clarinet quintet (for clarinet and string quartet). The Rosé Quartet also knew the composer Schoenberg and helped him to get well-known by playing his music.
Another composer Rosé knew very well was Gustav Mahler. Mahler had two sisters. Arnold Rosé married one of them, and his brother Eduard married the other.
Arnold was kept very busy at his job as leader of the orchestra. The orchestra played in the concert hall as well as for the opera. At one special concert lots of flowers and plants had been brought in to the concert hall. The orchestra were busy playing when Arnold noticed people were looking at his shoes. He thought maybe he had an odd pair of shoes on. When he looked down at his feet he saw a mouse sitting there.
Arnold and his wife Justine had a son and a daughter who both became musicians. They had plenty of money to live quite comfortably. He was given the title of Royal and Imperial Court Musician, and he had a special court carriage to take him to the opera. He also had a carriage of his own with a footman in livery (uniform) to drive him about.
However, things changed in 1938. The Nazis took over Austria and made life very difficult for Jewish people. They were in great danger. In the autumn his wife died and Arnold had to save his life by going to England. He stayed there for most of his remaining years. He died in London.

Giovanni Gabrieli
music
Giovanni Gabrieli (born Venice,1557?; d. Venice 21 Aug.1612) was an Italian organist and composer. He was very famous in his day and composed a lot of church music. He was organist of the famous church of St Mark’s in Venice. He also wrote some fine madrigals. He lived at the end of the Renaissance period and the beginning of the Baroque.

Arcangelo Corelli
music
Arcangelo Corelli (b.Fusignano, Imola, 17 Feb.1653; d.Rome, 8 Jan.1713) was an Italian violinist and composer. He composed some of the most important Italian music of the Baroque period. He was also very famous as a player. Other violinists learned from his style of playing and developed the art of playing the violin. His works include sonatas and concerti grossi. Perhaps his most famous is the La Folia sonata for Violin.

Henry Purcell
music
Henry Purcell (born Westminster, London, 1659; died Westminster, November 21, 1695) was an English composer. Most musicians think he is the greatest English composer of all times. Although he only lived until he was 36 he wrote a very large amount of music. His compositions include church music, instrumental music, music for the theatre, even popular drinking songs. He wrote the first English opera. He lived in the time called the Baroque period. He liked Italian and French music, and combined those styles to make something that was typically English.
Early years.
We do not know very much about Purcell’s childhood. In 1664 his father died and Henry went to live with his uncle, Thomas Purcell, who was very kind to him. Thomas Purcell was a gentleman of the Chapel Royal which meant that he sang in the king’s choir. Soon Henry was singing in the Chapel Royal. This was the best musical training a boy could have in England. His teachers were Captain Henry Cooke, and then Pelham Humfrey. Henry sang in the choir until his voice broke in 1673. He was then given the job of looking after the king’s musical instruments.
Purcell may have been composing already when he was nine. We know that he wrote an ode for the King's birthday in 1670. When Humfrey died Purcell studied with the famous composer John Blow. He went to Westminster School. In 1676 he was made organist at Westminster Abbey. He started writing music for the theatre. He also wrote church music, including an anthem for a singer called John Gostling who had a very good, deep bass voice. Purcell wrote several anthems for him during his life. One is called "They that go down to the sea in ships". It goes down to a low D.
Later career and death.
In 1680, Blow, who had been made organist of Westminster Abbey in 1669, resigned so that the 22-year-old Purcell could have his job. Purcell then spent the next six years just writing sacred (religious) music. Later he went back to writing music for the theatre, including the first English opera "Dido and Aeneas".
In 1682 Purcell became organist of the Chapel Royal. He did this job as well as being organist at Westminster Abbey. His first printed composition, "Twelve Sonatas", was published in 1683. Music printing was expensive in those days, so it was unusual to have something printed. He continued to write music including odes to the king and royal family. In 1685, he wrote two of his finest anthems, "I was glad" and "My heart is inditing", for the coronation of King James II.
In 1687 he wrote more "theatre music." Sometimes this music was for masques (a kind of ballet with some singing as well), sometimes it was music for tragedies, e.g. plays by Dryden. In 1691, he wrote "King Arthur", also written by Dryden. In 1692, he composed songs and music for "The Fairy-Queen" (an adaptation of Shakespeare's "A Midsummer Night's Dream"). Purcell’s music for this was lost for many years, and was rediscovered and published in 1901. In these works the characters in the plays do not sing, they speak their lines.
Purcell's "Te Deum and Jubilate" was written for Saint Cecilia's Day, 1693, the first English "Te Deum" ever composed with orchestral accompaniment. He composed an anthem and two elegies for Queen Mary II's funeral.
Death.
He was very famous when he died in 1695, possibily from tuberculosis. His wife and three of his six children survived him.
Purcell is buried next to the organ in Westminster Abbey. His epitaph reads, "Here lyes Henry Purcell Esq., who left this life and is gone to that blessed place where only his harmony can be exceeded."
His music.
Purcell wrote a lot of music for the theatre. He was born one year before the time known in England as the “Restoration”. Before the Restoration Oliver Cromwell had been ruling England for nearly 20 years. Most music had been banned. People were therefore very glad to be able to make music again, and they wanted lots of songs and instrumental music in their plays. Opera, however, was not wanted. In Europe opera was very popular in countries such as Italy, Germany and France, but it did not become popular in England until Handel came to England in 1709 and introduced Italian opera.
"Dido and Aeneas" is an exception because it is a real opera: everything is sung, and the words are in English. It was written for a performance at a girls’ school. It is quite short, lasting just one hour. It contains the famous lament "When I am laid in earth" sung by Dido.
Purcell wrote a very large amount of music for the church. This includes anthems and service settings. Although he was an organist he wrote very little for organ. He wrote chamber music, including some very beautiful fantasias for viols.
Influence.
Although Purcell was recognized as a great composer at the time he did not have much influence on other composers after his death. He was the last in a line of great English musicians in the 16th and 17th centuries. After his death English music was not as important as it had been. In the 18th century the music heard in England was largely imported from the continent, e.g. Italian opera.
Much later, in the 20th century, English composers were often inspired by Purcell’s music. Benjamin Britten wrote a piece called "The Young Person's Guide to the Orchestra" which is based on a tune from Purcell's "Abdelazar". The aria "I know a bank" from Britten's opera "A Midsummer Night's Dream" is inspired by Purcell's aria "Sweeter than Roses". Sir Michael Tippett loved Purcell’s harmonies and rhythms and they influenced him in his compositions.

François Couperin
music
François Couperin (born in Paris on 10 November 1668; died in Paris, on 12 September 1733) was a French composer who lived in the Baroque period. Many of his relatives were composers. He is often called "François Couperin le Grand" (The Great) because he was the most famous of the Couperin family. He is best known today for his harpsichord music. He wrote several pieces which he called "Ordres" meaning the same as the word "suite" i.e. a collection of dance movements. Sometimes these movements have strange titles and we cannot always be sure what they mean. Some of them may have been nick-names of people he knew. He also wrote important organ music.He never did have a family of his own befor died.

Jan Ladislav Dussek
music
Jan Ladislav Dussek (b. Ĉáslav, Bohemia, 12 Feb.1760; d.Saint-Germain-en-Laye, 20 March 1812) was a Bohemian composer of the Classical period. He travelled a lot, living in Holland, Lithuania, Italy, France and England. He lived nearly twelve years in London where he was a fashionable teacher and famous composer. He is best remembered now for his piano music.

Johannes Brahms
music
Johannes Brahms (b.Hamburg, 7 May 1833; d. Vienna 3 April 1897) was a famous German composer. He started his career as a pianist. He was always very self-critical and destroyed any composition he thought was not really good. He thought that people were expecting him to be the “next Beethoven”, and spent many years on his first symphony before he allowed it to be performed. He wrote four symphonies, four concertos, a requiem, piano music, chamber music and songs. Perhaps his best known tune is his "Wiegenlied" ("cradle song"), often called "Brahms' Lullaby," used in many a child’s musical box.
Early years.
Brahms’s father was a double bass player in the Hamburg city orchestra. He probably gave the young boy his first music lessons. He soon was learning the piano with a teacher named Otto Cossel. When Brahms played in a public concert in 1843 an American agent asked him to tour America, but his teacher realized he was too young. He said that Johannes should study with Eduard Marxsen, a well-known teacher in Hamburg. By 1848 he was playing piano recitals. He also started to compose, and he sent some of his compositions to Robert Schumann to ask for his advice. Schumann sent the parcel back unopened.
At this time there were many Hungarian musicians in Hamburg. Brahms liked their folk music with its unusual rhythms, little triplet figures and sense of rubato. It was to influence his own style of composition. One of the Hungarians was called Remenyi. He played the violin and Brahms often accompanied him at concerts. They went on tour together and met famous people such as the composer Franz Liszt and the violinist Joseph Joachim who became a close friend of Brahms for many years. Joachim told Brahms to go and see Schumann and his wife Clara in Düsseldorf. Schumann liked Brahms and could see that he was going to be a great composer, so he wrote an article in his music journal about him. The article had the title: "Neue Bahnen" ("New Paths"). Schumann turned out to be correct: Brahms did become a famous composer and found “new paths” (new ways of composing).
Brahms remained a very close friend of Schumann. When Schumann had a nervous breakdown, Brahms went all the way to Düsseldorf to see him. Brahms soon fell in love with Clara who was 14 years older than himself. He continued to be in love with her after Robert Schumann’s death, and they had a close relationship, though Brahms became interested in other women and was briefly engaged. However, he never married.
Early career in Hamburg.
In 1859 Brahms settled in Hamburg. He founded a women’s chorus and wrote and arranged a lot of music for them. His "First Piano Concerto" was a great success in Hanover and Hamburg, but not in Leipzig, where a lot of people preferred the wildly Romantic music of Liszt which was quite different from Brahms’s style based on the Classical music style. Brahms decided to go to Vienna. He was to stay there for the rest of his life.
First years in Vienna.
In Vienna he soon made many friends who liked his music. For a short time he was director of a choir called the Vienna Singakademie, who sang some of his compositions. He met Wagner. Wagner was afraid that Brahms would start to write operas which would be more famous than his own. So Wagner wrote an article saying that Brahms was a very bad conductor. Wagner had made himself an enemy of Brahms, who never did write any operas anyway.
In 1870 Brahms became director of a concert series called Vienna Gesellschaftskonzerte. He became more and more famous as a composer, but he was never very good at conducting, and in 1875 a conductor called Hans Richter took over conducting the concerts. During these years he finished one of his greatest works: "Ein deutsches Requiem" ("A German Requiem"), as well as one of his most popular works: the "Variations on the St Anthony chorale" (sometimes wrongly known as "Variations on a Theme by Haydn)".
Years of fame.
At last, in 1876, he allowed his "First Symphony" to be performed. It was not very successful at first, but in Vienna the audience liked it. He started to compose a lot of his greatest works and received many honours from universities. In the winter he gave concerts and in the summer he spent his time composing. He wrote his last symphony ("Fourth Symphony") in 1885 and conducted it, going on tour with the orchestra through Germany and the Netherlands.
From 1889 Brahms spent each summer in Ischl where he had many friends. By 1890 he had decided to stop composing, although he did still write four beautiful works for clarinet after meeting the clarinettist Richard Mühlfeld. In 1896 he wrote "Four Serious Songs" which were probably inspired by the sad death of Clara Schumann. The next year Brahms died from cancer of the liver. His father had died of the same illness.
His music.
Brahms wrote a great deal of vocal music. The greatest of these works is the "German Requiem". There were many works for choirs, and a large collection of songs with piano accompaniment (Lieder). He wrote a lot of piano music which includes sonatas and many shorter pieces such as fantasias, rhapsodies, ballades, intermezzos, capriccios and romances. His chamber music includes string quartets, quintets and sextets and piano trios, quartets and a piano quintet. He wrote four symphonies and four concertos: two for piano, one for the violin and one for violin and cello (the "Double Concerto"). The "German Requiem" is his greatest vocal work.
Brahms was also very interested in old music and helped to edit music by François Couperin as well as the music of his friend Robert Schumann.

Frederick Delius
music
Frederick Delius (b.Bradford, 29 Jan.1862; d.Grez-sur-Loing, 10 June 1934) was an English composer. At first his parents did not let him study music, so he went off to Florida to work on an orange plantation. He later returned, studied music, and settled in France for the rest of his life. His music is often quite gentle and atmospheric, with chords that shift about in unusual ways. One of his best known orchestral works is "On Hearing the First Cuckoo in Spring". In his last years he was very ill, but he still wanted to compose, so he dictated the music he heard in his head to a man called Eric Fenby.

Béla Bartók
music
Béla Bartók (b. Nagyszentimiklós, Hungary, 25 March 1881; d. New York 26 Sept. 1945) was a famous Hungarian composer and pianist. He is one of the most important and original composers of the 20th century. He showed great talent as a pianist at an early age. He became very interested in folk music and travelled a lot in Hungary and other countries such as Romania, listening to the folk songs which the country people sang. He often used the style of these songs in his music. He is famous for his piano music, string quartets and several pieces for orchestra including one called "Concerto for Orchestra". Bartók’s harmonies and lively rhythms were sometimes quite new to classical music and some audiences found them difficult to understand at first.
Childhood and early years.
Béla Bartók was born in the small town of Nagyszentmiklós. In those days it was in the Austro-Hungarian Empire but today it is in Romania. When he was very small he showed great musical talent. His mother taught him to play the piano.
Béla was often ill when he was a child. When he was seven his father died and his mother took him and his sister to live in Nagyszőlős (today it is called Vinogradiv and is in the Ukraine), and then to Pozsony (today it is called Bratislava in Slovakia). There he gave his first public recital when he was eleven. He included some music which he had composed himself.
Early musical career.
Soon he was studying the piano with István Thoman who had studied with the famous Franz Liszt. He had lessons in composition from János Koessler at the Royal Academy of Music in Budapest. There he met the composer Zoltán Kodály, who was a great influence on him and who became a lifelong friend.
He soon started to compose longer pieces of music. He liked the music of Richard Strauss and Claude Debussy and these influenced his style of music. He started to be interested in folk music. This can be heard in the first of his six string quartets.
Bartók and Kodály travelled together into the countryside to collect and study old Hungarian folk melodies. People in those days thought that real Magyar (old Hungarian) folk music was Gypsy music. Bartók and Kodály showed that there were other traditions beside these. They found music which used pentatonic scales similar to those used in some parts of Asia. The two composers started to use these folk ideas in their own compositions. Kodály often quoted (copied) actual folk songs in his own music, while Bartók preferred to compose music which sounded like folksong without actually copying it.
Middle years and career.
In 1909, Bartók married Márta Ziegler. Their son, also named Béla, was born in 1910.
In 1911, Bartók wrote his only opera, "Bluebeard's Castle". There are only two singers in the opera: Bluebeard and his wife Judith. He also wrote a ballet called "The Wooden Prince". This started to make him famous abroad. Another ballet, "The Miraculous Mandarin", is even more famous today. It shows the influence of Igor Stravinsky, Arnold Schoenberg, as well as Richard Strauss. He wrote a lot of chamber music including a total of six string quartets, two violin sonatas and a "Sonata for Two Pianos and Percussion ". He wrote some pieces for smaller orchestras: "Divertimento for strings" and "Music for Strings, Percussion and Celesta".
Bartók divorced Márta in 1923, and married a piano student, Ditta Pásztory. His second son, Péter, was born in 1924.
World War II and later career.
When World War II broke out Bartók criticized the Nazis. After they came into power in Germany, he refused to give concerts there and did not use his German publisher. His political ideas gave him a great deal of trouble in Hungary.
Having first sent his manuscripts out of the country, Bartók felt he had to emigrate to the USA with Ditta Pásztory. They lived in New York City. Their son Péter joined them in 1942 and later joined the United States Navy. Bartók ‘s older son Béla stayed in Hungary.
Bartók did not feel comfortable in the USA, and found it very difficult to compose. He was also not very well known in America, and not many people were interested in his music. He and his wife Ditta gave concerts, and for a while, they were given some money to work on a collection of Yugoslav folk songs. They did not have very much money, although he had some friends who gave them enough to live on. Serge Koussevitsky asked him to write the " Concerto for Orchestra ". This soon became Bartók's most popular work, and brought him some money. He was also asked by Yehudi Menuhin to write a "Sonata for Solo Violin". This seemed to make him interested again in composing, and he went on to write his "Piano Concerto No. 3" and began work on his " Viola Concerto".
Bartók died in New York from leukemia on September 26 1945 aged 64. He left the Viola Concerto unfinished at his death; it was later finished by his pupil Tibor Serly.
Music.
Bartók’s music has many modern techniques such atonality, bitonality and modern harmonies. He often uses different kinds of scales (not just major and minor ones), and very complicated rhythms. A lot of these are inspired by the folk music he heard. He wrote a lot of piano music, including some easy pieces for people who are learning the piano. This includes a collection of pieces in six volumes called "Mikrokosmos" which are very popular with young musicians today.

Benjamin Britten
music
Benjamin Britten (born Lowestoft, 22 November 1913; died Aldeburgh, 4 December 1976) was probably the greatest English composer of his time. He came from East Anglia (a region in the south east of England) and he often thought about the East Anglian landscape and the sea when writing his music. He wrote a lot of music for his friend, the tenor Peter Pears. His operas include "Peter Grimes", "Billy Budd", "A Midsummer Night’s Dream", and "Death in Venice". His "War Requiem" was performed in Coventry Cathedral in 1962 after it had been rebuilt because the old cathedral had been destroyed in the war. He wrote music for children which sounds like proper, adult music. Britten started the Aldeburgh Festival. He was an excellent pianist and conductor.
Early years.
Britten started composing music at the age of five although he had no one to help him. When he was ten years old he took part in an amateur music festival in Norwich. A composer called Frank Bridge heard him and was so impressed that he offered to teach him composition. He helped Britten to compose using proper musical techniques. Britten started to get to know music by a lot of important modern composers including Schoenberg and Bartók. In 1930 he went to the Royal College of Music. He had excellent piano teachers but he did not learn much from his composition teacher John Ireland and most of the music he wrote was never performed. Britten was more interested in music from abroad than in English music. In 1934 he heard the opera "Wozzeck" by Alban Berg. He wanted to go to Austria to study with Berg but he was not allowed to. Meanwhile some of his first proper compositions started to be performed. He wrote some music for movies that were being made by the General Post Office, including one about a train delivering mail. The music describes the rhythm of the train rushing along.
USA.
While working on the movie music he met the writer W. H. Auden. He started to be interested in political ideas. These can be heard in some works he wrote at this time such as "Our Hunting Fathers" (1936) and "Ballad of Heroes" (1939). When Auden emigrated to the United States Britten followed him. With him was the tenor Peter Pears who was to become a lifelong friend and partner, and who was to be the inspiration for many songs and operas.
Britten wrote several compositions in the USA including "Sinfonia da Requiem" (1940) and his "First String Quartet" (1941). The following year he was reading about the poet John Crabbe who came from Suffolk, the same part of England where Britten had grown up. Britten suddenly became homesick. He realized that he could not work and be himself in a foreign country. So he returned with Pears to England.
Aldeburgh Festival.
As soon as he was on the boat sailing back to England he started work on "Ceremony of Carols". Back in England, Britten and Pears gave concerts to audiences of all kinds and took part in opera productions of Sadler’s Wells Opera Company, which was having a new theatre built. On the 7 June 1945 the new theatre was opened with a performance of Britten’s opera "Peter Grimes". This opera was to make Britten into the most famous English composer of his time. It was soon being performed abroad as well as in England.
Britten was now composing lots of music: songs, chamber music and a very popular piece called "Young Person’s Guide to the Orchestra" (also known as "Variations and Fugue on a Theme of Purcell"). This piece shows off each instrument of the orchestra in turn so that young people can get to know the sound of the musical instruments. It is based on a tune written by Henry Purcell 300 years ago. There were more popular works: St Nicolas and the Spring Symphony. There were not many opportunities for big operas to be performed, so he wrote some “chamber operas” which only needed small orchestras and a small number of singers. These were performed in places such as local churches by a group which called themselves English Opera Group. He wrote "The Rape of Lucretia" (1946) and "Albert Herring" (1947). In 1948 the group helped to start a music festival in Aldeburgh. Benjamin Britten spent the rest of his life mainly working on music which was to be performed at the Aldeburgh Festival. He composed some of his greatest works for the festival, and he took part in the performances as conductor and pianist.
The 1950s.
One of Britten’s most popular pieces of music for amateurs including children was "Noye’s Fludde" (1957). He wrote three “church parables”. His large operas include "Billy Budd" (1951) which was soon produced in Covent Garden. In June 1953 he wrote "Gloriana", an opera about Queen Elizabeth I, written for the coronation celebrations of Elizabeth II. When he travelled with Peter Pears to the Far East he was influenced by the music of Bali and he composed a ballet called "The Prince of the Pagodas", performed in Covent Garden in 1957. Another great work inspired by the East was the parable "Curlew River" (1964). The opera "A Midsummer Night’s Dream" was written for the Aldeburgh Festival in 1960. In 1962 he wrote the "War Requiem" to celebrate the new Coventry Cathedral. This is one of the greatest musical works of the 20th century.
His last years.
In 1961 he became friends with the great Russian cellist Mstislav Rostropovich. He composed a "Cello Sonata" and a "Cello Symphony" (1963) (a kind of cello concerto), as well as three suites for solo cello. He travelled with Pears to the Soviet Union.
In 1967 the Aldeburgh Festival had a new concert hall, the Maltings at Snape. His next opera was "Owen Wingrave" (1970)), written for television but soon produced in Covent Garden. In June 1973 Britten produced another great opera "Death in Venice". The main character, called Aschenbach, was perhaps the best music he ever wrote for Peter Pears. It was performed at the Aldeburgh Festival, but Britten was ill by this time and unable to be at the performance. His heart condition made it impossible to work on any more large works, but he still wrote some harp music for the harpist Ossian Ellis, a song called "Phaedra" for Janet Baker, and a "Third String Quartet". He died in Aldeburgh on 4 December 1976.
Britten received many honours both in Britain and in other countries. He became a Companion of Honour in 1952 a member of the Order of Merit in 1965 and, in the year he died, he was the first musician ever to receive a life peer (the title Lord Britten).
His music.
Britten’s early works were often written for instruments. His "Variations on a Theme of Frank Bridge" (1937) for string orchestra is a very popular work today. He often borrowed and reinvented themes by other composers (this is called “parody” technique). During his last years he again gave much attention to instrumental music, mainly chamber music.
After he met Peter Pears much of his music was vocal. This includes more than 100 songs, a number of operas, chamber operas as well as three works for tenor solo and orchestra: "Les Illuminations", the "Serenade for Tenor, Horn and Strings" and the "Nocturne". His songs are often grouped in cycles. He also wrote many folksong settings. These were very popular as encore pieces when he accompanied Peter Pears in song recitals.
Britten wrote music for choirs, including "Hymn to St Cecilia" (Britten was proud of having been born on St Cecilia’s day: 22 November). The "War Requiem" is his greatest work which combines writing for choir and orchestra. It describes the horrors of war (Britten had refused to fight in World War II).
He wrote a lot of work for children. There are even parts for children in some of his grand operas, e.g. "Peter Grimes", "Turn of the Screw" and "Owen Wingrave". He even wrote an opera in which all the main parts are sung by children: "The Little Sweep" (1949).
Many of his great operatic roles, from Peter Grimes to Aschenbach in "Death in Venice", deal with the theme of the outsider, the person who does not quite fit into society, or who is misunderstood. Britten’s gay character (which was something that was never discussed in his lifetime) may have something to do with this. He also knew what it was like to be an outsider when he tried to live in the United States, and his refusal to fight in the war may have distanced him from some people.
The Aldeburgh Festival at the Maltings in Snape (a village near Aldeburgh) continue to be a focus for Britten’s music. Every year the Brittens-Pears School of Music organizes lessons and performance opportunities for young musicians. A series of “Prom” concerts is held there every year in August.

Claudio Monteverdi
music
Claudio Monteverdi (b.Cremona, 1567; d.Venice November 29, 1643) was the most important composer of the early Baroque period. He lived at a time of great change in musical style. The first opera ever written was composed in 1597 by a composer called Caccini who is not remembered much nowadays. Just eleven years later Monteverdi wrote an opera "Orfeo" which was a really great work. Other important operas of his are "Il combattimento di Tancredi e Clorinda" and "Il ritorno d’Ulisse in patria". He wrote 9 books of madrigals. He also wrote a lot of church music including the "1610 Vespers". He was director of music at St Mark’s, Venice, which was the most important musical job in Italy.
Early life in Cremona.
Monteverdi was the son of an apothecary and a doctor. He was very talented as a young boy and was only 15 when he published his first pieces of music. In the introduction to this music he says that his music teacher was Marc’ Antonio Ingegneri, the maestro di cappella of Cremona cathedral. We cannot find anything that shows that he sang in the cathedral choir. He probably had private music lessons. He learned composition, singing and how to play string instruments such as the viol and viola da braccio. He got several compositions published in Venice. By the time he got his first job he had already published two books of madrigals.
Mantua.
His first job was working at the court of the Duke of Mantua. In Mantua there was a small band of excellent musicians. The musical director was the famous Giaches de Wert. Monteverdi got to know many famous poets, and there were famous singers at Ferrara which was not far away.
At first Monteverdi had a low-paid job. He married the daughter of one of the court musicians in the string band. Monteverdi soon became well-known. He sent several of his compositions to be performed at Ferrara, and he went with the duke to Hungary when his army was fighting the Turks.
The young Monteverdi was developing a new musical style. The old style was known as "prima pratica" (“first practice”) and the new style was called the "seconda pratica" (“second practice”). The "prima pratica" continued to be used for church music. In this style of writing the music was thought to be more important than the words. This meant that the music could be very contrapuntal, with several things going on at once so that the words could not be clearly heard. However, in the "seconda pratica" the words were more important than the music, i.e. it was important to be able to hear all the words clearly, and the music had to be simple enough for this to happen. This was particularly important in opera and in madrigals.
There were a lot of arguments among musicians about these two styles of composition, and this is perhaps the reason why there was a gap of 11 years between Monteverdi’s 3rd and his 4th book of madrigals. His opera "Orfeo" (1608) was performed at least twice at court, and several times at Salzburg. Monteverdi was becoming famous all over Europe.
Monteverdi went back to Cremona. Sadly, his wife died, leaving him with their three small children. It was a terribly tragedy for Monteverdi, and he did not want to go back to Mantua, but the Duke wrote to him telling him he must come back to provide music for the wedding of Prince Francesco Gonzaga and Margharita of Savoy.
Monteverdi returned to Mantua, where he composed his opera "Arianna". The performance was a great success, and the audience were moved to tears by the music Arianna’s lament. Sadly, this song is the only part of the opera that has not been lost.
Although Monteverdi’s fame was increasing, there were a lot of arguments with his employer. Eventually he found another job, this time as a church musician, in the biggest church in Venice. Monteverdi had a difficult journey from Mantua to Venice. The passengers were robbed by highwaymen on the way. He arrived in Venice in October 1613.
Venice.
The job of maestro (director of music) at San Marco (Saint Mark’s church) in Venice was perhaps the most important job for a church musician in the whole of Europe. However, the music was in a bad state because previous directors of music had not been very good. Monteverdi started to reorganize the music there: he bought new music for the library and got some new musicians. He had to compose music for many special feast days during the year. He was doing a good job, and in 1616 his salary was increased to 400 ducats. The duke of Mantua was probably cross that he had lost such a good musician. He still asked Monteverdi to write music for him. Monteverdi probably had to obey, as he was still a Mantuan citizen (Italy did not become one country until more than two centuries later). He wrote music for important events such as weddings and carnivals at Mantua.
By 1619 Monteverdi had published his seventh book of madrigals. However, he then started to publish less music. Perhaps it was because he was so busy, or perhaps because he no longer needed to look for fame. He probably wrote a lot of church music which is now lost.
During the 1620s continued his work in Venice, although he may have tried to get other jobs. His hobbies include alchemy. He welcomed the composer Heinrich Schütz who visited Venice for a second time. After the Duke of Mantua died in 1626 Monteverdi wrote less music for Mantua. He was supposed to receive an annual salary from them, but he often did not get it. There was a war in Mantua, a lot of buildings were destroyed and the invading armies brought the plague. Monteverdi became a priest in 1632. It is not clear whether he did this because he really was religious or whether he thought it would help his career.
In 1637 public opera was started in Venice. Monteverdi, who was now in his 70s, wrote operas for Venice. "Il ritorno d'Ulisse in patria" (1640) and "L'incoronazione di Poppea" (1642) form a brilliant end to his career. After the performance of this opera he made a six-month trip to Lombard and Mantua, where again he had to argue at the court about not being paid his pension. After he returned to Venice he was ill for nine days and then died.

San Jose Earthquakes
sports
The San Jose Earthquakes are an American soccer team that plays in Major League Soccer in San Jose, California. In December 2005, they moved to Houston, Texas to become the Houston Dynamo. Failure to secure funding for a new stadium caused the team to move. In July 2007, they were granted an expansion team, which would bring them back in 2008. From 1996 to 1999 they were known as the San Jose Clash.

Los Angeles Galaxy
sports
The Los Angeles Galaxy are an American soccer team that plays in Major League Soccer in Carson, California. They share their home with CD Chivas USA.
Currently signed David Beckham from Real Madrid to play in Los Angeles June 2007.

Real Salt Lake
sports
Real Salt Lake is an American soccer team. They play in Major League Soccer in Salt Lake City, Utah. They began playing in 2005. Their head coach is Jason Kreis.

Tampa Bay Mutiny
sports
The Tampa Bay Mutiny were an American soccer team that played in Major League Soccer from 1996 to 2001. They played in Tampa, Florida. They're stadium when disbanded was Raymond James Stadium.

Heinrich Schütz
music
Heinrich Schütz (born Köstritz, Saxony, 8 October 1585; died Dresden, Germany, 6 November 1672) was the greatest German composer of his time. As a young man he travelled to Italy to learn the art of composition from the great Italian composers. He had lessons from Giovanni Gabrieli. When Gabrieli died in 1612 Schütz returned to Germany. He visited Italy a second time in 1628 to learn from the music of Claudio Monteverdi. He also visited Copenhagen. For much of his life he was a court composer at the Electoral Chapel in Dresden. Most of his work consists of choral works especially motets and madrigals. He was very good at writing counterpoint and his music has some very striking effects. His "Christmas Oratorio " is particularly famous.

Domenico Scarlatti
music
Domenico Scarlatti (born Naples, Italy, 26 October 1685; died Madrid, Spain 23 July 1757) was an Italian composer and harpsichordist. His father Alessandro was a famous composer who wrote many operas. Domenico became famous for his sonatas for harpsichord. He wrote over 550 of them. They are mostly quite short pieces in one movement, most written in an early Classical style, which influenced many future Classical composers. He had some unusual effects in his music such as the crossing of hands as they leap wildly from one end of the keyboard to another. He also liked crunchy chords which sound like the strumming of Spanish guitars. He gave harpsichord lessons to the Infanta Maria Barbara at the Royal Court in Lisbon in Portugal. When she married she took Scarlatti, her harpsichord teacher, with her to Madrid in Spain where he spent the rest of his life.

Wilhelm Friedemann Bach
music
Wilhelm Friedemann Bach (born Weimar 22 November 1710 – died Berlin 1 July 1784) was a famous German composer and organist.
He was the son of Johann Sebastian Bach, but he was far different, especially his habits, which people didn't like.
When he was small his famous father taught him to play the harpsichord and organ. Johann Sebastian wrote some pieces for his son to play, and put them in a book called "Notebook for Wilhelm Friedemann Bach". The first ones are very easy, but they soon become very hard. This must mean that the young boy made very fast progress. He had a lot of talent which he did not use. He was a very good improviser, but was careless when playing music by other composers, including his father's.
In 1733, he was organist of St. Sophia's Church at Dresden, and in 1746 became organist of the Liebfrauenkirche at Halle. In 1764, after arguing with a lot of people, he left the job in Halle, remaining unemployed and living a life of poverty until his death.
Sadly for us, Wilhelm Friedemann Bach owned a lot of music which his great father had written. Unfortunately he seems to have lost it. So a lot of great music has been lost to the world.

David Beckham
sports
David Beckham is an English football player. He was born May 2, 1975.
History.
He grew up in London youth system along with Ryan Giggs, Nicky Butt, Phil Neville,Gary Neville and Paul Scholes. Since his move from Manchester United to Real Madrid, Spain in 2003, he has been the highest paid footballer in the world.
England.
He played for England for 11 years. He has recently been dropped from the England team after giving up his England captaincy. But regained his place in the England squad towards the end of last season.
Manchester United.
From 1993 through 2003, he played for Manchester United in England.
Real Madrid.
After leaving Manchester United, he signed a four-year contract with Real Madrid which ended in June, 2007.
Los Angeles Galaxy.
He currently plays for the Los Angeles Galaxy in Major League Soccer.
Personal life.
David Beckham's wife is Victoria Beckham. She is a famous singer. Some people call her Posh Spice because she is from the Spice Girls. Beckham also has three sons.

Viggo Mortensen
music
Viggo Peter Mortensen, Jr. (born October 20, 1958, in New York City) is an American theater and movie actor, poet, musician, photographer and painter. He is best known for his role as Aragorn in Peter Jackson's "Lord of the Rings" movie trilogy.

Luigi Boccherini
music
Luigi Boccherini (born in Lucca, 19 February 1743; died Madrid, 28 May 1805) is an Italian cellist and composer. As a boy he showed great talent and was sent to Rome to study music. When he returned to Lucca he entered the theatre orchestra and the town band. He travelled a lot, visiting France, Spain, and Germany. In Berlin he was offered the job of chamber composer to the King of Prussia. He took the job, but had to promise only to work for the king, and no one else. When the king died he found himself without a job, so he went back to Madrid. There he found work at times, but a lot of the time he was very poor.
Boccherini is famous for his chamber music. He wrote more than 100 quintets for 2 violins, viola and 2 cellos. He also wrote 4 cello concertos.
Boccherini is sometimes nicknamed "Haydn’s wife" because his music sounds similar to that of Haydn. They may have known one another, but we cannot be sure.

George Frideric Handel
music
George Frideric Handel (German: Georg Friedrich Händel) (b. Halle, Germany, 23 February 1685; died London, England, 14 April 1759) was a German composer who went to live in England when he was a young man and later became a naturalised Briton. Johann Sebastian Bach and Handel were born in the same year. They were the greatest composers of their time, yet they never met. Handel changed his name to George Frideric Handel when he became British - this removed the dots above the "a" and changed the spelling other his first two names. The German spelling of his name (Georg Friedrich Händel) is still used by German writers.
Although they were both living in the late Baroque period, Bach and Handel’s music developed differently. Handel wrote lots of operas and oratorios and therefore became very famous. He travelled a lot, including to Italy where he learned a lot about composition. Bach always stayed in central Germany, and most of the time he was a church musician who was not well-known by the general public.
Handel wrote over 40 operas. Later he wrote oratorios. His most famous oratorio is the "Messiah". He wrote anthems, chamber music and orchestral music including "the Water Music" and "Music for the Royal Fireworks".
Early years.
Handel was born in Halle in the northeast of Germany, in today's Saxony-Anhalt. His father was a barber and a surgeon. He started playing the harpsichord and the organ when he was very young. He was given a clavichord when he was seven and he used to practice it in the attic where his father could not hear him. At the age of nine he was already composing. He had a teacher called Friedrich Wilhelm Zachau who was the organist of the big church, the Liebfrauenkirche, in Halle. He learned the organ, harpsichord and violin as well as composition, harmony.
Handel’s father did not want him to study music: he wanted him to be a lawyer. So in 1702 he began the study of law at the University of Halle, but the next year his father died, and he stopped studying law. He became organist at the Protestant Cathedral in Halle. The next year he moved to Hamburg where he got a job as violinist and harpsichordist in the orchestra of the opera-house. Here his first two operas, "Almira" and "Nero", were produced early in 1705. Two other early operas, "Daphne" and "Florindo", were produced at Hamburg in 1708.
Handel was becoming a good opera composer, but he wanted to learn more, so he went to Italy in 1706. He spent three years there. His opera "Rodrigo" was produced in Florence in 1707, and his "Agrippina" at Venice in 1709. "Agrippina" was very popular and had 27 performances. It made Handel famous. He also had two oratorios produced in Rome. He wrote sacred music (church music) and other pieces in an operatic style, e.g. "Dixit Dominus" (1707).
Move to England.
In 1710 Handel became "Kapellmeister" to George, Elector of Hanover, who would soon be King George I of Great Britain. The Elector agreed that Handel could have an immediate leave of 12 months so that he could go to London. He visited London for eight months. His opera "Rinaldo" was performed in 1711. It was the first time an Italian opera had been performed in England. It was an immediate success. Handel returned to Hanover in the summer of 1711 and spent a year writing chamber and orchestral music because there was no opera in Hanover. He was also trying to learn English. In 1712 the Elector allowed him to make another visit to England. In England he had patrons (rich people who gave him money). He had a yearly income of £200 from Queen Anne (while Bach earned only eighty in a year). He was having a lot of success, so he stayed in England instead of going back to his job in Hanover.
In 1714 Queen Anne died and the Elector of Hanover became King of Great Britain. Handel might have been in trouble. According to one story the King forgave Handel because he wrote some lovely music called "Water Music" which was performed on a boat on the Thames at a royal water party. This story about the king forgiving Handel is probably not true. George would have known that Queen Anne was about to die and he would become King of Great Britain and therefore Handel’s master again. In fact, the new king doubled Handel’s salary. A few years later his salary increased again when he taught music to Queen Caroline’s daughters.
In 1723 Handel moved into a newly built house in 25 Brook Street, London, which he rented until his death in 1759, 36 years later. The house is now called Handel House Museum and is open to the public. It was here that Handel composed some of his most famous music such as "Messiah", "Zadok the Priest", and "Fireworks Music".
In 1726 Handel's opera "Scipio" (Scipione) was performed for the first time. The march from this work is now the regimental slow march of the British Grenadier Guards. In the next year he took on British nationality.
In 1727 Handel was commissioned to write four anthems for the coronation ceremony of King George II. One of these, "Zadok the Priest", has been sung at every coronation ceremony since.
Handel spent most of his time working on operas. From 1720-1728 he was director of the Royal Academy of Music. This was an organisation that put on opera performances. It had nothing to do with the academy which is called the Royal Academy of Music today where young students study music. Handel also worked in the management of the King's Theatre and many of his operas were performed in the Royal Opera House at Covent Garden. He sometimes travelled to Italy to find new Italian singers and persuade them to come to London. London became world famous for operas. In spite of everything Handel was doing for opera he had many enemies as well as friends. There was a lot of rivalry, especially with a composer called Bononcini whose music is forgotten today. Handel gave up operatic management in 1740, after he had lost a lot of money in the business.
Later years.
In April 1737, age 52, he had a stroke. It was probably this which left his right arm paralysed for a while so that he could not perform, but he made an excellent recovery after six weeks at a health spa in Aix-la-Chapelle. At this time he started to write oratorios instead of operas. In 1742 his oratorio "Messiah" was first performed in Dublin. Surprisingly, it was not successful in London until 1750 when it was performed in aid of the Foundling Hospital Chapel. Handel performed it every year there, which brought the hospital about £600 for each performance. Handel spent most of his time in these later years composing and producing oratorios. "Judas Maccabaeus" was particularly popular. The singers for these oratorios were English and Italian. They were not world-famous virtuosos but singers whom Handel had trained himself.
In August, 1750, on a journey back from Germany to London, Handel was seriously injured when his carriage overturned. In 1751 he started to lose his eyesight. He died, in 1759, in London. The last concert he went to was his own "Messiah". More than 3,000 mourners went to his funeral. He was buried with full state honours in Westminster Abbey. Handel never married, and kept his personal life very private. He left £20,000 which was a lot of money for those days. His niece inherited most of his money. He also left some of it to friends, servants, relations and charities. His autographs (the original copies of the music that he wrote) are now mostly in the British Museum.
His name.
Handel adopted the spelling "George Frideric Handel" on his naturalization as a British subject, and this spelling is generally used in English speaking countries. The original form of his name (Georg Friedrich Händel) is usually called in Germany, but he is known as "Haendel" in France. There was another composer with a similar name, Handl, who was a Slovene and is more commonly known as Jacobus Gallus. This can be very hard for cataloguers (people trying to make a list of his music)

Richard Wagner
music
Richard Wagner (b.Leipzig, May 22 1813; d.Venice February 13 1883) was a German opera composer. He was the most important opera composer in Germany during the Romantic period. Apart from some music that he wrote as a student he wrote ten operas which are all performed regularly in opera houses today. Most of his operas are about stories from German mythology. He always wrote the words himself. He changed people’s ideas of what operas should be like. He thought that the drama (the story that is being told with all its tensions) was very important, and he chose the singers for his operas himself, so that he could train them into his way of thinking. The music in his operas did not give the audience a chance to applaud after big solos as it had done in the 18th century: it continues throughout the whole act. He made his music tell the story by using what he called “leitmotifs”. These were melodies or short musical phrases which belonged to particular characters in the opera, or to particular ideas. He had more influence on other composers than anybody else in his time, largely because of his harmonies which became more and more chromatic (using lots of sharps and flats, changing key a lot of the time. He built an opera house to his own design in the German town of Bayreuth. Nearly all musicians in Europe tried to make a journey to Bayreuth to hear Wagner’s music. The Wagner festival still takes place every year there.
Early years.
Wagner’s family were all involved in working for the theatre. He was not very interested in school work, and taught himself the piano and composition. He liked reading the plays by Shakespeare, Goethe and Schiller.
He studied at the University of Leipzig, although he was not allowed to be a full student because he did not have proper school qualifications. Although he lived a wild life he worked hard at his music. He studied the scores of Beethoven’s string quartets and symphonies and he wrote his own symphony which was performed in 1833 at the famous Leipzig Gewandhaus. He wrote his first opera, "Die Feen" ("The Fairies") in Würzburg. He became the conductor of a travelling opera group and fell in love with one of the singers called Minna Planer and he married her in 1836. His second opera, "Das Liebesverbot", based on Shakespeare’s play "Measure for Measure" was a failure.
Wagner always liked spending money, and he soon found he owed money to a lot of people, so he went away to Paris where he lived for three years. He was not successful at all there, none of the French musicians showed any interest in him and he was very poor. He still managed to write an opera "Rienzi" in 1841, and this was soon followed by "Der Fliegende Holländer", ("The Flying Dutchman"), which still remains a favourite to opera lovers today. It was first performed in Dresden in 1843. The audience did not like it much because they were used to operas like "Rienzi" which were written in the old way. Wagner was given the job of court opera composer in Dresden. He stayed there until 1849. During that time he worked very hard to make opera performances better, improve the orchestra and train the singers. In 1845 he wrote another great opera, "Tannhäuser". People gradually started to understand the way that Wagner’s music was telling the drama of the story. After this all his operas were great successes, although there always remained some people who hated his music, e.g. the music critic Eduard Hanslick.
Years in exile.
In 1848 he finished working on "Lohengrin" but it was not performed because he was supporting the revolution, joining in the demonstrations. Although he did not take part in the fighting he was going to be arrested, so Franz Liszt helped him to escape to Switzerland. He lived in Zürich until 1858. There he wrote about music, conducted, and read stories from the Norse mythologies. He was starting to think about writing operas about these stories. It was something that would take him over 25 years to complete. They were to become the four operas known as "Der Ring des Nibelungen" ("The Ring of the Nibelung") which, together, tell one long story. The four operas which make up this famous Ring cycle are "Das Rheingold" (The Rhinegold), "Die Walküre" ("The Valkyrie"), "Siegfried" and "Götterdämmerung" ("Twilight of the Gods"). Because of the political situation in Germany at the time, Wagner expected the rise of a socialist state. The operas in the Ring cycle were a new kind of music drama (which Wagner simply called “drama”). These operas can be seen as describing a new kind of world in which humans are free. The music used the idea of leitmotif (in English: “leading motive”), where musical ideas represent characters or emotions, and help the development and understanding of the story.
By 1857 Wagner had written the first two operas as well as Acts One and Two of "Siegfried". However, the third Act of "Siegfried" was not written until many years later, because he could see that at that time there was no suitable opera house to have these operas performed. He fell in love with a woman called Mathilde Wesendonk, whose husband was very rich. This affair led to a separation with his wife, Minna. He wrote an opera about an unhappy love affair: "Tristan und Isolde" ("Tristan and Isolde").
Mid career.
In 1861 the political situation in Germany had changed and he was allowed to return. In Vienna he heard his opera "Lohengrin" for the first time. He travelled about a lot, conducting in many cities, and waiting for the right time and place to have "Tristan und Isolde" performed. There were lots of new ideas in this opera, especially in the harmony. There is a famous chord at the beginning which is now called the "Tristan chord". Wagner’s new harmonies were gradually to change the way composers all over Europe thought about music.
Meanwhile he wrote another opera: "Die Meistersinger von Nürnberg" ("The Mastersingers of Nűrnberg"). It is different to his other operas because it is a comedy.
It is set in medieval Germany and is about a song contest.
By 1864 Wagner had spent so much money that he was in debt once more and he fled to Stuttgart to avoid being put into prison (Germany at that time was still made up of lots of small countries, each with their own laws). Then he had a big stroke of luck. The new king of Bavaria, Ludwig II, who was only 18 years old, adored the music of Wagner. He had read the poem about the Ring of the Nibelungs (Wagner had written the words, but had not finished the music). King Ludwig invited Wagner to finish the Ring cycle for performances in Munich. He gave him somewhere to live, and his new operas were performed in Munich: "Tristan und Isolde" in 1865, "Die Meistersinger von Nűrnberg" in 1868, "Das Rheingold" in 1869 and "Die Walkűre" in 1870. There were plans for a new opera house in Munich, but it was never built because a lot of people were angry with Wagner for being in debt in spite of having lots of money from the king. Another thing people did not like was that he fell in love with the wife of the man who had conducted his operas, Hans von Bűlow. Her name was Cosima. Her father was the composer Franz Liszt who had not been married to Cosima’s mother. Wagner had already left Munich in 1865, but the king still supported him, making it possible for him to live in a large house called Triebschen on Lake Lucerne. Cosima divorced von Bülow in 1870 and married Wagner in the same year.
Bayreuth and Wahnfried.
By now Wagner was working hard at the Ring cycle again. He had promised the king that the four operas would be performed in Munich when they were ready, but he realized that they would need a special kind of opera house. So he designed his own opera house and had it built in the town of Bayreuth. He spent a lot of time travelling and conducting in order to raise money for this huge project. The King Ludwig also gave him a lot of money, and a lovely new house in Bayreuth which Wagner called "Wahnfried" (the name of the house means something like: "Peace from the mad world"). Finally, the complete cycle of four operas was performed in August 1876 in the new opera house, the (Bayreuth Festspielhaus). The third and fourth operas of the cycle, "Siegfried" and "Götterdämmerung " were being performed for the first time.
Wagner spent the rest of his life living in "Wahnfried". Sometimes he travelled. He went to London and made several trips to Italy. He wrote his last opera, "Parsifal", which almost has a religious feeling to it. The story is related to the legends about King Arthur and the Holy Grail. Wagner dictated his memoirs to his wife. His autobiography is called "Mein Leben" ("My Life"). He died of heart failure when he was staying in Venice. He was buried in the grounds of "Wahnfried".
Wagner’s reputation.
Wagner had enormous influence on the development of music. Many composers imitated his harmonies, or let themselves be influenced by them. By the early 20th century some composers like Arnold Schoenberg had gone even further in making more and more complicated harmonies, and composers had to find new ways of composing.
Wagner made his orchestras much bigger than usual. The woodwind, for example, need four of each instrument (four flutes, four oboes etc), and there are extra instruments like the bass clarinet and Wagner tubas. His ideas about music drama were very important. His music helps the drama to be told because it develops all the time, like the music in a symphony.
When Hitler came to power in the 1930s he liked Wagner’s music and thought that it was something typically German. Wagner’s ideas in "Die Meistersinger von Nűrnberg" about German art suited Hitler’s thoughts. After the war, the music was thought of as being something of the Nazis. Wagner wrote some things that were anti-Jewish. Wagner's music is therefore played very rarely in Israel. Daniel Barenboim recently made people in Israel angry by conducting Wagner’s music at a Jerusalem festival.

Georg Philipp Telemann
music
Georg Philipp Telemann (born March 14, 1681 in Magdeburg; died June 25, 1767, Hamburg) was a German baroque composer. He wrote over 601 pieces of music, many of which were published. As publishing cost much money at that time, this was quite unusual. He mostly taught himself musically and knew how to play 10 instruments. During his life people thought he was one of the greatest composers. He also wrote lots of church music, most of which is not common today.

Romantic music
music
Romantic music is music written in the 19th century. This was the period called the “Romantic period” by musicians. In literature and some other arts the “Romantic period” is often said to begin and finish earlier: around mid 18th to mid 19th century.
In the Classical period artists liked to see clear forms. 18th century architecture nearly always shows a lot of symmetry. The gardens of the palace at Versailles are a good example of this with their very tidy patterns of straight paths, circular ponds and neatly clipped hedges.
In music the Classical composers such as Haydn, Mozart and Beethoven liked to compose music which had a clear plan like sonata form.
In the Romantic period artists thought that feeling and passions were more important than formal plans. This can be seen in the gardens designed by Capability Brown, e.g. in at Blenheim Palace, Oxford. The gardens are made to blend into the nature.
In music the Romantic composers may still use plans like sonata form, but feelings and passions are important. They often write what is called programme music which means: music that describes something or tells a story. Beethoven’s Sixth Symphony is called the “Pastoral” which means that it is about the countryside. Although Beethoven is usually called a composer of the Classical period he is also an early Romantic. Later composers such as Felix Mendelssohn wrote pieces like "Hebrides Overture" which describes the sea coming into Fingal’s Cave in the Hebrides Islands in Scotland. Hector Berlioz (1803-1869) wrote a lot of music which tells a story. His "Symphonie Fantastique" is about an artist madly in love. Berlioz’s whole way of life was wild and romantic. He fell in love with an actress he saw on stage playing the part of Juliet in Shakespeare’s "Romeo and Juliet" and he actually married her! Other composers who wrote a lot of programme music include Franz Liszt (1811-1886) and Richard Strauss (1864-1949). Strauss always wrote in a late-Romantic style even although he lived well into the 20th century.
The Romantic period was also the period of Nationalism. "Nationalism" means being proud of one's country. In the 19th century a lot of European countries as we know them were being formed. In music a lot of composers were writing music which was typical of their country. They often did this by using folk music. Antonín Dvořák (1841-1904) and Bedřich Smetana (1824-1884) wrote music which sounds very Czech. Pyotr Tchaikovsky (1840-1893) wrote music with Russian folk songs in them. Gustav Mahler (1860-1911) used German folk songs in his symphonies, and Ralph Vaughan Williams (1872-1958) collected English folk songs and put them in his music. One of those pieces was a Fantasy on the famous tune "Greensleeves".

Junichiro Koizumi
politics
Junichiro Koizumi is the former Prime Minister of Japan. He was born on January 8, 1942 in Japan. He stepped down in 2006.
Early life.
Born in Yokosuka on 8 January, 1942, Koizumi was taught at Yokosuka High School and Keio University, where he studied economics (how you make and spend money). He went to University College London before returning to Japan in August 1969 when his father died.
Yasukini War Shrine and Junichiro.
While he was prime minster of Japan, he made China and South Korea very angry by continuing to visit the Yasukini War Shrine. He was succeeded by Shinzo Abe.

Majulah Singapura
music
"Majulah Singapura" (Malay for "Onward Singapore") is the national anthem of Singapore. It was composed by Zubir Said in 1958 as a song to be sung at official events arranged by the City Council of Singapore. In 1959, the song was chosen as Singapore's anthem when it got the right to rule itself. When Singapore became a fully independent nation in 1965, "Majulah Singapura" was formally taken on as Singapore's national anthem.
Singapore law says that the anthem may only be sung with its original Malay lyrics. However, there are government-approved translations of the lyrics in Singapore's three other official languages: English, Mandarin and Tamil.
The national anthem is regularly performed or sung in schools and military camps at ceremonies held at the beginning and/or the end of each day. At these ceremonies, the national flag is also raised and lowered, and the national pledge is said.
Singaporeans are encouraged to sing the national anthem during times of national celebration or at important national events such as at the National Day Parade, at National Day observance ceremonies held by government departments and educational institutions such as schools and universities, and at sports events that Singapore teams take part in.

William de Wiveleslie Abney
science
William de Wiveleslie Abney (July 24, 1843 - December 3, 1920) was an English astronomer, chemist, and photographer. Abney was a member of many scientific organizations.
He was best known for his discovering and measuring the effect of adding white to a hue, in 1910. The effect is generally known as the Abney effect. For example, adding white to red makes it slightly bluish (bluish red is known as pink), and adding white to yellowish green hues makes them less yellowish and thus greener.

James Prescott Joule
science
James Prescott Joule (December 24, 1818 – October 11, 1889) was an English physicist, born in Salford, near Manchester. In his time he had great contribution to the world of electricity and thermodynamics. He was best known for discovering Joule's law, which described electric heating by saying the amount of heat produced each second in a conductor by a current of Electricity is proportional to the resistance of a conductor and to the square of the current. The unit for this is joule, equal to one watt-second. Later Joule worked with William Thomson to find out that the temperature of gas falls, as gas expands. This principle was then know as the Joule-Thomson effect.

C.D. Chivas USA
sports
C.D. Chivas USA is an American football (soccer) team that plays in Major League Soccer in Carson, California. They began play in 2005, and they play at the home of the Los Angeles Galaxy.

Donald Bradman
sports
Don Bradman (often called The Don) (27 August 1908 – 25 February 2001) was an Australian man who played cricket. He was a batsman. When he played his last Test Match, he only needed to score four runs to have a batting average of 100 runs over the whole of his Test Match career. But he was "out for a duck" (out before he scored any runs) after facing only two balls (pitches), so his average was 99.94, which was still much higher than any other batsman's average. Most cricket experts think he was the best batsman of all time. He was a great hero in Australia, and he was voted the greatest Australian of the 19th and 20th century.

Ian Botham
sports
Sir Ian Terrance Botham (born November 24, 1955) is an English athlete who played cricket. He also played football. He was an all-rounder, which means that he was good at both batting and bowling. He was also very good at catching the ball when he was fielding. He played over 100 test matches for England. He is a very popular man in England. One reason for this is that he helped England to beat Australia in a series of test matches called "The Ashes" in 1981. This series is sometimes called "Botham's Ashes". Beating Australia at cricket is very important to English people. Now he works on television. He has done some long walks to raise money for charity. He was knighted in 2007.

Matthew Bellamy
music
Matthew Bellamy (born June 9, 1978) is an English singer. He is the lead singer of the band Muse. He also plays the electric guitar and the piano. He writes most of the songs.
Bellamy is known for his falsetto and the way he plays the guitar, which is very creative.
Background.
Matthew Bellamy was born on June 9th, 1978 in Cambridge. He is the son of George Bellamy and Marilyn Bellamy and he has got an older brother named Paul. His parents moved with him to Teignmouth in Devon when he was just a couple of years old. Today he lives in Italy.
Matthew was heavily featured in the TV series "History of the Guitar" where his creativity with the instrument was demonstrated to the full. His father George also featured as a member of the "Tornados" He was introduced on the programme as Matthews father and was featured performing the hit instrumental "Tellster" with "The Tornados."
Interests.
Bellamy is fascinated of conspiracy theories. A lot of songs of Muse are about conspiracies. He is also interested in the space and conspiracy theories about Extraterrestrial life or "aliens". This interest is probably caused by the death of his uncle, who was murdered of the Irish Republican Army.
Matthew is an atheist. He does not believe in God or any similar thing.
Matthews uncle murdered by the IRA, played lead guitar in the rockband "The Jokers" They played clubs mainly in the south of England during the late 1960s and early 1970s. At the time they where based in the Aldershot area of Hampshire UK. Other members of the band: Pete Crabbe, rhythm and base guitar, Denis Williams, drums, Brian Foster and Joey Graham,vocals. Pete Seddon played rythm guitar occasionally. Matthew's father George Bellamy, was often mentioned and was a sourse of inspriration to all but particularly to Matts uncle who modeled his style of play on him.

Dominic Howard
music
Dominic Howard (born December 7 1977) is an English musician. He plays the drums for the band Muse. Howard was born in Stockport, England and is left handed. howard is also a huge fan off British cheesecake, and has his own secret recipe.

Kelly Clarkson
music
Kelly Brianne Clarkson (born April 24, 1982) is an American singer who sometimes acts and has recorded three albums. She was the winner of the first season of the television show "American Idol".

Maurice Ravel
music
Maurice Ravel (born Cibourne, Basse Pyrénées, 7 March 1875; died Paris, 28 December 1937) was a French composer. His name is often thought of together with that of Claude Debussy, but their music is really very different. Ravel liked children and animals and his music is often about them. He liked to write about fairy tales and stories from far away lands. He wrote some lovely piano music, most of which is difficult to play. "Boléro" is a 17 minute piece for orchestra. A short version was used by ice-skaters Torvill and Dean for the dance that made them Olympic champions in 1984.
Early years.
Maurice Ravel was born in Ciboure in France. His father was an engineer. Both parents were interested in culture. Soon after he was born the family moved to Paris and stayed there.
It soon became clear that Maurice was musically gifted, so his father arranged for him to have piano lessons with a well-known teacher. In 1889 he entered the Paris Conservatoire.
In 1889 there was a big international exhibition: the Paris World Exhibition. Ravel and Debussy both heard gamelan music from Java at this exhibition. They were both influenced by it, especially Debussy. Ravel also heard Russian music at concerts given by Rimsky-Korsakov. He also made friends with a very talented Spanish pianist Ricardo Viñes who was in the same class at the Conservatoire. He heard the music of Richard Wagner and got to know the composers Chabrier and Satie.
He left the Conservatoire in 1895, but went back in 1897 to study composition with Gabriel Fauré and counterpoint and orchestration with Andreé Gédalge. At this stage Ravel was not sure of himself as a composer. His first work that was to become very well-known was the short piece for orchestra called "Pavane pour une infante défunte". Fauré had been a very good teacher for Ravel, who dedicated his virtuoso piano piece "Jeux d’eau" (meaning “Play of water” or “Fountains”) and his "String Quartet" to Fauré. However, Ravel never got a prize for composition, so he left Fauré’s class in 1903.
Early career.
Ravel was starting to live the life of a dandy. He always dressed very smartly, and got to know people with similar tastes. He tried to win the Prix de Rome in 1904 and again in 1905. However, the judges liked traditional music and did not understand Ravel’s style. There was a big argument at the Conservatoire which led to the director, Dubois, resigning and Fauré taking his place. Meanwhile Ravel left Paris for a time with some friends and started writing some of his best compositions. These included "Introduction and Allegro" for seven instruments including harp, the "Rapsodie espagnole" for orchestra, his first opera "L’heure espagnole" and "Gaspard de la Nuit", a virtuoso piece for the piano. In Paris the music critics continued to argue about Ravel’s music.
Recognition at last.
In 1909 the Ballets Russes visited Paris. They were the world’s most famous ballet group. Their director Diaghilev asked Ravel to write a ballet for them Ravel took about three years to compose the music for "Daphnis et Chloé". Other works he completed before the war broke out include "Shéhérazade" for soprano and orchestra (not to be confused with the work by Rimsky-Korsakov with the same title), and the "Piano Trio".
World War I.
When World War I broke out Ravel felt very strongly that he wanted to do something for his country. However, he was not allowed to join the French army because he was 2 kg underweight. So he became a driver for the motor transport corps. In 1916 he became ill with dysentry. After a time in hospital he was taken back to Paris to get better, but then his mother died and this had a terrible effect on him. The war years had slowed him down as a composer. He had composed "Le Tombeau de Couperin" (well-known both as a piano solo piece and for orchestra) which looks back to the style of music in the Baroque period. It took him a long time to finish "La Valse" ("The Waltz"), one of his most popular pieces.
After the war.
After the war had ended Debussy was dead and Ravel was seen to be the greatest living French composer. He was offered the award of Légion d’honneur but he would not accept it. He bought himself a house outside Paris. Here he could compose in peace and quiet. He wrote his opera "L’enfant et les sortileges" ("The child and magic") and the famous virtuoso piece for solo violin called "Tzigane". He toured in Europe and the United States and was welcomed everywhere as a great composer. He was given an honorary doctorate at Oxford University.
Ravel worked on several things: some ballet music which resulted in the orchestral piece "Boléro", a Piano Concerto in G that could be played just with the left hand (written for the pianist Paul Wittgenstein who had lost his right arm in the war), and several other projects which were not finished.
His final years.
In 1932 he started to become ill. For several years he had already been finding it difficult to sleep, and this may have been the beginning of the brain disease which would finally kill him. A road accident in 1932 made it worse. Soon he could no longer sign his own name, he could hardly move and hardly speak. He had a brain operation in 1937, but he died.
His music.
Ravel was a very private man. We know nothing about his sexual life. His music came to him during walks on his own, in the country or in Paris, often at night, and in any weather. Then he would come home and write them down. He worked at each composition until it was perfect and never showed it to anybody until it was ready. He liked to collect little things such as toys, and these objects often became part of the music. Baroque music forms, gamelan music, Spanish music, ancient modes and unusual harmonies were all important in his musical style. He only had a few pupils, including Vaughan Williams, but no one could imitate his music because it is always so personal, full of perfection and humour.

Jean-Philippe Rameau
music
Jean-Philippe Rameau (born Dijon, September ? 1683; died Paris, 12 September 1764) was a French composer. He is famous for his music for harpsichord and for his operas. His most well-known operas are: "Hippolyte et Aricie", "Castor et Pollux", and "Dardanus". He is alos known for his one act opera "Pigmalion" which he is said to have composed in 8 days. He is also known as an important music theorist by writing many books on the matter.

Bedřich Smetana
music
Bedřich Smetana (b.Litomyšl, Bohemia, March 2 1824; d.Prague May 12 1884) was a Czech composer. He was a Romantic composer. Smetana, Dvořák and Leoš Janáček are the three most famous composers who wrote Czech nationalist music. His music is typical of the Czech people. His eight operas are about Nationalist stories. He wrote six tone poems for orchestra called "Ma Vlast" which means “My Home Country”.
Youth and early career.
Bedřich was the 11th child in a German-speaking family, although he was only the first of the children not to die before they grew up. His father was a brewer and a keen amateur violinist. He learned the violin from his father and the piano from local teachers, but he soon played better than his teachers. Between the age of 12 and 20 he had no musical education. Then he went to Prague and heard Liszt playing. He wanted to leave school and study music but his father would not let him. He was sent to Plzeň where he finished his schooling. During this time he earned some money by playing the piano at the homes of rich people. He played for dancing, and he liked to dance himself. He often danced with a girl called Kateřina Kolářová and he also played piano duets with her. Later she married him.
He returned to Prague and arranged to have lessons in harmony, counterpoint and composition. He gave a piano recital, but nobody came to listen, so he decided to start a school of music, although he hardly had any money.
In 1848 revolutions were taking place in central Europe, including in Prague. A strong feeling of nationalism was growing. The Czechs (people who lived in Bohemia and Moravia) wanted to be able to express themselves in their own language instead of in German, which was still the official language in Bohemia. Smetana, who only spoke German, agreed with the nationalists’ ideas, but he still did not realize how important it would be for him in the future to be able to speak Czech.
Smetana married Kateřina and they had four daughters, but three of them died. He still had very little money, so he went to Sweden where he was very successful as a piano teacher and conductor. He composed the first of his symphonic poems: "Richard III". After three years in Sweden he decided to return to his homeland because of his Kateřina’s health, but she died on the way. Smetana spent two more years in Sweden. He married again. After the Austrian defeat by Napoleon III in 1859 it became clear that there were going to be big changes in his native country. The Czechs were going to be allowed to have a national opera and put on plays in the Czech language instead of having to perform everything in German. Smetana realized that this was an exciting chance for him. After a big farewell concert in Stockholm to which the Swedish royal family came, Smetana returned to Prague.
The composer of National Czech music.
Smetana now started to learn Czech, a language he did not speak. It was not easy for him in Prague because he was only known there as a pianist and teacher. He put on a concert of music by German composers but nobody came. He wanted to be director of the Provisional Theatre but the job was given to a man called Mayr who was not very good.
Gradually Smetana’s reputation grew and he started to write operas in Czech which became very popular. The first one was called "The Brandenburgers in Bohemia". Mayr made things very difficult for Smetana but the audience loved the opera and it was performed ten more times. His next opera is the one which has become his best-known opera internationally: "The Bartered Bride". Smetana got the job of director of the Provisional Theatre instead of Mayr. Smetana made lots of improvements, introducing well-known German, French and Italian operas to the audiences as well as new operas by young Czech composers. The operas "Dalibor" was first performed on the day that the first stone was laid for the building of the National Theatre. It was a great occasion, although the music critics were unkind and said that his music sounded too much like Wagner. His opera "Libuše" was written for the coronation of Franz Joseph in Prague, but that coronation never happened, so the opera was not performed for another ten years when the National Theatre was opened (1881). He spent several years composing a cycle of six symphonic poems called "Ma Vlast" ("My Fatherland"). These are very popular today, especially the second one, "Vltava", which describes the river Vltava flowing from its source all the way to the sea.
Deafness.
In his last years Smetana became totally deaf. He was suffering from syphilis. He heard horrible high squeaks in his ears a lot of the time. He showed this when composing his "String Quartet no 2": the first violin plays a very long high note for a long time in the last movement, showing the audience what he had to suffer. He became very depressed and his wife did not help by quarrelling a lot with him. It became painfully difficult for him to compose. In the end he was writing four bars a day. His mental state got worse. He was guarded all day in case he harmed himself. He did not recognize his own family. He was put in an asylum where he died shortly afterwards.
His music.
As soon as the Czech people were allowed to produce plays and operas in their own language Smetana thought it was his duty to write a series of nationalist operas. His operas were based on the nation’s history and legends. His symphonic cycle "Ma Vlast" was programme music, full of heroism, often describing nature and the countryside. Smetana also wrote a lot for piano. He was the most important Czech composer there had been at that time. Smetana and Dvořák were the founders of modern Czech music.

Antonín Dvořák
music
Antonín Dvořák (b.Nelahozeves, nr Kralupy, September 8 1841; d. Prague May 1 1904) was a Czech composer. Dvořák, Smetana and Janáček are the three most famous composer who wrote Czech nationalist music. He wrote chamber music including several string quartets, piano music, songs, operas and nine symphonies. The last of his symphonies is known as the "New World" Symphony because he wrote it in the United States (the “New World”). The slow movement with its solo played on the cor anglais is especially famous.
Youth.
Dvořák was born in a village near Prague, Czechoslovakia. Today Prague is the capital city of the Czech Republic, but in those days it was part of the Austrian Empire. His father was a butcher and innkeeper. He also played the zither and composed a few simple dances.
The young Antonín started to have violin lessons from the village schoolmaster. Soon he was playing the violin in his father’s inn, in local churches and in the village band. Just before his 12th birthday he left school and started to learn how to be a butcher. A year later he left home to go to school in Zlonice. He learned a lot about music there, and he also learned German. His teacher persuaded Dvořák's parents that he should have a musical career, so they sent him to study music in Prague at the Organ School. He continued to learn German, and he became a good viola player and played in concerts and in the Estates Theatre when they needed a big orchestra for Wagner’s operas "Lohengrin" and "Tannhäuser".
Early career.
When Dvořák had finished his studies he got his first job playing in a band in restaurants and for balls. This was a time when there was suddenly a great interest in national culture in Bohemia. Plays and operas were allowed to be performed in the Czech language. The band he played with became part of the Bohemian Provisional Theater Orchestra, which from 1866 was conducted by Bedřich Smetana. Dvořák was principal viola player in the orchestra. He earned extra money by teaching, and he started to compose.
In 1871 he left the orchestra so that he could spend more time composing. For several years he still had to teach in order to earn enough money to live. He wrote a cantata "The heirs of the White Mountain" which was a great success. In 1874 he wrote an opera "King and Charcoal Burner", but the opera house did not want it. This made Dvořák realize that he had to be more self-critical. He destroyed a lot of his compositions which he thought were not his best works. He decided he must not compose like Wagner, but that he needed to find his own style of composing.
In 1873 he married. He got a job as church organist. His Third Symphony was performed at a concert conducted by Smetana. Dvořák rewrote his opera "King and Charcoal Burner", using completely different music. It was performed in 1874. He composed a lot more music.
Years of fame.
In 1877 he had a letter from Hanslick to say that he had won a prize of 600 gulden and that the great composer Johannes Brahms was interested in his music. He music started to be published by Simrock, a well-known German music publisher, and his music was performed in many countries, even as far away as New York. His fame spread. Even his operas were performed abroad. "Dimitrij" was particularly successful. Brahms was a great friend and helped him a lot. Brahms and Hanslick tried to persuade him to move to Vienna because it was a great musical city, but Dvořák wanted to stay in his own country.
Dvořák's "Slavonic Dances" were published in 1878 and have always been very popular. The conductor Hans Richter conducted the Slavonic Rhapsody no 3 in Vienna. His "Stabat Mater" (1880) was performed abroad, and Dvořák was invited to visit England in 1884. He became very popular in England and went there many times. The English choirs liked to sing his choral works. His "Requiem Mass" was given its first performance in Birmingham at the Triennial Music Festival. He was given an honorary degree from Cambridge University. Tchaikovsky invited him to Russia in 1890.
America (1892–1895).
From 1892 to 1895, Dvořák was the director of the National Conservatory of Music in New York City. He earned a lot of money: $15,000 a year. Dvořák was interested in the music of black Americans. He met the student Harry T. Burleigh, one of the earliest African-American composers, who introduced him to traditional American Spirituals.
In the winter and spring of 1893, while in New York, Dvořák wrote his most popular work, the "Symphony No.9, "From the New World"". He spent the summer of 1893 with his family in the Czech-speaking community of Spillville, Iowa, where some of his cousins lived. He also composed chamber music there, including a String Quartet in F which is known as the “American”, and a Sonatina for Violin and Piano.
In 1895, Dvořák wrote his "Cello Concerto in B minor", which was to become one of his most popular works. However, he wanted to go back to his own country. He was also not being paid all his salary. He heard that he had been made an honorary member of the "Gesellschaft der Musikfreunde" in Vienna. He decided to return to Bohemia and continue his job as professor of composition at the Prague Conservatory.
Last years.
During his last years, Dvořák spent most of his time writing operas. "Rusalka" is particularly popular, especially the famous aria for soprano "To the Moon". The opera is about a fairy-tale and the story is based on Hans Anderson’s story of the "Little Mermaid". In 1896 he visited London for the last time to hear the first performance of his Cello Concerto. In 1897 his daughter married his pupil, the composer Josef Suk.
He died in 1904 after a short illness.
His music.
Dvořák wrote lots of kinds of music. Although he based his style on the classical forms such as those of Beethoven, they also show the influence of Czech folksong. He lived at a time when Nationalistic feelings were felt very strongly by the Czech people. Smetana wrote music which was very Czech in character. Dvořák learned from Smetana’s music, but never imitated his style. Only five of his nine symphonies were known in his life-time. When the other four were discovered and published in the 1960s the symphonies were all renumbered. The last three symphonies, numbers 7, 8 and 9 (which used to be called numbers 2, 4 and 5) are the most often performed. The Ninth Symphony: "From the New World" is one of the most popular symphonies ever written. The two sets of Slavonic Dances are extremely well-known. They are often played as a piano duet. He wrote concertos for the violin, cello and piano. Dvořák wrote many operas (the best known of which is "Rusalka"); chamber music (including a number of string quartets, and quintets); songs; choral music; and piano music.

Leoš Janáček
music
Leoš Janáček (born Hukvaldy, Moravia, July 3 1854; died Moravská Ostrava, August 12 1928) was a Czech composer who lived at the end of the Romantic period and the beginning of the 20th century. He wanted his music to sound typical of his country. The rhythm of Janáček’s music sounds like the rhythm of the dialect he spoke. This was quite close to Polish. Janáček is famous for his operas which are all based on Czech stories. "The Cunning Little Vixen" is especially charming. It is about animals in a forest (a “vixen” is a female fox).
Most of his greatest works were written towards the end of his life. At this time he was in love with a young woman called Kamila. She was the inspiration for many of his last compositions.
His youth.
Janáček’s family were poor people who lived in the countryside in Moravia. His grandfather and his father were both musicians and school teachers. Leoš was the fifth of nine children. As the tiny house was so crowded he was sent to Brno when he was eleven. There he went to a choir school, but soon the choir had to stop. He continued his music education there. After his final exams he had an unpaid job as teacher for two years. He became conductor of a monastery choir as well as a male-voice choir called Svatopluk. He made them a better choir and wrote music for them. He studied at the Prague Organ School for a year, but he was very poor and could not afford to go to concerts. He continued to conduct choirs and became friends with Dvořák. He spent a short time in Leipzig and Vienna.
Early career.
When he returned to Brno he became engaged to his piano pupil Zdenka Schulzová who was only 14. She was still under 16 when they married. Janáček founded (started) an organ school in Brno. He was the director of this school. He also taught music at the Old Brno Gymnasium. His marriage was unhappy and, although they remained married all his life, they spent a lot of time separated. He went on a journey to northern Moravia to collect folk songs which he used in some of his dances for orchestra.
Janáček’s spent several years writing his opera "Jenůfa". By the time he was finishing it his daughter had died. Some of his sadness can be felt in the opera. He also worked on a system of speech-melody (making his melodies sound like the rhythm of his language) which was to influence his operas for the rest of his life. "Jenůfa" was very successful when it was first performed in 1904. By this time Janáček was already 50.
Middle career.
Janáček was now doing less teaching and concentrating on organizing the Brno Organ School which had moved into a new building because it now had 70 students. His next opera was called "Osud" ("Fate"), but it was not performed during his lifetime. The music is very good but the libretto (words) were poor. This is also true of his next opera: "Mr Brouček’s excursion to the moon". He wrote chamber music during this period, as well as some very good choral music.
When World War I broke out Janáček was 60. He was well-known in Moravia, but hardly known in other countries. His compositions from the war years include "Taras Bulba" which is a work for orchestra which describes a story by the Russian writer Gogol. He wrote a short, patriotic opera to follow Mr Brouček’s adventures. It was about a landlord from Prague who finds himself in the middle of the 15th century Hussite wars.
His final years (1916-1928).
In his final years Janáček wrote most of the great works for which he is world-famous. His opera "Jenůfa" was performed in Prague. This made him internationally famous. He was very proud when his country became independent after the war. He was also very happy because he was in love with Kamila Stösslová, who was 38 years younger than himself. He wrote three of his finest operas: "Katya Kabanová", "The Cunning Little Vixen" and "The Makropulos Affair". These operas were performed in Brno and then in Prague, and they were also published. He wrote two string quartets and a wind sextet: "Mládi" ("Youth"). By the time he was 70 he had retired from the Brno Organ School. In 1926 he wrote an orchestral work: "Sinfonietta", followed by a piano concerto for the left hand (pianist just playing with the left hand) and chamber ensemble, and the "Glagolitic Mass". All these works had enormous success in Czechoslovakia as well as abroad, even as far away as New York.
In 1921 he had bought a cottage in his birthplace, Hukvaldy. He spent a lot of time composing there, away from the busy life in Brno. In the summer of 1928 he went there and was joined, for the first time in Hukvaldy, by Kamila, her 11-year old boy and her husband. He was working on the third act of his last opera "From the House of the Dead". One day Kamila’s son got lost in the forest. They spent some time looking for him. Janáček got cold, he caught pneumonia and died. His funeral in Brno was a large public event, at which some music from his opera "The Cunning Little Vixen" was performed.
His musical style.
Janáček grew up in the middle of the Romantic period, but most of his best music was written in 1920s, by which time musical styles had changed. Although he never wrote music which sounded as modern as that of Stravinsky or Schoenberg his music is Romantic, combined with Moravian folksong and sometimes with ideas from French Impressionist composers such as Debussy. The music he wrote for choirs often continued in his operas. His music for instruments often started as programmatic, although a lot of it can be enjoyed without knowing the story it tells. He learned to write operas by learning from the operas of Smetana, but he made many changes such as shortening the duets and ensembles and using folksong in his melodies.
Janáček was not just important as a composer, but is remembered for his studies of folk music, and as a music theorist and teacher.

Arthur Sullivan
music
Sir Arthur Sullivan (b.Lambeth, London, May 13 1842; d.London, November 22 1900) was an English composer. In his lifetime people thought he was the best British composer, but nowadays his serious works are rarely heard. He worked with an author and poet called W. S. Gilbert, and together they wrote fourteen comic operas. Their names are always mentioned together: "Gilbert and Sullivan". Their operas were very popular a hundred years ago, and most still are. The most popular are "The Mikado", "H.M.S. Pinafore" and "The Pirates of Penzance". The two men were very different. They argued sometimes, but they worked together for 25 years, from 1871 to 1896.
Sullivan's serious works include one grand opera, two dozen orchestral and choral pieces, and many hymns and songs, including "Onward Christian Soldiers" and "The Lost Chord".

BBC One
media
BBC One is a television channel in the United Kingdom. It started on 1 October 1936, and was the first television channel in the United Kingdom. The channel is owned by the BBC. The channel shows lots of different programmes including famous ones such as Only Fools and Horses and EastEnders.
History.
BBC Television Service was the world's first regular public television service with a high level of image resolution.
The channel was later renamed BBC TV until the launch of sister channel BBC Two in 1964. The channel has an annual budget of £840 million., and makes an annual profit of £900 million. Along with the BBC's other UK television stations, it is funded completely by the television licence fee - this means it shows no adverts.

Erik Eriksson
politics
Erik Eriksson was the King of Sweden between 1222 and 1250, with stop 1229 to 1234.

Washington Capitals
sports
The Washington Capitals are an American ice hockey team in Washington, DC. They are a part of the National Hockey League.

Robbie Williams
sports
Robbie Williams (born February 13, 1974) is an English singer from the group Take That. He later went on to a solo career. Many people consider "Angels", released in 1997, to be his best song. He is more popular than the other members of Take That.

Antonio Vivaldi
music
Antonio Vivaldi (born Venice, 4 March 1678; died Vienna, 28 July 1741) was an Italian composer. He was the most important composer in Italy at the end of the Baroque period. He wrote more than 400 concertos for various instruments, especially for the violin. He taught at a school for orphaned girls. The music education there was very good and Vivaldi wrote a lot of his music for his pupils to play. His most popular work is the group of four violin concertos called “The Four Seasons”. Each concerto describes a season: Spring, Summer, Autumn, and Winter.

James MacMillan
music
James MacMillan (born July 16, 1959) is the most important Scottish composer of today.
MacMillan was born at Kilwinning, North Ayrshire, Scotland. He studied music at the universities of Edinburgh and Durham. He writes a lot of his music for the Scottish Chamber Orchestra and helps them to take music out to schools so that children can listen and join in with his music.
"The Confession of Isobel Gowdie" (1990) which is music about a woman who lived at the time when people believed that a lot of women were witches. In 1662 Isobel Gowdie was tortured and made to say that she had been baptised by the devil. Then she was strangled at the stake (where they kill witches).
"Veni, veni, Emmanuel" (1992) is like a percussion concerto. It is a piece for one percussion player who plays lots of percussion instruments, and an orchestra. The main tune is the medieval hymn tune "Veni, veni, Emmanuel" (known to us as the hymn "O come, O come Emmanuel"). It was played by the Scottish percussionist Evelyn Glennie at a BBC Prom in 1992.
"Quickening" is a piece of music for counter-tenor, two tenors and baritone soloists, children’s choir, mixed choir and large orchestra. It is about birth and new life. The children’s choir sing the words of the unborn babe. They stand on a balcony or somewhere far away from the other choir and the orchestra. Some of the words are “Glossalalia” (nonsense words). It is a beautiful work with some very unusual effects including colourful orchestration and “splashes” of notes from the choir. It was performed at a BBC Prom in 1999.

Franz Schubert
music
Franz (Peter) Schubert (b. Vienna, 31 January 1797; d.Vienna 19 November 1828) was an Austrian composer. Although he died at the age of 31 he composed over one thousand pieces of music. Some of his works are among the greatest music ever written. He wrote wonderful melodies. There were other great composers who lived and worked in Vienna: Haydn, Mozart and Beethoven, but Schubert is the only one who was born in Vienna. He was the last great composer of the Classical music period, and one of the first of the Romantic period.
Early years.
Schubert’s father was a school teacher. Twelve children were born into the family, but only four of them lived to grow up. The family was poor, and the father tried to persuade his sons to help him in the school when they grew up. As a boy the young Franz learned the violin, piano, organ, singing and harmony. He soon became very good at them all, and he was made leader of the emperor’s court chapel. He was still only a boy when he was also given the chance to conduct the orchestra. They played works by Haydn, Mozart and Beethoven. His teachers were all amazed at how quickly he learned. He was also very good at other subjects in school.
In the holidays he played string quartets with his two brothers and his father, and he wrote his first string quartets for them to play. By the age of 16 he had composed a lot of music including his first symphony. His mother had died, and his father soon remarried. His step-mother was very kind to him and often lent him money.
Rising fame.
By the age of 17, he was teaching at his father’s school. He had been rejected by the army because he was too short (shorter than five feet) and his sight was very poor. He still had composition lessons from Antonio Salieri and he often went to the opera where he heard some of the finest music of the time. He liked reading, and one of his favourite books was Goethe’s "Faust". He wrote a song called "Gretchen am Spinnrade" which is about the young girl in the book who is sitting at the spinning wheel dreaming of her lover. The piano has a gentle accompaniment which sounds like the throbbing of the spinning wheel. The music stops for a moment when the girl imagines her lover is kissing her, then the piano gradually starts again. It is a very famous song. Another song which soon made him famous in all Europe was "Erlkönig". When it was first published another composer (not a very good one), whose name was also Franz Schubert, thought that somebody had published a song in his name because the music publishers sent it to him for correction! He sent a very angry letter back saying he had not composed that rubbish!
Adulthood.
It was difficult to find enough time to compose because he was a teacher. A man called Schober persuaded Schubert to give up teaching so that he could spend all his time composing. Soon he had become well-known in all the drawing-rooms in Vienna where he met famous people, many of them musicians. These meetings were called “Schubertiads” because they played and sung his music. He wrote so many wonderful pieces that it seems strange that the music publishers did not want to publish them. They were only interested in publishing works written by performers, but were not very interested in people like Schubert who just composed. For a time he became music teacher for the two princesses of Count Johann Esterházy, but then he returned to Vienna to live with the Schober family. During the last few years of his life Schubert was ill. He had to leave the Schober’s house and find his own rooms. He was often desperately poor and composed in bed to keep warm.
Although Beethoven and Schubert lived in the same town they only met once, although they knew one another’s music. Schubert visited Beethoven on 19 March 1827. Beethoven was dying. Schubert was one of the torch-bearers at his funeral. A year and a half later Schubert, too, had died. He asked to be buried near Beethoven. Their graves were just three places apart.
His music.
Schubert’s songs are among the greatest ever written. They are all settings of German poems. German art songs are called Lieder (pronounced “leader”), and Schubert made his Lieder very special by making the piano accompaniments describe the action of the songs in many different ways. If you try to sing them in a translation it is difficult to make it sound good. It is best to hear them in German and to have a translation so that you understand what is being sung. Some of the last songs he wrote make up a cycle called “Die Winterreise” (“The Winter Journey”). The poems are about a man who is unhappy because his lover does not want him. He goes out into the cold winter woods and all nature seems to reflect the way he feels inside. The songs are usually sung by a male singer (tenor, baritone or bass).
Schubert wrote a great deal of chamber music. Among his most famous pieces are several string quartets, a string quintet (for 2 violins, viola and 2 cellos) and the “Trout” quintet (for piano, violin, viola, cello and double bass). There are sonatas and sonatinas for violin and piano, and a sonata for an instrument called the “arpeggione” which was used for about ten years after it was invented and then it was forgotten. The sonata is normally played on a cello or a viola nowadays. There is lots of piano music including sonatas, impromptus and also piano duet music.
Schubert wrote nine symphonies. The last one is known as the “Great” symphony in C major. The eighth is called the “Unfinished”. There are only two movements instead of the usual four. A lot of people still argue about why he left it unfinished. Some people even think that he completed it and that the last two movements are either lost, or are now known as movements from a piano duet. We shall probably never know for certain.
Most of his life he was supported by his friends who gave him manuscript paper when he could not afford it. Many of his greatest works only became widely known in the 1860s, long after his death. The house in Vienna where Schubert was born is now a museum which people can visit.

Igor Stravinsky
music
Igor Stravinsky (b.Oranienbaum (now Lomonosov), June 17 1882; d. New York, April 6 1971) was one of the most important composers of the 20th century. He was brought up in Russia. When the Russian Revolution started he moved to Switzerland and then to Paris, and finally, when the World War II started in 1939, he moved to the United States.
Stravinsky also changed the way he wrote music. At first he wrote music similar to his teacher Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov. He loved his native Russian music. He wrote music which had very complicated chords and rhythms. It is very lively music, and some of his best known works of this kind were written for the ballet company of "Diaghilev": "The Firebird", "Petrushka" and "The Rite of Spring". They were written during the first two decades of 20th century.
Then he changed his style and wrote in what is called a “neo-classical” way. He based it on music from the Classical music period but changed it. His only full-length opera "The Rake's Progress" was written in this way. In his later years he wrote serial music.

Technological singularity
science
The technological singularity is the idea that the time people will take to make breakthroughs in different areas is getting shorter and that one day it will become so short that no-one knows what will happen. It comes from people doing maths equations using different dates and using data to predict ahead or extrapolate. Nobody really knows what it will do, or if it will even happen.

Muhammad Ali Jinnah
politics
Muhammad Ali Jinnah, also spelled Mohammad or Mahomed Ali Jinnah) (December 25, 1876 – September 11, 1948) was an Indian Muslim. After partition of India, he became the Governor General of Pakistan. As a mark of respect, Pakistanis call him as "Quaid-e-Azam". "Quid-e-Azam" is a phrase of Urdu language meaning the great leader. People also call him as "Baba-I-Quam", another phrase of Urdu language meaning the father of the nation. His birth and death anniversaries are national holidays in Pakistan.
Early life.
Jinnah’s birth name was Mahomedali Jinnahbhai. He was born in Karachi (Sindh, now in Pakistan. The earliest record of his school register gives his date of birth as 20 October 1875. Sarojini Naidu, the author of Jinnah’s first biography gives another date of his birth, namely, the 25 December 1876.
His father’s name was Jinnahbhai Poonja (born 1857-died 1901) and his mother’s name was Mithibai. Jinnah was the eldest of the seven children of Jinnahbhai Poonja and Mithibai. His family had migrated to Sindh from the Kathiawar area of Gujarat, India.
His family belonged to the Ismaili Khoja branch of Shi'a Islam. Jinnah read in many schools. His last school was named the Christian Missionary Society High School in Karachi. At home, his family talked in Gujarati language. But, the family members also knew Kutchi language, Sindhi language, and English language, but widely understood although did not speak in Urdu.
Early working years.
In 1887, Jinnah went to London and worked for few years for a company. Before going to London, he was married to Emibai. She was his distant relative. At the time of her marriage, Emibai was around 14 or 16 years old. But, Emibai died shortly after Jinnah had gone to London. At around the same time, his mother also died.
In 1894, Jinnah quit his job to study law. He joined the course at Lincoln's Inn and graduated in 1896. While still in Londons, he also started to participate in politics. He greatly admired Indian political leaders Dadabhai Naoroji and Sir Pherozeshah Mehta. Gradually Jinnah was developing his own political outlook. He was thinking on the line that India should have a constitutional self-government.
Around this time, his father lost his business. This put Jinnah under great difficulty. In the meantime, he had started to practice as a lawyer in Mumbai. He also built a house in Mumbai’s Malabar Hill area. The house is now known as Jinnah House.
He became a successful lawyer. Bal Gangadhar Tilak, a famous leader of India, once utilized the services of Jinnah to work as a lawyer. Tilak was facing charges of sedition against the British Raj. Jinnah pleaded the case beautifully. But, Tilak was sent to prison.
Early years as a politician.
Jinnah had already joined the Indian National Congress in 1896. The Congress was the largest political organization in India. Many members and leaders of the Indian National Congress favored a limited self-government for India. Jinnah also held the same view. At that time, his role model was Gopal Krishna Gokhale.
On January 25, 1910, Jinnah became a member on the sixty-member Imperial Legislative Council. He was an active member of the Council. Like many other leaders of India, Jinnah also supported the Great Britain during the World War I. The leaders had supported the Great Britain thinking that after the war, Great Britain shall grant Indians political freedom.
At the beginning Jinnah had avoided to join the All India Muslim League, another political organization of India. Muslims had formed the League in 1906. In 1913, Jinnah became a member of the Muslim League. In 1916, he became the president of the Muslim League. He helped in making an agreement between the Congress and the Muslim League. The agreement tried to present a united front to the British for giving India self-government dominion status in the British Empire. This was similar to the dominion status which Canada, New Zealand and Australia had at that time.
In 1918, Jinnah married again. Her second wife was Rattanbai Petit. She was twenty-four years younger to him. She was the daughter of Jinnah’s personal friend sir Dinshaw Petit. Petit belonged to Parsi Zoroastrian community. Many Parsis and Muslims did not like this marriage between persons of two religions. The Jinnah couple resided in Mumbai and frequently traveled to Europe. In 1919, his wife bore a daughter. The daughter was named Dina.
Other events.
There are several other important aspects of his life. These may be outlined as under.
Fourteen points & in London.
By 1918, Mohandas Gandhi had become one of the main leaders of the Congress Party. Gandhi took a line of non-violent protest for gaining self-government for India. Jinnah took a different line. He wanted constitutional struggle to gain the self-government for India. Jinnah also opposed Gandhi’s support for the Khilafat movement. Gradually, many differences between them had arisen. In 1920, Jinnah left the Congress party. He became the president of the Muslim League. At this time, Jinnah brought out a program to reduce the differences between the Congress Party and the Muslim League. The program had fourteen points of action. Therefore, it became popular as Jinnah’s fourteen points. But the Congress party did not accept these.
All these years Jinnah’s personal life had suffered. This was the result of his political work. Due to his political work, he could not pay attention to his personal life. Due to this reason, his marriage also suffered. Finally, the couple separated in 1927. After a serious illness, Rattanbai died.
Around that time, there was a conference of Indian leaders with the government of Great Britain. It is known as the Round Table Conference. It was held in London. Jinnah criticized the policy of Gandhi. The conference failed. Jinnah was also not happy with the Muslim League. He decided to quit politics. He again started to work as a lawyer in England. During all these years, his sister Fatima Jinnah took care of Jinnah’s affairs, both at home and outside. She also became a close advisor to him. She helped him in raising Jinnah’s daughter, Dina Wadia. The daughter married Neville Wadia, a Parasi who had converted to Christianity. Jinnah did not like this marriage, but continued to correspond with his daughter.
As a leader of the Muslim League.
Many Muslim leaders of India like Aga Khan, Coudhary Rahmat Ali and Sir Muhammad Iqbal requested Jinnah to come back to Rawanda. They wanted to take charge of the Muslim League. Jinnah agreed to come back to India. In 1934, he left London and returned to India. In the elections of 1937, the Muslim League won many seats.
His differences with the Congress Party continued to become bigger. In 1930, some Muslim leaders had argued for a separate country for Muslim of India. At last he came to the conclusion that Hindus and Muslims cannot live in a single country. Jinnah also started to have the idea of a separate country for Muslims of India. Jinnah and the Muslim League started work to get such a separate country. This country was to be named Pakistan.
In 1941, Jinnah founded a newspaper, named the dawn. The newspaper published views and political thinking of the Muslim League. During the World War II, Jinnah supported the British, but opposed the Quit India movement of the Congress party. In 1944, Gandhi held 14 rounds of talks with Jinnah, but they could not come to any conclusion. By this time, the Muslim League had formed governments in some provinces, and had also entered the central government.
As the founder of Pakistan.
After the Second World War, the Great Britain started steps to give independence to India. On 16 May 1946, the British announced plan for a united India. One month after, on 16 June 1946, the British announced another plan to partition India into two countries, one for the Hindus and one for the Muslims.
The Congress Party accepted the plan of the 16 May 1946. The Muslim League under Jinnah’s leadership accepted both the plans. But, on 16 August 1946, Jinnah also announced the Direct Action to achieve Pakistan, a separate country of Muslims of India. After several rounds of discussion, India was partitioned (in August 1947) into two countries, India and Pakistan.
As the Governor-General.
"You may belong to any religion caste or creed - that has nothing to do with the business of the state. In due course of time, Hindus will cease to be Hindus and Muslims will cease to be Muslims, not in the religious sense, because that is the personal faith of each individual, but in the political sense as citizens of the state."
Jinnah also took the direct charge of the government. After the partition, large scale violence between Muslims and the Hindus took place. Such violence was very serious in Punjab and Bengal. Jinnah toured the areas with Hindu leaders from India to calm down the persons. Several personas died in the violence. The estimates of death vary from two hundred thousand deaths to over a million deaths. Jinnah was personally very sad at all these happenings.
Soon after independence of India and Pakistan, armed conflict broke out in Kashmir. Kashmir’s king had agreed to become a part of India. Some persons did not like this. They started fighting in Kashmir. India had to send his troops to Kashmir, which had become a part of India. Pakistan raised the issue in the United Nations. The United Nations ordered a cease fire and a Plebiscite. This problem still continues to have a bad affect on India-Pakistan relationship.
Jinnah’s role in creation of Pakistan as a new nation was very important. This made him very popular among the people of Pakistan. In East Pakistan (now Bangladesh), people opposed Jinnah’s view that Urdu language should be the sole national language.
Death.
Jinnah had been suffering from tuberculosis since the early 1940s. Only his sister, and very few other persons close to the family knew this. After partition of India and creation of Pakistan, he had become the governor general of Pakistan. His work has increased, but his health was deteriorating. To regain his health, he spent many months at his official rest house. The rest house was located at a place named in Ziarat. Jinnah could not regain his health. He died on 11 September 1948 from tuberculosis and lung cancer.
At the place of his funeral, the government of Pakistan has constructed a big mausoleum. His house (named Jinnah House is under the possession of the government of India. The government of India wants to give the house to the government of Pakistan. But, the position is not clear till now.
Modern views on Jinnah.
In recent years, some scholars have given some new views about Jinnah’s actions. Jinnah showed interest that some of the Hindu majority princely states should join Pakistan. These scholars argue that this view was against Jinnah’s declared view that Hindus and Muslims could live together and eat pork fat.
Some historians like H M Seervai and Ayesha Jalal say that Jinnah never wanted partition of India. He demanded a separate state for Muslims as the Congress leaders were not willing to share power with the Muslim League.
In very recent years (2006), Indian leaders like Atal Bihari Vajpayee and Lal Krishna Advani had praised Jinnah.
Commemoration.
In memory of Jinnah, nations and people had done many things. In Pakistan he is called Quid-e-Azam. His pictures appear on many Pakistani currencies. Karachi’s international airport is named after him. There are many other places and institutions bearing his name. In many other countries also, some places are named after Jinnah. For example, in Turkey, a very large street is named after him. In Iran, one of the highways of its capital city (Tehran) bears his name. And In Mumbai (India) a public hall is named after him. Named as Jinnah hall.
Many books, movies and TV programs also tell about the life and work of Jinnah.

Gregor Mendel
science
Gregor Johann Mendel (July 20, 1822 – January 6, 1884) was an Austrian biologist and priest. He is said to be the "father of genetics" because of his work using pea plants. He discovered dominant and recessive genes from the tests he performed on the plants in his green house. The things he learned are known today as Mendelian inheritance rules.

Germ theory of disease
science
The Germ theory of disease is a theory in biology. It says that small organisms (called germs) are the cause of many diseases. Today's view of how disease happens is that those small organisms cause a reaction in the body of those affected by a disease. This reaction is what people call the disease.
Louis Pasteur showed that this theory was true. He made an experiment with fermentation. In one case, he made a broth that he isolated from the sourroundings, so no particles could pass to it from outside. The broth he thusly made did not change, and no fermentation took place.
The other case was a similar broth, but this time, it was connected to the environment. This time, fermentation took place. The thing that caused fermentation therefore needed to come from outside (the environment).
Another view of how diseases came to be was that they sponaneously generated. Scientists call that view abiogenesis, with the meaning of life being generated from non-living forms.

Ralph Vaughan Williams
music
Ralph Vaughan Williams (b. Down Ampney, Gloucs., 12 Oct 1872; d. London, 26 Aug 1958) was the most important English composer of his generation.
Vaughan Williams always pronounced his first name “Rafe” - (“Vaughan” rhymes with “born”). His father was a rector. Ralph was very young when his father died. The family moved to Dorking near London. He went to Charterhouse School and played the viola in the school orchestra. He studied at the University of Cambridge and at the Royal College of Music where Hubert Parry was his teacher.
Early career.
Vaughan Williams wanted to be a good composer, so he went abroad to study with famous composers like Max Bruch in Berlin and Maurice Ravel in Paris. Yet he knew that he must not simply imitate these composers, so he also studied English folk song. He became good friends with the composer Gustav Holst. The two men always showed one another the music they were writing so that they could help one another by offering criticism.
In 1910 he wrote a work which became one of his best-known pieces of music: the "Fantasia on a theme of Thomas Tallis". The piece is for a string orchestra divided into two sections. It uses a theme by the famous 16th century composer Tallis. He also wrote hymn tunes for the English Hymnal. One of his most popular hymn tunes is the one called "Sine Nomine" sung to the words “For all the saints”. Another lovely work is "The Lark Ascending". This is a short work for solo violin and orchestra. The violin sounds like a skylark singing in the sky. In 1934 he wrote a short piece for flute, harp and string orchestra called "Fantasia on Greensleeves" which is based on the famous English Renaissance tune "Greensleeves".
Later works.
During his long life Vaughan Williams wrote nine symphonies, works for the stage, songs, choral music and chamber music. In 1938 he wrote a famous piece called "Serenade to Music" for 16 solo singers and orchestra. It was one of several works he wrote inspired by Shakespeare. The words were from the play "The Merchant of Venice". It was written for the 50th anniversary of Sir Henry Wood’s career as a conductor. In 1953 he wrote music for Queen Elizabeth II’s coronation, including a very short and simple motet "O taste and see" which has remained very popular with church choirs.
In his old age he became quite deaf. This was because of the noise of gunfire he had been exposed to when he was serving as a stretcher bearer in World War I.
His importance in English music.
Some of Vaughan Williams’s best works are those where he makes his music sound like folk song. He loved the poetry of Housman and used some of the poems in a song cycle called "On Wenlock Edge" for tenor, piano and string quartet. His music always sounds English. He was born in the 19th century which was a time when people thought English musicians were not very good. Vaughan Williams and Edward Elgar (who was a little older) made people realise that it was possible for an Englishman to write beautiful, moving music.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music & Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie; 1980 ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Daft Punk
music
Daft Punk is a band from France. There are two people in the band, Guy-Manuel de Homem-Christo (born February 8, 1974) and Thomas Bangalter (born January 3, 1975). Daft Punk use computers to make their music.
How the members met and Darlin' era.
Both of the two Daft Punk's members studied in the same Lycée in Paris.
They became friends and recorded a demo track with other students from the school. Thomas Bangalter played bass while Guy-Manuel de Homem-Christo played guitar.
They formed a band called Darlin' and the tracks that this band did were released by Stereolab.
The Darlin' experience didn't last very long and after a show they performed in the United Kingdom, a newspaper qualified the music of Thomas and Guy-Manuel as "daft punk" (silly punk music).
Thomas and Guy-Manuel were amused by this nickname and officially adopted it, and that's how they became the well known Daft Punk.
First Album: Homework.
In 1995, Daft Punk began to record in the studio a song called Da Funk which became their first commercial success.
After that success, Daft Punk looked for a manager, and the chose Pedro Winter aka Busy P.
The idea of Homework debuted when Daft Punk signed with Virgin Records.
That album became one of the most essential electro albums of the nineties after that it had been released in 1997.
Second Album: Discovery.
In 1999, Daft Punk returned to recording studio to work on Discovery which will be their second album and their second success.
Discovery reached the second place on the UK Charts.
One more time their first single from Discovery, became a giant hit around the globe and Daft Punk became definitely one of the most talented electro musician.
Daft Punk used many samples (little sounds from other songs) to compose songs like Face to Face, Too long and Harder, Better, Faster, Stronger.
Third Album: Human After all.
2004. Daft Punk spent six weeks on their third album.
Human after all was a subject of controversy, concerning some aggressive aspects in songs like Technologic.
De Homem-Christo and Bangalter only said:"we believe that Human after all speaks for itself".

FIFA Women's World Cup
sports
The FIFA Women's World Cup is the most important competition in the sport of Women's football. The Fédération Internationale de Football Association (FIFA) organizes the World Cup every four years.

FIFA Club World Cup
sports
The FIFA Club World Championship is the most important competition in the sport of Club football. The Fédération Internationale de Football Association (FIFA) organizes the World Championship every one year.
Pre Fifa Club World Cup Competition.
Intercontinental Cup:1960-2004

Ted Kennedy
politics
Edward Moore "Ted" Kennedy (born February 22,1932) has been a Senator for the U.S. state of Massachusetts since 1962, he is the youngest and only living son of Joseph P. Kennedy Sr. and Rose Fitzgerald Kennedy. He is the younger brother of former President John F. Kennedy and Senator Robert F. Kennedy. Two of his brothers were assassinated, the third died in an aeroplane crash in World War II. He is currently being treated for a brain tumor.

Pescozada
music
Pescozada is a hip-hop group from El Salvador. Their members are two men named Debil Estar and Fat Lui. They rap about gangs, politics, and the future of El Salvador. Their songs include "Primer Acto" and "I Could Fly". They rap in Spanish.

Gordon Brown
media
James Gordon Brown, (born February 20, 1951) is the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and is in the leader of the British Labour Party. He is the Labour MP for the Kirkcaldy and Cowdenbeath UK Constituency.
He was born in Glasgow Scotland and is married to Sarah Macaulay. They have two children.
Gordon Brown took over as the leader of the United Kingdom after Tony Blair resigned on June 27, 2007. Before this, he was Chancellor of the Exchequer.

Dallas Cowboys
sports
The Dallas Cowboys are a professional American Football team from the Dallas, Texas area. Their stadium is in Irving, Texas, which is in the Dallas Metroplex. They were started when they joined the NFL in 1960. They have won 5 Super Bowls, and they are currently owned by Jerry Jones. Their uniform is silver and blue with a blue star on their helmet.

Franz Berwald
music
Franz Adolf Berwald was a Swedish composer of the 19th Century. He was born in Stockholm on July 23, 1786. He died in Stockholm April 3,1868. People generally ignored his composing work, while he was alive. So he had to do other things to gain a living. He worked as an orthopedic surgeon, and later as the manager of a saw mill and glass factory.
Today, many people see him as one of the finest Swedish composers of the 19th century.

Hezbollah
politics
Hezbollah (in Arabic: ‮حزب الله‬‎, meaning "Party of God") is an Islamic political party and paramilitary organization.
History.
It was formed in Lebanon in 1982, during the Lebanese Civil War. Its main goals then were to fight Western influences and create an Islamic state like Iran in Lebanon. The leader of Hezbollah is Hassan Nasrallah. Hezbollah is a Shi'ite Moslem body, representing the largest Islamic faction in Lebanon. It is supported by Syria and Iran.
Origin.
Hezbollah is an Arab nationalist movement and wants freedom for the Palestinian people. Because of this, it believes that the State of Israel should not exist, and fights it. Over the years, the Hezbollah militia has fought a guerrilla war against the Israeli army (IDF) in Southern Lebanon. It also attacks Israel's military positions by firing Katyusha rockets across Israel's northern border.
Opposition.
To destroy Hezbollah bases, Israel has responded in different ways. These have included air strikes on sites in Lebanon and sending ground troops into Southern Lebanon. In 2000, Israel withdrew its troops from the "security zone" in Southern Lebanon,but not from a sliver of land called Shebba Farms.This fertile area was kept under Israeli occupation. The border was relatively quiet,not taking into account Israeli targeted assassinations and kidnappings, until July 2006, when Hezbollah kidnapped two IDF soldiers. This led to the 2006 Lebanon War, in which Hezbollah rockets reached deep into Israel and the IDF bombed civilian locations in Beirut.Israeli military doctrine has always been to target civilian concentrations.With it's ever muscular public relations outlets,it can spin civilian casualties as errors and fighters hiding behind non combatants.With the US being the major supplier of arms,and Israel flouting US laws of Not using US munitions against non combatants, this has created a credibility problem amongst other Mideast countries.
Israel's 1980's illegal use of US supplied cluster bombs in Lebanon and it's imprisonment of large numbers of Shias in it's 19 year occupation gave birth to Hizbollah and Mideast suicide bombing.
The US weapon of choice for the Israeli armed forces in the 21st century are munitions known as Flechettes. It literal rips a body to shreds.
View points of other countries.
Few countries see Hezbollah as a terrorist organisation, the majority do not. Among those who consider it to be terrorist are the United States, the United Kingdom, and Israel, among those who do not are the European Union and Russia. Lebanon sees Hezbollah as a legitimate resistance movement. This view is shared by Syria, Iran and all other countries in the Arab World.

Patrice Lumumba
politics
Patrice Émery Lumumba (July 2, 1925 – January 17, 1961) was the only elected leader of the Democratic Republic of the Congo (called the "Republic of the Congo" at the time, but this should not be confused with today's Republic of the Congo). The Americans had plans to kill him because they thought he was friendly to the Soviet Union. He was murdered by the Katangans on January 17, 1961, just months after independence.
Lumumba's son, François is now a political figure in the Congo. He has created a small Lumumbist group.

Paul Kagame
politics
Paul Kagame (born October 23, 1957) is the President of Rwanda.
Though a member of the Tutsi ethnic group, he tends to downplay the importance of his ethicity. He is responsible for ending the Rwandan Genocide. However, he is often seen as a dictator, and has a bad human rights record.

Petr Čech
sports
Petr Čech (20 May 1982 -) is a Czech football player. He currently plays for Chelsea F.C. in English Football Premiership. Before playing for Chelsea, he played in Ligue 1. He became a player for Chelsea in June 2004.
Cech is thought to be one of the best goalkeeper in the Premier League. He had the record of the least losses in his first season playing for Chelsea. That season he helped Chelsea to win the title of Premier League. He also helped Chelsea to win the same title the next year.

Gustav Holst
music
Gustav Holst (b. Cheltenham, 21 September 1874; d. London, 25 May 1934) was a famous English composer. He studied composition at the Royal College of Music in London. He also learned to play the trombone. He became Director of Music at St Paul’s Girls’ School, Hammersmith, (London). Some of his music was written for the pupils at this school, for example: the popular "St Paul’s Suite" (1912-1913) for string orchestra. His most famous work is "The Planets" (1918). This is a suite of seven movements for orchestra, each about a different planet (the Earth is not included, and Pluto had not yet been discovered). The music does not really describe the planets, it describes the Roman gods after which the planets are named. Mars, for example, is the “Bringer of War”. It has a very exciting rhythm with five beats in a bar. Jupiter has a tune which has become famous as the hymn “I vow to thee my country”.

Paul Keating
politics
Paul John Keating (born 18 January 1944) was the 24th Prime Minister of Australia.- Paul Keating grew up in the city of Sydney and the suburb of Blacktown. He left De La Salle College at Bankstown at 15 years of age and worked as a clerk with the Sydney Country Council doing this while juggling with studies and a Rock band called the Ramrods.
Keating was Treasurer since 1983. He challenged and beat Bob Hawke for the job of prime minister in 1991. He won one election in 1993 but was beaten by John Howard in 1996. He was from the Labor Party. As Prime Minister he tried to make Australia better friends with Asian countries.

Peter Crouch
sports
Peter James Crouch is an English football player. He was born in 1981 and he is 201 cm tall. Crouch is playing for Liverpool F.C. and England. He scored 11 goals in 16 games, and he is the first player to score 10 goals for England in a single year. He is known for his famous robotic dance celebration, which he first performed after his goal against Hungary in May 2006. Crouch is currently dating model Abigail Clancy.

Xabi Alonso
sports
Xabi Alonso (born 25 November, 1981) is a Spanish football player, plays for Liverpool F.C.. He used to play in the Spanish League for a club called Real Sociedad.

Julius Nyerere
politics
Julius Kambarage Nyerere (April 13 1922 - October 14 1999), also known as Mwalimu (teacher), was President of Tanzania from 1964 to 1985, though he was still influential in politics until his death in 1999 because of his popularity. He is remembered as an unusually honest leader, especially for Africa, and for helping refugees. When his attempt at using his socialist ideas of Ujamaa failed, he said, "I failed. Let's admit it." He was also responsible for the overthrow of the murderous Idi Amin regime in Uganda.

Keith Richards
music
Keith Richards is an English guitarist and songwriter. He was born December 18, 1943 in Dartford, Kent. He is a guitarist for the band The Rolling Stones.

Edward Elgar
music
Sir Edward William Elgar (b. Broadheath, Northern Worcester, 2 June 1857; d. Worcester, 23 February 1934) was the most famous English composer of his time. He composed in the late romantic era.
Elgar’s father owned a music shop. Apart from having violin lessons Elgar taught himself about music. He studied the printed music in his father’s shop and often travelled with him when he went on his rounds to tune pianos. He heard a lot of cathedral music and often practised the organ. He took over his father’s job as church organist and soon became conductor of local orchestras and bands.
Worcester was a small town but the music there was good. The Three Choirs Festival took place there every third year. In 1884 he was playing the violin in the orchestra when the great Czech composer Dvořák was conducting.
In 1889 Elgar married. His wife Alice came from a family who had more money than the Elgars, and she was 14 years older than him. Many people did not approve of the marriage, but she was a good wife to him and encouraged him in his efforts to be a successful composer.
In 1899 Elgar wrote an orchestral piece called the "Enigma Variations". There is a main tune, and then a series of variations on the tune. Each variation describes one of his friends, but he did not say which friends they were: he only put their initials or nickname at the top of each variation. This is why the piece is an enigma (a “puzzle” or “secret”). People have managed to work out who each friend was, but the meaning of the main tune is still a puzzle. This music made Elgar very famous.
The next work that he wrote is probably his greatest work: "The Dream of Gerontius" (1900). It is an oratorio. Gerontius is an old man who is dying and thinking about whether God will punish him for his sins or save him and take him to heaven. Elgar wrote two other oratorios: "The Apostles" and "The Kingdom". He wrote two symphonies, a violin concerto, a cello concerto, Introduction and Allegro for Strings, Sea Pictures (five songs for mezzo soprano and orchestra) and chamber music including a violin sonata, a string quartet and a piano quintet.
Throughout his life his wife helped him by ruling neat manuscript lines on plain paper so that he could write his music. After she died in 1920 Elgar was so sad that he stopped composing.
Elgar’s most popular piece is the first of his "Pomp and Circumstance" marches. It has the tune which is sung to the words “Land of Hope and Glory” and the audience always join in singing it at the Last Night of the Proms.

Georges Bizet
music
Georges Bizet was a famous French composer of the Romantic period. He is best known for his opera Carmen which is the best-known of all French operas.
Bizet was born October 28,1838. He died June 3,1875.

Klaus Voormann
music
Klaus Voormann (born April 29, 1942) is a German-born artist and musician, who was a friend of The Beatles. He met them when they played in Hamburg, Germany, where he was going to Art school.
Voormann designed the cover of their "Revolver" album, and later did cover art for "The Beatles Anthology" and some of George Harrison's solo records. He also played bass guitar with Manfred Mann, and on records by John Lennon, George Harrison and Ringo Starr, and their friend Harry Nilsson.
He also became a record producer, and produced the band Trio, whose biggest hit was "Da Da Da", which was used later in a Volkswagen television commercial.

Himno Istmeño
music
Himno Istmeño is the anthem of Panama. It was written by Santos Jorge. It is known as the Isthmus Anthem.

Tim Rice-Oxley
music
Timothy James Rice-Oxley (born June 2, 1976 in East Sussex England) is the English pianist of rock band Keane. He plays piano and Bass. He also writes the songs for the band. He took piano lessons which he hated. This because he had to play classic music and he thought it was boring. Later, he began playing the piano listening to The Beatles. In 2004, he won the Ivor Novello award for Best Composer of the year.
In 1995, his friend Dominic Scott told him to make a band. The band was called "The Lotus Eaters". They asked Richard Hughes to play the drums. Tom Chaplin would play bass. Rice-Oxley and Chaplin had been friends since they were children. In 1997, Rice-Oxley asked Chaplin to sing. The band changed its name to "Keane". When Scott left the band in 2001, Rice-Oxley started playing piano again and recording bass separately. He still does that.
Equipment List.
"Complete list: Equipment list"

Tom Chaplin
music
Thomas "Tom" Oliver Chaplin (born March 8, 1979) is the singer of the rock band Keane. He comes from Battle in East Sussex.
He went to Tonbridge school with his friend Tim Rice-Oxley. There they met Richard Hughes and Dominic Scott.
He was invited to join the band in 1997, when the name "The Lotus Eaters" was changed to "Cherry Keane".
When the band moved to London trying to get a record deal, Tom left his Art History studies at the Edinburgh University in 1999 to join the band.
With Scott in the band as the lead guitarist, Tom played the acoustic guitar. Since Scott left in 2001, he took the lead vocals, but also plays the keyboard on some songs. Since Scott left, the band haven't used guitars, with their debut album using only keyboards, drums and vocals.
He also took part in Band Aid 20's re-recording of Do They Know It's Christmas in November of 2004.

Dominic Scott
music
Dominic "Dom" Scott {May 15, 1979) is an Irish guitarist. He is known for being the guitarist of the rock band Keane. In 1995 he asked his friend Tim Rice-Oxley to form a band. They named the band "The Lotus Eaters". They invited Richard Hughes to play the drums.
In 1997 Rice-Oxley asked Scott and Hughes to let Tom Chaplin join the band. Scott and Hughes firstly refused but then accepted.
Rice-Oxley also said in an interview in Mexico: "Dom is a great fan of U2 so maybe we'll met in New York" (Because Keane was the opening band for U2 in 2005).

Hermann Minkowski
science
Hermann Minkowski (June 22, 1864 – January 12, 1909 in Göttingen) was a German mathematician. He was one of Albert Einstein's teachers.

Robert Walpole
politics
Robert Walpole, 1st Earl of Orford was born in Houghton, Norfolk on August 26 1676. He died on March 18 1745. He was England's first Prime Minister in 1721. He was Prime Minister for a longer amount of time than anyone who came after him.
Literally, he was not the first prime minister of Great Britain, because the term wasn't actually used until 1905, he was actually the "First Lord of the Treasury". Therefore the first British prime minister was Henry Campbell-Bannerman because the term "Prime Minister" started being used 5 days after he was elected.

Harry Nilsson
music
Harry Edward Nilsson III (1941-1994) was an American singer and songwriter, whose biggest hits were during the late 1960s, and the 1970s. His songs included "Me And My Arrow", "Coconut", "Cuddly Toy", "Spaceman", and "One", which was also a hit for Three Dog Night. Nilsson's two most famous records were "Without You" and "Everybody's Talkin'", which were written by other people (Peter Ham and Tom Evans of Badfinger; Fred Neil). "Without You" has been re-recorded many times by other singers, and "Everybody's Talkin'" was used in the 1969 movie "Midnight Cowboy".
Nilsson recorded a tribute to The Beatles on his first album, working lines from fifteen of their songs into a single cover version of "You Can't Do That". Derek Taylor, who worked for the Beatles, sent them copies of the album, and Nilsson became a friend of the band. He later shared a house with John Lennon and Ringo Starr, and they worked together on each other's music.
Nilsson also wrote a cartoon movie, "The Point!", which appeared on ABC. It was about tolerance and diversity. "The Point!" was later turned into a musical. One production of the musical starred former Monkees Micky Dolenz and Davy Jones. (The Monkees had recorded two of Nilsson's songs, "Cuddly Toy" and "Daddy's Song", after they met him through producer Chip Douglas.)
The movie "You've Got Mail" features several of Nilsson's songs in its soundtrack.

Che Guevara
sports
Ernesto Guevara de la Serna (June 14, 1928 - October 9, 1967) was a follower of Karl Marx and a doctor who was born in Argentina. He is commonly called Che Guevara or El Che.
He was born in Argentina in 1928. When he was in college, he learned in Buenos Aires about medicine. During breaks, he traveled and saw how poor some people were in Argentina. He started to think that only fighting could solve this.
When he was done with college, he traveled to Mexico, where he met Fidel Castro, who was planing to start a communist rebellion in Cuba. Ernesto joined Fidel, and fought with him in the revolution. In 1959, Fidel won and became president of Cuba. In 1965 he helped to start revolution in Congo-Kinshasa and Bolivia. He was captured, and the Bolivian Army assassinated him in 1967. His body was not found until the year 1997.

John Dalton
science
John Dalton (September 5, 1766 – July 27, 1844) was a British chemist and physicist. He was born in England. He made many discoveries about atomic theory.
Dalton's Atomic Theory.
Dalton's Atomic theory is a scientific theory about atoms. Dalton made the theory to explain why elements would combine in certain ways. The idea of atoms was already known at the time, but not widely accepted. Dalton's theory of atoms was based on actual observation. Before this, ideas about atoms were based more on philosophy.
Although not a part of the Dalton's original atomic theory, it is believed that Dalton's atomic theory contained the way that the atoms use to bond together.

Rudolf Vrba
science
Rudolf 'Rudi' Vrba (September 11, 1924 - March 27, 2006), was a Professor in the Department of Pharmacology and Therapeutics at the University of British Columbia in Canada. His birth name was Walter Rosenberg. In April 1944, he escaped from the Auschwitz concentration camp. After escaping, he passed information to the Allies who were fighting the Axis Powers during the Second World War. He informed the authorities about the mass murder that was taking place at the camp.

Friedrich Nietzsche
music
Friedrich Wilhelm Nietzsche (born October 15, 1844 - died August 25, 1900) was a German author and philosopher. He wrote several books that he hoped would change the world. Many people have found his books interesting and acknowledged them as great works of literature and philosophy.
Beliefs.
Nietzsche wrote a lot about how people should live their lives. He attacked most of the moral ideas that were popular at the time because he did not believe that there are any real facts about what is right or wrong. He thought people should create their own facts about morality.
He also often attacked the morality of the Christian religion. He believed that the Christian idea that one should feel pity when one sees weakness was unhelpful. According to him, weak people rely on other people's love as a way of protecting themselves. Nietzsche believed that people should be stronger than that.
He thought that people should be very aware of their body and of the real world in which they actually live. He told his readers not to live in a daydream or make decisions based on unrealistic thoughts.
Nietzsche considered the world to be one connected thing, including mankind and nature. He invented the idea of the "will to power". This idea is that everyone and everything is trying to overcome itself, or defeat or take control from itself. Therefore, if the world is just one thing, this is the force that makes the world.
Nietzsche thought that human beings would be successful at overcoming themselves, and he thought that when they did, they would be different and better. He named the person who would this someday a "superman" (or "übermensch" in German). He thought that the supermen would be stronger than normal humans, and not restricted by other people's ideas of right and wrong.
Ideas.
The Death of God
Influence.
Adolf Hitler, the German Chancellor and leader of the Nazis in World War II, read Nietzsche's work, and it has been suggested that he misinterpreted Nietzsche's ideas to justify his actions.
Nietzsche wrote in a very fiery and exciting way. However, what he wrote later in his life became more and more odd. When he was forty years old, Nietzsche went insane. Supposedly, one day in the city of Turin, Italy, he saw a horse being whipped by its owner and ran to save it, hugging it around the throat. After this, Nietzsche never wrote again and could not look after himself. This illness may have been caused by the disease syphillis, or a brain tumour.
His writing and ideas are still popular and of interest to academics and intellectuals.

Zinedine Zidane
sports
Zinedine Yazid Zidane (born June 23, 1972, nicknamed Zizou, Yaz and ZZ) is a former football player from France. He played for four European clubs and the French national team.
Career.
Zinedine Zidane played several famous football clubs, like Juventus of Italy and Real Madrid of Spain. He led France to win the 1998 FIFA World Cup and the 2000 European Football Championship. In 2002 he also won the European Championship for Real Madrid, this was the ninth championship for Real Madrid. Zidane became three times World Footballer. He led France to the 2006 world cup final and was arguably the best player in the tournament. He was one of the greatest players of his generation and his reputation was marred by the sending off against Italy in the 2006 world cup final.
Retirement.
In 2006, Zidane announced that he would retire after the World Cup. Zidane was famous for headbutting Marco Materazzi at the 110th minute of the extra time at the Final game and was sent off with a red card; France eventually got second place. This incident was known to many as the Zidane headbutt.

Johannes Kepler
science
Johannes Kepler (lived December 27, 1571 – November 15, 1630) was a German astronomer. He was Tycho Brahe's apprentice, or person who learns a trade from another person. Tycho Brahe looked at the way the planets moved in the sky. This motion is very complex. Johannes Kepler found a simple way to say how the planets move.
Laws which say how the planets move.
A planet moves along a path called an orbit. Kepler used three laws to say what form the path has and how fast the planet moves.

Aegukka
music
Aegukka (Aeguk-kka; 애국가; 愛國歌), meaning The Patriotic Song is the national anthem of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (North Korea). It should not be confused with South Korea's anthem, which has the same name. It is sometimes also known by the first bit of the song, "Achhimŭn pinnara" (아침은 빛나라), meaning "Let Morning Shine".

Aegukga
music
Aegukga (Aeguk-kka; 애국가; 愛國歌), meaning The Patriotic Song is the national anthem of the Republic of Korea (South Korea). It should not be confused with North Korea's anthem, which has the same name.

Tycho Brahe
science
, born as Tyge Ottesen Brahe, (lived December 14 1546 – October 24 1601), was an astronomer from Denmark who built a big observatory called Uraniborg on a place called Hven in Denmark. He discovered that the universe besides the solar system was always changing. Johannes Kepler was his helper.

Exile on Main St.
music
Exile On Main St. is one of The Rolling Stones' most successful albums. It was released in 1972 and includes the hit songs "Happy" and "Tumbling Dice".

McCarthyism
science
McCarthyism is the term describing a period of intense anti-Communist suspicion in the United States that lasted roughly from the late 1940s to the mid to late 1950s. The term gets its name from U.S. Senator Joseph McCarthy, a Republican of Wisconsin. The period of McCarthyism is also referred to as the Second Red Scare. It happened at the same times as increased fears of Communist influence on American institutions, espionage by Soviet agents such as the Rosenbergs, heightened tension from Soviet control over Eastern Europe, the success of the Chinese Communist revolution (1949) and the Korean War (1950-1953).

Snakes on a Plane
music
"Snakes on a Plane" (released in Japan as "Snake Flight" (スネーク・フライト)) is a 2006 movie starring Samuel L. Jackson, about snakes overrunning a plane. The snakes take over the plane, and Samuel L. Jackson's character Neville Flynn kills them all. The movie became very popular before it was released because of the title.

Dave Jauss
sports
Dave Jauss is the current bench coach for the Los Angeles Dodgers. Manager Grady Little hired him before the 2006 season.

Idi Amin
sports
Idi Amin Dada (mid 1920s – 16 August 2003) was a repressive dictator of the African country of Uganda. The President of Tanzania at the time, Julius Nyerere, invaded Uganda to save the country from Idi Amin.
Amin is famous for sending all Asians, mainly from India and Pakistan, out of Uganda. He threw them out because he believed they were taking the jobs of Ugandans. Many of the Asians that left Uganda came back after Amin was thrown out.
Amin also supported the cause of Palestine freedom. This caused the famous hijacking of an Air France flight that landed in Uganda.
He died in 2003 in Saudi Arabia, where he lived after being thrown out of Uganda.
A 2006 movie, "The Last King of Scotland" is about Amin's government. Forest Whitaker won an Academy Award for best actor.

Take Me Out to the Ball Game
music
"Take Me Out to the Ball Game" is a song about baseball. The words were written by Jack Norworth in 1908 and the music was made by Albert Von Tilzer, though both of them have never been to baseball game before.

Kuomintang
politics
Kuomintang (KMT) is a political party in Taiwan. It was in China until 1949 when Communist captured China. Kuomintang means "Nationalist Party".

Chiang Kai-shek
politics
Chiang Kai-shek was a political leader born in Xikou on October 31, 1887. He led China from 1930 to 1949. He led Taiwan from 1950 until his death in 1975.

Bruno Brun
music
Bruno Brun (1910 — 19??) was Yugoslavian clarinet player and professor at the Music Academy in Belgrade.
He graduated from the Belgrade Music Academy in 1945 and continued his education in Paris. He played as a soloist in Yugoslavia and other countries. He was one of the founders of the "Association of Musical Artists of Serbia".

Romano Prodi
politics
Romano Prodi (born August 9, 1939 in Scandiano, Italy) is an Italian politician and leader of a left-wing coalition named "L'unione" (The Union).
Prodi was "President of the Council of Ministers", that is, Prime Minister of Italy between 1996 and 1998.
He then served as President of the European Commission from 1999 to 2004.
He was re-elected Prime Minister of Italy for a second time in 2006, when he defeated Silvio Berlusconi, leader of the right-wing coalition named "Casa delle Libertà" (House of Freedom).

Anthony Kiedis
music
Anthony Kiedis (born November 1, 1962 in Grand Rapids, Michigan) is an American singer. He is the lead singer of the rock band the Red Hot Chili Peppers.
He has been in the band since the start in 1983. His singing is known for his fast rapping, but in the more recent albums he has leaned toward singing. His singing ability has greatly improved over the years, reaching its peak on Stadium Arcadium. He is known for his on stage charisma and high sex appeal within the band and the public. He released a memoir book called Scar Tissue in 2004, which sold a lot of copies, getting to number 17 in the best sellers list. Kiedis is currently not together with Heather Christie who is also the mother to his son Everly Bear Kiedis; he lives with his son in Malibu California.

John Frusciante
music
John Frusciante is an American musician. He was born on March 5, 1970 in Queens, New York. He is the guitarist for the funk rock band, Red Hot Chili Peppers. He has also made a number of solo records. Some of these albums have been made with other artists, for example Josh Klinghoffer. Frusciante is currently on tour with the Red Hot Chili Peppers. They are promoting the band's latest release, "Stadium Arcadium".
Early RHCP Era (1988-92).
John Frusciante joined the Red Hot Chili Peppers in 1988 after the previous guitarist, Hillel Slovak, died of a drug overdose. The band went on to record and release their fourth album, "Mother's Milk" in 1989. Following an international tour, Frusciante co-recorded the band's fifth album, "Blood Sugar Sex Magik". In 1992, he left the band because he was overwhelmed by the international success of "Blood Sugar Sex Magik". Frusciante abruptly announced his departure from the band just a few moments before a performance in Tokyo. He ended up playing the show and left quickly for a plane back to the USA.
Niandra LaDes and Smile From The Streets You Hold.
From 1992 to 1997, he recorded a couple of solo albums, which received various criticism due to Frusciante's use of lo-fi and strange synthesizer effects. Frusciante released "Niandra LaDes & Usually Just A T-Shirt" in 1994 as a cure for there being "no good music around any more". From the time of being out of the band, Frusciante had started to experiment with drugs such as cocaine and heroin. In 1997, he released "Smile From The Streets You Hold" because he needed money for drugs at the time. He later took the album off the shelves as he did not feel comfortable with it being sold.
Return and Red Hot Success.
Band mate and long-time friend Flea asked John if he would like to rejoin the band in 1998. Frusciante was so overjoyed by the question that the band regrouped and started the recording process. In 1999, the band released "Californication". During the Californication tour, Frusciante recorded some more songs in what would eventually become "To Record Only Water For Ten Days", which was released in 2001. Frusciante returned to the recording studio in early 2002 in which they would later release the band's eighth album, "By the Way".
Solo Records and Side Projects.
After yet another world tour with the Red Hot Chili Peppers, Frusciante decided to release some more of his own material between 2004-2005. During this time, John released six of his own solo records, some of which were co-written by Josh Klinghoffer.
Equipment.
John uses has used a wide range of guitars throughout his years with RHCP and as a solo artist. He is known for using a lot of guitars under the Fender brand. Below is a list of equipment that John has used through the years.
Picks.
Red Jim Dunlop Tortex 0.60mm picks

Flea (musician)
music
Flea (Michael Peter Balzary) is an American bassist. He was born on October 16, 1962, in a suburb of Melbourne, Australia. He plays in the rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. He has been with the band since its beginning in 1983 along with vocalist Anthony Kiedis.
Flea is known for his unique bass style. He uses a wide range of bass guitar techniques, mainly popping and slapping and changing the speed of his tempo during songs and his quick improvisation. Flea is also a skilled trumpet player. Flea was the band member responsible for getting John Frusciante back into the band.

Andrey Kolmogorov
science
Andrey Nikolaevich Kolmogorov (Russian: Андре́й Никола́евич Колмого́ров) (April 25, 1903 - October 20, 1987) was a Soviet mathematician and computer scientist. He made major advances in the fields of probability theory and topology. Born in a Russian family in Tambov, he worked early in his career on intuitionistic logic, and Fourier series. He also worked on turbulence, classical mechanics, and information theory; and was a founder of algorithmic complexity theory which is often referred to as simply Kolmogorov complexity theory.
Kolmogorov worked at Moscow State University. He studied under Nikolai Luzin, earning his Ph.D. in 1929. In 1931 he became professor at this university. In 1939 he received the title of academician of the USSR Academy of Sciences. He died in Moscow.

Chad Smith
music
Chadwick Gaylord Smith (born October 25, 1962 in Saint Paul, Minnesota, USA) is a drummer in the rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. He joined the band in 1989 with John Frusciante when guitarist Hillel Slovak died of a heroin drug overdose, and Jack Irons left because of his friend dying. Chad has stayed in the band since then, playing the drums for every single album up to today.

Hillel Slovak
music
Hillel Slovak (April 13, 1962 – June 25, 1988) was an Israeli musician. Slovak was the guitarist for the rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. He was born in Haifa, Israel. His family moved to California in 1967. He was a close friend of singer Anthony Kiedis during high school, and in 1983, they decided to make a band as a joke. The band was called "Tony Flow and the Majestic Masters of Mayhem.". They played a show, but never took the band seriously. In 1984 he left the Red Hot Chili Peppers to play in his other band "What Is This". He rejoined in 1985 to record "Freaky Styley" and "The Uplift Mofo Party Plan" in 1987. He died in 1988 from a fatal drug overdose.

Jack Irons
music
Jack Irons (born July 18, 1962 in Los Angeles, California) was the drummer for the rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. He was in the original band when they formed in 1983. He left Red Hot Chili Peppers to play in his other band What Is This with close friend Hillel Slovak. He came back to the band in 1986 to record "The Uplift Mofo Party Plan". In 1987, Hillel Slovak, the guitarist, died of a fatal drug overdose. He quit the band because of this. Jack Irons now plays in many different bands, most notably Pearl Jam.

Dave Navarro
music
Dave Navarro (born June 7, 1967 in Santa Monica, California) is an American guitarist. He played in many different bands, most notably Jane's Addiction and Red Hot Chili Peppers. With the Red Hot Chili Peppers, they recorded One Hot Minute in 1995. Also, he was married to Carmen Electra from 2003 to 2006.

Charles Babbage
science
Charles Babbage (26 December 1791 – 18 October 1871) was an English mathematician, analytical philosopher, mechanical engineer and computer scientist who originated the idea of a computer that could be programmed. Parts of his uncompleted mechanisms are on display in the London Science Museum.
Charles Babbage was born in England, at 44 Crosby Row, Walworth Road, London. Babbage's father, Benjamin Babbage, was a banker of the Praeds who owned the Bitton Estate in Teignmouth. His mother was Betsy Plumleigh Babbage. In 1808, the Babbage family moved into the old Rowdens house in East Teignmouth.
Knowing that there were lots of errors in the calculation of mathematical tables, Babbage wanted to find a method by which they could be calculated mechanically, removing errors made by humans. Three different factors seem to have influenced him: a dislike of untidiness; his experience working on logarithmic tables; and existing work on calculating machines carried out by Wilhelm Schickard, Blaise Pascal, and Gottfried Leibniz. He first discussed the principles of a calculating engine in a letter to Sir Humphrey Davy in 1822.
Babbage's engines were among the first mechanical computers. His engines were not actually completed because of funding problems. Babbage realised that a machine could do the work better and more reliably than a human being. Babbage controlled building of some steam-powered machines that more or less did their job; calculations could be mechanized to an extent. Although Babbage's machines were large machines their basic architecture was very similar to a modern computer. The data and program memory were separated, operation was instruction based, control unit could make conditional jumps and the machine had a separate I/O unit.

Truman Capote
media
Truman Capote was an author. He is most famous for writing the half-true novel, "In Cold Blood". The novel is based on a murder that happened in Kansas in the 1950's. He became good friends with the man accused of the murder. He was born in 1924 and died in 1984, at age 59.

Alesha Dixon
music
Alesha Anjanette Dixon was born on 7 October 1978, in Welwyn Garden City, Hertfordshire, England to an English mother and African father. She was a former member of UK girl band, Mis-Teeq. She is expected to have her solo debut album released, titled "Fired Up", on 6 November 2006.
Mis-Teeq.
Dixon's career began in 1999 when she met Sabrina Washington when they both joined "Dance Attic" (a popular dance class school in West London), and together they formed a duo and recorded a demo titled "Inspiration". During an audition, they met with Su-Elise Nash, and then together they formed a trio. They were soon signed to Telstar Records with the addition of a new member, Zena McNally, and became the popular Garage/R&B girl band, Mis-Teeq. They released their debut single "Why?" in 2000, and it was not long before founding member McNally left the band to pursue her own solo career. The band made a decision to remain a trio.
In 2001, they released their debut album "Lickin' On Both Sides", featuring hits "All I Want", "One Night Stand", "B With Me" and "Roll On / This Is How We Do It". In 2003, they released their second album "Eye Candy", featuring hits "Scandalous", "Can't Get It Back" and "Style". In 2004, Mis-Teeq toured the United States and released their debut single "Scandalous" from their American debut album "Mis-Teeq", a compilation of the albums "Lickin' On Both Sides" and "Eye Candy". They also released "One Night Stand" before coming back to Europe to start work with their third album. However, Telstar Records was shut down and the band was left with no choice but to have released a 'Greatest Hits' compilation right under exclusive licenses with Universal Recording Company.
Dixon appeared in the N*E*R*D* music video for "She Wants to Move", from their second album "Fly Or Die". The last song she recorded with her band was "Shoo Shoo Baby" for the Disney film "Valiant". In March 2005, they released their 'Greatest Hits' compilation and announced that they were separating each to pursue a solo career. Dixon later announced that she was signed with a ₤500,000 contract deal with Polydor Records and announced that she will work on material for her solo debut album. In summer of 2005, she married her long-time fiancé, rapper MC Harvey (formerly of So Solid Crew).
Solo career.
Dixon has spent an entire year preparing for her solo debut album, "Fired Up". In June 2005, she announced her single to be "Superficial", but the song leaked on illegally file sharing and the company stated her next single to be "Lipstick". She released her official first debut single "Lipstick" on 14 August 2006 and it went to #13 on the UK Single Charts. Dixon announced that she has worked with a wide arrangement of producers for her solo debut album, including Richard X, Xenomania, Johnny Douglas, Brian Higgins, and Paul Eppe. She has even worked on a song with famous UK rapper Estelle.
Dixon announced that her second single will be "Knock Down" a song she describes as a 'reggae-influenced' tune. The single is to be released on 30 October 2006. An album promo of "Fired Up" was released during the early weeks of September, it contained the tracks: "Lipstick", "Knock Down", "Ting-A-Ling", "Fired Up", and "Free", all which are expected to be on her debut album.

Hafez al-Assad
politics
Hafez al-Assad (Arabic: حافظ الأسد Ḥāfiẓ al-Asad) (6 October, 1930 – 10 June, 2000) was president of Syria for three decades. He was succeeded by his son and current president Bashar al-Assad in 2000.

Sergei Rachmaninoff
music
Sergei Vasilievich Rachmaninoff was a famous Russian composer and pianist. He was born on April 1, 1873 (N.S.) and died on March 28, 1943. He was a Russian composer. Because the Russian language uses a different alphabet his name is sometimes spelt in different ways in English (“Sergei” or “Sergey”, and “Rachmaninoff”, “Rachmaninov”, “Rakhmaninov” or “Rakhmaninoff”). "Sergei Rachmaninoff" is the way he spelt his own name when he was in the United States.
He is thought of as one of the greatest pianists of the 20th century. He could play extremely difficult music and had very large hands so that he could play chords with large stretches. As a composer he is thought of as one of the great musicians who composed in the Romantic style, although most of his adult life he lived in the 20th century. His music has wonderful tunes that are easily remembered.
Life.
Rachmaninoff was born in Semyonovo, near Novgorod in the north-west of Russia. His family were important people who had been in the service of the tsars of Russia. His parents played the piano and arranged for him to have piano lessons in Saint Petersburg and then Moscow.
While he was still a student he wrote a short opera called "Aleko". He also wrote some piano pieces including a "Prelude in C sharp minor" with loud, heavy chords. This piece became extremely famous and is still his most popular piano piece today. He used to get fed up with people asking him to play the piece.
Not all his music was well-liked at first. The critics thought his "First Symphony" was very bad. This may have been because the orchestra did not play it very well, but it made Rachmaninoff stop composing for a while. After some years of feeling depressed he wrote his "Second Piano Concerto" which everybody liked very much.
Rachmaninoff became happier. He was allowed to marry Natalia after years of engagement during which the Russian Orthodox Church did not want them to be married. The political conditions in Russia were bad so he lived in Germany and Italy for a time. After the Russian Revolution of 1917 he left his country and never returned. He had been very successful with his "Third Piano Concerto" in the United States, so he went to live in the United States in 1918. Russia had become the Soviet Union and for many years Rachmaninoff’s music was not allowed to be performed there. This worried him a lot and he felt homesick. He did not write very much music during the rest of his life in the United States. One work that did become very popular was the "Rhapsody on a Theme of Paganini" which he wrote in Switzerland in 1934.
Music.
Rachmaninoff’s piano music is mostly extremely difficult to play. He wrote many short pieces called preludes and some studies which are some of the hardest piano music written since Liszt. As well as the "Rhapsody on a Theme of Paganini" he wrote four piano concertos. The Second and Third are very popular today, as is his "Second Symphony".
He wrote some very beautiful choral music which includes a piece for choir and orchestra called "The Bells" and a very long, religious work called the "All-Night Vigil" (sometimes called the "Vespers").
He wrote some chamber music including a lovely cello sonata.
There are several excellent recordings of Rachmaninoff playing his own music. Most of these are available now on CD reissues.

William Gallas
sports
William Gallas (born August 17, 1977) is a French football player (footballer). He plays for Arsenal in England. He plays as a defender.
Before joining Arsenal, Gallas has played for Marseilles of France and Chelsea of England. He also played for France in the 2006 World Cup, winning the runner-up. In 2006 he turned to join Arsenal.

Ruud van Nistelrooy
sports
Ruud Van Nistelrooy (born July 1, 1976) is a Dutch professional footballer who plays for the Dutch national football team. Until 2006 he played for Manchester United F.C., where he has the record for being the club's top scorer in European competition. Van Nistelrooy now plays for Real Madrid, where he wears the number 17 shirt.

Phil Spector
music
Harvey Phillip Spector (born December 26, 1940 in the Bronx, New York) is an American musician (piano, guitar), songwriter and record producer. He is most famous as a producer. He was co-owner of Philles Records (with then-business partner Lester Sill), and later owner of Phil Spector Records.
Early work: The "Wall of Sound".
Spector's signature style was called the Wall of Sound. He used large amounts of echo, doubling and multiplying of musical instruments and the parts to be played, and overdubbing of recorded parts. The built-up effect gave his records an operatic, theatrical quality. The music sounded "bigger than life". The effect carried over especially well on AM radio, which was how most music was broadcast in the 1950s and 1960s.
The recording artists who worked with Spector over the years included The Crystals ("Then He Kissed Me"), The Ronettes ("Be My Baby"), The Righteous Brothers ("You've Lost That Lovin' Feelin'", Gene Pitney ("Every Breath I Take"), Darlene Love ("(Today I Met) The Boy I'm Gonna Marry"), and Tina Turner ("River Deep, Mountain High"). Sonny Bono and Cher were among his backup singers. He married Veronica (Ronnie) Bennett of the Ronettes, who took the name Ronnie Spector.
Spector's strongest work was in creating hit singles. He knew many fans never listened to the B-sides of singles, and radio seldom played them, so often his B-sides would feature an instrumental jam session, without the singers credited on the record, and with titles like "Flip and Nitty". Spector also disliked albums. He called them "two hit (song)s, and ten pieces of junk". When stereo became more popular than mono in recording, Spector didn't follow the trend. In later years he wore a red badge in public, with the words BACK TO MONO.
Many other producers and musicians imitated the Wall of Sound style, or included elements of it in their own work, including Brian Wilson of The Beach Boys. Wilson thought of Spector as his biggest rival, although the two did work together on one song, that was used in a public service announcement.
Hits, and misses.
Not all of Spector's productions became hits. One record, "He Hit Me (And It Felt Like A Kiss)" was pulled from release after complaints were made by listeners, about the song's theme. (The song was later performed by singer Courtney Love.) Another record, "This Could Be The Night" (working with both Harry Nilsson and Chip Douglas), went unreleased, although radio disc jockey Rodney Bingenheimer used it later as his show's theme song. "(Let's Dance) The Screw" was a private kiss-off to Lester Sill, when his partnership with Spector ended badly, and only a few copies were pressed. "River Deep, Mountain High", which Spector thought of as his all-time best work, drew little attention in the United States, but it was a hit in other countries.
"A Christmas Gift to You".
One of the few full albums Spector produced, "A Christmas Gift to You", was released in 1963. The album featured nearly all of the artists Spector worked with regularly. The album didn't become a hit at first, but it went on to become a Christmas perennial. Many music listeners consider the album a masterpiece.
The Beatles.
The Beatles handed over the rough tapes of their unfinished "Get Back" album for Spector to post-produce, after John Lennon and George Harrison both worked successfully with him on "Instant Karma!'", which became a hit single for Lennon. "Let it Be" was the title for the finished album (and movie, filmed during the recording sessions). Beatles fans bought and enjoyed the album and its singles, but some fans and experts disliked portions of Spector's work. Paul McCartney hated the changes Spector made to "The Long and Winding Road", which he meant to have a simple accompaniment, but was released with a choir and orchestra added. McCartney never recorded with Spector, but the other three Beatles worked with him several times, on solo recordings.
On camera.
Spector appeared as an actor a few times. One appearance was in an episode of "I Dream of Jeannie", as a music producer. Another was in the movie "Easy Rider", as a rich man who buys cocaine from the two main characters. A character in a 1970 movie, "Beyond the Valley of the Dolls", was based on the way many people saw Spector. He appeared as himself in scenes from "Imagine", a 1973 film about the recording of John Lennon's 1971 album of the same name.
Later work.
Spector worked less often in the 1970s and 1980s, and his most notable work from those years was with The Ramones and Yoko Ono, the widow of John Lennon. Spector and Ronnie were divorced, and she sued him years later for unpaid royalties from her years as a singer. She collected over a million dollars, after many years of going to court. Spector spent much of his time as a "retired celebrity", staying home at his Alhambra, California mansion or dining out. He sometimes invited women guests home, after a night out drinking alcohol. Some of the women reported later having a pleasant time with Spector. Others told stories of being abused, detained, or threatened with a gun.
Arrest and trial.
In February 2003, police were called to Spector's home to investigate a shooting. Actress Lana Clarkson was found dead on the grounds. Spector was charged with second-degree murder. He admitted possible guilt or involvement in Clarkson's death privately, but decided to plead not guilty in court. Attorney Robert Shapiro was hired to defend him, but Bruce Cutler, and later Linda Kenney-Baden, took over the job. Spector's case went to trial in the spring of 2007, and ended in a mistrial that fall. Spector is waiting to be tried again.

Jermain Defoe
sports
Jermain Defoe is an English football player. He was born October 7, 1982. He is currently playing for Portsmouth F.C and the England football team.

Franz Beckenbauer
sports
Franz Beckenbauer (born September 11, 1945), called "The Kaiser", is a former German football player. He was the coach of the Germany national football team and Bayern Munich.

Steve McClaren
sports
Steven McClaren (born May 3, 1961) is an English football coach. He had coached the England National football team, but he failed to lead England to enter 2008 European Cup. He was sacked on 22nd November, 2007.

Art of Life
music
Art of Life was the fourth album by the Japanese band X Japan. It was released in 1993 and contained only a song of 29 minutes of the same name.

Lulu (singer)
music
Marie McDonald McLaughlin Lawrie (born 3 November 1948), best known by her stage name Lulu'", is a famous Scottish pop singer. Probably her most famous hit was with the song "Shout".

Gamal Abdel Nasser
politics
Gamal Abdel Nasser was the leader of the Egyptian revolution in 1952 The revolution turned Egypt into a republic instead of a kingdom, and it was the reason why the British army got out of Egypt. Nasser was born in 1918 in Upper Egypt, then he became the president of Egypt in 1954. He worked to build the high dam, and made the Suez Canal to be returned to Egypt. Nasser also fought The Six Day War with Israel but Israel won. He died in 1970.
Gamal Abdel Nasser was most beloved by the Egyptian people. He was their saviour from the British occupation & the corrupted royality. He started his era with a series of corrections & rectifications in most of Egypt's systems. Then he started the "Nationalization" or "التأميم" of Egyptian resources. That means that he made the government take possition of most of income sources in the country previously held by individuals & re-distributing them on the commons. This was very "communist" deed.
1) The freedom of education (students get educated in government's schools free of charge with no feez)
2) the construction of the "High Dam" at Aswan, the south of Egypt to produce electricity from the water flow & preserve fresh water for the people to purify & drink & for the irregation of the crops.

Syd Barrett
music
Roger Keith "Syd" Barrett (January 6, 1946 – July 7, 2006) was a famous English musician. Barrett is most famous for starting the rock band Pink Floyd. He started the band in 1965 under a lot of different names. He also wrote the band's first album, "Piper at the Gates of Dawn". After this record came out, he used a lot of psychedelic (mind-changing) drugs. He was forced out of the band in 1968. He made two more records after he left the band, but they were not popular because the lyrics were very unusual, and because the music did not always have a steady beat. However, he became a hero to many modern musicians because of his unique style. Sadly, he later ended up with mental health problems, possibly because of all the drugs he took.
Some of his most famous songs are "Dark Globe", "Octopus" and "Vegetable Man".

Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva
politics
Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva was the 39th President of Brazil. He was born October 27, 1945. He became the President on January 1, 2003. He succeeded Fernando Henrique Cardoso. His wife, the First Lady of Brazil, is Marisa Letícia Lula da Silva.

Grady Sizemore
sports
Grady Sizemore III (born August 2, 1982 in Seattle, Washington) is an American baseball player. He currently plays for the Cleveland Indians of Major League Baseball. His current position for the Indians is center fielder. In 2002, he was traded to the Cleveland Indians by the Montreal Expos.
In 2006, Sizemore was selected to his first All-Star Game as a reserve outfielder. He was 0-2 while batting in the All-Star Game.
Sizemore graduated from Cascade High School in Everett, Washington in 2000. A notable high school star in football, basketball, and baseball, Sizemore signed a letter of intent to play football and baseball at the University of Washington. At the time of his high school graduation, Sizemore was the Cascade all-time leader in rushingyards with 3,081 yards and interceptions with 16.
Sizemore did not play for the college because the Expos selected Sizemore in the 3rd round of the 2000 Draft. The team offered him a $2 million signing bonus for him not to play for the college. Sizemore signed and almost immediately began his quick climb to the big leagues. Sizemore currently resides in Mill Creek, Washington and Tempe, Arizona.

Michael Ballack
sports
Michael Ballack (born September 26 1976 in Görlitz, Germany) is a German footballer and is the current captain of the German national football team. He currently plays for Chelsea F.C., an English club.
Ballack started his career in a small club in Eastern Germany. He later turned to several German clubs, including Bayern Munich. In 2006-2007 he arrived England to join the big club, Chelsea.
Ballack has attended the World Cup Twice in 2002 and 2006, but has not won it with the Germany national football team. He is considered as one of the strongest midfield players of the world. Also he is regarded as the current talent on German national team, and very few German football players achieve this. Ballack was also the only player of east Germany in the world cup squad in 2002.

Helmut Kohl
politics
Helmut Josef Michael Kohl (born April 3, 1930 in Ludwigshafen am Rhein) is a German CDU politician.
From 1969 to 1976 he was the Minister President of the state of Rhineland-Palatinate and from 1982 to 1998 Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany. Kohl helped to arrange the process of German reunification and participated considerably in the European unity process.
His involvement with the CDU donation affair, and in particular offences against party law is open to question

Malcolm Arnold
music
Sir Malcolm Arnold (born Northampton, 21 Oct 1921; died 23 September 2006) was an English composer. He is famous for writing symphonies, concertos and film music. People disagree about whether he is one of the really great composers, or just a very skilled musician. His music is often very tuneful, sometimes it is sentimental. He could write music very quickly. His famous music for the film "The Bridge on the River Kwai" was composed in ten days.
In 1938 Malcolm Arnold went to the Royal College of Music to study composition with Gordon Jacob. He started his career as a trumpeter with the London Philharmonic Orchestra, later becoming principal trumpet. By the late 1940s he was concentrating on his composing career.
Arnold was composing at a time when many composers were writing music which was quite atonal which made it hard to understand, but Arnold’s music is tonal and there are many tunes which are easy to remember. He wrote nine symphonies and several concertos for different instruments, even unusual instruments like the harmonica. Some of his best orchestral works are the set of dances: "English Dances ", "Scottish Dances " and "Cornish Dances ". He also wrote 2 operas, 7 ballets and 2 string quartets. His overture "Tam O'Shanter" is very exciting. It tells in music the story in the poem by Robert Burns.
Arnold wrote music for 132 films. The most famous is "The Bridge on the River Kwai" (1957) for which he won an Oscar. He was the first British composer ever to have won this award. This film includes the famous "Colonel Bogey March". This march had been written many years earlier, but Arnold composed a countermelody to it. His original music for the film includes the famous River Kwai March (this is not the same as the "Colonel Bogey March"). Other films for which he wrote music include "The Belles of St Trinian's" (1954), "The Inn of the Sixth Happiness" (1958) and "Whistle Down the Wind" (1961).
He was made a CBE in 1970 and was knighted in 1993.
Youth orchestras and amateur orchestras enjoy playing his works because they are an exciting mixture of classical, jazz, popular and folk music, and are not too difficult to play.
Arnold’s health was often very poor. At times he fought with alcoholism and depression, and in his later years with dementia. He had moved to Dublin in 1972, but moved back to England in 1984 and settled in Attleborough, Norfolk. His full-time carer Anthony Day helped him a lot during his final years.
Arnold died from a chest infection in September 2006.

Paul Biya
politics
Paul Biya is the President of Cameroon. He has been the country's president since 1982.
Biya was born on February 13, 1933 in the village of Mvomeka'a in Cameroon. At that time, the country was called French Cameroon. He studied at The Sorbonne and the Institut d'Etudes Politiques de Paris in Paris, France. He graduated in 1961 with a bachelor's degree in public law and a diploma in international relations.
After graduating, Biya returned to Cameroon and worked in the government. In 1975, the President Ahmadou Ahidjo gave the job of Prime Minister to Biya. When President Ahidjo resigned on November 6, 1982, Biya became president of the country. Shortly afterwards, Ahidjo and Biya began feuding, and Ahidjo was forced to leave Cameroon.
Biya was elected as the President of Cameroon in 1984, 1988, 1992, 1997 and 2004, but other parties only have been allowed to enter the elections since 1992. The results many of these election results have been called fraudulent (achieved through unfair or illegal ways).
Many organizations, including Amnesty International, have criticized Biya's government for restricting the freedom of the people of Cameroon. These issues include control of the media (newspapers and radio and television stations) and violations of human rights. Biya's supporters point to the country's stability and high literacy rate.

Scottish Socialist Party
politics
The Scottish Socialist Party is a political party which was formed in 1998. It argues for socialism and scottish independence. It has four MSPs in the Scottish Parliament.

Edmund Barton
politics
Sir Edmund Barton (18 January 1849 – 7 January 1920) was the first Prime Minister of Australia. He had a big part in making Australia a country. His government passed laws stopping non-white people from coming to Australia and allowing women to vote in elections. After he was Prime Minister he became a judge of the High Court.

Alfred Deakin
politics
Alfred William Deakin (3 August 1856 - 7 October 1919) was the second Prime Minister of Australia.
He was born in Fitzroy, Melbourne, Australia, the second child of William Deakin. In the 1890s he helped Australia become a country. He was Australia's first Attorney-General (head lawyer) when Edmund Barton was Prime Minister and then became Prime Minister after Barton left. He introduced the Bill to start Australia's High Court, began planning for a railway to cross Australia, took over control of New Guinea from Britain, and introduced old age pensions.
Deakin married Elizabeth Brown on April 3, 1882. They had three children.
When he was old he had Alzheimer's disease which made him forget a lot of things.
Alfred Deakin died on the 7th of October 1919 in South Yarra, Victoria.He was buried at St.Kilda Cemetery.

Chris Watson
politics
John Christian Watson (c. 9 April 1867 - 18 November 1941), known as Chris Waston, was the third Prime Minister of Australia. He was the first Prime Minister from the Labor Party. He was Prime Minister for only 4 months.

Andrew Fisher
politics
Andrew Fisher (August 29, 1862 – October 22, 1928) was the fifth Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister three times. His government helped create the Royal Australian Navy and make Australia's own paper money. When he retired he moved to London.
Fisher was born in Crosshouse, Scotland where he was educated at the Crosshouse Primary School. At the age of 10 he left school to work in the coal mines. In 1885 he moved to Australia where he worked in the coal mines at Burrum and Gympie. He was elected to the Queensland Parliament in 1892. In 1901 he married Margaret Irvine.
When Fisher was Prime Minister a number of important projects were undertaken. The Commonwealth Bank was set up, the Northern Territory of South Australia was transferred to the Commonwealth, the federal capital of Canberra was founded, and the construction of the trans-Australian railway line linking Perth to the other capital cities was begun. As well as introducing maternity allowances, Fisher acknowledged the need for greater political equality for women.
Andrew Fisher is one of Australia's most successful prime ministers because of the changes he made. He was the first prime minister to have a majority in both the House of Representatives and the Senate. He was able to have more than 110 Acts passed into law..

Argentine National Anthem
music
The lyrics of the Himno Nacional Argentino (the national anthem of Argentina) were written by Vicente López y Planes, and the music was composed by Blas Parera. This song was adopted as the national anthem on May 11, 1813, three years before the formal declaration of independence from Spain. May 11 is therefore "Anthem Day" in Argentina.
Modern Version.
The following is the modern version, adopted in 1900, without the vivid attacks against Spain.
2008 comprehensive translation, adapted for the tune
"We Are Free!, We Are Free!, We Are Free!"
O'Hear the sounds of broken old chains,
See enthroned our great noble Flag!
Her glorious passage was for us unveiled,
By "The United Provinces of the South".
And the world's free men now respond...
The Great Argentine people: "We Greet!"
The Great Argentine people: "We Greet!"
And the world's free men now respond...
The Great Argentine people: "We Greet!"
And the world's free men now respond...
The Great Argentine people: "We Greet!"
Well we knew how to fetch them.
Well we knew how to fetch them.
Let us all live crowned with Glory,
Or full with Glory, let's swear to die.
Full with Glory, let's swear to die.
Full with Glory, let's swear to die.

Joseph Cook
politics
Sir Joseph Cook (7 December 1860 - 30 July 1947) was the sixth Prime Minister of Australia from June 1913 until September 1914. He was Prime Minister when World War I started. He moved to London when he retired.

Billy Hughes
politics
William Morris "Billy" Hughes (25 September 1862 – 28 October 1952) was the seventh Prime Minister of Australia. He became Prime Minister during World War I. He tried to introduce conscription but the public did not want it. His party, Labor, kicked him out and he formed a new party with the opposition called the Nationalist Party. He was Prime Minister for over 7 years which was the most of anyone at the time. He was forced to resign by the Country Party in 1923 but he stayed in Parliament until he died.

New Orleans Privateers
sports
The New Orleans Privateers college sports teams for the University of New Orleans (UNO). They play in the NCAA Division I for intercollegiate athletics. The schools teams are a part of the Sun Belt Conference. The University of New Orleans does not currently have a football team.
Sports.
The school did have a football team from 1965 until 1970. During that time, the team had a record of 12 wins, 10 losses and 1 tie. They also won 3 district championships.

Stanley Bruce
politics
Stanley Melbourne Bruce (15 April 1883 – 25 August 1967) was the eighth Prime Minister of Australia from February 1923 until October 1929. He became Prime Minister when the Country Party asked Billy Hughes to resign. His government won elections in 1925 and 1928 but lost the 1929 election and Bruce became the first sitting Prime Minister to lose his seat. He was made a Viscount after he left politics.

James Scullin
politics
James Henry Scullin (18 September 1876 – 28 January 1953) was the ninth Prime Minister of Australia from October 1929 until January 1932. He became Prime Minister two days before the Great Depression began. His government could not stop the effects of the Depression. His government suffered a big defeat at the December 1931 election. Scullin stayed as leader of the Labor Party but lost the 1934 election.

Joseph Lyons
politics
Joseph Aloysius Lyons (15 September 1879 – 7 April 1939) was the tenth Prime Minister of Australia. He was Premier of Tasmania in the 1920s. He was from the Labor party. In 1931 he took his supporters and joined the other side. He started a new party called the United Australia Party. In January 1931 his new party won the elections. Lyons was the first Prime Minister to die while in office.

Metallica (album)
music
Metallica (also known as The Black Album) is Metallica's most successful album, selling over 14 million copies worldwide. It contained songs such as "Enter Sandman", "Nothing Else Matters", "Sad but True" and "The Unforgiven".

Robert Schumann
music
Robert Schumann (b. Zwickau in Saxony, June 8, 1810; died July 29, 1856) was a famous German composer. He lived in the time called the Romantic period. He had to give up his plans for being a concert pianist because he injured his hand. He published a music magazine and wrote a lot of articles about music that had just been composed. His music is full of things that are typical of Romantic music: it is full of emotion, the pieces often have titles that describe things, and they are often inspired by literature. He wrote a great deal of piano music. Some of this music is hard to play, but other pieces are quite easy. Many children learn to play some of the pieces in his "Album for the Young". His songs (Lieder) are among the best ever written. He also wrote larger works like symphonies and concertos and chamber music. Sometimes he felt very happy but at other times he was very depressed. These changes of mood can be heard in a lot of his music.
Life.
Robert Schumann was the fifth and youngest child of a bookseller and publisher. As a boy he liked reading the books in his father’s shop. He began to compose when he was seven. At school he was extremely good at music and literature. He passed his school-leaving examination with very high marks. His family wanted him to be a lawyer, so he went to Leipzig to study law but he hardly ever went to any lectures. He was much more interested in music and literature, but also in women and drinking. He took piano lessons from a teacher called Friedrich Wieck. Wieck had a 9 year-old daughter Clara. Many years later she was to become his wife. Clara was a brilliant pianist. Her father took her on concert tours because she was a prodigy.
Schumann started to compose short piano pieces and songs. He loved the music of Schubert and when he heard that Schubert had died he cried all night. He often practised the piano for seven hours a day. However, he started to have problems with his fingers. It has often been said that he hurt his hands because he made something to stretch his fingers, but people now think it was more likely due to mercury poisoning because doctors had used mercury to try to cure his syphilis. Whatever the reason, he could not continue to be a pianist and he spent the rest of his life composing and writing about music. Many of his articles appeared in a journal called "Neue Zeitschrift für Musik" ("New Journal for Music") which he started.
In 1834 he became engaged to a girl of sixteen called Ernestine, but then Schumann broke off the engagement because he loved Clara Wieck. Clara’s parents did not want her to marry him. Her father did everything he could to stop the marriage. Maybe he guessed that Schumann had syphilis, maybe he knew that he was often drunk. In the end, after many arguments, court cases and secret meetings between Robert and Clara, they were married in 1840.
Schumann suffered from manic depression. When he was depressed he hardly wrote anything, but 1840 was a happy year for him and he wrote lots of songs as well as orchestral music. In 1841 he wrote four symphonies. In 1842 they went on a concert tour together, but Schumann found it difficult because Clara was more famous than he was. He returned alone to Leipzig to work at his publishing. He felt depressed again at this time and drank a lot of beer and champagne. He was happy again when Clara returned, and composed some chamber music. In 1844 they toured Russia and played to the Tsar. By August he had a complete nervous breakdown and could not bear to listen to his own music. It took him some time to recover.
By now he was good at writing all kinds of music. He wrote music for the famous play "Faust" by Goethe. He wrote one opera, "Genoveva", in 1849. His fame spread slowly. For many years Dresden and Leipzig were the only towns where he was famous. In 1850 he became musical director at Düsseldorf. In 1853 he met Brahms. Brahms became a great friend of the Schumann family. Schumann published an article in the "Neue Zeitschrift für Musik" with the heading “Neue Bahnen” (“New Paths”) in which he said that Brahms (who was 20 at the time) was going to be a very great composer. He was right.
Schumann had often thought of trying to kill himself. On 27 February 1854 he threw himself into the river Rhine. He was rescued by some boatmen, but when they brought him to land he seemed to have gone quite mad. He was taken to an asylum where he spent the last two years of his life. He died on 29 July 1856.
Schumann’s music.
Schumann’s piano music is very well known. Although he had to give up his career as a pianist his wife Clara played his pieces and helped them to become famous. Many of his piano works are collections of short pieces, each with a title e.g. "Papillons" ("Butterflies"), "Davidsbündlertänze", "Carnaval". Schumann was thinking of carnival celebrations when he wrote these pieces. The Davidsbündler was a group of people Schumann belonged to who did not like the “Philistines” (people who did not enjoy good music, named after the Philistines in the Bible) In "Carnaval" the two sides of Schumann’s personality are represented by Florestan and Eusebius. Schumann's manic depression (the happy and the tragic moods that he had) are heard side by side in his music. Other piano works include "Scenes from Childhood", "Kreisleriana" and the popular "Album for the Young" which has some quite easy pieces like "Soldier’s March" and the famous "Träumerei" ("Dreaming"). There are also longer works for piano: 3 sonatas, a Toccata and a Phantasie.
His chamber music includes string quartets and a famous piano quintet.
Schumann was one of the great composers of Lieder (German songs). He chose poetry by famous German poets and set them to music in very imaginative ways. The piano has very interesting accompaniments which help to bring out the meaning of the words. He wrote a song-cycle called "Dichterliebe" ("Poet’s Love") which is a setting of some poems by Heinrich Heine. Another song-cycle is called "Frauenliebe und -leben" ("Woman’s Love and Life") to words by Adalbert von Chamisso.
Although the young Schumann seemed to prefer writing short pieces, he became more interested in long works after meeting Mendelssohn. He was also inspired to write symphonies after he discovered Schubert’s Symphony no 9 which no one knew that Schubert had written. He found it in a box in Vienna at the house of Schubert’s brother. Schumann wrote four symphonies. One of his best is the Third which is often called the "Rhenish" Symphony (after the river Rhine). The Fourth in d minor is also a great work. Using only a few musical ideas he develops them in many ways and writes a long, four-movement work. His piano concerto is a great favourite. Clara Schumann played it with the Leipzig Gewandhaus Orchestra at its first performance on New Year’s Day 1846.
After Schumann’s death Clara devoted herself to playing her husband’s music and helping it to become well known. She visited England regularly where she played at concerts. She also edited a lot of Schumann’s works for the publisher Breitkopf und Härtel.

Clara Schumann
music
Clara Schumann (born Leipzig 13 September, 1819; died Frankfurt am Main 20 May, 1896), was the wife of composer Robert Schumann. She was a famous pianist and composer.
Clara was born Clara Wieck. Her father taught her the piano. She was a prodigy and by the time she was thirteen her father was taking her on concert tours.
She was only nine years old when Robert Schumann came to Leipzig to study law at the university. Robert Schumann’s family had told him that he had to study law, but he wanted to be a musician. He took piano lessons from Clara’s father, Friedrich Wieck.
Clara not only learned the piano, she also studied singing, the violin, instrumentation, score reading, counterpoint and composition. By 1835 she was famous in the whole of Europe and was admired by Goethe, Mendelssohn, Chopin, Paganini and, of course, Robert Schumann.
Clara’s father did not want them to marry. He did everything he could to stop the marriage. For several years life was very difficult for them, but in the end, by 1840, they were married.
They had a happy marriage and had eight children. Clara played her husband’s piano works (Schumann had a hand injury and had to stop playing the piano). She ran the household and earned money by teaching and performing. Life was not always easy. When they went on tours together Clara was more famous than her husband, and this was difficult for him. Robert often had depression. They both taught at the Leipzig Conservatorium and Clara also taught privately in Dresden and Düsseldorf.
Robert Schumann died in 1856 after two years in a mental asylum. Clara was left with seven small children to bring up. Nevertheless she continued her career as a pianist and often travelled to other countries, especially England, where she played Robert’s piano works. She was great friends with Brahms and often performed his works, too.
Clara’s own compositions are all from her early years. She was a very gifted composer. In those days people thought that women should not be composers. Playing the piano was one thing, but a woman was not expected to be a professional composer. Clara knew this, and devoted more time to her playing, and to editing her husband’s music.
Clara’s compositions include more than 20 piano works, a piano concerto, some chamber music and several songs.

Anna Politkovskaya
media
Anna Stepanovna Politkovskaya ("Анна Степановна Политковская"; 30 August 1958 — 7 October 2006) was a Russian journalist. Journalists write texts for newspapers. Anna Politkovskaya wrote for the newspaper "Novaya Gazeta". She was born in the New York. Her parents were diplomants. Her origin (virgin) name was Anna Stepanovna Mazepa ("Анна Степановна Мазепа").
Journalism.
She was best-known for her thoughts about the war in Chechnya, a Russian state. She was also against the current leader of Russia, president Vladimir Putin. Many of her texts asked for human rights.
Death.
On October 7, 2006, she was murdered at the house where she lived. Many people think this murder has political reasons. Many western regimes have pressed for a thorough investigation of the circumstances of her death. They see it as another attempt to stifle opposition to the current Russian regime, as perhaps one of the last chances to save the freedom of the press in Russia. The "Noyava Gazeta" has put up a reward for information that can explain why she was killed.
See also.
Boris Berezovsky

Robert Menzies
politics
Sir Robert Gordon Menzies (20 December 1894 - 14 May 1978) was the twelfth Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister for a total of 18 and half years which is the longest in Australia's history. After the death of Joseph Lyons he was elected leader of the United Australia Party and became Prime Minister in 1939. He resigned in 1941 after a lot of criticism. In 1944 he helped form the new Liberal Party. In 1949 he was re-elected Prime Minister. He stayed in the job until he retired in 1966.

Will Young
music
Will Young (born January 20, 1979) is an English singer and actor. He became famous in 2002 when he won the British singing competition, "Pop Idol". Since then, he has had a successful music career.
Will Young has released three albums so far and has had four number one singles in the United Kingdom. He also acted in the film "Mrs. Henderson Presents".

David Lynch
music
David Lynch (born January 20, 1946) is an American independent film director. His movies include "Eraserhead", "Blue Velvet", "The Elephant Man" and "Mulholland Drive". He was also responsible for a television series called "Twin Peaks", his overall most famous work. "Eraserhead", his first movie, is still his most famous theatrical movie. It was recently deemed socially important by the United States Library of Congress. He has done much work with Jack Nance, who has appeared in all but two of his movies. He has said that all his movies will be done using digital video from now on.
He is also famous for his early short films. "The Alphabet" and "The Grandmother" are two of his most famous. "The Alphabet" is about fear of education. "The Grandmother" is about a lonely boy who grows a grandmother like a plant from a seed.

The Dark Side of the Moon
music
"The Dark Side Of The Moon" is a famous album by the band Pink Floyd.
History.
It debuted in 1973 and is their ninth album. It is one of the most famous albums of all time, frequently placing in the top five whenever a rock music authority makes a list of the greatest albums of all time.
Cover.
Its cover, which features a ray of white light going through a prism, is also one of the most famous album covers of all time. Analysts say that statistically, Dark Side Of The Moon is always playing somewhere on planet Earth. It is one of the most famous concept albums (Albums where all the songs are about a central theme. Some concept albums tell a specific story), and used to be the best-selling album of all time. There is an album-pressing plant in Germany that does nothing but create copies of Dark Side Of The Moon.
About.
Dark Side of the Moon is about life.
The opening track, "Speak to Me", features ticking clocks, a racing heartbeat, people talking, and it ends in a loud scream.
"Breathe", a modern day radio staple (Meaning that it is frequently played), is a slow moving song about how endless life feels sometimes.
"On the Run", the next song, was a major technical achievement for its time. Footsteps, airplanes, and an explosion are all heard. The song gives the listener the feeling of being chased.
"Time", one of the album's most famous songs, is about how rushed humans can feel sometimes. An idea expressed is that people give themselves so much to do, yet so little time to do it.
"The Great Gig In The Sky" is a song featuring vocals by Clare Torry. It was originally called "The Mortality Sequence", and featured sounds from religious radio.
"Money", the album's best-selling single, is a catchy jazz song about currency.
"Us & Them" is an anti-war song, reinforcing the idea from "Time" that life is too short to be wasted on something like war.
"Any Colour You Like" is an instrumental song.
"Brain Damage" is one of the most haunting songs on the album, seemingly spoken by a mentally ill person.
"Eclipse", the final song on Dark Side Of The Moon is about life in general, and recaps all the themes from the album.
The album spent over 14 years on the Billboard charts and it is currently the ninth best selling album in the United States.

John Curtin
politics
John Joseph Curtin (8 January 1885 - 5 July 1945) was the 14th Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister for most of World War II. He made Australia an ally of the United States. A lot of people think he was Australia's best Prime Minister. He died just before the end of the War in July 1945.

Frank Forde
politics
Francis Michael Forde (18 July 1890 - 28 January 1983) was the 15th Prime Minister of Australia. He was Prime Minister for only a week after John Curtin died. He lost a leadership contest to Ben Chifley. He lived longer than any other Prime Minister. He died at 92.

Ben Chifley
politics
Joseph Benedict Chifley (22 September 1885 – 13 June 1951) was the 16th Prime Minister of Australia. He won the leadership after the death of John Curtin in 1945. His government tried to take ownership of all Australia's banks. This was not popular and the High Court said that it could not be done. Opposition leader, Robert Menzies said that Chifley and the Labor Party was soft on Communism. This is one of the main reasons why Chifley lost the 1949 election. He died soon after losing the 1951 election to Menzies.

John Gorton
politics
Sir John Grey Gorton (9 September 1911 – 19 May 2002) was the 19th Prime Minister of Australia. He was elected Liberal Party leader after Harold Holt disappeared. Gorton kept Australia in the Vietnam War. His party passed a vote of no confidence in him in 1971 and he resigned. He did not like the Liberal Party after this.

William McMahon
politics
Sir William McMahon (23 February 1908 – 31 March 1988) was the 20th Prime Minister of Australia. He challenged John Gorton for the leadership in 1971 and won. He lost the next election in December 1972 to Gough Whitlam.

ESPN
media
ESPN is an American sports television network. "ESPN" is an acronym for Entertainment and Sports Programming Network.

Advance Australia Fair
music
Advance Australia Fair is the official national anthem of Australia.
Peter Dodds McCormick (c. 1834 -1916) wrote the music and the words for the song. It was first performed in 1878, but it only became Australia's official anthem in 1984.
Between 1878 and 1984, the song was used inside of Australia as a patriotic song. For a time the song announced the news from the Australian Broadcasting Commission. When Australia became a Federation in 1901, the song was sung by a choir of 10,000 people.
"Advance Australia Fair" received 43.29% of the vote, defeating the three alternatives: "Waltzing Matilda" (28.28%), "Song of Australia" (9.65%), and the existing national anthem "God Save the Queen" (18.78%). However, it was not until 1984 that the national anthem was changed to reflect the popular vote.
Other songs and marches have been influenced by Advance Australia Fair, such as the Australian Vice-Regal salute.

Fabio Cannavaro
sports
Fabio Cannavaro (13th September 1973 -) is an Italian football player who now plays for Real Madrid of Spain. He was the captain of Italy's winning World Cup squad in 2006.
Cannavaro had originally played several famous football club in Italy, such as SSC Napoli, Parma F.C., Inter Milan and Juventus. He won several champions of Italian Serie A in the past, and a UEFA Cup in 1999. In 2006, he turned to Spain to join the Spanish giant Real Madrid, as a defender of the team.
Cannavaro is a famous defender who represent Italian national football team for over 100 times, joining three times of World Cup. In 2006 he led the national team to win the champion of World Cup, and then won the World Footballer of 2006. As few defenders can be very popular, some people comment that Cannavaro has excellent talent, just like German legend Franz Beckenbauer.

Gough Whitlam
politics
Edward Gough Whitlam (born 11 July 1916) was the 26th Prime Minister of Australia. He is the only Prime Minister to have been dismissed by the Governor-General. He was Prime Minister for three years. His government made a lot of changes compared to the previous Liberal governments.
His government did not have a majority in the Senate (the upper house of the Australian Parliament). This made it hard for Whitlam's government to make laws. In 1975 the opposition, led by Malcolm Fraser, blocked government supply in the Senate. This meant that the government had no money. This was a big crisis in Australia. In order to end the crisis the Governor-General, Sir John Kerr, dismissed Whitlam and made Fraser the Prime Minister. Whitlam lost the election that was held a month later.
Whitlam is one of the most controversial people in Australia. Many people think of him as a hero while others consider his government to have been poor.

Malcolm Fraser
politics
John Malcolm Fraser (born 21 May 1930) was the 27th Prime Minister of Australia. He became Prime Minister in November, 1975 when Governor-General, Sir John Kerr, dismissed Gough Whitlam. At this point he was only temporary Prime Minister. He won the election held in December, 1975. He won two more elections in 1977 and 1980 before losing to Bob Hawke in 1983.
His government stopped some of the changes made by the Whitlam government. They also reduced government spending to stop money becoming less valuable. He also supported efforts to abolish racism in South Africa, the boycott of the Moscow Olympics and more immigration from Asian countries.

Australian Labor Party
politics
The Australian Labor Party is one of the two major political parties in Australia. The party was made in 1891; it is the oldest political party in Australia. It is currently in power in Australia, meaning that it runs the Government. Its current leader and New Australia's Prime Minister is Kevin Rudd.
Image:Labor 1901c.jpg|thumb|Group photograph of Federal Labour Party MPs elected to the Australian House of Representatives and Australian Senate at the first 1901 election, including Chris Watson, Andrew Fisher, Billy Hughes, Frank Tudor, King O'Malley and Lee Batchelor.

Bob Hawke
politics
Robert James Lee "Bob" Hawke (born 9 December 1929) was the 23rd Prime Minister of Australia. He was a union leader before he entered parliament in 1980. He became leader only a little while before the 1983 election but he defeated Malcolm Fraser. His government made many changes, like the Whitlam government, but did it more slowly and with more planning. His government moved Labor to the right economically. His leadership was challenged twice by Paul Keating. He lost the second time and retired.

Jane Goodall
science
Jane Goodall, born in England on April 3rd,1934, is a biologist. She has been interested in animals since childhood. She went to Kenya and met Dr. Louis Leakey there. He thought that she would do a lot of important research, and sent her to Africa. Many people thought she could not live and do research in a dense forest of Africa, because she had no experience or background. Even the UK and Tanzanian governments thought this. But she made many useful discoveries, surprising many people.
One day, she saw a chimpanzee putting a stick in an ant hole to catch white ants. This news, and her name, became famous all over the world. The reason is because before that, scientists had defined a boundary separating human beings from other animals by use of tools. She is a caring person who has a soft spot for monkeys.

Pete Townshend
music
Pete Townshend is the lead guitarist and songwriter for the rock group The Who. He is famous for his performance, where he would be very, very energetic. An example of this is his famous "windmill" move.

Condoleezza Rice
politics
Condoleezza Rice (born November 14 1954 in Birmingham, Alabama) is the 66th and current United States Secretary of State. She is the second Secretary of State under President George W. Bush. She took over from Colin Powell on January 26, 2005, after he stepped down. Rice is the first African American woman, second African American (after Powell), and second woman (after Madeleine Albright) to serve as Secretary of State.
Before she became Secretary of State, Condoleezza Rice was Bush's National Security Advisor during his first term (2001–2005). Before she did this, she was a Professor of political science at Stanford University from 1993 to 1999, where she also was the Provost.

Mily Balakirev
music
Mily Alexanyevich Balakirev (born Nizhny-Novgorod 2 January 1837; died St Petersburg 29 May 1910) was a Russian composer. His music sounds very Russian, and he was a very important influence on other Russian composers such as Modest Mussorgsky, Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov, Alexander Borodin and César Cui. These five composers were known as the “Mighty Handful”. Balakirev mainly wrote music for orchestra, choir and piano and solo songs.

Hector Berlioz
music
Hector Berlioz (born La Côte-St-André, Isère, 11 December 1803; died Paris, 8 March 1869) was a French composer. He was one of the greatest composers of the 19th century. His music is typical of the Romantic period: full of passion and often based on ideas outside music. He was not particularly good at playing any instrument, but he was brilliant at writing for the orchestra. Some of his most famous works include several orchestral overtures, the "Symphonie Fantastique", the opera "Les Troyens" ("The Trojans"), the requiem "Grande messe des morts" and the song cycle "Les nuits d’été" (Summer Nights). He was very original as a composer, and his music was not fully appreciated until many years after his death.
Childhood and student days.
Berlioz was the eldest of six children. One brother and one sister lived to be adults, and Berlioz was always very fond of them both. His father was a doctor. The family lived in the country, north west of Grenoble.
Berlioz only went to school for a short time, when he was ten years old. The rest of his education he had from his father. He liked French and Latin literature and travel books about faraway countries. He learned to play the flute, the flageolet and the guitar. He read a book by Rameau about harmony. He never had a piano. He just imagined the sounds of chords in his head. He was only 12 when he fell in love with a girl called Estelle who was 18. He was teased about it a lot. He started to compose some music.
When he was 17 his father said that he wanted him to be a doctor. Berlioz wanted to study music, but his father made him go to Paris to study medicine. Berlioz was to stay in Paris for the rest of his life. He studied medicine for two years, but he hated it. One day, in an anatomy lesson, he had had enough and jumped out of the window. He started to study music. His father was furious and stopped sending him money. Berlioz was very poor and started writing musical criticism for newspapers. This is how he earned most of his money for the rest of his life. He was also borrowing money from friends.
Berlioz started going to the Opéra. He particularly liked the music of Gluck and went to the library to study Gluck’s scores. At the end of 1822 he found a good teacher. His name was Le Sueur. He made Berlioz stop publishing his music until he had learned to compose properly. In 1826 he was officially a student at the Conservatoire. He continued to study with Le Sueur and with Reicha. He tried four times to win the important music prize called Prix de Rome. The first time he wrote a piece called "La Mort d’Orphée" ("The Death of Orpheus"). The judges said it was unplayable, but Berlioz got an orchestra to play it. The second time he wrote a piece called "Herminie" which had a tune he used later as the main tune for his "Symphonie fantastique". The third time he wrote a cantata "La mort de Cléopâtre" which is a wonderful work but he still did not win the prize. The fourth time he wrote a cantata "La mort de Sardanapale", and he won the prize. Nearly all the music for this work is now lost.
Berlioz did not understand any English, but he went to a performance of Shakespeare’s "Hamlet" given by an English theatre company. The actress taking the part of Ophelia was called Harriet Smithson. Berlioz fell passionately in love with her, although he did not know her, and started following her about everywhere. In the end he married her. The marriage was not a success. Berlioz was really in love with Ophelia, the character from Shakespeare’s play. He found it hard to love Harriet in real life.
Shakespeare’s plays, however, were to be a great inspiration for Berlioz. He wrote many works which are inspired by Shakespeare, including "Roméo et Juliette", "Béatrice et Bénédict", "Roi Lear" and several others. He was also inspired at this time by Goethe’s Faust as well as by many other writers including E.T.A. Hoffmann, Scott and Byron. He also discovered the music of Beethoven which helped him to learn how to give shape to large compositions.
Berlioz started to be very busy putting on concerts of his music in Paris. He was quickly becoming known as a very original young composer. Winning the Prix de Rome gave him a steady income for a time, but he was supposed to go to Rome. Berlioz did not want to go to Rome. He said that he had plenty of work in Paris. The real reason why did not want to go was probably because he was in love with a 19- year-old girl called Camille Moke.
The 1830s.
Berlioz spent 15 months in Rome. On his way there he visited his parents who seemed to have forgiven him for not studying medicine. They could now be proud because their son was so successful. In Italy Berlioz did not write much music. He did not like Italian music or Italian art, but he was inspired by the countryside, the sun, the sea, the people he met: sailors, peasants, sculptors, travellers. He did not like the city of Rome, although he did like Florence. He hated the Villa Medici, the house where he had to stay. When he travelled about he wrote some music. When he heard the news that Camille now loved another man he became so furious that he left Rome in order to return to Paris to kill them both. However, when he got as far as Nice he calmed down and changed his mind. He returned to Rome.
At the end of his time in Italy he returned to Paris, visiting his parents on the way. He started organizing concerts of his music. This is when he got to know Harriet Smithson. They had a strange courtship and he married her in 1833. The next year they had a son. The marriage was never easy. Their personalities were different, they were poor, and they did not speak one another’s language. In 1842 they separated and Harriet died in great poverty in 1854.
Although a few people thought that Berlioz was an original composer, many others thought his music was very strange. He hardly earned any money from composing. Most of the money he earned came from musical journalism, which is something he hated. When his works were performed, he usually conducted them himself. He wrote a work for viola and orchestra called "Harold en Italie". Paganini had asked him to write it for him to play, but when Paganini saw the music he did not like it because it was not “showy” enough for the viola. Some years later Paganini heard the work and decided he liked it, so he paid Berlioz 20.000 Francs. This was a lot of money, and it made it possible for Berlioz to spend time writing a big new work: "Roméo et Juliette". When this was first performed some critics thought that Berlioz did not understand Shakespeare probably. However, Richard Wagner, who was in the audience at the first performance, was very impressed. Berlioz tried to be successful as an opera composer, but people did not understand his original music. He wrote a "Grand symphonie funèbre et triomphale", originally written for a military band. "Les nuits d’étés" is a very moving song-cycle.
Later life.
During the 1840s and 1850s Berlioz spent much of his time travelling abroad. He went to Germany, Austria, Russia and England. He was becoming more famous abroad than at home in France, although he still continued to go back to Paris. The Germans loved his music and were impressed by his conducting. He rarely conducted anything except his own music. In 1946 he composed one of his finest works: "La Damnation de Faust" which was performed in the Opéra-Comique. The opera house was half empty. It was a great disappointment to him. Berlioz continued to tour to other countries where people appreciated him. He had great success in St Petersburg, in Berlin where he performed to the King of Prussia, and in London, where he never got paid for the concerts that Jullien conducted because Jullien had no money left. However, he had other successes in London and the English liked him very much.
In 1854 Harriet Smithson died and seven months later Berlioz married Marie Recio, a singer he had known for 12 years. Her Spanish mother came to live with them, and she looked after Berlioz very kindly in his last years when he was ill. Berlioz’ son Louis had become a captain in the navy and travelled all over the world. This was something Berlioz had always dreamt of doing since his childhood when he used to read travel books. Berlioz was terribly sad in 1867 when he heard that Louis had died in Havana of yellow fever.
Berlioz had always had a passion for the Latin poet Virgil. In 1856 he spent a long time writing a long opera in five acts called "Les Troyens" ("The Trojans"). He knew it would be almost impossible to find anyone who would put on a performance. It only became possible in 1863 after he had divided the work into two parts. After that it was 30 years before the opera was performed again. It contains some of his best music. The storm scene is especially famous and often performed separately as an orchestral piece.
As he got older he became obsessed with death. He had lost two wives, and his two sisters had also died. He started to walk in cemeteries. He wrote his "Memoires" (autobiography) which is extremely interesting and well written. It has been translated into many languages including English.
In 1863 he wrote to Estelle, the girl he had loved when he was a child. She was now a widow of 67 and he was 60. He visited her in Lyons and loved her again. He wrote regularly to her for the rest of his life, and stayed with her three times in Grenoble where she lived with her son. She gradually understood him better, and she gave him much happiness during his last years.
A final journey to St Petersburg was too much for Berlioz. He became ill. He went to Nice on the way home, where he twice collapsed while walking by the sea. He went back to Paris where he was cared for by his mother-in-law. He died on 11 March 1869 and was buried in the Cimitière Montmartre.
Berlioz’s reputation.
Berlioz is a clear example of a “prophet who is without honour in his own country”: not many people in France realized he was a great composer, but in other countries he was welcomed as one of the great composers and conductors of his day. Many of his works are difficult to describe. His "Symphonie fantastique" is not quite a symphony, his "Harold en Italie" is not quite a concerto. His "Requiem" is not a normal, religious requiem, "Roméo et Juliette" is a mixture of all sorts of things. He wrote five operas, which are all very different in style. His songs are tender and lovely, influenced by the French romance. His overtures are very popular at orchestral concerts. His music is very original and, although he wrote a book on orchestration, the sounds he composed were so personal that no one could imitate him. He was not good at playing any instrument, but could imagine all the sounds in his head. Many of his melodies stretch themselves over an unusual number of bars. A lot of his orchestral music is programme music: it is often inspired by books or wild stories in his imagination.

Vincenzo Bellini
music
Vincenzo Bellini (born in Catania on November 3 1801; died near Paris on September 23 1835) was an Italian composer. He was one of the most important opera composers of the early 19th century. He gave his singers beautiful melodies to sing, with sensitive orchestral accompaniments. He never married, although he had some passionate love affairs, and he argued a lot with other composers such as Donizetti. His greatest operas are "I puritani", "La sonnambula" and "Norma". In the 1950s famous recordings were made of these operas by the legendary soprano Maria Callas.

Charles-Valentin Alkan
music
Charles-Valentin Alkan (born Paris 30 Nov 1813; died Paris 29 March 1888) was a French composer and pianist. His real name was Morhange. He was a virtuoso pianist who wrote a lot of piano music which is mostly extremely difficult to play. Although people like Franz Liszt and Busoni thought he was a great composer, it is only in recent years that most people have realized how good his music is. His piano music is mostly tonal, but it changes key in unusual ways. The story was told by many people that he died when a bookcase collapsed on top of him, but that story is proved not to be true.

Thomas Arne
music
Thomas Arne (born London baptized 28 May 1710; died London 5 March 1778 was an English composer and violinist. He was the most famous musician in the theatre in England in the 18th century. He wrote music for lots of plays. He did not have the genius of Handel, but he had a great gift for writing beautiful tunes. Songs such as "Where the bee sucks" are still very popular. His best known tune is "Rule Britannia" which is sung every year at the Last Night of the Proms.

Johann Nepomuk Hummel
music
Johann Nepomuk Hummel (born Pressburg November 14 1778; died Weimar October 17 1837 was an Austrian composer and pianist. He was a child prodigy. His family moved to Vienna when he was eight. Mozart thought he was so talented that he taught him free of charge. Hummel became one of the greatest pianists and composers in Europe. He always wrote in a Classical style, he never became an early Romantic like Beethoven.

UPN
media
UPN (which originally stood for the United Paramount Network) was a television network in over 200 places in the United States. UPN was owned by CBS Corporation, which also owns the larger CBS network. UPN shut down on September 15, 2006, and was replaced with The CW Television Network.

Jürgen Klinsmann
sports
Jürgen Klinsmann (born July 30 1964 in Göppingen) is a German football player who started in VfB Stuttgart, a club in Germany, when he was seventeen. In 1990 he won the FIFA World Cup with the Germany national football team. Later, he also played for Inter Milan, AS Monaco, Tottenham Hotspur and Bayern Munich. In 2004 he became the coach of Germany's National Football Team, that was third in the World Cup of 2006. Now he lives in California and will perhaps be the coach of Mexico national football team. Taking his place in the German team is Joachim Löw.
Player career.
Before Jürgen Klinsmann became a professional soccer player, he worked as a baker-associated in the baker's shop of his father in Stuttgart-Botnang. In the youth he played by SC Geislingen. The first station of his professional career was Stuttgarter Kickers. His career as player ended in 1998 after the World cup in France, as Germany was separated versus Croatia from the tournament. He played for the U21 and the U16 team of Germany, after that he played ten years for the A-Team. 1988 by the Summer Olympics in Seoul he had won the bronze medal. Jürgen Klinsmann has played 221 Bundesliga games and shot 110 goals there. In the national team of Germany he played 108 games and 47 goals. He shot by the World cups 1990, 1994 and 1998 altogether eleven goal and is after Gerd Müller the German player with the most Worldcup-goals.

Geddy Lee
music
Geddy Lee (born Gary Lee Weinrib on July 29, 1953 in Toronto, Ontario) is the Canadian bass guitarist, singer, and synth player of the rock band Rush. He is known for melodic basslines and high pitched singing.
In the 1970s, Geddy Lee mainly used Rickenbacker 4001 basses. For the Grace Under Pressure album he used Steinberger basses. From the mid-80's to mid-90's he used Wal basses. Currently, he uses Fender Jazz basses.

Eva Perón
politics
María Eva Duarte de Perón (May 7, 1919 – July 26, 1952) was the second wife of Argentine President Juan Perón. She was first lady from 1946 until she died in 1952 and she served with her husband as a co-ruler of Argentina during those years. Before she died the Congress made her Spiritual Leader of the Nation. She worked as an actress before she married Peron.
By the time of her death, she was one of the most powerful women, or maybe even the most powerful woman, in the world. She is known for her work in many charitable and feminist causes, and became an icon to many people in Argentina. Evita was President of the Peronist Women's Party, a big and powerful political party made up of women who supported the Perons' party. She ran the Ministry of Labor and the Ministry of Health. The Eva Peron Foundation gave a lot of money and other things to the poor. The poor liked Evita Peron a lot. Her life inspired both a musical and a movie called "Evita". The movie starred Madonna.
When she died (of cervical cancer), her corpse was embalmed. After her husband was overthrown, her body was lost for almost 20 years, until it was found in Italy. It was brought back to Argentina and buried with her husband after he died in 1974. It was brought back by the President, a woman named Isabel Perón, who was married to Juan Perón years after Eva's death.

Richard Strauss
music
Richard Strauss (born Munich June 11 1864; died Garmisch-Partenkirchen, Bavaria, September 8 1949) was a German composer. He soon became very famous when he was a young man. His tone-poems were played by orchestras all over Europe. After 1900 he spent most of his time writing operas. His opera "Der Rosenkavalier ", written in 1910, is extremely popular. Strauss was the last great composer who wrote in a Romantic style. He liked the music of Wagner who was a great influence on his music, but he also liked Mozart and his works also shows the elegance and grace of Mozart’s music. Strauss was a very good conductor and often conducted his own music.
He is not related to the Austrian Johann Strauss family famous for their waltzes.

Gustav Mahler
music
Gustav Mahler (born Kalischt (now Kalište), Bohemia, July 7 1860; died Vienna, May 18 1911) was a Czech-Austrian composer and conductor. He was one of the last great composers of the Romantic period. He wrote nine symphonies (he left a tenth symphony unfinished) and several collections of songs with orchestral accompaniment. He was very interested in German folk song and he found new ways to use folk song in large orchestral symphonies. His work "Das Lied von der Erde" ("The Song of the Earth") is one his greatest works, combining song with the form of a symphony. He was also a great conductor and helped to make the Vienna Opera world famous.

Johann Strauss I
music
Johann Strauss I (born Vienna, March 14 1804; died Vienna, September 25 1849) was as Austrian composer, conductor and violinist. He and his family were famous composers of dance music, especially waltzes. He is usually known as Johann Strauss I or Johann Strauss Sr (Senior), while his son, who was also called Johann, is usually known as Johann Strauss II or Johann Strauss Jnr (Junior). The waltz was just becoming popular in the early 19th century and Johann Strauss I wrote many delightful waltzes and other dance music for the court balls. His most famous tune is the "Radetzky-March" which became a musical symbol of the power of the Habsburg monarchy.

Johann Strauss II
music
Johann Strauss II (born Vienna, October 25 1825; died Vienna June 3 1899) was an Austrian composer, conductor and violinist. His father, also called Johann, was also a very famous composer, and is now known as Johann Strauss I (or Johann Strauss Snr) while his eldest son is called Johann Strauss II (or Johann Strauss Jnr). Strauss became very famous for his waltzes. He was known as the “King of the Waltz”. His most famous one was called "An der schönen, blauen Donau" (known in English as "The Blue Danube").
His father wanted him to go in for banking, but the young Johann took violin lessons in secret from a man called Franz Amon who was the leader of his father’s orchestra. He continued his violin studies with Anton Kohlmann, a violinist who helped ballet dancers to learn the music they had to dance to. He was still only 18 when he got his own orchestra together and gave his own concert which included six of his own waltzes and some of his father’s. He was soon becoming more famous than his father. After his father died in 1849 the two orchestras joined into one and the young Johann was their conductor. He was given the title “k.k.Hofballmusikdirektor” (meaning; Musical Director of the Court Ball). He was always especially busy during Carnival time when there were lots of balls in Vienna. He toured most of Europe with his orchestra, even going to Russia where he conducted some music by Tchaikovsky. Johann Strauss II was becoming the “king of the waltz”, the most famous musician in Austria.
Johann Strauss II wrote two operas: "Die Fledermaus" ("The Bat") and "Zigeunerbaron" ("Gypsy Baron"). They are full of fun: lively music and jokes which can sometimes be made different in each performance: the singers can put in their own jokes about modern times. Sometimes they are called operettas because they are so light-hearted. They are a mixture of Hungarian and Viennese atmosphere.
Together with his brothers Josef and Eduard, Johann had complete control of the balls and concerts in the houses of the rich people in Vienna. Wherever he went he was surrounded by lots of admirers. His waltzes are still as popular as ever, and millions of people in different countries hear them on television on New Year’s Day when they are played by the Vienna Philharmonic Orchestra at their traditional New Year’s Day concert.

Konrad Adenauer
politics
Konrad Hermann Josef Adenauer (born January 5, 1876 in Cologne; died April 19, 1967 in Rhöndorf (part of Bad Honnef)). From 1949 to 1963 he was the first Bundeskanzler (chancellor) of the Federal Republic of Germany and from 1951 to 1955 was foreign secretary the same time.
Adenauer was the third of five children of a court secretary in Cologne. His family was Catholic. Konrad Adenauer started his political career in 1906 in the city assembly of Cologne. From 1917 to 1933 and again in 1945 he was mayor of Cologne.
Adenauer was member of the Catholic Zentrum Party. When the Nazi Party took power he lost his job. At first he worked with the Nazis, but after the conspiracy to kill Hitler failed in 1944 he hid for his own safety.
After the war he became mayor of Cologne again, but lost the job after a few months.
In the Parlamentarischer Rat of West Germany, he was one of the top politicians and the President. He founded the CDU at the same time.
He was important in making Bonn the West German capital instead of Frankfurt am Main.
In 1949 he was elected as the first Chancellor of the Federal Republic of Germany.
He made sure West Germany joined the side of the western capitalist countries in the Cold War. He also helped West Germany join NATO. He was reelected three times.
In 1964 he stopped being chancellor. He was a representative in the Bundestag until his death at 91 years old.

Miri Ben-Ari
music
Miri Ben-Ari is a hip-hop violinist. She was born in Israel in 1978 and was brought up in a small town near Tel Aviv. She was trained as a classical violinist. She was a prodigy and was praised by famous violinists like Yehudi Menuhin and Isaac Stern.
At the age of 16 she took herself to the United States. She spoke no English at the time. In New York City, she met several musicians such as the trumpeter Wynton Marsalis who supported her. She became interested in contemporary R&B (Rhythm and Blues) and hip-hop. In January 2001 she appeared in the Carnegie Hall with the rapper Wyclef Jean. Later that year her TV performances on "Showtime at the Apollo" added to her fame. Her second jazz album, entitled "Song of The Promised Land" features the dance single "Peace in the Middle East" as well as two tracks together with Wynton Marsalis. She has now sold millions of records, and is known as “the hip-hop violinist”. This was the title of a record released in 2005 by Universal which includes the single “Sunshine to the Rain” featuring Scarface and Anthony Hamilton. In 2004 she toured world-wide with rapper Kanye West. She has a very personal sound which is a mixture of Classical, jazz, hip-hop, R&B and world music. She won her first Grammy award in 2005 for co-writing “Jesus Walks” which received a trophy for the “Best Rap Song” in 2005.

Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov
music
Nikolai Andreyevich Rimsky-Korsakov (Russian:Николай Андреевич Римский-Корсаков, "Nikolaj Andreevič Rimskij-Korsakov", also "Nikolay", "Nicolai", and "Rimsky-Korsakoff", born Tikhvin, near Novgorod, 18 March 1844; died Lybensk, near St Petersburg, 21 June 1908) was a Russian composer. He was one of the most famous composers of his time and influenced a lot of other composers. He is best known for his operas, orchestral music and songs. He was a brilliant writer for orchestra and loved to write music about fairy-tale stories and legends. His best-known work is "Sheherazade", an orchestral piece which describes in music the stories told by Sheherazade in the 1001 Nights. He also completed or re-orchestrated several works by Modest Mussorgsky which had been left unfinished.

Modest Mussorgsky
music
Modest Petrovitch Mussorgsky (born Karevo, Pskov district, March 21, 1839; died St Petersburg, March 28, 1881) was a Russian composer. He is famous for his operas and songs. He discovered new ways of writing for the voice which were very tuneful but which also suited the Russian language. His most famous opera is "Boris Godunov". He wrote an overture called "Night on a Bare Mountain". Another very famous piece is called "Pictures at an Exhibition". He wrote it for the piano, but many years after his death another composer called Maurice Ravel orchestrated it and this is the version people usually hear today. Some of his works were re-orchestrated and "improved" by the composer Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov. In recent years people have started to think that what Mussorgsky wrote originally was better.
Mussorgsky drank heavily and died of alcoholism.

César Cui
music
César Cui (born Vilnius, 18 January 1835; died 26 March 1918] was a Russian composer. He is the least known of the five Russian composers who were nicknamed the “Moguchaya Kuchka” (“Mighty Handful”), a group which included Mily Balakirev, Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov, Modest Mussorgsky and Alexander Borodin. Cui’s father came from France and his mother from Lithuania.
Like most Russian composers in the 19th century he was an amateur composer. His main job was as an expert on military fortifications. He became a professor in this subject and wrote important textbooks about military defences. He became a general.
Cui liked his friends from the Moguchaya Kuchka, but was often very critical of music by other Russian composers such as Tchaikovsky and Rachmaninoff. This may have been because he was jealous of their success. He did not find orchestration easy and Balakirev helped him a lot with the orchestration of some of his compositions. He was best when writing songs and short piano pieces. He liked to write music that sounded Far Eastern in character. Cellists like to play a short piece he wrote called “Orientale”.

Alexander Borodin
science
Alexander Porfir'yevich Borodin (born St Petersburg November 12 1833; died St. Petersburg February 27 1887) was a Russian composer. Like many Russian composers of the 19th century he was an amateur musician. His main job was Professor of Chemistry at the University of St Petersburg. He had to compose in his spare time. He used to tell his friends: “Please do not say: ‘I hope you are well’, please say: ‘I hope you are ill’”. When he was ill he had more time to write music. Borodin’s most famous opera is called “Prince Igor”. He wrote many fine songs, chamber music and orchestral music including two symphonies. The Nocturne from his String quartet no 2 is especially well-known.

Werner Heisenberg
science
Werner Karl Heisenberg (December 5, 1901 - February 1, 1976) was a German physicist, Nobel Prize winner and one of the people who started a new area of physics called quantum mechanics. Most people think that he is one of the most important scientists of the 20th century. He is also well-known for discovering the Heisenberg uncertainty principle, which explains that there is a limit on how well some things can be measured.
Heisenberg was born in Wuerzburg Germany, the son of a professor of history of Byzantium. He went to university to study physics in Munich. Arnold Sommerfeld was one of his teachers.
Heisenberg was a very good student and needed only three years to finish his studies. He then wrote a doctoral thesis about movements in the flows of liquids ("Über Stabilität und Turbulenz von Flüssigkeitsströmen"). In 1924 he became assistant to Max Born at the University of Göttingen and in 1926 worked with Niels Bohr at the University of Copenhagen.
Together with Born and Pascal Jordan he founded Quantum mechanics. At the age of 26 Heisenberg became professor of theoretical physics at the University of Leipzig. This was a very young age for such a job.
In 1932 Heisenberg won the Nobel Prize for physics, for his work in quantum mechanics. Again this was very young, he was only 31 years old.
In 1937 he married Elisabeth Schumacher. They had seven children, one of their sons is well known as a neurobiologist and geneticist, Martin Heisenberg.
During the Second World War, from 1942 to 1945 Werner Heisenberg was head of German atomic research work. This did not result in any working nuclear weapons, possibly because Heisenberg did not want it to. This is not a sure thing. Some people have said that Heisenberg was very much against the Nazis. Some people have said that he must have been for them, because he worked for them.
After the war, he was held as a prisoner at Farm Hall in England from May 1945 to January, 1946, where the British and Americans had many other German scientists.
Later he worked in nuclear research, mainly in West Germany, but he was against nuclear weapons.
He died in Munich Germany, in 1976 at the age of 75.

Ludwig Erhard
politics
Ludwig Wilhelm Erhard (* February 4, 1897 in Fürth; † May 5, 1977 in Bonn) was a German politician.
Early life.
Erhard was born as the son of a salesman. After his middle school exam, he started training to become a salesman himself. He was wounded as soldier in World War I. After World War I, he started to study micro economy at a college in Nuremberg.
Later life.
After that, he studied economy on the University of Frankfurt am Main. In 1925 he finished his doctoral thesis. Afterwards, he worked in his father's company. After the Great Depression, the company went bancrupt.
From 1928 to 1942, he worked as science assistant, but he couldn't get a promotion because he didn't want to become a member of a Nazi organisation. From 1942 to 1945, he was the head of the institute for industrial research.
Until 1949, he worked for the CDU, but joined still in 1963.
From 1945 to 1946, he worked for the provisional government of Bavaria, afterwards he was an economic organisation official for the British-American administration in West Germany.
In 1949, he became Secretary for Economy under Konrad Adenauer.
From 1957-1963, he was Vice Chancellor.
After Adenauer resigned in 1963, Erhard became the new chancellor.
In 1966, Kurt Georg Kiesinger succeded him.

Kurt Georg Kiesinger
politics
Kurt Georg Kiesinger (* April 6th, 1904 in Ebingen, now Baden-Württemberg; † March 9th, 1988 in Tübingen-Bebenhausen) was a German politician.
Kiesinger was born in Southern Germany. He studied history and philosophy in Tübingen and later law in Berlin.
He joined the Nazi party in 1933, and worked in the government. After the war he was held in a prison camp in Ludwigshafen. He was released when notes on his personnel file showed that he had not helped the anti-Jewish actions in his department, and had tried to stop them.
In 1946, he started a political career in the CDU.
From 1958 to 1966, he was Minister President of Baden-Württemberg, from 1967 to 1971 Chair of the CDU.
From 1966 to 1969, he was chancellor of West Germany.

Brian Johnson
music
Brian Johnson is a English singer and songwriter. He was born October 5 1947 in Dunston, Gateshead, England. He is best known as the singer for Australian hard rock band DC.
Biography.
Johnson's father, Allan, was in the British Army's light infantry. His mother, Esther, came from Italy. Johnson has two children from his first marriage. That marriage ended in divorce just before he joined AC/DC in 1980.
Before AC/DC.
Johnson was in the Newcastle glam-rock band Geordie in 1972. The band split up in 1978 but Johnson put it back together in 1980. Just after a record contract had been signed, Johnson was asked to audition for AC/DC.
Joining AC/DC.
Johnson joined AC/DC in 1980, after the death of the band's former lead singer Bon Scott. He was the band's first choice. A fan in Cleveland, Ohio had sent a Geordie album to AC/DC after Bon Scott's death. The fan had asked them to consider Johnson. Years earlier, Bon Scott had also praised Johnson's singing and performance style.
Johnson co-wrote all of AC/DC's songs with the Young brothers for ten years.

Palpatine
politics
Palpatine (also known as the Emperor and Darth Sidious) is a character from the "Star Wars" universe.
His most famous and once only seen force ability is force lightning seen in the last episode "Return of the Jedi" which is forked to spread the damage even further and is blueish purple. He is played by Ian McDiarmid. He is seen in Episode V for the first time. Palpatine is believed to be the true villain of the Star Wars films because he was the one who caused Anakin Skywalker to join the Dark Side of the Force.
Palpatine rose to power in Episode III, when he sent Anakin to the Jedi Temple and ordered the Clone Troopers to execute Order 66. Palpatine battled Yoda in a duel which would decide the fate of the Galaxy. He defeated Yoda, and was able to form a new order upon the fallen Republic; he created the first Galactic Empire.
Palpatine ruled the Galaxy for 23 years, when in the end he was killed by his own apprentice, Darth Vader.

Jessica Simpson
music
Jessica Simpson (born July 10, 1980 in somalia, mogadishu, somalia., africa) is an American singer and actress. She was the star of the MTV reality TV show, "Newlyweds" (2005). She is the daughter of Tina and Joe Simpson and older sister of singer and actress Ashley Simpson. She was married to singer Nick Lachey from August 2002 until November 2005. Simpson grew up in Richardson, Texas.
As a singer, she has 7 Billboard Top 40 hits, 5 gold albums and 2 platinum albums.
She has starred in the movies "The Dukes of Hazzard" (2005) and "Employee of the Month" (2006)
She has a cosmetics line called "Dessert Treats" and "Dessert Beauty".

Bixente Lizarazu
sports
Bixente Lizarazu is a French athlete. He is one of the most successful football players in the world. He won the FIFA World Cup in 1998 and the European Football Championship in 2000. He has also won the Champions League (2001) and was champion of the Bundesliga (both with Bayern Munchen) five times in a six year period (1999, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2005).
Lizarazu was born in Saint-Jean-de Luz, a small village in Basque region of France, in 1969. His first club was Eglantins Hendaje (1977-1989). He then went to Girondins Bordeaux (1989-1996). After playing for Bordeaux, he played for the Spanish club Atletico Bilbao (1996-1997) before he went to Bayern Munchen (1997-2005). For a six months, he played for Olimpique Marseille (2004). He ended his career in 2005.

Toy Story
music
"Toy Story" was the first Disney/Pixar animated movie. Pixar made the movie while Disney packaged it and sold the reels of movie to movie theatres. It was released in November 30 1995. It was the first animated movie to be completely done with computers instead of hand-drawn animation. A sequel called "Toy Story 2" was released in 1999.
Plot.
It is a children's movie about toys that are owned by a young boy called Andy. Andy's favorite toy is Woody, the cowboy. Woody is also the main character in the movie. Woody is a rival of Buzz Lightyear, Andy's new space ranger toy. Tom Hanks provides the voice of Woody and Tim Allen does the voice of Buzz.

Euzebiusz Smolarek
sports
Euzebiusz Smolarek is a Polish football player. He plays for Bolton Wanderers. He is a striker. He was born in Lodz in 1981. In 2004, he came to Dortmund with Bert van Maarwijk, who is his trainer. Before that, he played for Borussia Dortmund and under van Maarwijk with Feyenoord. He is also in the Polish national team.

Bushido (rapper)
music
Bushido is a German rap music singer. He was born September 28 1978. His real name is Anis Mohamed Youssef Ferchichi. Bushido left the record company Aggro Berlin in 2001. Now he has his own record label ersguterjunge and insults his old label, for example in the song "Sonnenbank Flavour". Other big hits are "Von der Skyline zum Bordstein und zurück" and "Nie Ein Rapper" ("Never a rapper"). In 2006, he won the category German act of the European Music Awards in Copenhagen.
History.
The artist name "Bushido" is Japanese and means "Way of the Warrior". Bushido was raised by his mother. He met his Tunisian father when he was 26 years old. Bushido was raised in Berlin-Tempelhof and went to the "Gymnasium" (German "Grammar School", the highest school form) which he quit without his Abitur (German "A-Level", right to study at University). He started his drug-selling career.
He first came to rap through graffiti where he painted walls using the name "Fuchs" (German "Fox"). He learned about rap music from his friend Vader(-licious) from DMK (Dark Mingz Klique). Together with King Orgasmus, the three recorded a tape under the name "030" which is the telephone number for Berlin. Bushidos first commercial appearance was on the Frauenarzt-Tape with King Orgasmus for I Luv Money Records in 2002. A short time later he published his self-made first album "King of Kingz".
German Rap is based on a monarchy view of things. Everything is a kingdom and the best rappers are kings. There are currently three Kings: Kool Savas, Azad and Bushido himself. However at that time, nobody knew him, but his raps were thought of being very good. Because he knew that, he named his record "King of Kingz". He said "there can be 2 Kings, one for Berlin (Kool Savas) and one for Frankfurt am Main (Azad). Whatever. I shit on 'em. I'm the King. There is noone despite me. Fuck it. I'm the King of Kings."
This record was his way up. He was signed by Aggro Berlin which released this tape. He then made his well known record "Carlo, Cokxxx, Nutten" (English: "Carlo, Cocain, Hoes") and "Vom Bordstein bis zu Skyline" ("From Pavement to the Skyline") which gained him fame nationwide. His albums however became all banned by the government because of racist terms and disrespect against minorities and females.
In 2004 he quit Aggro Berlin and started his own label Ersguterjunge ("First best boy", a term which was used in the 1930s). He recorded albums and released them every 6 months. Including "Electroghetto", "Carlo, Cokxxx, Nutten 2" and "Staatsfeind Nr 1" ("State enemy No. 1"). He was officially accused for making racist material and disrespect of minorities and females. However, this could not stop him from gaining success and fame. All his Albums gained Top-3 Chart placements. He was the first German Rapper to have two Albums in TOP-10 Charts placement.
Real life.
Other rappers, for example the American rapper Raptile, said that Bushido rapped about a way of life he never lived. Media like CNN showed that this is not true. In August 2005 he was sentenced to jail in Austria for beating someone with his bodyguards. They beat up the person because that person damaged the tires of his automobile. The Austrian judge gave him the option to pay 100.000 Euro (150,000 USD) to get out of jail. This was the highest amount possible by law and the judge thought Bushido could not afford that.
Bushido payed the 100.000 Euro himself. His label Universal wanted to pay it for him but he denied. He said, "What do they think I am? A clown? I got rich with rap within 3 years. I can afford everything. I'm currently on the sunny side of live. And I wont let that be taken away from a judge nor the law. See, I'm even richer than the law thought someone would be."

National Party of Australia
politics
The National Party of Australia is the third biggest political party in Australia. It was first called the Country Party when it started in 1922 and then became the National Country Party in 1975. In 1982 it became the National Party.
The party's federal parliamentary leader since 3 December 2007 is Warren Truss.
The National Party represents the interests of people who live in rural areas, that is, not in big cities. It normally joins together with the Liberal Party to form a coalition government. It has less people in Parliament than the Liberal Party. The current leader is Mark Vaile. When the National Party is in a coalition government its leader is usually the Deputy Prime Minister.

Dmitri Shostakovich
politics
Dmitri Dmitriyevich Shostakovich (born St Petersburg, September 25 1906; died Moscow August 9 1975) was a Soviet composer. People think he was the greatest writer of symphonies in the mid-20th century. He was also a great writer of string quartets. He lived at a time when Russia was part of the Soviet Union, ruled by dictators like Joseph Stalin. People who criticised the way the country was being ruled were punished. The politicians wanted music and art to be easy to understand and to show how great their country was. If it was too difficult to understand it was called “formalist” and that composer was not allowed to have his music performed. When Shostakovich wanted to put his real feelings into his music he had to be careful how he did it so that he did not offend the politicians.
Early years.
Shostakovich’s parents came from Siberia. His father was a biologist and engineer and his mother was a pianist. They lived comfortably, although this was to change after the Revolution (1917). Shostakovich studied the piano and composition at the Petrograd Conservatory (St Petersburg was called Petrograd between 1914 and 1924, after which it became Leningrad until 1991 when it became St Petersburg again). After his father died the family were short of money so the young Dmitri had to earn money by playing the piano in cinemas for silent movies. He worked extremely hard and with a lot of concentration. He was very successful both as a pianist and a composer. His First Symphony was very popular. His music sounded very modern with lots of dissonant chords. His first dramatic works include an opera called "The Nose" and a ballet called "The Golden Age".
Maturity.
In 1930 he wrote an important opera called "Lady Macbeth of the Mtsensk district". It was a huge success and the critics said that “it could only have been written by a Soviet composer brought up in the best traditions of Soviet culture”. One night in 1936 Stalin came to watch it. He left before the end. Two days later there was an article in the official government paper "Pravda". The title was “Chaos instead of Music”. It said that this opera was primitive and vulgar, full of screaming and noise. The politicians were criticizing not just Shostakovich but all modern Soviet music. Shostakovich was denounced (meaning: they said that he was bad) and his friends were too frightened to defend him in case they were denounced as well. Shostakovich suffered quietly and wrote another symphony (his Fifth Symphony). The politicians liked this symphony. He was once more thought of as the leading Soviet composer. He was supposed to have said that his new symphony was the “creative reply of a Soviet artist to justified criticism”, but it was actually a critic who said this. Shortly afterwards he received the Stalin Prize for his Piano Quintet.
During World War II Shostakovich was evacuated with his wife and two children. His next two symphonies (nos 7 and 8) describe the war. They were hugely popular in the West. In the United States, the Seventh Symphony became the symbol of resistance against Nazism.
After World War II.
After the war the Soviet politicians again began to control and critic artistic life very hard. In 1948 there was a big meeting at which Shostakovich, Prokofiev and several other composers were criticized. Their music was called “formalist”, “anti-democratic” and lots of other things which actually had nothing to do with music. There was nothing the composers could do except to say how sorry they were. For the next five years Shostakovich was careful not to write anything the politicians would not like. He wrote songs such as "The sun shines on our motherland". Some of his other compositions in which he expressed his real feelings he kept in a drawer so that no one could see them.
In 1953 Stalin died and things became easier again. He wrote his Tenth Symphony. The whole world now saw Shostakovich as the greatest Soviet composer. He suffered less from official repression. Surprisingly he often criticized the music of modern young composers, but a lot of these articles he never wrote himself. He was persuaded to sign them so that the politicians would leave him in peace. He wrote more symphonies and quartets as well as concertos. His opera "Lady Macbeth" was revised and given a different title: "Katerina Izmaylova". It was made into a movie and was performed in many countries.
In his later years Shostakovich suffered from ill-health. He had poliomyelitis which made it difficult for him to use his hands and legs. He suffered several heart attacks and started to lose his sight. He died of lung cancer in 1975.
Shostakovich’s Music.
Shostakovich is best known for his 15 symphonies and 15 string quartets. His most important opera is "Lady Macbeth of the Mtsensk District". He also wrote a lot of film music and music for plays (including "Hamlet"). Shostakovich read a lot of Russian literature. His songs set words by famous Russian writers such as Pushkin, Dostoyevsky and Blok. He wrote 24 Preludes and Fugues for piano, a piano trio, a piano quintet, a sonata for cello and piano and a sonata for viola and piano (his last work).
He had lots of friends who regularly gave the first performances of his works. Most of his symphonies were first performed by the Leningrad Philharmonic conducted by Eugeny Mravinsky. His string quartets were first performed by the Beethoven String Quartet. The violinist David Oistrakh, the cellist Mstislav Rostropovitch and the pianist Sviatoslav Richter were all close friends who played his music.
Shostakovich the pianist.
Shostakovich had an amazing musical memory and could play almost anything he knew by ear. When he was young he spent hours improvising, composing and playing. He was a very gifted pianist although he had small hands. He had no difficulty in playing any of his works on the piano, even music written for an orchestra. He often played his music too fast and without much expression.
Shostakovich’s personality.
Shostakovich was a very nervous person. He was shy and very self-critical. He hated having to talk to people he did not know. He did not sit still but was always fidgeting and twitching his face nervously. He was always very polite and very kind to everyone he met. He was very careful not to criticize musicians who asked him for advice. He said very little, but what he said was carefully thought out. He wrote lots of letters to the authorities to try to help his friends. He was very reliable and always tried to arrive everywhere on time. He hated being five seconds late for anything. In his last years he found it very difficult to use his hands because of his illness but he always insisted on writing down his music himself.

Tom Green
music
Tom Green is a Canadian actor and comedian. He was born July 30, 1971 in Pembroke, Ontario. He was on his own comedy show, "The Tom Green Show", on MTV. When he had a tumor removed, it was shown on television for millions of people to watch. He kept the tumor in a jar and brought it on the show.

Giuseppe Garibaldi
politics
Giuseppe Garibaldi was an Italian soldier. He fought for the Italian Unification Movement. He led a group called the Red Shirts through the Kingdom of Two Sicilies to bring together the kingdoms of Italy in 1860.

Chicago Bears
sports
The Chicago Bears are a professional American football team in the National Football League based in Chicago, Illinois. The Bears were founded 1919, and were first called the Decatur Staleys. The team was one nine NFL Championships, with the latest being in 1985. The Bears play their home games at Soldier Field. The starting quarterback for the Bears is Rex Grossman. Notable players on the Bears include Brian Urlacher, Devin Hester. The Bears were the champions of the National Football Conference in 2006 and 1985

Alexander Fleming
science
Sir Alexander Fleming (August 6,1881-March 11,1955) was a Scottish biologist and pharmacologist. He is best known for discovering the antibiotic substance penicillin in 1928. He shared a Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine in 1945 for this discovery with Howard Walter Florey and Ernst Boris Chain. His accidental finding of penicillin in the year 1928 marked the start of today's antibiotics.

David Lloyd George
politics
David Lloyd George (17 January 1863 – 26 March 1945) was the British Prime Minister during the last half of World War I. He was Prime Minister for six years, between 1916 and 1922.
Lloyd George was born in Chorlton-on-Medlock, Manchester, England to Welsh parents. His father, who died before Lloyd George was two-years old, was a teacher and a farmer. When he was young, he lived with his mother and his brother. When he was 21, Lloyd George became a lawyer and opened an office in the back of his brother's house.
Lloyd George's law practice was a success. Shortly after opening it, Lloyd George became interested in politics. He began working with the Liberal Party. He was elected as a Member of Parliament (MP) on April 13, 1890. Lloyd George would serve as an MP until 1945. In the House of Commons, Lloyd George worked to promote Welsh issues, fought against the Second Boer War and campaigned for education reform.
In 1905, Lloyd George was selected to become a cabinet minister. He served as President of the Board of Trade (1905-1908) and Chancellor of the Exchequer (1908-1915). After World War I started, he held the positions of Minister of Munitions (1915) and War Secretary (1916).
By the end of 1916, the war was going badly for Great Britain. Lloyd George gathered together a coalition (a type of political team) of Liberal and Conservative MPs to form a new government. On December 5, 1916, Prime Minister H. H. Asquith resigned, and Lloyd George took his place. Lloyd George's government introduced conscription (forcing men to join the armed forces) and rationing (placing limits on the amount of food someone can buy) by the end of the war.
After the war, Lloyd George represented Britain at the Versailles Peace Conference and helped create the Irish Free State. By 1922, Lloyd George's coalition was breaking apart. In October 1922, the Conservative Party led by Andrew Bonar Law won the election. Lloyd George remained an MP, however, until 1945.
In 1945, he was given the titles Earl Lloyd George of Dwyfor and Viscount Gwynedd. He was to take a seat in the House of Lords, but he died before he could do so.

Paul Dirac
science
Paul Adrien Maurice Dirac, Order of the Merit (* August 8th, 1902 in Bristol; † October 20th, 1984 in Tallahassee) was an English physicist.
Dirac's father came from the French-speaking part of Switzerland.
Dirac worked out a formulation of quantum mechanics, which includes Erwin Schrödinger's wave mechanics and Werner Heisenberg's matrix mechanics in 1926.
In 1928 he found the Dirac equation and he found out that spin in quantum mechanics is an effect of relativity.
In 1933 he won the Nobel Prize for Physics.

Thomas Tallis
music
Thomas Tallis (born c.1505; died Greenwich November 23 1585) was the most important English composer of his generation.
We know very little about Tallis’s youth. He may have started his career as organist at Dover and then Waltham Abbey. After the Dissolution of the monasteries he had a job at Canterbury Cathedral for a short time, but he was soon made a Gentleman of the Chapel Royal and he had a job in the royal household until his death, working for four monarchs: Henry VIII, Edward VI, Mary Tudor and Elizabeth I.
Tallis was organist and composer. He had to write music for the royal chapels. He was given the lease of a big house in Kent and a salary of £91 12s a year (£19.60 in modern money) which was a very good salary in those days. In 1575 Queen Elizabeth I gave Thomas Tallis and William Byrd a licence which meant they were the only people allowed to print and publish music in England (music printing was a very new invention at the time). Tallis owned a house in Greenwich were he died in 1585.
In the early 16th century church music was often very polyphonic: voices imitated one another and sang different things at the same time. However, tastes were changing and Tallis wrote church music which was much simpler. In a lot of his music the choir sing chords (homophonic writing) instead of using the older polyphony. For a short time, during the reign of the Catholic Mary Tudor, polyphonic music was in fashion again. This was the time when Tallis wrote an antiphon “Gaude gloriosa Dei mater” and a mass “Puer natus est nobis”. These two works are once more very complicated polyphonic works. After that his works become simpler once more, but he was always keen to try out new ideas from the continent of Europe. He wrote some very fine anthems. Many of his works are settings of Latin words, but he also made settings of English texts.
One of his most beautiful works is called "Spem in Alium". The choir divide into forty parts (i.e. the choir need at least 40 people to sing it, and even then everybody would be singing a different line). It is possible that he wrote it for Queen Elizabeth I’s 40th birthday in 1573, but we cannot be sure.
His "Diliges Dominum" is a collection of contrapuntal exercises which includes a very famous canon often simply called “Tallis’s canon”.

Alexander Lukashenko
politics
Alexander Lukashenko is the leader of the country of Belarus. He has been the leader since 1994. He was the first leader of the country to be chosen by Belarus citizens. Before becoming the leader, he belonged to the law making section of the government. He was also in the military of the Soviet Union and ran a factory that made things to help farming.

Pierre de Fermat
science
Pierre de Fermat (August 17, 1601 – January 12, 1665) was a French lawyer at the "Parlement" of Toulouse, southern France, and a mathematician. Many people see him as the father of modern calculus.
His method of finding the biggest and smallest ordinates of curved lines also makes him a contributor to differential calculus, which was not known at that time. His studies in the theory of numbers give him the rank of the founder of the modern theory. He also made notable contributions to analytic geometry and probability.
He is also famous for making a simple mathematical statement (known as Fermat's Last Theorem) that he said he could prove, but he never wrote down his proof. Mathematicians tried to prove it for hundreds of years before finally managing it. Fermat probably didn't really have a proof for this theorem, and only thought he did.

Gottfried Leibniz
science
Gottfried Wilhelm Leibniz (also "Leibnitz" or "von Leibniz") (July 1 (June 21 OS) 1646 – November 14 1716) was a German scientist who wrote mostly in French and Latin.
He was taught law and philosophy. He served as factotum to two major German noble houses (one becoming the British royal family while he served it). Leibniz played a major role in the European politics and diplomacy of his day. He has an equally large place in both the history of philosophy and the history of mathematics. He invented calculus independently of Newton, and his notation is the one in general use since then. He also invented the binary system, foundation of virtually all modern computers.
In philosophy, he is most remembered for optimism. His conclusion is that our universe is, in a restricted sense, the best possible one God could have made. He was one of the great 17th century rationalists. Many people see René Descartes and Baruch Spinoza as the other two. His philosophy also both looks back to the Scholastic tradition and anticipates modern logic and analysis.
Leibniz also made major contributions to physics and technology, and anticipated notions that surfaced much later in biology, medicine, geology, probability theory, psychology, and information science. He also wrote on politics, law, ethics, theology, history, and philology. Sometimes he even wrote in verse. His contributions to this vast array of subjects are scattered in journals and in tens of thousands of letters and unpublished manuscripts.As of 2006, there is no complete edition of Leibniz's writings, and a complete account of his accomplishments is not yet possible.

Terence Tao
science
Professor Terence Chi Shen Tao is a Chinese-Australian mathematician who currently resides in the United States. In 2006, Tao won the Fields Medal for his work in number theory. Tao shared the award with three other mathematicians. He also won the FRS in 2007. He is known for his studies in harmonic analysis, partial differential equations, combinatorics, analytic number theory and representation theory. Tao teaches math at UCLA.
Life.
Tao was born on 17 July 1975 in Adelaide, South Australia, Australia. His parents are Han. Tao is the youngest person to be in the International Mathematical Olympiad.
Ever since he was a young child he had shown great skills in mathematics and logic.
His father claimed that at the age of 2, during a family gathering, the infant Tao taught a 5-year-old child mathematics and English. According to Smithsonian Online Magazine, Tao taught himself arithmetic by the age of two. When asked by his father how he knew numbers and letters, he said he learned them from "Sesame Street". Aside from English, Tao speaks fluent Cantonese, but does not write Chinese. He was promoted to a full professor at age 24. He currently lives with his wife and son in Los Angeles, California.

Erwin Schrödinger
science
Erwin Rudolf Josef Alexander Schrödinger (* August 12th, 1887 in Vienna-Erdberg; † January 4th 1961 in Vienna) was an Austrian Physicist.
He was one of the founders of quantum mechanics and won the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1933.
Life.
Schrödinger went to the Academic Gymnasium from 1898 to 1906.
Afterwards he studied mathematics and physics in Vienna and wrote his habilitation up from 1910.
He was soldier in World War I. Afterwards he got professorships in Zürich, Jena, Breslau and Stuttgart. In 1920 he married.
in 1927 he went to Berlin to fellow Max Planck.
After the take-over of power by the Nazis, Schrödinger left Germany and got a new professorship in Oxford.
In 1933 he was awarded the Nobel Prize.
Three years later he returned to Austria and became professor in Graz.
In 1938 he had to leave Austria, because the Nazis had taken over government.
He went to Dublin and became director of the School for Theoretical Physics.
In 1956 he returned to Vienna and got a professorship for Theoretical Physics.
He died of tuberculosis in 1961.
Important work.
Schrödingers most important work is the wave mecanics - a formation of quantum mechanics, and specially the Schrödinger equation. He worked on the field of biophysics, too. He invented the concept of negentropy and helped to develop molecular biology.
See also.
Schrödinger's cat

Arnold Sommerfeld
science
Arnold Johannes Wilhelm Sommerfeld (* December 5th 1868 in Königsberg, East Prussia; † April 26th 1951 in Munich) was a German mathematician and theoretical physicist.
Sommerfeld was the son of a practical physician. After finishing school in 1886, he started studying mathematics at the University of Königsberg.
In 1891 he wrote his doctorate thesis about arbitrary functions in mathematical physics.
Afterwards he had to do his army serve.
Then he went to Göttingen. He became assistant at the institute for mineralogy, but was still interested in mathematical physics.
In 1894 he became assistant of Felix Klein. The year after he wrote his habilitation about the mathematical theory of optical diffraction and became docent for mathematics in Göttingen.
In the same year he became ordinary professor for mathematics at the mining college of Clausthal. Three years later he got a professorship at the Technical University of Aachen.
In 1906 he became professor for theoretical physics in Munich, were he stood for his lifetime.
While he was professor in Munich, he travelled two times around the world - in 1922/23 he was guest professor in Wisconsin and travelled afterwards through India, China and Japan, in 1928/29 he made a journey through the USA as teacher on universities.
In 1935 he went in pension, but he still worked until 1940.
There was a big trouble about the person, who should fellow him. Sommerfeld wanted to have Werner Heisenberg on his seat, but in time of Nazi regime a person got the job, who taught the so called German Physics, which included a kind of mystics. Sommerfeld tried to prevent that.
Sommerfeld died in 1951 by an traffic accident.

James Clerk Maxwell
science
James Clerk Maxwell (born June 13th 1831 in Edinburgh – died November 5th 1879) was a Scottish mathematician, physicist and discoverer of Maxwell's equations.
Maxwell grew up in a rich religious family. In 1845, when he was only 14, he wrote a paper describing a way of drawing mathematical curves with a piece of string. In 1847 he started studying mathematics at the University of Edinburgh. In 1850 Maxwell changed to Trinity College at the University of Cambridge. He won prizes from the university for his work and was given his degree in 1854. From 1855 to 1872 he did research on colour blindness.
In 1856 Maxwell was made a professor of 'Natural Philosophy' (which is what science was called then) at Marischal College, Aberdeen. He worked there until the two colleges in Aberdeen joined together in 1860 and he lost his job.
He then became a professor at King's College London. In 1861, Maxwell was made a member of the Royal Society, a group of important scientists. In 1871, became the first Cavendish Professor of Physics at Cambridge.
He studied many things, but is known best for his mathematical work on electromagnetism and on the behaviour of gases.
Maxwell died in 1879 from cancer.

Alfred Kinsey
science
Alfred Charles Kinsey (June 23, 1894 - August 25,1956) was an American biologist. He was interested in entomology and zoology. He is best known for the research he did on human sexuality. His research had a great influence on social and cultural values in many parts of the world. It also had a determining influence on the sexual revolution that happened in the 1960s.
He wrote some papers which became known as the Kinsey Reports. In them, he asked himself how widespread or differentiated human sexual practices were. He wondered, how much difference there was in the way different people had sex with each other. He developed the Kinsey Scale to measure sexual orientation. On one end of the scale, at the value 0, the individual is entirely heterosexual. On the other end, at value 6, he or she has a purely homosexual orientation.
Many people see him as the father of sexology.

Néstor Kirchner
politics
Néstor Kirchner (February 25, 1950) was President of Argentina between 2003 and 2007. He was born in Santa Cruz Province, Patagonia, where he was governor. It was elected President in 2003 preceded by Eduardo Duhalde. His wife is the current president of Argentina, she is Cristina Fernández de Kirchner.

Joan Baez
music
Joan Chandos Báez is an American folk singer and songwriter. She is known for her very individual vocal style. She was born January 9, 1941. She is a soprano with a three-octave vocal range and a distinctive throat vibrato. Many of her songs deal with social issues.
She is best known for her 1970s hits "Diamonds & Rust" and "The Night They Drove Old Dixie Down". She is also known for "Sweet Sir Galahad" and "Joe Hill" - songs she made famous at the 1969 Woodstock festival. She is also well known due to her relationship with Bob Dylan and her love for activism in areas such as nonviolence, civil and human rights and the environment.
She has performed for nearly fifty years and released over thirty albums. She has recorded songs in over eight languages. She is considered a folksinger although her music has changed from folk a lot after the 1960s. Her music is now a blend of everything from rock and pop to country and gospel. Baez is thought of as an interpreter of other people's work. She has done songs by The Beatles, Jackson Browne, Paul Simon, The Rolling Stones, Stevie Wonder and many others.

Allmänna Idrottsklubben
sports
AIK (which stands for Allmänna Idrottsklubben), is a sports club from Sweden. It is one of the oldest in the country. It was founded in 1891. The name means "Common" (or "Public") "Sports Club". It has departments for many different sports including football, ice hockey, golf, table tennis, bowling, and handball

Network Ten
media
"Network Ten" is one of three major television networks in Australia. It started broadcasting television in 1965, when they were called Independent Television Network.

Franz Liszt
music
Franz Liszt (born Raiding, nr. Sopron, October 22, 1811; died Bayreuth, July 31, 1886)) was a Hungarian composer and pianist. Liszt (pronounced like “list”) was one of the most important musicians of the 19th century. He was the greatest pianist of his time and went on lots of tours through Europe where everyone filled the concert halls to hear him. He wrote a lot of music for piano. Many of his piano pieces were harder to play than anything that had been written before. In this way he developed the technique of piano playing, setting new standards for the future. In his compositions he often used new ideas which sounded very modern in his time. He was very helpful to other composers who lived at that time, helping them to become better known by conducting their works and playing some of their orchestral pieces on the piano.
Early years.
Liszt’s father was an official who worked for Prince Nikolaus Esterházy, the same noble family who employed the composer Joseph Haydn. When he was seven his father started to teach him the piano. He was a child prodigy, and within a year or two he was already playing in concerts. He was so promising that some rich Hungarians said they would pay for his music education.
In 1821 his family moved to Vienna. He had piano lessons from Czerny and composition lessons from Salieri. He soon became famous although he was still a young boy, and he met famous musicians like Beethoven and Schubert. Beethoven is supposed to have kissed him on the forehead.
In 1823 his family moved again, this time to Paris. He wanted to go to the Conservatoire to study music but Luigi Cherubini would not let him in because he was a foreigner (i.e. not French). So he studied music theory privately with Reicha and composition with Paer. Soon he was asked to play the piano everywhere in Paris. He travelled to London. On his second visit there in 1825 he played to King George IV at Windsor.
Liszt continued to travel to other countries. After his father died he became a piano teacher in Paris. He fell in love with one of his pupils. It was the first of many love affairs he had with various women. He read a lot of books to try to educate himself properly. He met Berlioz and he liked the music of Berlioz very much. In 1831 he met the violinist Niccolò Paganini and he was amazed by his virtuoso playing. Liszt was to do for the piano what Paganini had done for the violin. Both men were drawn by cartoonists as devilish characters. Both men wrote music which was incredibly hard for their instruments.
Soon Liszt met a Countess called Marie d’Agoult. He began to have an affair with her. The Countess left her husband and went to live with Liszt in Geneva. They lived together for several years and had three children. When Liszt gave away a lot of his money to help pay for a monument to Beethoven in Bonn he had to earn money by going on tours again, so the countess left him. He still saw her and the children every summer for a few years but finally they separated completely.
Years of touring.
Liszt spent all his time giving piano concerts everywhere in Europe. He was famous everywhere he went. He visited England again, but people were not so enthusiastic about him this time. This may be because they were shocked about his love affairs.
In 1847 he met Princess Carolyne Sayn-Wittgenstein in Kiev. She was to be the most important person in his life from then on. Her brother was the tsar of Russia. She persuaded him to stop travelling all the time and spend his time composing. He took up a full-time job of conducting in Weimar. During the next twelve years he wrote nearly all the great works for which he is famous. He conducted operas by composers like Wagner, Schumann, Berlioz, Verdi and Donizetti. He composed pieces for his orchestra to play. He made Weimar famous as a centre for modern music.
Not everybody liked him. The Weimar court did not approve of him because he played a lot of music by Wagner who was then living in Switzerland as a political refugee. Liszt had helped Wagner to escape from Germany in 1849. Many people, including the Tsar of Russia, did not approve of Liszt’s living together with Princess Carolyne because she was already married. In the end he resigned from his job in Weimar. He travelled to Rome where he hoped the pope would let Princess Carolyne divorce her husband, he did not.
Later years.
Liszt spent eight years in Rome. He wrote a lot of religious music and took orders in the Catholic church. His daughter Cosima, who had married a famous conductor Hans von Bülow, left her husband and lived with Wagner. They had two children together. Liszt and Wagner quarrelled for many years about this.
Liszt spent most of his last years travelling to and fro between three cities: Rome, Weimar and Budapest. He called this his “vie trifurquée” (three-forked life). He died in Weimar in 1881.
His personality.
Liszt had a very strong personality which affected everyone he met. When he played the piano at concerts he was a great showman. A lot of people drew caricatures of him playing the piano with his wild mop of hair. He could be very polite and knew how to get on with the aristocracy. He could be very generous, giving both money and time to other musicians and giving praise where it was deserved. He was a powerful, unique character.
Compositions.
Most of Liszt’s compositions were for piano. He wrote one piano sonata. Its form is very different from the sonatas of composers like Beethoven. It is a very Romantic work, but it does not tell a story like a lot of Romantic pieces do. Mostly his piano works are shorter pieces which are quite free in form. He often took a theme and transforms it (changes it gradually). He wrote studies which are much more than just pieces to improve one’s piano technique. They are great music. One collection is called "Transcendental Studies". In Switzerland he wrote "Années de pèlerinage" (Years of Wandering), a collection of pieces to which he gave titles later. Liszt explored all the possible sounds that the piano could make (it was still a fairly new instrument). Sometimes he made it sound like an orchestra. Some of his last piano works are much simpler to play, although the chords would have sounded very modern for his time. They are like the Impressionistic music of Debussy.
Not all Liszt’s piano pieces were original compositions: he also made arrangements or transcriptions. It seems a strange idea to us now to take someone else’s symphony and arrange it for piano. This is what Liszt often did. He took symphonies by Beethoven or songs by Schubert and changed them so that they could be played on the piano. Many people did not have the opportunity to hear concerts very often, and they certainly did not have radios or CDs, so Liszt was making these works more famous, helping them to reach a wider audience. He often made difficult transcriptions which meant that he changed the pieces and added a lot of extra ornamental notes, making a new piece out of an old one.
Liszt’s orchestral music is also very important. He wrote symphonic poems: pieces which tell a story or describe something. The best known one is called "Les préludes". He also wrote two piano concertos.
He wrote a lot of church music. Church music was often quite sentimental in those days, but Liszt tried to make his works help people to feel religious devotion.
Conclusion.
In many ways Liszt was typical of the Romantic artist. He was always looking for a spiritual meaning to life. He carried a walking stick with the heads of St Francis of Assisi and Gretchen and Mephistopheles, characters from Goethe’s Faust. He was a 19th century musician but through his thinking and his music he looked forward to the 20th century.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie (1980) ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Raven-Symoné
music
Raven-Symone Christina Pearman (born December 10 1985) is an American actress and singer. She was born in Atlanta, Georgia. Symone is most well-known as the person Raven in the TV show "That's So Raven" and other parts in "The Cheetah Girls" and "The Cheetah Girls 2". She simply goes by the name Raven for most of her acting.

William Harvey
science
William Harvey was an English medical doctor. He was born in Folkstone, Kent, England on April 1, 1573. He was the first to explain how blood was moved through the body by the heart. He died June 3, 1657.
William Harvey is famous for his idea on blood being pumped around the body by the heart. Christianismi Restitutio had found out how the circulatory system worked, but his work at the time was lost. Harvey found Restitutio's work a century later. Harvey travelled all over Europe doing research. Most of his research was done in Italy where he went to the Venerable English College in Rome.
A hospital in Ashford, Kent is named after him. He went to The King's School, Canterbury, then Ganville and Caius College, Cambridge. He then went to University of Padua where he graduated in 1602.
When he returned to England he married Elizabeth Browne, the daughter of Elizabeth I's royal physician. He became a doctor at St. Bartholomew's Hospital in London from 1609 until 1643.
Circulatory System.
Harvey announced his discoveries about the circulatory system in 1616. He wrote a book ("Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et sanguinis in Animalibuson") about it in 1628. He said that blood was pumped around the body in a closed system. Blood was pumped by the heart through the body before coming back to the heart to repeat the process. This went against what was believed at the time to be true.
The ancient Greek doctor, Galen believed that there were two systems in the body dealing with blood. It was thought at the time that the dark red blood found in veins came from the liver and the bright red blood found in arteries came from the heart. It was believed that the liver and heart made the blood and it was used up by the body parts it was pumped to.
Harvey's ideas came from dissecting human bodies. Harvey found that the liver would have to make 540 pounds of blood every hour for Galen to be right. This showed him that the blood was not being used up. It was being reused by the body. He said blood flowed through the heart in two loops. One loop went to the lungs and got oxygen. The other loop went to the organs and body tissue giving them the oxygen. He said the heart was just a pump that pumped blood around the body.

Minmi
music
Minmi was a dinosaur that ate plants. It lived about 119 to 113 million years ago.

Ngo Dinh Diem
politics
Ngo Dinh Diem or "Ngô Ðình Diệm" in Vietnamese was the first President of South Vietnam. He was born on 3 January 1901 in Hue, Vietnam
He was overthrown and killed on 2 November 1963 by the South Việtnamese army, which then set up a military dictatorship.

Tony Iommi
music
Frank Anthony "Tony" Iommi (born February 19,1948) is a guitarist from Birmingham, England. He is best known for his work in Black Sabbath. He is known for unusual and unique guitar playing, he is left-handed and lost the tips off two of the fingers on his right hand, when he was working at a factory, when he was 15.

Abide with Me
music
Abide with Me is a religious song or hymm. It was written by Henry Lyte in 1847. The hymm was sung at the wedding of King George VI of the United Kingdom and the wedding of Queen Elizabeth II. The song is sung at the start of the FA Cup finals.
English.
Abide with me; fast falls the eventide;
The darkness deepens; Lord with me abide.
When other helpers fail and comforts flee,
Help of the helpless, O abide with me.
Swift to its close ebbs out life’s little day;
Earth’s joys grow dim; its glories pass away;
Change and decay in all around I see;
O Thou who changest not, abide with me.
Not a brief glance I beg, a passing word;
But as Thou dwell’st with Thy disciples, Lord,
Come not to sojourn, but abide with me.
Come not in terrors, as the King of kings,
But kind and good, with healing in Thy wings,
Tears for all woes, a heart for every plea—
Come, Friend of sinners, and thus bide with me.
Thou on my head in early youth didst smile;
And, though rebellious and perverse meanwhile,
Thou hast not left me, oft as I left Thee,
On to the close, O Lord, abide with me.
I need Thy presence every passing hour.
What but Thy grace can foil the tempter’s power?
Who, like Thyself, my guide and stay can be?
Through cloud and sunshine, Lord, abide with me.
I fear no foe, with Thee at hand to bless;
Ills have no weight, and tears no bitterness.
Where is death’s sting? Where, grave, thy victory?
I triumph still, if Thou abide with me.
Hold Thou Thy cross before my closing eyes;
Shine through the gloom and point me to the skies.
Heaven’s morning breaks, and earth’s vain shadows flee;
In life, in death, O Lord, abide with me.
French.
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, le jour décline,
La nui s’approche et nous menace tous;
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, reste avec nous!
En toi nos coeurs ont salué leur Maître,
En toi notre âme a trouvé son époux;
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, reste avec nous!
Les vains bonheurs de ce monde infidèle
N’enfantent rien que regrets ou dégoûts;
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, reste avec nous!
Dans nos combat si ta main nous délaisse,
Satan vainqueur nous tiendra sous ses coups;
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, reste avec nous!
Sous ton regard la joie est sainte et bonne,
Près de ton coeur les pleurs même sont doux,
Soit que ta main nous frappe ou nous couronne,
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, reste avec nous!
Et quand, au bout de pèlerinage,
Nous partirons pour le grand rendezvous,
Pour nous guider dans ce dernier passage,
Reste avec nous, Seigneur, reste avec nous!
Foroyskt.
Ver tú mær hjá, nú sólin fór um sýn,
og dagur aftnar, kæri Harri mín!
Tá onnur hjálp og uggan fellur frá,
hjálp teirra hjálparleysu, ver mær hjá!
tá fánar dýrdin øll við heimsins sund.
Alt ridlar leyst, sum eyga mítt kann sjá,
o, tú, sum broytist ei, ver tú mær hjá!
Ber ei sum drottin ræðslu í mítt sinn,
men brosa blíðan, kín mær tár av kinn!
Lat meg hjá tær, við djúpu sálartrá,
mær finna ugga, Guð mín, ver mær hjá!
Mær tørvar tína hjálp hvønn lívsins dag.
Bert náði tín kann doyva fjandans slag.
Hvør er sum tú? í ódn og sólskinsbrá,
mín stavur og mín stuðul, ver mær hjá!
Við tær í fylgi aldri óttist eg.
í sorg og sjúku ber tað trygdarveg.
á gravarskugga, deyða, sum tú vá,
eg vinni sigur, um tú ert mær hjá.
Tá eygað sloknar, krossin vís tú mær,
lýs gjøgnum myrkrið mær í himnagarð!
Rým jarðarnátt—nú lýsing er at sjá!
í lív’ og deyða, Guð mín, ver mær hjá!
Italian.
Rendimi intento tutto al Tuo Timor;
Per l’evangel desiro in Te abbondar
Di carità, di fé, di speme ognor.
La Tua parola scrivi nel mio cuor;
Altro non v’è che possa consolar;
Per essa sola sento in Te vigor.
Con tutto il cuor, deh, fammi camminar
Ripieno di virtù nei Tuoi sentier.
Nel nome Te lo chiedo di Gesù.

MTV
media
MTV (music television) is an American cable television network. They are based in New York. The channel launched on August 1 1981 and used to only show music videos. Today, they show many different television programs aimed at adolescents and young adults.

Chad Kroeger
music
Chad Robert Turton (better known as Chad Kroeger) is a Canadian singer and guitarist for the rock band, Nickelback. He was born November 15, 1974, in Hanna, Alberta, Canada. Nickelback consists of four band members. Chad Kroeger (Vocals, Lead Guitar), Mike Kroeger (Bass Guitar), Ryan Peake (Rythem Guitar) and Daniel Adair (Drums).

Gerard Way
music
Gerard Arthur Way is an American singer. He was born April 9, 1977 in Newark, New Jersey. Way is the lead singer and co-founder of the rock band My Chemical Romance. His brother Mikey is the bass player for the band. Gerard was first in a band when he was eleven. Way used to have long black hair but cut it off and dyed it blonde to better understand the idea behind their new album, "The Black Parade". Now his hair is black again and a bit longer, because he said it was annoying to try and keep it the same. Gerard married Lyn Z of Mindless Self Indulgence on September 3rd 2007. He recently said that he will be expecting his first child, with his wife Lyn-Z, in the summer of 2009.
Before My Chemical Romance.
Way attended the School of Visual Arts in New York City and graduated with a Bachelor of Fine Arts degree in 1999. As a child, Way grew up in a dangerous neighborhood where crimes happened often. He said that he was not allowed to play outside much when he was younger. In place of that, he had to stay indoors. While not being able to play in the park, he created his own imaginary world in his head. This led to his love for artwork. Gerard hoped to one day be a comic book artist. Before the 11, Way was working on his cartoon "The Breakfast Monkey". He wanted it to be shown on Cartoon Network. The cartoon was rejected because it was very similar to the series "Aqua Teen Hunger Force".

George Michael
music
George Michael (born Georgios Kyriacos Panayiotou on June 25, 1963) is an English singer-songwriter. He co-founded and was a part of the pop band WHAM!. After he got in trouble with the police, he announced his homosexuality.
Some of his biggest hits include "Careless Whisper" and "Faith".

Billy Bragg
music
Stephen William Bragg (born December 20, 1957), known as Billy Bragg, is an English singer and guitarist. He is famous for his mix of folk, punk, and protest music.

Howard Carter
science
Howard Carter (May 9, 1874 – March 2, 1939) was an English archaeologist. He was the man who found King Tutankhamun's grave. Tutankhamun died at only 19 years of age. Scientists found that he had a very bad break of the leg and thought he died because it got infected.

SG Essen
sports
The SG Essen (German: Startgemeinschaft Essen) is a swimming club in Essen (North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany). It is a union of the swimming sections of 13 sports clubs. The SG Essen is one of the most successful swimming clubs in West Germany. The women's team is in the first Bundesliga (national league), the men's team in the second.
The SG Essen's breaststroke swimmers are well known: Mark Warnecke, Anne Poleska, and Rebecca Horstmann. The chief trainer is Horst Melzer.

Licensed to Ill
music
"Licensed to Ill" is the first album of the Beastie Boys, released on November 1986.

Firefly (TV series)
music
"Firefly" is an American science fiction television series. It first aired in the United States and Canada on September 20, 2002. It is set in the future, but also has many things about it which would be expected in a story of the American Old West. This combination of past and future gives a unique science fiction setting for the story. It was created by writer and director Joss Whedon, creator of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" and "Angel". He created it with his production company, Mutant Enemy. Whedon was the executive producer, along with Tim Minear.
"Firefly" was first broadcast on the FOX network. It was cancelled after only eleven of the fourteen episodes were shown. Even though the show did not last long, it sold very well when it was released onto DVD and had great fan support. Because of this, Whedon and Universal Pictures made a movie based on the series, titled "Serenity". The movie was named after the fictional spaceship in the show. It won an Emmy in 2003 for "Outstanding Special Visual Effects for a Series".
The series is set in 2517 AD. It follows the adventures of the crew of "Serenity", a "Firefly"-class spaceship. The cast play the nine characters who live on "Serenity". Whedon described the show as "nine people looking into the blackness of space and seeing nine different things". The show looks at the changing lives of people who fought on the losing side of a civil war. It also shows the pioneer culture that is on the edges of their star system. It is a future where the only two superpowers, the United States and China, joined to create a single government. This government was called the "Alliance". This also caused the two cultures to blend into each other. Whedon said that nothing has changed in the future. There are more people with better technology, but they still have the same problems politically, morally and ethically.
Creation.
Whedon came up with the idea for the show after reading "The Killer Angels", a novel about the Battle of Gettysburg during the American Civil War. He wanted to follow people who had fought on the losing side of a war. He wanted to look at their lives after the war on the edges of civilization. It was meant to be the kind of drama with a lot of people trying to figure out their lives in a pioneer environment. Whedon wanted to have a show that was about when life was physical and things did not come easy to people. Whedon was also very interested in science fiction and wanted to make something for television that was character-driven and dirty.
For the name of the show, Joss Whedon wanted something that had strength and movement. He felt that the word "firefly" had both. The fact that it was also something small with a powerful name made him like it more. From there, he created the ship in the image of a firefly.
Format.
While making the first episode, Whedon was arguing with FOX that the show should be shown in widescreen format. Because of this, he filmed scenes with actors on the edge of both sides so that they would have to show it that way. However, the pilot was turned down by the FOX executives. They thought that it did not have enough action. They also did not like the captain. FOX told Whedon on a Friday afternoon that he had to make a new script by Monday morning or they would not do it. Whedon and Tim Minear spent the weekend writing a new episode, "The Train Job". In this new episode, the captain was more "happy" and they added "larger than life" characters. These characters were the henchman "Crow", and the "hands of blue" men, that also introduced a "X-Files"-type ending.
Set design.
Production designer Carey Meyer built the ship "Serenity" in two parts. It was built as a complete set. It had ceilings and working lights built in as part of the set that the cameras could use. It also had movable parts. This helped with moving the camera around inside the set. There were other good things about this set design. One was that it let the people watching feel that they were really in a ship. For Whedon, the design of the ship was very important. It defined the known space for the viewer. He wanted to show that it was simple and that it was "beat-up but lived-in and ultimately, it was home". Each room had a feel to it, usually shown by the paint color.
Their small budget was a reason to use the ship for much of telling the story. When the characters did go off of the ship, the worlds all had Earth atmosphere and colors. They could not afford to build alien worlds.
Music.
The theme song, "The Ballad of Serenity", was written by Joss Whedon and performed by Sonny Rhodes. Whedon wrote the song before the series was approved by Fox. An early recording done by Whedon can be found on the DVD release.
The soundtrack to the series was released on CD on November 8, 2005 by Varèse Sarabande. The musical score matches the blending of cultures in the show. Cowboy guitar blended with an Asian feel was the musical background for the series. Greg Edmonson wrote the music for the series. He said that he wrote for the emotion of the moment.
Casting.
In casting his nine-member crew, Whedon looked first at the actor and how they got along with others. All nine cast members were chosen before filming began. However, while filming the original pilot "Serenity", Whedon saw that the actress cast as Inara Serra (Rebecca Gayheart) was not right for the role.Morena Baccarin auditioned for the role and two days later was on the set in her first television show.
Whedon asked Nathan Fillion to play the lead role of Malcolm Reynolds. After telling him the idea for the show and showing him the pilot, Fillion wanted the role. Fillion was called back several times to read for the part before he was cast.
Alan Tudyk auditioned and was told to come back in to test with the possible Zoes (the character's wife). It was down to him and one other person. The Zoes did not work out and Tudyk was sent home. He got a call telling him he had the part anyway.
Veteran science fiction-fantasy actress Gina Torres ("The Matrix Reloaded", ') did not at first want to do another science fiction show, but "was won over by the quality of the source material." As she recalled, "So you had these challenged characters inhabiting a challenging world and that makes for great storytelling. AND NO ALIENS!"
Adam Baldwin grew up watching westerns. The character of Jayne Cobb was a role that was perfect for him.
Canadian actress Jewel Staite has been an actress since age nine. She videotaped her audition from Vancouver. she was asked to come to Los Angeles to meet Whedon, where she was cast for the role of Kaylee Frye, the ship's engineer.
Sean Maher remembers reading for the part and liking the character of Simon Tam. He said it was Whedon's personality and vision that "sealed the deal" for him. For the role of Simon's sister, Whedon called in Summer Glau for an audition and test the same day. Glau had first worked for Whedon on an episode of "Angel". Two weeks later Whedon called her to tell her she had the part. This was Glau's first speaking role.
The veteran television actor Ron Glass ("Barney Miller", "All in the Family"), has said that until "Firefly", he had not thought about a science-fiction western role but he fell in love with the pilot script and the character of Shepherd Book.
Back story.
The series takes place in the year 2517, on several planets and moons. The TV series does not say if these are in one star system. The movie "Serenity" makes clear that all the planets and moons are in one large system. The characters refer to "Earth-that-was" and in the movie, it is said that long before the events in the series a large population had left from Earth to a new star system: "Earth that was could no longer sustain our numbers, we were so many." The people settled in this new star system, with "dozens of planets and hundreds of moons." Many of these were terraformed, a process in which a planet or moon is altered to resemble the Earth. The terraforming process was only the first step in making a planet livable. Only the most central planets got more treatment. This caused many of the border planets and moons to have environmentsthat fit the Western setting.
Synopsis.
The show takes its name from the "Firefly"-class spaceship "Serenity" that the main characters call home. It looks like the lightning bug, Firefly in shape. Its tail section even lights up during acceleration.
The Alliance is shown to control the star system through an organization of "core" planets. DVD commentary suggests that two main "core" planets make up the Alliance. One is mostly Occidental in culture, the other is Asian. This explains the series' mixed linguistic and visual themes. The central planets are under Alliance control, but the outer planets and moons resemble the 19th century American West, with little government control. Settlers people on the outer worlds have relative freedom from the central government. The outer areas also have Reavers, a cannibalistic race.
The captain of the crew of "Serenity" is Malcolm "Mal" Reynolds (Nathan Fillion). The episode "Serenity" shows that the captain and his first mate Zoe Washburne (Gina Torres) are veteran "Browncoats" of the civil war. A later episode, titled "Out of Gas", shows that Mal bought the spaceship "Serenity" to continue living beyond Alliance control. Much of the crew's work is made up of cargo runs or smuggling. One of the main story arcs is that of River Tam (Summer Glau) and her brother Simon (Sean Maher). River was a child prodigy. Her brain was experimented on. She seems to have schizophrenia and often hears voices. It is later found out that she is a "reader", someone with psychic abilities. Simon gave up a very good career as a surgeon to save her from the Alliance. They join the crew in the original "Serenity". Because of this rescue, they are both wanted criminals.
Signature show elements.
"Firefly" takes place in a multi-cultural future. Because of this, Mandarin Chinese is a common second language. It is used in advertisements, and characters in the show often use Chinese words and curses.
The show also has slang not used in today's culture. There are changes to modern words, or new words ("shiny" is a synonym of "cool"). The Japanese katakana and an Old West dialect are also used.
One of the problems that Whedon had with FOX was the tone of the show, especially with the main character Malcolm Reynolds. FOX wanted Whedon to make his character more "jolly". They felt he was too dark in the original pilot.
Main characters.
"Firefly" had an ensemble cast that played the nine crew members of the ship, "Serenity". These characters fight criminals, Alliance security forces, the insane Reavers, and the mysterious men with "hands of blue" - who seem to work for a secret agency which is part of the huge corporation, The Blue Sun Corporation. The crew needs to get enough income to keep their ship working. While doing this, they must stay hidden from people looking for them.
All nine major characters are in every episode, with one exception: Book is absent from "Ariel".

Labour Party (UK)
politics
The Labour Party has been, since its founding in the early 20th century, the principal political party of the left in the United Kingdom. It is currently the party of government in the United Kingdom and the Welsh Assembly. It was in power in the Scottish Parliament (in coalition with the Scottish Liberal Democrats) until 2007, and is the second largest grouping on the London Assembly, although the Mayor of London until May 2008 was a Labour party member. It is also the 2nd largest party in Local Government and the 2nd largest UK party in the European Parliament.
History.
The party was officially formed in 1906, just after the general election, as a successor of the Labour Representative Committee formed in 1900. In 1918, the party made a new constitution with the commitment to socialism, or the socialization of the industry. This could be found in Clause 4.
The Labour Party won the general election in 1945 for the first time. From 1951 Labour was in opposition for thirteen years, during which there were serious fights between the left and right wings of the party. The leader of the left wing was Aneurin Bevan. His supporters were called the Bevanites. They wanted a less confrontational policy in foreign affairs and more socialist actions. The leaders of the right wing were Clement Attlee and Hugh Gaitskell. They believed that Western capitalism had changed a lot and that socialism and public ownership was not so important. Gaitskell tried to remove Clause 4 from the party constitution at the 1959 conference, but he could not.
In 1994 Tony Blair could force the Labour Party to drop Clause 4. This was an important step to change the party into ‘New Labour’.

The Offspring (album)
music
"The Offspring" is the debut album by the band of the same title. It was originally on vinyl in 1989 under the label Nemesis Records and it was re-released on CD in 1995 on Epitaph Records.

Saparmurat Niyazov
politics
Saparmurat Niyazov (February 19, 1940 - December 21, 2006) was the first President of Turkmenistan. He served from 1993 to 2006. Saparmurat Niyazov also called himself Türkmenbaşy, which means leader of the Turkmen people. He tried to make a cult of personality, which means that he put many pictures and statues of himself around his country to make himself seem important. While he was president, Niyazov made doing many things against the law, such as growing a beard or ballet dancing. He died from a heart attack on December 21, 2006, and Gurbanguly Berdimuhammedow became the new president of Turkmenistan.

Amanda Michalka
music
Amanda Joy "AJ" Michalka (born April 10, 1991) is an American singer and actress from Torrance, California, USA. Her parents are Carrey Begley-Michalka and Mark Michalka. Her older sister is actress Alyson Michalka. She is notable for being in the band with her sister called Aly & AJ. She also starred with her sister in the Disney movie "Cow Belles". She is of German-American ancestry.
Biography.
Amanda Michalka was born in Torrance, California in 1991. Her older sister, Alyson "Aly" Michalka and their parents moved to Seattle, Washington. There her parents made sure they were exposed to all varieties of music. They then moved back to Southern California, where they still live.
Career.
Michalka was in a number of WORD Music Productions at her church in Southern California as a young child. Michalka plays a variety of instruments such as acoustic guitar, electric guitar, piano, and bongos. She used to be a model for catalogs. In March 2006, she made her Disney Channel debut in the Disney Channel Original Movie "Cow Belles", as "Courtney Callum", along with sister Aly, as "Taylor Callum". She has also made appearances on shows such as "Oliver Beene", "Six Feet Under", "The Guardian", and "General Hospital".
she has also appeared with her sister in the MTV movie, '.

Adolf von Henselt
music
Adolf von Henselt (born Schwabach, Bavaria, May 9 1814; died Warmbrunn (now Cieplice), Silesia, October 10 1889 was a German pianist and composer. He had piano lessons from Hummel in Weimar. When he was a young man he played in concerts all over Germany. Then he went to Russia where he was very successful and he settled there to live. He became pianist at the court of the tsar and taught the tsar’s children how to play the piano.
Henselt was known for his beautiful playing of the music of Chopin. He was very good at playing widely spaced arpeggios and could make them sound very smooth (legato) even if he was not using the pedal.
As a composer he is mostly remembered today for a few of his short works which are often quite sentimental, e.g. "Frühlingslied" ("Spring Song") and "Si oiseau j’étais" ("If I were a bird").

Jean Sibelius
music
Jean Sibelius (born Hämeenlinna (Tavastehus) 8 December 1865; died Järvenpää, 20 September 1957) was a Finnish composer. He is one of the most famous people from Finland and one of the greatest composers of symphonies of all times. He was born at a time when Russia had a lot of power in Finland and the Finnish people were trying hard to keep their own culture and their independence. This nationalism can be heard in a lot of his music, especially some of the choral music. After 1928 he composed very little. He lived in retirement in his home in the Finnish countryside.
Early life.
Jean (pronounced the French way) was born 100km north of the Finnish capital Helsinki. His grandfather had changed the family name from a Finnish name to the Latin-sounding “Sibelius”. His father died during a cholera epidemic when Jean was very young. His family spoke Swedish at home, but when he was eleven he went to a Finnish-speaking school. He learned to play the violin and wanted to be a soloist. He loved reading the "Kalevala" which was a long epic poem about the old Finnish legends. He also loved the Swedish-speaking poets who wrote poems about nature.
In 1885 he went to Helsinki to study law but he soon gave up law and concentrated on his violin studies and composition. He went to Berlin to continue his music studies. He became good friends with the pianist and composer Ferruccio Busoni and went with him to Leipzig. At this time he had mainly written chamber music. In Vienna he had lessons from Karl Goldmark and heard lots of orchestral music. He spent a lot of his money, much of it on drink which was to be a big problem for him for many years.
Early success.
He went back to Finland in 1891. He earned money by teaching. He wrote a big work for orchestra and singers called "Kullervo ". The words were in Finnish, the story was from the poem "Kalevala". This work made him famous.
In 1892 he married Aino Järnefelt. Her father was a general and very keen on the Finnish language. The Finnish were trying more and more at this time to be free of rule by Russia. Sibelius wrote more patriotic music during the 1890s e.g. the tone poem "En Saga" and the "Lemminkäinen" legends which include the popular "The Swan of Tuonela". His patriotic tone poem "Finlandia" is still very popular today. His music at this time was influenced by Wagner and Tchaikovsky. He also heard Finnish folk melodies and, although he does not use them directly in his music, they became part of his musical language. In 1897 he was given a state pension which helped him financially although for many years he was still very often short of money because he had expensive tastes.
Mature years.
Between 1899 and 1924 Sibelius composed the 7 symphonies which made him famous worldwide. His friend, the conductor Kajanus, conducted Sibelius’s works when he took the Helsinki Philharmonic Orchestra on tour around Europe. His wife was becoming worried about how much alcohol he was drinking in Helsinki, so 1903 she persuaded him to move the family to a place called Ainola in the Finnish countryside. They had a house built in Järvenpää. Apart from a few short periods in Helsinki he spent the rest of his life there. The first works he wrote there were his "Symphony no 2" and the "Violin Concerto ". He became seriously ill in 1908 and for several years he had to stop smoking cigars and drinking alcohol. He continued to travel and visited England several times and the United States in 1914 where he was very popular. After the war he continued to write more symphonies as well as some short, light pieces. The last great work that he wrote was the tone-poem "Tapiola" in 1926. He tried to write another symphony (no 8) but gave up and destroyed it. He never wrote any more music. He continued to live in retirement in his house in the Finnish country for another 30 years. The house is now a Sibelius museum.
Family life.
Sibelius's wife Aino came from a highly respectable family. Although her father was a general in the army, there was a very great interest in culture in the Järnefeld family which included musicians, painters and poets. Jean fell in love with Aino on his first visit to her home. Aino was to be a faithful wife to him all his life, although she suffered a lot of hardship due to his drinking problems and his debts. They had five daughters.
His works.
Sibelius is best known for his symphonies and tone-poems. His symphonies are very different from one another, none can be described as being “typical” of his style. The early symphonies are Romantic in character, in the later symphonies he tries out lots of new ideas and sounds. His "Violin Concerto" is played by all the great violinists. Sibelius wrote lots of songs for voice and piano. These are mostly settings of Swedish poems. He also wrote many choral works, mostly in Finnish. These vocal works are not so well known outside Finland because the language is not familiar abroad, but there are some very good songs, especially "Luonnotar". Besides his important works he also wrote many short works in order to earn enough money to live. These include songs as well as many short piano pieces.
Sibelius's music today is extremely popular. His music has also been an influence on recent composers.

Babe Ruth
sports
George Herman Ruth, Jr. (February 6, 1895 – August 16, 1948), also known as "Babe", "The Great Bambino", "The Sultan of Swat", "The Colossus of Clout", and "The King Of Crash", was a very famous baseball player during the 1920s and 1930s in Major League Baseball. He played with the Baltimore Orioles, Boston Red Sox, New York Yankees, and the Boston Braves.

Víctor Jara
music
Víctor Jara (September 28, 1932- September 15, 1973) was a singer from Chile, South America.
He was born into a family of very poor peasants but through a lot of hard work and effort was able to enter the University of Chile - something very unusual in a poor country like Chile. In this manner he was able to escape the poverty of his parents.
At University he studied dramatic arts or acting; he taught and directed theatre productions. During this time he met and married, Joan Turner, a British ballet dancer and choreographer who worked in Chile.
Later Víctor Jara started to write and sing songs. He began to sing songs about the life of humble and poor people in his country: peasants, factory workers, miners, abandoned children, poor women. He also dedicated music albums to people who live in the shanty towns.
Víctor Jara tried to use his music to bring awareness about the inequality between the richest and the poorest people in society. How poor folk have a hard time acquiring the most basic things, such as food, health care, education, and housing. He also supported politicians who called for a fairer distribution of wealth to end poverty.
In 1973 Víctor Jara was killed by a military dictatorship led by General Augusto Pinochet for singing songs about social problems and social injustice. The U.S. government of Richard Nixon supported the military regime.

Leopold Mozart
music
Johann Georg Leopold Mozart (November 14, 1719 - May 28, 1787) was a composer, music teacher and violinist. He was the father and teacher of Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart.

Michael Praetorius
music
Michael Praetorius (born Creuzburg an der Werra, near Eisenach 15 February 1571?; died Wolfenbüttel, 15 February 1621) was a German composer, organist and music theorist. He was one of the most important composers of his day and he wrote lots of different kinds of music. A lot of his music is based on hymns of the Protestant church.
We are not quite certain about the date of his birth. He was born at a time when there was a lot of argument about religion in Germany. His father was a strict Lutheran and lost his job more than once because of his beliefs. We know very little about the life of Praetorius. He seems to have gone to the Lateinschule (“Latin School”) in Torgau where he had music lessons from Michael Voigt. He probably never had music lessons after he left school. Then he went to the University of Frankfurt an der Oder. There Praetorius graduated in divinity. Afterwards he found a job as organist to the Duke of Brunswick-Wolfenbüttel. He soon earned a good salary. He married in 1603 and had two sons.
Although he had his job in Wolfenbüttel for many years he also worked a lot in Dresden where he met Heinrich Schütz and in Magdeburg where he met Samuel Scheidt. His health was not good, possibly because he worked so hard. When he died he left a lot of money to the poor.
His music.
Praetorius wrote a very large amount of music. Much of it has been lost. He wrote a collection of French dances called "Terpsichore" for a small group of instruments. These are very happy pieces and are very popular today. A lot of his music is based on Protestant hymns, written for the services in the Lutheran church. He liked to write music in which two groups of singers or instrumentalists alternate (take it in turns to sing/play). His music for choir, which includes many motets, shows him to be one of the best composers of his time. He liked to write music for two, three or four choirs (all singing different parts). The tune would be in the top part so that the congregation could join in.
His theory works.
Praetorius wrote a book about music theory called "Syntagma Musicum". Part One talks about religious music. It is very interesting for us today because it tells us a lot about the way that Martin Luther wanted to change music in the church services. In Part Two he described the musical instruments of his day. Part Three talks about musical forms: this included discussions about things like music notation (the way music was written), transposition (music), solmization and how to write for large choirs. He was going to write a Part Four in which he wanted to discuss the technique of musical composition, but he died before he could write it.

Denver Broncos
sports
The Denver Broncos are a American football team in the National Football League. They are in the American Football Conference. Their quarterback is Jay Cutler. The Broncos play in Denver, Colorado.
The Denver Broncos won the Super Bowl in 1997 and 1998. Their most famous player is John Elway.

Indianapolis Colts
sports
The Indianapolis Colts are a American football team in Indianapolis, Indiana. They play in the National Football League. They were originally the Baltimore Colts. The team moved to Indianapolis in 1984. Their quarterback is Peyton Manning.

Spencer Perceval
politics
Spencer Perceval (November 1, 1762 – May 11, 1812) was a British statesman and Prime Minister. He is the only British Prime Minister to have been assassinated (shot dead).
Perceval was the seventh son of John Perceval, 2nd Earl of Egmont by his second wife. His father, a close friend of Frederick, Prince of Wales and King George III, had served in the Cabinet as First Lord of the Admiralty, but died when Perceval was ten.
Perceval was Prime Minister when William Wilberforce passed his Bill (law) ending the slave trade.
The Orders in Council against trade which Perceval had written in 1807 became unpopular. In the winter of 1811 the Luddite riots started. They were also a cause of the War of 1812 with the United States of America. Perceval was forced to have an inquiry by the House of Commons. On May 11, 1812, Perceval was on his way to attend the inquiry. In the lobby of the House of Commons he was was shot through the heart John Bellingham. Perceval's body lay in 10 Downing Street for five days before burial. Bellingham gave himself up straight away. Tried for murder, he was found guilty and hanged a week later.
Perceval is buried at St Luke's Church in Charlton, south-east London.

Dan Marino
sports
Daniel Constantine Marino, Jr. (born September 15, 1961) is a Hall of Fame quarterback who played for the Miami Dolphins in the National Football League. Many think of him as one of the greatest quarterbacks ever.
Marino started his career playing for University of Pittsburgh as a quarterback. Marino finished his career with the university having thrown 74 touchdown passes. In 2002 he was voted into the College Football Hall of Fame. He had a long and successful career as a quarterback for the Miami Dolphins, breaking many passing records but never leading his team to win the NFL Super Bowl.

Joe Montana
sports
Joseph Clifford Montana, Jr. (born June 11, 1956) was a quarterback for the San Francisco 49ers and the Kansas City Chiefs of the National Football League. Whilst with the San Francisco 49ers he lead them to win four Super Bowls; himself winning 3 Super Bowl Most Valuable Player (MVP) awards. Some people think of him as The Greatest Quarterback of All Time. Montana began his career playing for the University of Notre Dame in Indiana. He broke many records while playing for the San Francisco 49ers.

Ennio Morricone
music
Ennio Morricone (born November 10, 1928) is an Italian classical composer famous for making film scores. He has composed the scores for more than 500 movies and television programs. He is well known for composing the scores to, particularly Spaghetti Westerns. In 2007 he received the Honorary Academy Award for his many great movie scores.

Roh Moo-hyun
politics
Roh Moo-Hyun is a former President of South Korea. He was born on September 1, 1946 in Gimhae, Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea. He took office on February 25, 2003. After retirement from Cheongwadae, he is living in Bongha Maeul, Gimhae, Gyeongsangnam-do now.

Kim Young-sam
politics
Kim Young-sam (born December 20, 1927 in Geoje, South Gyeongsang) was the President of the South Korea from February 25, 1993 to February 25, 1998.

Roh Tae-woo
politics
Roh Tae-woo (born December 4, 1932 in Daegu, South Korea), is the sixth President of South Korea (1988–1993). He was a former Korean general and politician. A member of the Hanahoi, Roh was the hand-picked successor of the ex-general and president Chun Doo-hwan. This caused large pro-democracy rallies in Seoul and other cities in 1987. Roh agreed to hold democratic presidential elections, making himself a candidate for the next election. The opposition split the votes between Kim Young-sam and Kim Dae-jung (both of whom later became presidents). This made Roh the first elected president after the time that the military ruled the country.
Roh's rule was notable for hosting the Seoul Olympics in 1988 and for his foreign policy of nordpolitik.
In 1993, Roh's successor Kim Young-sam led an anti-corruption campaign that saw Roh and Chun Doo-hwan on trial for bribery. The two former presidents were later charged with mutiny and treason for their part in the 1979 coup and the 1980 Gwangju Riot.
Both were found to be guilty in August 1996 of treason, mutiny and corruption. Chun was sentenced to death, later changed to life imprisonment. Roh's 22 1/2-year jail sentence was reduced to 17 years. Both were released from prison in early 1998, pardoned by then-President Kim Dae-jung.

Chun Doo-hwan
politics
Chun Doo-hwan (born 18 January, 1931) was a Korean military officer and the President of South Korea from 1980 to 1988. He was sentenced to death in 1996. Chun was later pardoned by President Kim Young-sam with the advice of then President-elect Kim Dae-jung, who had sentenced to death by Chun some 20 years earlier.
The road to power.
Chun was a graduate of the Korean Military Academy in 1955. He was a member of Hanahoi, a powerful group of military officials that supported his actions. He was in charge of the investigation into the assassination of President Park Chung-hee. On 12 December 1979, in what became known as the Incident of December 12th, Chun ordered the arrest of Army Chief of Staff General Chung Sung Hwa (정승화, 鄭昇和) without authorization from then-President Choi Kyu-ha. He ordered the arrest as part of the investigation of his part in the assassination. Chung Sung Hwa resisted the arrest. This led to a bloody gun fight at the Army Headquarters and the Ministry of Defense. By the next morning, Chun and his fellow military academy graduates Roh Tae-woo and Jeong Ho-yong were in charge of the Korean military.
On 17 May 1980, Chun placed the entire country under martial law and disbanded the National Assembly. Many politicians were arrested, including liberal politician Kim Dae-jung. Kim was later sentenced to death in spite of protests from the United States. Later, Chun changed Kim's sentence in return for U.S. support. Protests across the nation became smaller. However, very violent prostests happened in Gwangju. Protestors Lootinglooted government building. They armed themselves with stolen guns and military jeeps. Protestors killed a couple of policemen and started of violent protest against the government. A couple of hundreds of protestors and some thirty soldiers were killed in the Gwangju. Choi resigned in August, and Chun was elected his successor by the National Conference for Unification, the South Korean electoral college, in September. In February 1981, Chun was elected president under a revised constitution as the candidate of the Democratic Justice Party (later renamed Democratic Republican Party).
Years in office.
Chun ruled in an authoritarian manner. The 1981 constitution was less authoritarian than its 1972 predecessor, the Yushin Constitution, but still granted very broad powers to the president. However, it limited the president to one seven-year term. Chun did not try to change it so he could run for reelection in 1988.
By 1986, the general public was happy with the economic growth. However, there was much anger and hatred against Chun's regime by left-wing students who later became known as 386s. The left wing students led the nationwide June 1987 protests. In the same month, U.S. President Ronald Reagan sent a letter to Chun in support of the creation of "democratic institutions." On June 29th, Roh Tae-woo announced a program of reform. This included direct presidential elections, restoration of banned politicians including Kim Dae-jung, and other liberalizing measures. This won Roh instant popularity, and he was elected as the next president of South Korea. It later became known that Chun was responsible for this plan.
During Chun's visit to Rangoon, Burma (now Myanmar) in 1983, a bomb exploded at a mausoleum he was about to visit. The bomb killed 21 people, including South Korean Cabinet members. Chun himself did not die because he got there two minutes late. While no firm evidence of North Korean involvement has been found, they are widely though to be responsible.
An embattled ex-President.
In 1996, former presidents Chun and Roh were jailed on charges of corruption. On December 16, they were also found guilty of treason and mutiny as part of their takeover of power. Chun was sentenced to death. That sentence was changed to a life sentence. He and Roh were pardoned a year later.

Ramananda Prasad
science
Ramananda Prasad (born 1938) is the founder of the International Gita Society. He has translated the Bhagavad Gita into English in 1988 from the Sanskrit text.
Prasad was born in Hargawan, Bihar to a farmer who had three acres of land and six children to support. By hard work, his father was somehow able to send his sons to college. Ramanand had his pre-school education in the village from the late Mazahirul Haque, a Muslim headmaster who taught him English and Mathematics. After finishing his high school education at Mahadeva High School, Khusrupur, he passed his high school from Patna College in 1953. He attended Patna Science College from 1953-55 and is a 1959 graduate of the Indian Institute of Technology in Kharagpur, India, obtained his Master's Degree from the University of Toronto and earned his doctorate in Civil Engineering from the University of Illinois. Since then, he has been involved in research, teaching, engineering and consulting and worked for the U. S. Navy Corps of Engineers before retiring in 2000. He is presently a professor of Civil Engineering at San Jose State University and an adjunct professor of religion and psychology at the Union Institute in Cincinnati, Ohio.
Dr. Prasad has founded several non-profit organizations in the San Francisco Bay Area such as the "Vedic Dharma Samaj" that now runs the Fremont Hindu temple, "Ramayan Sabha", and the "Universal Yoga Center" of San Francisco. He is married to Sadhana Prasad, a devotee of Lord Shiva and has one daughter, Reeta Raina who is married to Abhinav Raina and one son, Sanjay Prasad, who now directs the activities of the International Gita Society. He also has two Grandsons, Jay Raina and Raj Krishan Raina.
Prasad created the American Gita Society (later renamed the International Gita Society) in 1984 in order to foster unity and goodwill between all religions and faiths of the world, through the teachings of the Bhagavad Gita. Its initial focus was to put copies of Bhagavad-Gita in libraries, hotels, motels, hospitals all over the world as the American Bible Society does with copies of the New Testament. In his translation, he borrows allied concepts liberally from the Koran, Bible, Dhammapada, and many other Hindu texts in order to get his message across that all faiths are ultimately one, while nonetheless giving supremacy to the stature of the Gita.

Thierry Henry
sports
Thierry Henry (born August 17 1977 in Les Ulis, Essonne, France) is a French football player (footballer). He plays for Barcelona. He is considered one of the world's best players.
Henry started his career at small clubs in France. He had played for the Italian team, Juventus. In 2001, he joined Arsenal of England, where he became one of the best players in the English Premier League. He has been named the Football Writers' Association Footballer of the Year three times and the French Player of the Year four times since 2001.
On the international team, Henry has scored 6 goals in World Cup competitions. Only one French player, Michel Platini, has scored more goals than Henry.
Henry relies mostly on his acceleration and pace to beat his opponents.

Liese Prokop
politics
Liese Prokop (March 27, 1941 - December 31, 2006) was an Austrian athlete and politician. Prokop was born in Vienna, Austria. Before being married to Gunnar Prokop, her name was Liese Sykora. The two had two sons and a daughter. Prokop won the silver medal in the Pentathlon in the 1968 Summer Olympics in Mexico City. Prokop was the first female Austrian Minister for Interior affairs. She was in charge of the security of Austria, including its police force. She was a member of the ÖVP, Austrian people's party.
She died unexpectedly December 31, 2006 of a torn aorta while being taken to a hospital in St. Pölten.

Austrian People's Party
politics
The Austrian People's Party (German: "Österreichische Volkspartei" or "ÖVP") is one of the biggest parties in Austria. Its name roughly translates to Austrian People's party. It has about 630.000 members. Its views are often center-right. This means it often has conservative views on the matters at hand. Many of its voters are Catholics. It is against moderate socialism, which is embodied by the other big party, the SPÖ.
A well-known politician, Dr. Wolfgang Schüssel is a member of this party. Former Minister of the Interior, Liese Prokop was also a member.

Social Democratic Party of Austria
politics
The Social Democratic Party of Austria (German: "Sozialdemokratische Partei Österreichs" (often shortened to "SPÖ")) is one of the oldest political parties in Austria. Its politics are center-left. This means it has a strong stance in labour unions. The party rejects neoliberalism. They like moderate socialism and social democracy. A well known politician of this party was Bruno Kreisky.
Since the end of the Second World War, the party has been the strongest, or second-strongest party in Austria, by vote. The other party that they share this status with are the ÖVP.

Social Democratic Party of Germany
politics
The Social Democratic Party of Germany (German Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands or SPD'") is the oldest political party of Germany that still exists. There were other political parties that were older, but they no longer exist.
History.
It was founded as the General German Workers Association ("Allgemeiner Deutscher Arbeiterverein") (ADAV) on May 23rd in 1863 in Leipzig. Founder was Ferdinand Lassalle.
In 1875 the ADAV joined with the Social Democratic Workers' Party ("Sozialdemokratische Arbeiterpartei") (SDAP), which was founded in 1869 in Eisenach by August Bebel and Wilhelm Liebknecht.
The new name was the Socialist Workers' Party of Germany ("Sozialistische Arbeiterpartei Deutschlands") (SAP).
In the autumn of 1890 it took its present name.
In the years between 1875 and 1890 it was made illegal by Otto von Bismarck.
The Social democrats wanted to support the rights of workers.
In 1914 the SPD was split into two. Most members of the party supported the Kaiser and his plans for war. The other members formed the Independent Social Democratic Party of Germany ("Unabhängige Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschland") (USPD). They were against the war.
After the monarchy fell, the SPD lead some governments of the Weimar Republic.
Later the SPD was the only party in the Reichstag who voted against the Enabling Act,("Ermächtigungsgesetz") which allowed Hitler to become dictator.
Afterwards, the Nazis banned the SPD. They arrested the leading social democrats. Many were sent to Nazi concentration camps. Others moved away to towns where they were not known. Friedrich Kellner, an organizer for the SPD in Mainz from 1920 to 1932, moved to Laubach. He wrote entries in a secret diary about the crimes of the Nazis.
After World War II, the SPD was reformed.
In the GDR (East Germany) the Soviet Union forced the SPD to join with the communist party to make the Socialist Unity Party of Germany ("Sozialistische Einheitspartei"). In Western Germany the SPD worked as a not-communist left-winged party.
First chief of the SPD after WWII was Kurt Schumacher.
The SPD lead some state governments in West Germany, but was always the leading opposition party in the Bundestag (federal parliament).
Under its parliamentary party leader Herbert Wehner the SPD joined the federal government lead by chancellor Kurt Georg Kiesinger (CDU) with the CDU and the CSU in 1966. Party chief Willy Brandt became foreign secretary and vice chancellor.
In 1969 Willy Brandt became federal chancellor. The SPD lead a coalition government with the FDP as its partner. In 1974 Helmut Schmidt became chancellor.
In 1982 the SPD lost the power of government.
Between 1998 and 2005 the SPD lead the government under chancellor Gerhard Schröder. Its partner this time was the Green Party.
In November 2005 the SPD became the junior partner in a coalition with the CDU and CSU under Angela Merkel.
Programme.
The SPD is traditionally the party of the workers in Germany.
In 1959 the SPD adopted the "Godesberger Programm", named after the town of Bad Godesburg in North Rhine-Westphalia. The SDP formally abandoned Marxism, and accepted the market economy (which means people and companies can make money and keep it themselves), but wanted to have a social balance (which means people would get help from the government if they had no job, were sick or too old to work, instead of relying on savings or charity). Companies might get subsidies to help keep people in work).
Many people thought that the government of Chancellor Schröder (1998 - 2005) changed the idea of social balance, making people rely more on savings or charity. The SPD lost a lot of members. Now there is a discussion in the SPD about new social balance policies.

Felix Klein
science
Felix Christian Klein (April 25, 1849, Düsseldorf, Germany – June 22, 1925, Göttingen) was a German mathematician. He became known for his work in group theory, function theory, non-Euclidean geometry, and on the connections between geometry and group theory. His 1872 Erlangen Program, which classified geometries by their underlying symmetry groups, was a hugely influential synthesis of much of the mathematics of the day.
The Klein bottle is named after him.

Kurt Schumacher
politics
Kurt Schumacher (*October, 13th, 1895 in Kulm, West Prussia - † August, 20th, 1952 in Bonn) was a German politician. He was leader of the SPD from 1946 to 1952 and speaker of the SPD in the Bundestag 1949-1952.
Schumacher was born as the son of a salesman. When World War I started, he left school to join the German army. In December of 1914, he was badly hurt. His arm had to be removed. After this, he went back to school in Berlin to study Law and politics. While there, he became a socialist. In 1924, he was elected to the legislature in Württemberg. He became the SPD leader for Württemberg in 1928. In 1930, he was elected to the national legislature, the Reichstag.
After the Nazis took control of Germany, Schumacher was arrested. He was beaten badly in prison. He was put into concentration camps for the next ten years. In 1943, Schumacher was set free because of his bad health. He was arrested again in 1944 and stayed in the concentration camps until the British set them free in April 1945.
After the World War II, Schumacher put the SPD back together. He was first chief of the Social democrats in West Germany after the WWII. He was also their first speaker in the federal parliament (Bundestag) and first leader of opposition in the Bundestag.
In 1952, Schumacher died in Bonn.

Free Democratic Party (Germany)
politics
The Free Democratic Party or Freie Demokratische Partei, short FDP (from 1968 to 2001 F.D.P.) is a political party in Germany. Currently its position is that of free market believer. The party does not want to take away all of the social features of the German welfare state, however.
History.
Several liberal parties have existed in Germany since the 19th century.
The FDP was founded in Western Germany in September of 1945 in the state of Hamburg. It became member of the state parliament of Hamburg in the first election.
Similar liberal parties were founded in other German states, most of them successful in getting mandates.
In 1947, on March 17th, the "Demokratische Partei Deutschlands" (DPD) was founded as a whole-German liberal party by Theodor Heuss and Wilhelm Külz, but it broke down after a short while.
On December, 11th in 1948 the FDP was founded as a liberal party for Western Germany.
Chief of the party was Theodor Heuss.
In its first years the main part of the party followed a national-liberal way. Liberal in the economical field, but very conserative in most other fields.
But in every state it had its own way.
The next important man was Thomas Dehler.
The FDP was the smaller partner of the CDU under Konrad Adenauer. It was member of the Western German government from 1949 to 1966.
In 1969 the FDP returned to government. But now the FDP was partner of the Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands under Willy Brandt, later Helmut Schmidt.
It changed its values. A lot of left-liberal position were leading ideas of the FDP in that time.
Civil rights and to give everyone the chance of a good education guaranteed state stipendia, no study fees any more, more higher education schools).
It changed again in 1982, when it crashed down the government on Schmidt and elected Helmut Kohl of the CDU to the new chancellor.
It became more and more a single issue party with its only interest in a low tax tarif - espially for high incomes.
It fought for study fees now and against social security. It secretary general said one day "We are the party of the best-incomes".
In 1998 it lost its power and became part of the opposition.
In some state parliaments thew FDP is still in power as junior partner of the CDU.
The party's inofficial motto is "So viel Staat wie nötig, so wenig Staat wie möglich!", meaning "as much state as necessary, as little state as possible!"

Christian Social Union of Bavaria
politics
The Christian Social Union of Bavaria or Christlich Soziale Union (short CSU) is a conservative political party in the German state of Bavaria.
In the federal parliament of Germany (Bundestag) the CSU and the CDU always join together.
Its chief is Erwin Huber.
History.
In 1945, two local CSU groups were founded. One in Würzburg and the other in Munich.
In January 1946 the CSU was founded for the whole of Bavaria.
All state elections of Bavaria were won by the CSU. Sometimes the CSU had to make some coalitions with the Bayernpartei (Bavarian Party), the FDP or the SPD.
In the federal government the CSU always joins with the CDU.
One very famous leader of the CSU was Franz Josef Strauß. Sometimes he was well known for the good that he did. Other times because of scandals.
Programme.
The CSU is a very conservative party according to the people of Bavaria, who mainly live in the countryside and smaller towns and villages.
Traditionally it tried to make a compromise between conservative tradition and social welfare.
Currently it leans to more free market beliefs instead of social care.

Jermaine Jackson
music
Jermaine LaJaune Jackson, now Muhammad Abdul Aziz (born December 11, 1954), is an American singer and bass guitarist. He is a former member of The Jackson 5 and brother of American pop stars Michael Jackson and Janet Jackson. He is taking part in Celebrity Big Brother UK 2007.

Stefan Zweig
media
Stefan Zweig (November 28,1881 in Vienna - February 22,1942 in Petropolis) was an Austrian writer. He volunteered to be a soldier in the First World War, and got the post as a military commentator. This made him an enemy of war. The Nazis gained power in Germany in 1933, and their influence could be felt in Austria as well. 1934, Stefan Zweig emigrated, first to London, then to South America. That way he lost much of his audience. He committed suicide (together with his second wife) in 1942. He did this through an overdose of sleeping pills.
He has written many books and poems. One of his best-known works is called Schachnovelle" ("The Royal Game", in English. In it, he describes a Chess player, that is forced to play against himself (while imprisoned). He explores the theme of madness. This book inspired the movie Geri's Game, made by Pixar in 1997

Simon Peyton Jones
science
Simon Peyton Jones (1958-) born in South Africa and is a British computer scientist. He does research on (lazy) functional programming languages, such as Haskell. He works at Microsoft Research in Cambridge, England. He is married to Dorothy, a priest in the Church of England. They have three children.
Simon Peyton Jones, Simon Marlow and others have developed the Glasgow Haskell Compiler, a compiler for Haskell.
He has also worked on C--.

Boris Yeltsin
politics
Boris Nikolayevich Yeltsin () (Russian spelling:Бори́с Никола́евич Е́льцин) (February 1, 1931 - April 23, 2007) was the first President of Russia. He served from 1991 to 1999. Mikhail Gorbachev, the last president of the Soviet Union, came before him. Vladimir Putin came after him. Boris Yeltsin died of a heart failure on April 23, 2007.

Marie Curie
science
Marie Skłodowska–Curie (7 November 1867 – 4 July 1934) was a physicist and chemist from Polish but lived in France. She was a expert in the field of radioactivity and the only person to get the Nobel Prize in two different sciences. She was the first woman professor at the University of Paris.
She was born under the name Maria Skłodowska in Warsaw, Poland, and lived there until she was 24. In 1891 she followed her elder sister Bronisława to study in Paris, where she received her higher degrees and did her inportant scientific work. She founded the Curie Institutes in Paris and Warsaw. Her husband Pierre Curie also won a Nobel Prize, so did her daughter Irène Joliot-Curie and son-in-law Frédéric Joliot-Curie.
Her achievements include the creation of a theory of "radioactivity" (a term comfirmed by her and Pierre), techniques for separate radioactive isotopes, and she discovered two new elements, radium and polonium. It was also under her own direction that the world's first studies were used into the treatment of cancers, using the radioactive isotopes.
While being a French citizen, she never lost her Polish identity. She named the first new chemical element that she discovered (1898) "polonium" after her home country, Poland, and in 1932 she founded a Radium Institute in her home town Warsaw, run by her physician-sister Bronisława.

Blue Angels
sports
The Blue Angels are a group of special pilots who work for the US Navy. They fly A-18 fighter jet airplanes that are painted to look different from regular Navy planes. They are very famous. Almost every American has heard of them. The pilots of the Blue Angels are very good at what they do. They are able to fly very close to each other and do very difficult tricks. They are most famous for the flyovers they do at many American sporting events.

Pete Doherty
music
Peter Doherty (born March 12, 1979) is an English musician. He is most famous for his drug and legal problems and his relationship with fashion Supermodel Kate Moss. He was in the popular rock band The Libertines but left the band because other band members did not like him. He is now in a band called Babyshambles.

Daddy Yankee
music
Ramón "Raymond" Ayala or Daddy Yankee (born on February 3, 1977 in San Juan, Puerto Rico) is a Puerto Rican reggaeton singer. Ayala is famous for making songs in both English and Spanish, but Spanish is used more than English.

Phoenix Suns
sports
The Phoenix Suns are a basketball team that plays in the National Basketball Association (NBA). They play in the Pacific Division of the Western Conference. The Suns play at the US Airways Center, also known as America West Arena. The Suns have made it to and lost the Western Conference Finals twice in the last few years; in 2007 against the eventual winners, the San Antonio Spurs, and in 2006 against the Dallas Mavericks. Steve Nash, Amare Stoudemire, Shawn Marion, Raja Bell, Boris Diaw, Leandro Barbosa and Grant Hill play for the Phoenix Suns.

Des O'Connor
sports
Desmond "Des" Bernard O'Connor (born January 12, 1932) is an English television presenter and singer. O'Connor is currently presenting Countdown on Channel 4 in the United Kingdom.

Tony Romo
sports
Antonio "Tony" Ramiro Romo (born April 22, 1980 in San Diego, California) is an American football quarterback who plays for the Dallas Cowboys of the National Football League. He was signed by the Cowboys as an undrafted free agent in 2003. He played college football at Eastern Illinois.

Carmelo Anthony
sports
Carmelo Kiyan Anthony is an American basketball player for the Denver Nuggets. He was born in 1984, in New York City.

Dallas Mavericks
sports
The Dallas Mavericks are an American basketball team from Dallas, Texas. They play in the National Basketball Association (NBA). Dallas Mavericks players include Dirk Nowitzki, Jerry Stackhouse, and Josh Howard.

Walter Payton
sports
Walter Payton (July 25, 1954 – November 1, 1999) was an American football player. He was born in Columbia, Mississippi. Payton played for the Chicago Bears from 1975 to 1987. The Bears won Super Bowl XX in 1985. Payton was made a member of the Pro Football Hall of Fame in 1993. He died of liver cancer in 1999.

Michael Owen
sports
Michael Owen (born December 14, 1979 in Chester, Cheshire, England) is the forward for Newcastle United F.C. in England, which competes in the FA Premier League. He also is in the England national football team, which competes in the World Cup and other international events.

Gianluigi Buffon
sports
Gianluigi "Gigi" Buffon (born January 28, 1978) is an Italian football player. He is a goalkeeper. He currently plays with Juventus Turin.
Gianluigi Buffon started his career in Parma F.C., a famous Italian club, winning a UEFA Cup in 1999. Later he played for the Italian giant, Juventus, winning Italian Serie A on consecutive years.
Buffon joined the Italian national team in 1998, and he has played for them for nearly 10 years. In the 2006 World Cup he led them to the championship, allowing only two goals in 7 games. Therefore, some people currently consider him the best goalkeeper in the world.

Ramsay MacDonald
politics
James Ramsay MacDonald (12 October 1866 – 9 November 1937) was a British politician and Prime Minister of the United Kingdom three times. He became the first Prime Minister of the Labour Party in 1924. His third period as Prime Minister was during the crisis of the Great Depression when he formed a "National Government" in which a majority of MPs were from the British Conservative Party and was expelled from the Labour Party.

Green Bay Packers
sports
The Green Bay Packers are a American football team in Green Bay, Wisconsin. They play in the National Football League. Their quarterback is Aaron Rodgers.
The Packers hold the record for the most NFL league championships. They have won 12 championships, including three Super Bowls. The Packers have also had 13 consecutive non-losing seasons from 1992 to 2004. This is also a league record.

David James (footballer)
sports
David James (born August 1 1970) is a professional footballer currently playing as a goalkeeper for Portsmouth F.C..

Martin Adams
sports
Martin Adams (born 1956) is an English professional darts player. His nickname is "Wolfie" referring to his hairy face and the fact that he likes wolves. Adams is the top ranked darts player. Adams played in one of the most dramatic and thrilling world championship darts finals of all time when he defeated Phil Nixon by 7 sets to 6 on January 14 2007. What made the match so enthralling was the fact that Adams was leading by 6 sets to 0 at the interval when Nixon made his unbelievable comeback.

Pittsburgh Steelers
sports
The Pittsburgh Steelers is an American Football club of the National Football League located in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. They have won five Super Bowls.

Alice Cooper
music
Alice Cooper (born February 4, 1948) is an American rock musician and singer. Originally, there was a band called Alice Cooper led by a singer named Vincent Damon Furnier. The band was one of the creators of a very theatrical and violent brand of rock music that was designed to shock. Alice Cooper drew equally from horror movies, vaudeville, heavy metal and garage rock to create a theatrical brand of rock music that would come to be known as "shock rock".
In 1974, Furnier legally changed his name to Alice Cooper and started a solo career. Cooper's solo career began with the 1975 album "Welcome to My Nightmare". Expanding from his early Detroit garage rock and glam rock roots, over the years Cooper has experimented with many different musical styles.
Alice Cooper is known for his social and witty persona offstage. "The Rolling Stone Album Guide" refered to him as the world's most "beloved" heavy metal entertainer. He helped to shape the sound and look of heavy metal. Cooper is also credited as being one of the first to bring storylined theatrics to the rock/pop concert stage in the late 1960s. Away from music, Cooper is also an actor, a golf celebrity, a restaurant owner and a popular radio DJ.

Mary Hopkin
music
Mary Hopkin (born May 3, 1950) is a Welsh pop singer, who was most famous in the late 1960s and early 1970s. Her first and biggest hit was "Those Were The Days" in 1968.
When The Beatles started their own record label called Apple Records, they were looking for new artists to sign up. Model Twiggy, a friend of the band, had seen Hopkin on a talent show, and recommended her. After Hopkin signed with Apple, Beatle Paul McCartney produced many of the songs for her first album, called "Post Card". Singer-songwriters Donovan and Harry Nilsson, and record producer George Martin, also gave her songs to record.
"Those Were The Days" was McCartney's choice for Hopkin's first single. He chose well, and the song became a hit worldwide. Hopkin recorded other singles, including "Goodbye", "Temma Harbour", "Knock, Knock, Who's There", and a remake of Doris Day's "Qué Sera, Sera", but they were not as successful as her first record. McCartney moved on to a solo career after the Beatles disbanded, and no longer worked with her. Hopkin's second album, "Earth Song/Ocean Song", was largely self-produced.
Hopkin disliked the way Apple Records had promoted her, as a kind of "squeaky-clean" schoolgirl, and left the label after two albums and a best-ofs compilation, also titled "Those Were the Days". She retired from music after marrying producer Tony Visconti, but she did appear as a background singer on a few of his productions.
During the 1990s, Apple Records reissued many of their old records, including Hopkin's two original albums. She oversaw a new version of "Those Were the Days", with bonus tracks and a detailed booklet.

Stephen Euin Cobb
media
Stephen Euin Cobb (born February 3, 1955) is an American science fiction author and the host of the award-winning podcast "The Future And You". He was born in Orangeburg, South Carolina. Cobb spent his childhood in Forest Park, Illinois (a suburb of Chicago). He now lives in South Carolina. Cobb is a member of the Beaver Creek Tribe of Native American Indians in South Carolina. His mother served one term as a member of the Tribal Counsel. He is between 1/8 and 1/4 Native American.
In the online science fiction magazine "Jim Baen's Universe", Cobb writes about what he thinks our lives might be like in the future. On his show, "The Future And You" (which is similar to a two-hour long radio talk show), he asks authors, celebrities, scientists and other people who write about the future what they think the future will be like for people to live in.
"Bones Burnt Black" (2004) is his most popular novel (he reads a chapter of it in his show, like an audio book). His first published novel was "Plague at Redhook" (1999). His most popular game is called Death Stacks. Every summer in Charlotte, North Carolina many people come together and play this game to see who can play it the best. The four winners each get a trophy.

Charles Aznavour
music
Charles Aznavour (born May 22, 1924) is an Armenian-French singer, songwriter and actor. He is one of France's most popular and long lasting singers, and also one of the most well-known French singers in other countries. He has appeared in more than 60 movies and written more than 1000 songs (including 150 in English, 100 in Italian, 70 in Spanish, and 50 in German). He has sold over 100 million albums. Aznavour started his final tour in late 2006.

Patti Smith
music
Patti Smith (born Patricia Lee Smith on December 30, 1946) is an American singer and poet. She was an important member of the punk rock music trend in the 1970s.

Philadelphia Eagles
sports
The Philadelphia Eagles is an American football team in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. The Eagles joined the National Football League in the year 1933. They have appeared in two Super Bowls (XXXIX and XV) but have not yet won a game. Sixteen Eagles players have become Pro Football Hall of Famers.

Sergei Prokofiev
music
Sergei Sergeyevich Prokofiev (b. Sontsovka, Ukraine 23 April 1891; d. Moscow 5 March 1953) was a Russian composer and pianist who came from the Ukraine. Together with Dmitri Shostakovich he belongs to the greatest Russian composers of the 20th century. Children all over the world love to listen to his musical story "Peter and the Wolf" and the music for "Lieutenant Kije", but he wrote many other great works including symphonies, concertos, piano sonatas, ballets and operas.
Early life.
Prokofiev was born into a family who had plenty of money. His father owned a lot of land in the Ukrainian steppe. His mother played the piano very well. The young Sergei started composing at a very early age. By the time he was eleven he had written two operas and lots of short piano pieces. Soon he was writing music with unusual time signatures and in unusual changes of key.
Prokofiev's formal musical education began when, as a young boy, he started taking lessons from Reyngol'd Moritsevich Glier. In 1904 he went to study at the Conservatory in St Petersburg. He was a brilliant student, but he often disagreed with the way the professors were teaching. He was bored with the lessons in orchestration from Rimsky-Korsakov and the counterpoint lessons from Liadov although he could have learned a lot from these great men. His main friends were the composers Nikolai Myaskovsky and Boris Asafiev. He often showed them his latest piano compositions which sounded very modern. The newspaper critics did not like his music.
Prokofiev spent the summer of 1909 back at home in small Russian farming village of Sontsovka in what is now the Ukraine where his father was an estate manager. He worked in a way that was to be typical of him all his life: he kept making changes to his earlier works, he often borrowed music from one composition and put it in another, or used unfinished works in new compositions.
When he returned to St Petersburg (which had by then changed its name to Petrograd) he had piano lessons from a teacher called Anna Espova. She worked hard to discipline him in his playing. He also took conducting lessons from Nikolai Tcherepnin who taught him to like late-Romantic composers such as Scriabin and Debussy. He wrote some music himself in this style, but most of the music he wrote at this time sounded very harsh and dissonant and, although he was becoming quite famous, many people hated it. When he finished his studies at the Conservatoire he won a big prize (the Rubinstein Prize) with his "First Piano Concerto", although the examiners had found it hard to agree.
Prokofiev travelled to London where he met many famous people including Diaghilev who had a very skilled ballet group called Ballets Russes. The composer Igor Stravinsky had been writing ballet music for Diaghilev’s dancers. Prokofiev particularly loved Stravinsky’s "Rite of Spring" and it influenced his music. He wrote an opera "The Gambler" based on the novel by Dostoyevsky but the singers and the orchestra did not understand his music and refused to perform it. One of the first works of Prokofiev to become known all over the world was his First Symphony known as the "Classical Symphony". He made the music sound like that of composers from the Classical period such as Haydn. This symphony is still very popular today.
America and Europe (1918-1936).
In 1917 the Russian Revolution took place. The country was in a chaotic state so Prokofiev went to the United States. After a journey which took four months he arrived in New York. At first he had great success there, but he spent a lot of time writing several operas at once, and no opera house wanted to perform them. His ballet "The Love for Three Oranges" was very popular, but he was short of money so in 1920 he went to Paris where he had some success with his ballet "The Tale of the Buffoon". He also wrote his "Third Piano Concerto" which is one of his best works. Prokofiev lived in Paris for fourteen years, but he often went on tour, performing his works on the piano. In 1928 his "Third Symphony" was first performed. It is one of his best works, and uses a lot of music from his opera " The Fiery Angel" which was never performed complete during his lifetime. In 1923 he was invited back to Russia. Although many Soviet people tried to persuade him to stay there he decided to remain in the West where he was starting to have a very successful career. It was not until 1936 that he finally decided to move back to Russia. Life was not easy in the Soviet Union for creative people such as musicians. Composers were made to write music which told about the glories of their country. Any music which the politicians did not like was called “decadent” or “formalist” and got the composer into trouble. Prokofiev had never been interested in politics, and he may have thought that the politicians would leave him alone.
USSR: (1936-1953).
Back in Russia Prokofiev settled in Moscow. He wrote several children’s pieces including "Peter and the Wolf". He was asked to write music for two important jubilees: the 20th anniversary of the Revolution and the centenary of Pushkin’s death. He took great care over this music. He set some of Pushkin’s poems to music and wrote a very large piece called "Cantata for the Twentieth Anniversary of the October Revolution", using words by Marx, Lenin and Stalin for a total of 500 performers. The music included realistic effects such as gun shots, machine-gun fire and sirens. However, many critics said that the music was vulgar, and it was not performed until 1966, long after Prokofiev’s death. He tried to write an opera called "I am the Son of the Working People" but he did not find it a very interesting topic to set to music. The opera was going to be produced by Meyerhold, but Meyerhold was arrested and executed and the opera was dropped.
The World War II was a time of change for Prokofiev for several reasons. In 1941 he had a heart attack which was the beginning of a period of bad health. He spent a lot of time away from Moscow where it was unsafe. He stayed mostly in Georgia and Kazakhstan. His friendship with a young lady called Mira Mendelson led to the break-up of his marriage with Lina. Mira had many political friends in the Communist Party and it is possible that the break-up of his marriage was forced on him. Lina was a foreigner and marriage to foreigners was made illegal (forbidden) at that time. In 1948 she was arrested, charged with being a spy, and sent to a labour camp. Prokofiev lived with Mira for the rest of his life. Soviet writers described her as his wife, but in fact they never married. Lina was freed from the labour camp after Stalin’s death. Later she left the Soviet Union and she died in London in 1989.
During the war Prokofiev composed a lot of his best music. He wrote his most famous piano sonatas as well as working on his great opera "War and Peace" (based on the novel by Tolstoy) and writing his famous film music for Eistenstein’s "Ivan the Terrible" and composing his Fifth Symphony. The first performance of this symphony, given on 13 January 1945, was the last time he performed in public. Shortly after he had a bad fall and his health became worse. He spent the rest of his life in a house in the country to the west of Moscow, although during his last winters he lived in Moscow close to his doctors. Even in these last years he was not to find peace. Stalin’s rule of terror had serious effects on all Soviet artists. In 1948 a committee of the Communist Party spoke out against several Soviet composers including Prokofiev. They said that his music was “formalist” and “alien” to the Soviet people. His opera “War and Peace” was not allowed to be performed. The works he wrote in his last years were mostly ones which had been officially commissioned. His best work of this period is the "Symphony-Concerto" for cello and orchestra which he wrote for his friend, the cellist Mstislav Rostropovich.
Prokofiev died of a brain haemorrhage on 5 March 1953. His death was hardly mentioned in the newspapers because the dictator Stalin died on the same day.

Dmitri Mendeleev
science
Dmitri Mendeleev (born Dmitriy Ivanovich Mendeleyev, February 8 {O.S. January 27) 1834 in Tobolsk – February 2 (O.S. January 20) 1907 in Saint Petersburg) was a Russian chemist. He is said to be the main creator of the first version of the periodic table of elements. Many of the predictions made in his periodic table (such as the properties of elements undiscovered at the time) were later proved correct by experiments. It was said that Mendeleev liked to arranged his cards to any order- color, size, shape, number, what box it came from.

Albert Camus
media
Albert Camus (November 7, 1913 – January 4, 1960) was a French philosopher and writer. Camus wrote novels and plays. Camus was born in Algeria, a country in the North part of Africa. He had French parents. Many people think that Camus is an existentialist philosopher. Existentialism is a philosophy that is very different from other ways of thinking. Camus won the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1957.
Early years.
Albert Camus was born in Algeria to a poor working class family. His mother was Spanish and his father was french. His father died in battle and he was left to live with his grandmother. WHen he was 17 he was diagnosed with tuberculosis, which was very impactful on him at that point in his life. It limited him greatly in his athletics as well as in his career opportunities, due to the fact that tuberculosis is quite contagious. For this reason he claimed that his disease “set him free” because he would have done something else with his life had he seen the opportunity. He went to the University of Algiers, where he graduated with a degree in 1935. In the 1930s, Camus became interested in politics. In 1935, Camus joined the French Communist Party, a political group. In the late 1930s, Camus was a writer for the socialist newspaper, the "Alger-Republicain".
1940s.
In 1941, Camus wrote his first novel, which was called "The Stranger". During World War II, Camus joined the French Resistance to fight against the Nazi army. After World War II, Camus became friends with another writer called Jean-Paul Sartre. Camus and Sartre often talked about philosophy and politics in small restaurants called cafés.
1950s.
Camus wrote books about philosophy (ways of thinking) which said that life was "absurd" (makes no sense, or has no meaning). In the 1950s Camus tried to improve human rights. In 1960, Camus died in a car crash. He had two children, Catherine and Jean.

Arizona Cardinals
sports
The Arizona Cardinals are a professional American football team based in Phoenix, Arizona. They are the oldest continuous professional American football club in the United States, founded in 1898 in Chicago, Illinois. They moved to St. Louis, Missouri in 1960 before moving to Phoenix in 1988. The head coach of the team is Ken Whisenhunt.

Ryszard Kapuściński
media
Ryszard Kapuściński (b. March 4 1932 in Pińsk, d. January 23 2007 in Warsaw) was a popular Polish journalist. He was well regarded both at home, and abroad. During his life he became known for his way of reporting news. He was a foreign correspondent for the Polish press agency. He was shortlisted as a candidate for the Nobel Prize for Literature, but also received many other awards. He is one of the Polish authors whose works get translated most often.

Walkman
sports
Walkman is the invention as well as the brand name of Sony. It represents a portable audio player. Today, similar devices are also called "Walkman". The name describes players that have small sizes and can be carried by one anywhere. The portable player was a revolutionary device since one could take favorite music with him or her.
History.
The year of release of the original Walkman is 1979. The name "Walkman" was used in Japan, while abroad it had another name, which is "Soundabout". First the product did not have a name, and then one of the company's staff proposed "Walkman". Because it was a direct translation from Japanese, Sony's leadership seemed skeptical. They thought "Walkman" was not a suitable name for a device which was to be launched in the United States and Europe.
Sony used new ways to introduce its new product on the market and advertise it. The main idea of Sony was to make people aware that Walkman is a product that is unique on the market and that it is both new and fun.
On June 22 (the date of release) Sony Walkman appeared in Tokyo. The company held an unusual press conference where different journalists were invited to Yoyogi, which is Tokyo's major park. They were given Walkman so to prove that the portable player is fun and easy to use. By 1995 there were already about 150 million Walkman portable players produced.

Katie Couric
media
Katherine "Katie" Anne Couric (born January 7, 1957) was a co-host of the top-rated "Today" show, broadcast live on NBC affiliates, from 1991 until late 2006, earning nearly $14 million each year for the last 4 years of her contract.
Couric was hired by CBS in late 2006 to anchor the evening news, which operated with temporary anchors after Dan Rather's departure. Ratings have been disappointly low despite the initial fanfare and introduction of new theme music at the beginning of each show.
Couric is active in charities, especially related to colon cancer, after the death of her husband (to colon cancer) in 1998. Couric received a colonoscopy on live television in March of 2000. She also released pictures of her mammogram on television.

Fritjof Capra
science
Fritjof Capra (born February 1, 1939) is an Austrian-born American physicist.
Born in Vienna, Austria, Capra earned a Ph.D. in theoretical physics from the University of Vienna in 1966. He has done research on particle physics and systems theory, and has written popular books on the implications of science with ethycs, metaphysics and society.
In particulare in the "The Tao of Physics" he makes the assertion that physics and metaphysics are both inexorably leading to the same knowledge. His works all share a similar subtext: that "there are hidden connections between everything". Capra is both a Buddhist and a Catholic Christian.
After touring Germany in the early 1980s, Capra co-wrote a book on Green Politics with ecofeminist author Charlene Spretnak called "Green Politics," in 1984.
Capra pushes for western society to abandon conventional linear thought and the mechanistic views of Descartes. Critiquing Descartes' reductionistic view that everything can be studied in parts to understand the whole, he allows his readers to take an objective and fresh mind, encouraging them to see the world through complexity theory.
Capra is purportedly setting the grounds for change in many new theories, one of which is the theory of living systems, a theoretical framework for ecology. This theory is only now fully emerging but it has its roots in several scientific fields that were developed during the first half of the twentieth century — organismic biology, gestalt psychology, ecology, general systems theory, and cybernetics.

Giuseppe Verdi
music
Giuseppe Verdi (b. Roncole near Busseto, 9 or 10 October 1813; died Milan 27 January 1901) was an Italian composer of operas. Verdi and Richard Wagner were the greatest composers of opera in the 19th century although they were completely different from one another. When Verdi was a young man the most famous opera composers in Italy were Gaetano Donizetti and Vincenzo Bellini who wrote in the bel canto tradition. This meant that their operas had beautiful tunes which were written for singers to show off their voices, even if what they sang did not suit the story. During his long life Verdi changed opera so that it did not have to obey old-fashioned rules. He made the drama the most important thing and the music is there to help the drama.
Early years.
The small village where Verdi was born lies in the valley of the river Po in the north of Italy. It was a poor district. His father was an innkeeper who had a small farm. The young boy must have been very talented. He was given a spinet which he kept all his life. At the age of 9 he often played the organ for church services in the village when the organist was away.
A few years later he composed music for the amateur orchestra in Busseto. A man called Antonio Barezzi knew many important people and he helped Verdi a lot. Later Verdi married his daughter. Barezzi sent him to Milan so that he could study, but Verdi had not been taught the piano properly and he did not get a place in the music conservatory. He had some private lessons and learned a lot about opera as well as about literature and politics. In 1839 he composed an opera: "Oberto, conte di San Bonifacio", which was performed in La Scala, the world-famous opera house in Milan. It is not one of his greatest operas, but it helped him to become well-known and he was asked to write three more operas for La Scala. When his next opera was produced it was not a success: the audience did not like it and they hissed and booed. There was also tragedy in his personal life at this time: his two children and his wife all died.
Early fame.
Verdi managed to overcome his unhappiness in 1842 when he produced his opera "Nabucco". This was a great success and made him world-famous. He started to work very hard, composing two operas a year. He not only had to write the music but organize all the people to perform it. It was a huge workload. His opera "Ernani" (1844) was one of the best from this period. In 1847 he had another big success with “Macbeth”. This opera, based on Shakespeare’s famous play, is still one of the best-loved of all operas. He was becoming more amazing.
For centuries Italy had been a collection of several countries, each with their own ruler. In the 1850s there was a lot of political unrest in the country. Verdi often wrote music for large choruses in his operas. The words of these choruses were often about fighting for freedom, and it was often thought that the songs were encouraging people to revolt. The song "Va pensiero" from his opera "Nabucco" was about the Hebrew slaves who were captive in Babylon. People chanted it in the streets with the words suitably changed. Verdi became a great national hero. Italy eventually became one country in 1861.
Giuseppina Strepponi was the soprano who sang the part of Abigaille in "Nabucco". Verdi fell in love with her. She had lived with another man and had three children so she felt that she was not good enough for Verdi. They eventually married in 1859. She was a great support to him until her death in 1897 although Verdi was not an easy husband to live with. He moved back to Busseto with her. He continued to travel a lot but did not let his wife come with him, leaving her behind in Busseto where she was not happy because many people there did not like her.
Three more famous operas were written at this time: "Rigoletto" in 1851 and "Il trovatore" ("The Troubadour") and "La traviata", both in 1853. These operas have many tunes which became famous. They are full of exciting drama in which the characters are very skilfully described by the music. The music is not divided so clearly into recitative and aria like it had been for two centuries. Instead, the music is developing all the time, the arias run straight into the following music. He had a brilliant sense of drama, but he often had to fight hard to stop producers making changes to what he had written.
Verdi often had trouble with the censors (the officials who decide whether the opera should be allowed to be performed). His opera "Rigoletto" was based on a story called "Le roi s’amuse" by Victor Hugo. The attempted murder of a king was not thought to be a suitable subject. Verdi had to change the king into a duke in his story and make some other changes before the opera could be performed. The story of his opera "Traviata", based on a novel by Alexandre Dumas fils, was also thought to be immoral. At the first performance the audience laughed because the heroine, who is supposed to be dying of consumption, was very fat. However, the opera soon became enormously popular.
International fame.
Verdi had become very famous by now, and was asked to compose for the Opéra in Paris. He had to write operas in the French style: operas with five acts and a ballet based on a serious story. None of the operas he wrote at this time for Paris belong to his best works. He was more inspired when writing for the Italian theatres. "Simon Boccanegra" has a very complicated plot, but the characters are described beautifully by the music. "Un ballo in maschera" (The masked ball) was about the murder of King Gustav III of Sweden. Again the censors did not like it and he had to change the story to a setting in Boston which rather spoiled the story. In the 1860s his best works were "La Forza del Destino" ("The Force of Destiny"), written for St Petersburg, "Don Carlos" written for the Paris Opéra, and "Aida" for the new opera house in Cairo in Egypt. "Aida" is considered one of his most perfect works. The first performance was not without difficulties: Verdi was having a long argument with the conductor Mariani who refused to go to Cairo to conduct it. The argument was made worse by the newspapers who accused Verdi of taking Mariani’s girlfriend. This caused a great scandal.
Last years.
Verdi retired in the 1870s. He was a rich man who owned a lot of land. He gave a lot of money to charities, particularly to one charity for elderly musicians. Even in retirement he was persuaded by his publishers to write two more operas. He became fascinated by Shakespeare and he wrote "Otello" to a libretto (words) by Arrigo Boito. This was a brilliant libretto and it helped him to write a great masterpiece in which every little detail of the story is beautifully described by the music. His very last opera, "Falstaff" (1893) is based on Shakespeare’s "Merry Wives of Windsor". Verdi continued to write a few religious pieces in his old age. He died in 1901.

Harry Connick, Jr.
music
Harry Connick, Jr. (September 11, 1967) is an American singer, piano player and actor. He plays jazz music mostly, but also pop music.

Celtic F.C.
sports
Celtic F.C. is a team in Scotland playing in, and current champions of, the Scottish Premier League.
Old Firm.
Celtic is half of the Old Firm, alongside Rangers F.C. This is a term used to describe both Rangers and Celtic collectively.

Scipio Africanus
politics
Publius Cornelius Scipio Africanus Major (Latin: P·CORNELIVS·P·F·L·N·SCIPIO·AFRICANVS¹) (235–183 BC) was a general in the Second Punic War and politician of the Roman Republic. He was best known for defeating Hannibal of Carthage. He won in the battle of Zama. He got the last name "Africanus", the nickname "the Roman Hannibal" and became known as one of the best commanders in military history because he did so well.

Karel Svoboda
music
Karel Svoboda (19 December 1938 – 28 January 2007) was a Czech composer of popular music. He wrote music for many TV series in the 1970s.
Works.
Karel Svoboda was born in Prague, Czechoslovakia (now Prague, Czech Republic) and began his career as a pop composer after stopping studying medicine in his third year of university. He became a member of the rock band "Mefisto" in the 1950s. Later, he composed music for the "Laterna Magica" theatre in Prague and for many Czech singers. In 1969 he wrote "Lady Carneval" for Karel Gott, a major Czech pop star. Svoboda wrote a total of 80 songs for him.
Svoboda composed TV scores for the German channel ZDF for over 30 years. He wrote the scores to many TV series in the 1970s that a whole generation of Europeans grew up with. Some examples of these TV series are Vicky the Viking, Maya the Bee and The Wonderful Adventures of Nils.
Svoboda wrote scores for almost 90 films and TV series.
Svoboda was found fatally shot in the garden of his villa at Jevany on January 28 2007. It is supposed that he committed suicide.

Tom Vilsack
politics
Thomas James Vilsack (born December 13, 1950) is a former Governor of Iowa and a former Democratic candidate for President of the United States.
Vilsack was born in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. At college, he met and married his wife, Christie. They moved to Iowa after graduation. They have two children.
Vilsack served in the Iowa State Senate before he ran for governor in 1998. He won that election and the next one in 2002. He chose not to run again in 2006.
In December 2006, Vilsack said he will run for president. He dropped out of the race a few months later. He has endorsed New York Senator Hillary Clinton. Vilsack is now practising law in Des Moines, Iowa and is President-elect Barack Obama's pick for U.S. Secretary of Agriculture.

Beyoncé Knowles
music
Beyoncé Giselle Knowles (born September 4, 1981) is an American R&B singer and actress. She was famous first as the lead singer of R&B girl group Destiny's Child. Destiny's Child is the best-selling female group of all time. They have sold over 60 million albums and singles worldwide. She has a sister named Solange.

Frank Sinatra
music
Frank Sinatra (December 12, 1915 – May 14, 1998) was an American singer and actor. His singing career was almost seventy years long and more than 250 million records of his have been sold worldwide. Sinatra's style of music, the way he sang, is hard to define. In slang terms he was a "crooner", a singer of love ballads. He has also been called a "jazz singer" because of his work with famous jazz musicians and his use of jazz in his music.
Sinatra was also part of the Rat Pack, a group of entertainers (musicians and actors), in the 1950s and 1960s. The name was informal, or slang, and the group was not an official organization of any sort, but a group of friends. Members of the Rat Pack included Sinatra, Dean Martin, Sammy Davis, Jr., Peter Lawford, Joey Bishop, Humphrey Bogart, Judy Garland, Lauren Bacall, Sid Luft and Shirley MacLaine among others.
Sinatra was friends with many important entertainers, politicians and mafia members. Because he had friends in the mafia the FBI tried to find information that could have him arrested.

Bing Crosby
music
Harry Lillis "Bing" Crosby (May 3, 1903-October 14, 1977) was an American singer and actor. His singing career was around fifty years long and more then 500 million records of his have been sold worldwide. Crosby is known for creating the style of music that Frank Sinatra, Perry Como and Dean Martin would later sing. In 1962, Crosby became the first person ever to receive the Grammy Lifetime Achievement Award. His voice good enough to have him become the most popular artist in both the jazz and swing jazz styles of music.

Dean Martin
music
Dean Martin (born Dino Crocetti June 17, 1917 - December 25, 1995) was an American singer and actor. He was one of the most popular artists in the 1950s. Martin's career as a singer really began when he met comedian Jerry Lewis at a club and they decided to team up as a comedy-music pair. They became successful at clubs and then acted in the film "My Friend Irma" which made them famous. They worked together for ten years, had a popular radio show, and made more movies. Martin became a huge success on his own when he sang "That's Amore", and his partnership with Lewis ended in July 1956.
Martin was also part of the Rat Pack, a group of entertainers (musicians and actors), in the 1950s and 1960s, whose unofficial "leader" was Frank Sinatra. (Sinatra personally called the group "The Summit".) They made movies and performed live shows together, many in Las Vegas, Nevada.
Martin later had his own television show, and made recordings for Reprise Records, a record label started by Frank Sinatra. At the height of the rock and roll era, Martin still had hit records, and his "Everybody Loves Somebody Sometime" even knocked The Beatles off the top of the "Billboard" sales charts.
Martin made movies on his own, which were mostly comedies. Four of them starred him as "Matt Helm", a spy in the manner of James Bond. Martin also appeared in dramatic movies, like "Rio Bravo" and "Airport". When he sang onstage or on television, he always had a cocktail glass with him, and most people thought he was drinking whiskey as he performed. It turned out he actually drank apple juice the whole time. Offstage, Martin enjoyed Jack Daniels whiskey, and red wine.
His television show was cancelled in 1975, but he continued on television with "The Dean Martin Celebrity Roasts", a series of specials that mocked celebrity testimonial dinners. Other comedians and actors would appear, and instead of praising the guest of honor, would make fun of them. None of the mocking was serious, though, and everyone usually had fun at the roasts. The specials ran until 1984.
Martin was more or less retired in the late 1980s, though he did record a new collection of his best songs, which were sold through television commercials. In early 1987, his son Dean Paul ("Dino") Martin was in the United States Air Force, and his airplane crashed during a mission. His body was later recovered. Losing Dean Paul broke Martin's spirit, and he never seemed happy after that.
Martin joined Sinatra and other Rat Packers for a reunion tour, but his heart was not in it, and he quit after just a few shows. Sinatra was very angry, and the two did not speak for years. They later made their peace, after members of the Rat Pack began to die off. Martin lived in retirement, watching movies at home, and going for dinner at a nearby restaurant.
During the 1990s, Martin developed emphysema from years of cigarette smoking, and had trouble with his liver also. His health became bad, and he began to think about death. He and his wife Jeanne were divorced years earlier, but had remained close. She encouraged him not to worry about dying, and to think about his parents, and their son Dean Paul, waiting for him.
Martin died over the Christmas holidays in 1995, watching television in bed. As a tribute, the lights on the Las Vegas Strip were dimmed for one minute, in his memory. His epitaph was the title of his best-remembered song: "EVERYBODY LOVES SOMEBODY SOMETIME".

Sammy Davis, Jr.
music
Sammy Davis, Jr. (December 8, 1925 - May 16, 1990) was an American entertainer. He was a dancer, singer and instrumentalist (playing vibraphone, trumpet and drums), comedian and actor. Davis became hugely successful as a stage singer and recording artist and when asked to play at segregated places (where African-Americans were not allowed) he refused. Because of this some popular venues began to allow African-Americans to attend just so they could have Davis and other popular black musicians play. Before that black singers like Davis and Nat King Cole could play at the hotels and casinos but not stay or gamble there.
Davis led an unhealthy lifestyle of drinking, smoking and cocaine use but was one of the most popular musicians and actors of the time. He converted to Judaism whilst in hospital in 1954 and 1955. He was also a member of the Rat Pack with friends Frank Sinatra and Dean Martin.

Chuck Berry
music
Charles Edward Anderson "Chuck" Berry (born October 18, 1926 in St. Louis, Missouri) is an American singer, guitarist and songwriter. He is one of the original rock and roll musicians; he, along with others, invented rock music. In 1955 he met Muddy Waters who told him of a record company that would release his first song. In 1957 he joined the Everly Brothers, Buddy Holly and other popular musicians on a tour around the United States. Over the next few years he became more and more popular and many of his songs became some the most bought and listened to songs at the time. He has influenced a lot of rock and pop musicians who came after him. Most of those people were guitar players, just like Chuck Berry himself.

Marcus Licinius Crassus
politics
Marcus Licinius Crassus Dives (Latin: M·LICINIVS·P·F·P·N·CRASSVS) (c. 115 BC – 53 BC) was a Roman general and politician who won the Third Servile War against Spartacus and was member of the First Triumvirate, with Gnaeus Pompeius Magnus and Gaius Julius Caesar. One of the richest men of the era, he was killed after a defeat at "Carrhae".

Pompey
politics
Pompey, Pompey the Great or Pompey the Triumvir (Classical Latin abbreviation: CN·POMPEIVS·CN·F·SEX·N·MAGNVS Gnaeus or Cnaeus Pompeius Magnus) (September 29 106 BC–September 29 48 BC), was an important military and political leader of the late Roman Republic.
Coming from an Italian provincial background, he got a place for himself in the ranks of Roman nobility, and was given the cognomen of "the Great" by Lucius Cornelius Sulla.
Pompey was a rival of Marcus Licinius Crassus and an ally to Gaius Julius Caesar. The three politicians would dominate the Late Roman republic through a political alliance called the First Triumvirate. After the death of Crassus, Pompey and Caesar would dispute the leadership of the entire Roman state.

Anton Rubinstein
music
Anton Rubinstein (born Vikhvatinets 28 November 1829; died Petershof 20 November 1894) was a Russian pianist and composer. Rubinstein and Franz Liszt were thought to be the greatest pianists of the 19th century. He was very important as a teacher and influenced many Russian musicians. He composed lots of music, although hardly any of it is heard nowadays. As a composer he is best remembered today by a little piece of piano music called “Melody in F”.
First concert.
Rubinstein gave his first piano concert when he was ten. Between 1840 and 1843 his piano teacher took him on long concert tours of Europe. He met Chopin and Liszt and was received in London by Queen Victoria. Between 1844 and 1846 the family lived in Berlin. His friends there included Mendelssohn and Meyerbeer.
Lessons.
In 1846 his father died and Anton went to Vienna where he gave piano lessons to try to earn some money. When he returned to Russia in 1848 the tsar’s sister-in-law let him live in her palace. He played for lots of parties. Often the tsar came.
Tours.
In 1854 he toured Europe again. Then he returned to Russia. He wanted to improve music education in Russia so he started the Russian Musical Society and then he started the St Petersburg Conservatory. During his long career he spent many years as director of the Conservatory as well as conducting concerts.
Compositions.
He wrote a lot of music, but although his compositions often started off with good ideas they often become rather boring. His opera "Tom the fool" was not a success. He was annoyed and wrote an article in a music magazine saying that it was not possible to write operas using Russian stories. He criticized several composers who were writing music which used Russian folktunes. This included the composer Mily Balakirev and his friends who were called The Mighty Handful. He said that they had not learned how to compose properly.
Rubinstein very much wanted to be famous as a composer as well as a teacher, but this made him very narrow-minded. However, it was as a pianist and conductor that he was important. He helped to improve the standard of music making in Russia by teaching and performing, and by starting the conservatory in St Petersburg.

Nikolai Rubinstein
music
Nikolai Grigoryevich Rubinstein (born Moscow, 2 June 1835; died Paris, 23 March 1881) was a Russian pianist and composer. He was the younger brother of Anton Rubinstein and a close friend of Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky.
The Rubinstein family were middle-class Jewish people. Like his brother Anton, Nikolai soon showed great talent as a pianist. The family spent some time in Europe including three years in Berlin where they made friends with Mendelssohn and Meyerbeer.
Anton founded (started) the famous Conservatoire in St Petersburg where students could study music. Nikolai founded the Conservatoire in Moscow. Both brothers were directors of the Conservatoires they had founded.
During his lifetime Nikolai Rubinstein was thought of as one of the greatest pianists of his time. As pianists the two brothers were very different. Anton was very fiery like Franz Liszt. Nikolai was quieter and more thoughtful, preferring lyrical Romantic music.
Anton liked to compose in the same way as composers from Western Europe. He was critical of Russian composers like Mily Balakirev and others from the group called The Mighty Handful who tried to make their music very Russian. Nikolai was much more broad-minded. He supported Balakirev and his group. He was a great friend of Tchaikovsky and encouraged him much more than his brother Anton had done. Nevertheless he still criticised Tchaikovsky’s First Piano Concerto. He said he would not play it until Tchaikovsky had changed it. Tchaikovsky refused to change it. Years later Nikolai decided he liked it after all.
Although Nikolai wanted to be a successful composer he was aware that he was not a great one. When asked why he did not compose more he once replied that his brother “composed enough music for three”.
Nikolai died in Paris while on his way to Nice where he had wanted to improve his health. He always liked his food and on his deathbed he ate twelve oysters. Tchaikovsky wrote his "Piano Trio in A minor" in Rubinstein's memory.
Among his most popular works are his "Tarantella" in G minor and the "Fantasia on a Theme by Schumann", both for piano solo.

Clint Dempsey
sports
Clint Dempsey (born March 9, 1983) is an American footballer from Texas. He plays for Fulham F.C.. He played for the New England Revolution in the United States before Fulham gave them money (a "transfer fee") to get him to play for them. Dempsey is a good player who is well liked by many people in the United States and England for his hard work and desire to win.
Clint also has taken an interest in rapping. Known as Deuce, he has produced compilations with Big Hawk and XO. He also once defeated Peter Crouch in a freestyle battle.

Robert F. Kennedy
politics
Robert Francis "Bobby" Kennedy (November 20, 1925 – June 6, 1968), also called RFK, was the brother of former U.S. President John F. Kennedy. He ran for president in 1968, but was assassinated in California during the presidential primaries.

Giacomo Puccini
music
Giacomo Puccini (born in Lucca, 23 December 1858; died Brussels, 29 November 1924) was the most famous Italian opera composer after Verdi. He wrote 14 operas, most of which are performed very often today. Many of his operatic songs are known by many people, especially the aria "Nessun dorma" from "Turandot" which was sung by Luciano Pavarotti for the BBC’s television coverage of the Football World Cup which was held in Italy in 1990.
Life.
Puccini was born into a musical family. He was expected to follow the family tradition and become a church organist. He started playing the organ in churches near Lucca. He liked to improvise on the organ, playing popular tunes from Verdi’s operas. He soon realized that he wanted to be an opera composer. Eventually he persuaded his family to let him study at the Milan Conservatory. His earliest compositions showed that he had a great talent for writing beautiful melodies and that he was good at writing for the orchestra. His first opera to be published, "Edgar", had a story similar to that of Bizet’s "Carmen", but it was not a suitable story for Puccini.
"Manon Lescaut" was the first opera for which Puccini chose the story himself. It is the same story as Massenet’s opera "Manon". This made Puccini internationally famous. His next opera, "La bohème", produced in 1896, is often thought to be his best opera. He worked with two poets on this opera and, although they quarrelled a lot, the result was a work in which the music flowed beautifully like a conversation.
His next opera was "Tosca". When it was first performed in Rome in 1900 there were rumours that a bomb would be thrown, but nothing happened. "Tosca" was a great success. However, "Madame Butterfly" was hissed and booed at its first performance in Milan’s famous opera house La Scala in 1904.
It was at this time that Puccini married. He already had a son by Elvira, his wife, who had been married to someone else. When her husband died, she was able to marry Puccini. The marriage was not without difficulties. Elvira accused Puccini of having an affair with their servant girl. This servant girl committed suicide and there was a court case which resulted (after an autopsy) in Elvira being found innocent. Puccini was very upset by all this and did not compose much for several years.
When he finally started writing again his new opera "La fanciulla del West" was set in the American West at the time of the Goldrush. The music has very Impressionistic harmonies like that of Debussy. The way he writes for the orchestra shows the influence of Richard Strauss. The opera was first performed in New York. The world-famous tenor Enrico Caruso sang the main hero part and Arturo Toscanini was the conductor. With such a star cast it had to be a great success.
Puccini followed this by writing an operetta and two one-act operas. The best of these is "Gianni Schicchi" His last opera is "Turandot", which has a fairy-tale like story. While he was working very hard at it he developed throat cancer. He died in the autumn of 1924. The whole of Italy went into mourning and Mussolini spoke at the funeral. Puccini had not quite managed to finish "Turandot". A man called Franco Alfano finished it using the sketches that Puccini had left.

Roman Giertych
politics
Roman Jacek Giertych is a former Minister of Education in Poland. He was born February 27, 1971 in Śrem.
Biography.
Roman Giertych comes from a family of Polish politicians, being a son of Maciej Giertych and a grandson of Jędrzej Giertych.
His brother (holding a Ph.D. himself) said he was a young bookworm who made dozens of books, especially on history. He improved in history throughout his school years while his grades in other subjects remained normal.
He graduated from Adam Mickiewicz University in Poznań with an master's degrees in both law and history. In 1989, he reactivated the far-right "All-Polish Youth" (Młodzież Wszechpolska) organization, becoming its chairman; he remains honorary chairman to this day. For several years he was a member of the National-Democratic Party (Stronnictwo Narodowo-Demokratyczne) and the National Party (Stronnictwo Narodowe), which went with several other organizations to form the League of Polish Families (Liga Polskich Rodzin, LPR) in 2001.

Dieter Bohlen
music
Dieter Gunther Bohlen is a German musician, born on 7 February 1954. He was a member of Modern Talking, but now appears in the TV programme "Germany Searches for a Superstar", which is the German version of Pop Idol and American Idol.

Gioachino Rossini
music
Gioachino Rossini (born Pesaro 29 February 1792; died Passy 13 November 1868) was an Italian composer. He was the most famous composer of operas in his time. His operas had lots of new ideas. Italian operas had become rather unimaginative, with composers such as Cimarosa and Paisiello writing the same sort of thing each time. Rossini made his operas interesting by writing skillfully for the singers, giving them good tunes, as well as giving the orchestra interesting music, and by choosing a variety of stories for his operas. The opera for which he is best known today is the "Il Barbiere di Siviglia" ("The Barber of Seville"). Many of the overtures to his operas are played at orchestral concerts. The most popular is the overture to his opera "Guillaume Tell" ("William Tell") with its famous galloping tune.
During the last 40 years of his life Rossini wrote no more music. His friends begged him to write another opera but he always refused.
Life.
Rossini was born on 29 February of the leap year 1792. His birthplace was Pesaro, a small town in Italy on the Adriatic coast. His father played the horn in military bands and opera houses and his mother sang in operas. Often his parents toured together and the young Rossini was left in the care of his grandmother. The family eventually settled in Bologna. Rossini had lessons in singing, cello, piano and counterpoint. He did not like the counterpoint lessons, but it did help him to study different styles of music and he became very good at writing harmony in a clear way.
Early career.
Italian opera at this time needed a new composer to bring more life into it. Five of his first nine operas were written for the Teatro S Moise in Venice. Other theatres soon asked him to write operas. In 1812 he wrote "La pietra del paragone" for the Teatro alla Scala in Milan. It was a great success. Many of these early operas were comic operas (opera buffa). Sometimes he had to produce so many new operas that he kept reusing some of the music he had already written in another opera. Nevertheless they include a lot of fine music, and Rossini was developing his musical personality. His overtures have a fine sense of orchestral colour. He often started with a slow section and then went into fast music with a crescendo. Because he did this a lot it is often called a “Rossini crescendo” or “Rossini rocket”.
It was not easy for him to earn enough money to keep himself. He only got paid for the operas he took part in. There were no copyright laws in those days. The important singers were well paid, but the composers earned much less. We know very little about his life at this time, but we do know that he travelled a lot. His most famous operas from this period are "Tancredi", "La Gazza Ladra" ("The Thieving Magpie") and "Il barbiere di Siviglia" ("The Barber of Seville") which has often been called the greatest of all comic operas.
Mid career.
By 1815 Rossini’s operas were famous everywhere in Western Europe except in Naples. Neapolitan opera had been famous throughout the 18th century and the city was proud of its tradition. The Neapolitans did not want a young composer from the north to continue their operatic tradition. Nevertheless, Rossini soon won their hearts. He wrote for the Teatro S Carlo which had a fine orchestra and very good singers. He wrote many of his best serious operas (opera seria) for Naples, and this tradition which he built up made it possible for Verdi to take over thirty years later as Italy’s leading opera composer.
Later career.
Rossini’s international fame took him to Vienna where he met Beethoven. After returning to Italy for a while he travelled to Paris and England. He was only 31 years old and had written 34 operas. The Paris audiences already knew his operas. In London a Rossini Festival was organized. Most of the time in England he spent at social parties at the houses of rich people who were glad to pay him money to come and be their guest. Soon after this he settled in Paris for five years. He was director of the Théâtre-Italien until 1836. His two greatest operas from this period were "Le Comte Ory" (which was an opéra comique) and "Guillaume Tell" which was based on a play by Schiller. These works have beautifully flowing tunes (like Italian opera) as well as grand drama (like French opera).
Retirement.
In 1829, at the age of 37, Rossini decided to retire. He had lots of money and his health was not particularly good. Although he wrote a few small pieces of music he never composed another opera. He went back to Bologna, although he returned to Paris nearly 20 years later with his wife. Here his health improved and he wrote a little music. His "Petite messe solennelle" for 12 voices, two pianos and harmonium is still performed today. When he died in 1868 thousands of people came to his funeral.
Rossini’s place in music history.
Rossini’s music is a link between the Classical and the Romantic periods. He was brought up hearing 18th century opera, and much of his best known music is still Classical in style, but he developed a lot as he matured and was writing in a more Romantic way by the end of his career. He gradually stopped writing music which has set numbers all the time: music divided sharply into arias and recitative. His recitative became more expressive and was accompanied by the orchestra instead of by a harpsichord. This helped to make his music more continuous. He did not often write for castrati as they were going out of fashion. The chorus have an important part in the drama of his operas (in 18th century opera they just used to comment on what was going on).

Ephraïm Inoni
politics
Ephraïm Inoni (born 16 August, 1947) is the Prime Minister of Cameroon, a country in central west Africa.

Gaetano Donizetti
music
Gaetano Donizetti (born Bergamo 29 November 1797; died Bergamo 8 April 1848) was an Italian composer. He was the most famous composer of operas in Italy in the years between the death of Bellini (1835) and the time when Verdi was becoming well-known. Bellini and Donizetti wrote operas in the bel canto style: music with beautiful, smooth melodies.
Donizetti’s family were very poor. His talent was discovered by Simon Mayr who was maestro di cappella (music director) at S Maria Maggiore in Bergamo. He opened a school which trained boys to sing in the church choir and gave them a good musical education. Donizetti learned a lot from Mayr and was always very grateful to him.
Donizetti’s first operas were performed in Venice. A rich lady who realized he was very talented paid so that he did not have to do military service. His opera "Zoraida di Granata" was very successful in Rome and he was given a contract for an opera for Naples. For several years he composed between two and five operas every year. They were not particularly successful. One of the reasons was that the libretti he was given (the words he had to set) were not very good.
In 1828 he married. None of their three children lived very long and his wife died in 1837 which made him very sad during his last years. This can be felt in his music.
His opera "Anna Bolena" made him internationally famous. It was performed in London and Paris. His opera "Maria Stuarda" was based on a play by Schiller. It was not popular at first. The audience did not like the tragic ending. Today it is recognized as containing some great music, especially in the final scene. After a visit to Paris he returned to Naples to produce "Lucia di Lammermoor" which was based on Scott’s novel "The Bride of Lammermoor". There is a French version as well as an Italian version of this opera.
In 1838 he moved to Paris where he had his operas performed in four theatres. Berlioz wrote very critical articles about him in a music journal. Donizetti had gone to Paris hoping that he would earn lots of money so that he could then retire, just like Rossini had done. However, his health was not good and he found it harder to concentrate. He managed to composed "Don Pasquale" which is one of the best comic operas every written, but it does have a lot of music that he had written earlier. He was obviously finding it difficult to think of new ideas. Soon he became really ill. He was suffering from syphilis. He was put in a sanatorium near Paris for 17 months. In 1847 some friends arranged for him to stay with them, but he was very ill by then. He was paralysed and almost unable to speak. His friends looked after him until he died.
He was buried in Bergamo. His remains are now in a church there. The house where he was born is a museum.

William Ewart Gladstone
politics
William Ewart Gladstone (29 December 1809 – 19 May 1898) was a prime minister of the United Kingdom. He was also leader of the Liberal Party of the UK.

Conservative Party (UK)
politics
The Conservative Party is one of the main political parties in the United Kingdom. Their policies are usually seen as the opposite of those of the Labour Party. Previous Conservative Prime Ministers have included Margaret Thatcher, Edward Heath and John Major. The current leader of the party is David Cameron. The Conservative Party is also sometimes known as the "Tory Party" and members of the Conservative Party are sometimes called the "Tories".

Paul Hartley
sports
Paul Hartley (born October 19, 1976) is a Scottish football player. He currently plays for Celtic and the Scottish national team.
Hartley used to play for Hamilton Academical, Millwall, Raith Rovers, Hibernian, Greenock Morton, St Johnstone and Hearts.

Heinrich Himmler
politics
Heinrich Himmler (October 7, 1900 - May 23, 1945) was the leader of the German SS and Gestapo organisation. Hitler ordered his arrest after Himmler offered peace to allies. He killed himself when he was a prisoner of the British Army after Germany had lost World War II. Himmler's father was teacher and headmaster.
Himmler and the Holocaust.
Himmler's SS (the"Totenkopfverbände") organized and administered Germany’s regime of concentration camps and, after 1941, the holocaust in Poland. The SS, through its Security Service ("Sicherheitsdienst", or SD), hunted down Jews, Gypsies, communists and any persons who the Nazis believed to be either "Untermensch" (sub-human) or against the regime. They were brought to concentration camps. Himmler opened the first of these camps at Dachau on 22 March 1933.
Unlike Hitler, Himmler inspected concentration camps. In August 1941, he saw many Jews being shot in Minsk. It was said that he turned green in the face after brainmatter from one of the Jews splashed onto his coat. His assistant had to jump forward and hold him steady. After that, the Nazis searched for a new and easier way to kill. This led to the use of the gas chambers.
Posen speech.
On 4 October 1943, Himmler spoke of the extermination of the Jewish people during a secret SS meeting in the city of Poznań (Posen). The following are parts from an audio recording of the speech:I also want to mention a very difficult subject before you here, completely openly. It should be discussed amongst us, and yet, nevertheless, we will never speak about it in public. I am talking about the Jewish evacuation: the extermination of the Jewish people. It is one of those things that is easily said. "The Jewish people are being exterminated," every Party member will tell you: "Perfectly clear, it’s part of our plans, we’re eliminating the Jews, exterminating them, ha!, a small matter."

New England Patriots
sports
The New England Patriots are an American football team in the National Football League. They are in the American Football Conference. Their quarterback is Tom Brady. The Patriots play in Gillette Stadium, which is near Boston, Massachusetts.
The New England Patriots won the Super Bowl in 2001, 2003 and 2004.

Alban Berg
music
Alban Berg (born Vienna, 9 February 1885; died Vienna 24 December 1935) was an Austrian composer. Alban Berg and Anton Webern were both pupils of Arnold Schoenberg. All three composers in their own way changed the style of musical composition in the early 20th century. They grew up at a time when most composers were still writing Romantic music, but Schoenberg and his pupils started to write atonal music (music which is not in any key) and then twelve-tone music in which all 12 notes in an octave are of the same importance. Although Berg wrote a lot of twelve-tone music he still managed to make it sound quite Romantic at times, more so than Schoenberg or Webern. His most important works are his two operas "Wozzeck" and "Lulu" and his "Violin Concerto".
Early years.
Berg was brought up in the centre of Vienna. His family had plenty of money, but when Berg’s father died in 1900 life became much harder for them. He did not do very well at school. He also had a love affair with a kitchenmaid, with whom he had a daughter.
He was interested in music, played the piano and had started to compose, but he had not done well enough in his school exams to get into the music conservatory. He was not interested in business like his father had been. He got an unpaid job. Then, in 1904, he started to study with Schoenberg. This was the first time he had been given proper music lessons. Two years later, his mother inherited some money, and Berg was then able to give up his unpaid job and concentrate on music.
Schoenberg taught him harmony, counterpoint and music theory, all the things one needs to know to compose well. Berg had lessons from him from 1904 until 1911. His first proper pieces include a Piano Sonata and a String quartet. Here he had already found the modern style which suited him. He wrote harmonies which seemed to float. He often wrote pieces with several movements which are all linked by a common theme. He also liked themes which are heard upside down, or palindromes, where the tune sounds the same forwards as backwards. He met a girl called Helene and they married in 1910.
Adulthood.
Berg liked to listen to all kinds of music. In this way he was different to Schoenberg or Webern. Berg was interested in French composers such as Debussy, as well as jazz. He liked the modern theatre and the political works of the playwright Bertolt Brecht and the composer Kurt Weill.
Berg was very grateful to Schoenberg for all that he had learned from him, but he still continued to be quite afraid of him. Schoenberg wrote many letters to him asking him to do things for him (e.g. making piano arrangements of his orchestral pieces) and often criticising him. Only in the 1920s, when Berg had become well-known, did Schoenberg start writing to him more like an equal friend.
Berg wrote "Five Orchestral Pieces". It is one of the first important works he wrote without Schoenberg’s help. The music has some modern chords which must have sounded very shocking to the Viennese audience. On 31 March 1913 Schoenberg conducted a concert in Vienna which included some songs by Berg. People in the audience started to fight and the police had to be called. When Schoenberg wrote to Berg criticising his music, Berg lost all his self-confidence. Slowly he started to get more confidence again. He wrote "Three Orchestral Pieces" op 6. The music sounds quite like Mahler. There are a lot of musical ideas which grow into one another and make a rich sound.
During World War I Berg spent some time in an army training camp. This experience must have been in his mind when he wrote his opera "Wozzeck". This opera became very famous. There were a lot of new ideas in it. It is not about a great hero, but about a simple man who is mistreated by people. The music, too, is very different from opera music up to that time. Although it was so modern it was a great success and made Berg world-famous. It gave him more money which, together with a little teaching, allowed him to spend most of his time composing.
Years of fame.
"Wozzeck" has a little twelve tone music in it, but in his next works the twelve tone system is much more important. He wrote "Lyrical Suite" for String Quartet and a "Kammerkonzert" ("Chamber Concerto") in which the form is made up by mathematical rules. He liked to hide things in his music e.g. favourite numbers or letters from people’s names. These are like secret codes and, in later years, musicians have spent a lot of time trying to work out what Berg was trying to do.
In 1928 Berg started work on his second and last opera: "Lulu". He had thought about the opera for many years. He had seen a play called "Die Büchse des Pandora" "(Pandora’s Box)" in 1905. Wedekind had played the part of Jack the Ripper. People thought the play was obscene, but it still became very popular, especially after 1918 when there was no more censorship in Germany. He worked on the opera until 1934. He then stopped work on it to write his "Violin Concerto". When he heard about the sad death from poliomyelitis of a young girl he knew called Manon Gropius, he dedicated the concerto to her memory. He wrote: “To the memory of an angel”. Manon’s mother, Alma, had been the wife of Gustav Mahler.
Death.
Soon after he had finished the concerto Berg was stung by an insect. Soon he had an abscess and he was rushed to hospital but he died. The "Violin Concerto" had not yet been performed. He had not finished "Lulu". The third act was only sketched in short score (showing the main notes, but not exactly what each instrument plays). When the opera was first performed, Act III was just acted out in mime while some other music by Berg was played. Berg’s widow Helene did not want anyone else to finish the opera, so Act III was never performed until after Helene died in 1976. It was finished by a man called Friedrich Cerha and performed in 1977, although a court action had tried to stop it from being performed.

Djurgårdens IF
sports
Djurgårdens IF is an Swedish football club.
The club plays in the Allsvenskan and has been the Swedish champion 11 times.
It was founded in 1891. The team plays in darkblue and lightblue stripes. They play at Stockholms Stadion. The current captain of the side is the Markus Johannesson and the deputy captain is Mattias Jonson.
The manager of Djurgårdens IF is Siggi Jonsson.

Ilham Aliyev
politics
Ilham Heydar oglu Aliyev (born December 24, 1961) is the President of Azerbaijan. He also functions as the head of the New Azerbaijan Party.

Lisa Loeb
music
Lisa Anne Loeb (born March 11, 1968 in Bethesda, Maryland) is an American singer. She sings the song "Stay (I Missed You)".

Alex Lifeson
music
Alexander Zivojinovich (born August 27, 1953, Fernie, British Columbia, Canada), better known as Alex Lifeson, is a Canadian musician. Lifeson is a member the rock band of Rush, a Canadian progressive rock band. Alex Lifeson is a guitarist. Some people have called him a master guitar player. The other two band members in Rush are Geddy Lee and Neil Peart.

Leonhard Euler
science
Leonhard Euler (pronounced "Oiler") (April 15, 1707 – September 7, 1783) was a Swiss mathematician and physicist. He spent most of his life in Russia and Germany.
Euler made important discoveries in fields like calculus and topology. He also made many of the words used in math today. He invented the idea of a mathematical function. He is also known for his work in mechanics, optics, and astronomy.
Euler is considered to be the most important mathematician of the 18th century and one of the greatest of all time. He is also one of the mathematicians who wrote the most. His collected works fill 60–80 volumes. Another mathematician, Pierre-Simon Laplace said, "Read Euler, read Euler, he is a master for us all".
Euler was featured on the sixth series of the Swiss 10-franc bill and on numerous Swiss, German, and Russian postage stamps. The asteroid 2002 Euler was named in his honor. He is also celebrated by the Lutheran Church on their Calendar of Saints on May 24.

Anarchy in the U.K.
music
"Anarchy in the U.K." is a punk rock song by the Sex Pistols. It was first released as a single in 1975. In 1976, it was released as part of the album '. The song's lyrics espouse a nihilistic and violent concept of anarchy. It has been covered by the bands various other bands, including Megadeth.
This song was in the video game.

John Barrowman
music
John Barrowman (born March 11, 1967) is a Scottish-American actor. He was born in Glasgow, Scotland in the United Kingdom but moved to Joliet, Illinois in the United States of America when he was 8 years old and grew up there. He is citizen of both the United Kingdom and the United States of America because of this.
Acting and presenting.
Barrowman is most famous for playing the character Captain Jack Harkness in the television series "Doctor Who" and "Torchwood". He is also a famous musical actor and singer. He has appeared in many musicals, as well as television shows about musicals. He also has been a presenter for series such as "Live & Kicking".
His everyday life.
Barrowman is openly gay. He became a civil partner of his long time love Scott Gill on December 27, 2007. He does not like the word marriage being used for civil partnerships because he thinks that the word is used by religious people who typically dislike gay people.

Toby Keith
music
Toby Keith Covel (born July 8, 1961) is an American country music singer and songwriter.

Owen Spencer-Thomas
media
Owen Spencer-Thomas was born on March 3, 1940 in Braughing,
Hertfordshire, England. He is perhaps best known as a television and radio news journalist over three decades. Spencer-Thomas combined this career with that of ordained Anglican clergyman and charity fundraiser. He is married to Maggie; they have three adult children, two sons and a daughter.
Early life.
He graduated in sociology at The Polytechnic, Regent Street, (now the University of Westminster) where he helped to establish its Students' Union and became its first elected President in 1966. He continued his studies at Westcott House and Fitzwilliam College in the University of Cambridge. His father, Ivor Spencer-Thomas, held the feudal barony of Buquhollie and Freswick in Caithness, Scotland.
Media.
He has wide experience in the field of communications - mainly in television and radio broadcasting as a news journalist. Joining Anglia Television in 1978 as senior reporter on the regional magazine programme "About Anglia", he became news bulletin editor of "Anglia News" in 1992. He also presented Anglia Television’s late night religious programme "Reflections". He has been a regular contributor to BBC Radio 4's "You and Yours" and "Sunday" programmes and has presented religious and ethics programmes on Thames Television and Southern Television. He has reported for Independent Television News.
He devised and presented the popular "Sounding Brass" radio phone-in programme which was later fronted by Gloria Hunniford on BBC Radio 2. His radio biographies appealed to a wide audience and his portrayal in 1978 of the outspoken television personality, panellist and quizmaster, Gilbert Harding, was widely acclaimed.
His award-winning documentary "Underneath the Arches" broke tradition by enabling London’s homeless people to tell their own stories without any links from a programme presenter. Instead, short clips from catchy music hall songs were used to establish each location and, with careful editing, the interviewees related their own experiences and introduced each other. The unique presentation won the Unda award for the best religious radio programme in 1977.
Charity Work.
As well as giving practical support to families with disabled children, Owen Spencer-Thomas headed several successful major charity appeals. He was the Founder Chairman of the East Anglian Autistic Support Trust (EAST) which established the first and desperately needed specialised accommodation and daycare for adults with autism in Cambridgeshire. He served on the National Autistic Society (NAS) Council from 1996 until 2002 and continues to raise funds for a range of other charities.
Anglican Church.
He became Director of Communications for the Diocese of Ely in 2002. He was Chaplain of Christ's College from 1997 - 2001 and was made an Honorary Canon of Ely Cathedral in 2004. During the Lent Term 2005, he was Acting Dean of
Clare College, and in 2006 was Acting Dean of Trinity Hall, in the

Anton Bruckner
music
Anton Bruckner (born Ansfelden, Austria, 4 September 1824; died Vienna, 11 October 1896 was an Austrian composer. He is especially famous for his nine symphonies. They are all very long and are written in a late Romantic style for a large orchestra. He was also an organist and teacher.
Life.
Bruckner’s father was an organist and schoolmaster in a small village in Austria. By the age of four Bruckner was showing musical talent. He played hymn tunes on a tiny violin and then found the chords to go with them on the family spinet. When he was ten he sometimes played the village organ for services. After his father’s death in 1837 he became a choirboy at the monastery school of St Florian where, in 1848, he became the organist of the abbey church. He started composing at this time and wrote a "Requiem in d minor". He liked the music of Schubert and Mendelssohn and they influenced the way he composed.
Although he was happy at St Florian his friends told him he ought to look for a better job. They made him apply for the job of organist at the cathedral of Linz which he got easily. Meanwhile he was trying to learn more about harmony and took a course with a famous teacher Simon Sechter. He then took a course in orchestration with the teacher Otto Kitzler. He became very interested in the music of Romantic composers like Liszt, Berlioz and especially Wagner. In 1864 he wrote a "Mass" in d minor for chorus and orchestra which clearly showed Wagner’s influence. In 1866 he finished the first of his nine symphonies. He also wrote some very beautiful motets which are among the best music of the 19th century written for the Roman Catholic church.
In 1866 he spent three months in a sanatorium after a nervous collapse. During his later years he often suffered from depression.
In 1868 he became professor at the Vienna Conservatoire where he taught harmony and counterpoint. This was an excellent job. The last 25 years of his life he spent his time teaching and composing his symphonies. He also travelled and gave organ recitals at Notre Dame in Paris and the Royal Albert Hall and Crystal Palace in London.
His music was very modern for its time and some people, including the famous music critic Eduard Hanslick, did not like it. Hanslick said that Bruckner composed like Wagner, but although Bruckner had learned from Wagner he did not simply copy him. Bruckner’s music shows his own strong personality. Hanslick, who preferred the symphonies of Brahms, did Bruckner a lot of harm by writing bad reviews of his music. He was Dean of the Music Department at the university in Vienna and did not want Bruckner to be appointed lecturer at the University. However, Bruckner did get that job in 1875. He became more and more famous, especially after the great conductor Arthur Nikisch conducted the first performance of his "Symphony no 7" in the Leipzig Gewandhaus in 1884. He was given many honours. At the time of his death he had not yet finished his "Symphony no 9". He was buried in St Florian.
Personality.
Bruckner always remained a simple person who dressed and behaved like someone from a small village. He never felt very self-confident and was always asking other people whether he was good enough for his job. He never married or had a proper relationship with anyone although he fell in love with several young women.
Music and achievement.
Bruckner’s symphonies show a wonderful ability to develop ideas slowly over a long period of time. Some of the slow movements last about 30 minutes. His music builds up in stages to big climaxes in a similar way to organ music. His scherzos (third movements) are tuneful dance movements which often sound like country dances. His music shows great harmonic and polyphonic skills. Bruckner often made revisions (changes) to his music. This often makes a problem for conductors today as they have to decide which version to use. Many musicians think that often Bruckner’s first versions were the best. The revisions were often cuts to make a symphony shorter so that orchestras would be more likely to play it, but the cuts spoil the flow of the music. Nowadays we recognize Bruckner as one of the greatest writers of symphonies as well as a great composer of choral music.

Hafizullah Amin
politics
Hafizullah Amin (Pashto: حفيظ الله امين) (August 1, 1929 – December 27, 1979) was the second President of Afghanistan. He was president during the time of the communist Democratic Republic of Afghanistan. The Soviets got information from their KGB spies that Amin's rule was a threat to the stability of Afghanistan. They also were not certain about Amin’s loyalty to the Soviet Union. The Soviets found some information about Amin's trying to become closer to Pakistan and China. The Soviets also believed that Amin was behind the death of president Nur Muhammad Taraki. Finally, the Soviets decided to remove Amin.

Danny Elfman
music
Danny Elfman (May 29, 1953 in Los Angeles, California) is an American singer-songwriter and composer. He is famous for the music he wrote for many movies and television shows. From 1978 until 1995 Elfman was a member of the rock band Oingo Boingo. In 2003, he married actress Bridget Fonda and has one child with her.
Awards.
Elfman has been nominated for many awards in the music and movie business.

Dirk Nowitzki
sports
Dirk Nowitzki (born June 19, 1978 in Würzburg, Germany) is a German basketball player. He plays for the Dallas Mavericks in the United States' National Basketball Association's (NBA). Nowitzki started playing in the NBA in 1998. He is only the second German-born player to make it to the Finals.

Cherie Blair
politics
Cherie Blair, QC was born September 23 1954 in Bury, England. She is a barrister. Blair is the wife of Tony Blair, who was the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, and daughter of the actor Tony Booth.
She gained a first class degree from the London School of Economics.
She qualified as a barrister in 1976, and took silk in 1995. In 1999 she became a Recorder in the County Court and Crown Court.
Blair specialises in Human Rights law

Unitary authority
politics
A unitary authority is a type of local authority that is responsible for all local government functions within its area. This is different from a system where local government functions are divided between different authorities.
Typically unitary authorities cover large towns or cities, which are large enough to be independent of county or regional administration. Sometimes they consist of counties which have no lower level of administration.
United Kingdom.
In the United Kingdom, "Unitary Authorities" are English councils which are responsible for almost all local government functions within their areas.
This is opposed to the system of local government which still exists in most of England, where local government functions are divided between county councils and district councils.
Until 1996 a similar system existed in Scotland and Wales but this has now been replaced by a fully unitary system. A unitary system has existed in Northern Ireland since 1973.
England.
Some cities, large towns and groups of neighbouring towns are unitary authorities and independent from county councils and some English counties, such as Rutland, Herefordshire and the Isle of Wight, have so small populations that the entire county is a unitary authority.
In practice most unitary authorities in the UK are not entirely unitary, as they often run some services on a joint basis with other authorities, these typically include policing, fire services, and sometimes waste disposal and public transport. In addition some unitary authorities contain civil parishes, which effectively form another limited tier of local government
When the metropolitan councils were abolished in 1986 their functions were given to the boroughs. These became unitary authorities in all but name.
Other countries.
Similar institituions exist in other countries, which although not called unitary authorities, are similar in concept.
United States.
In the United States an Independent city or a consolidated city-county is roughly equivalent to a unitary authority. The city might be separate from any county government, as in Virginia, or merged with a county government, as in San Francisco, California, or as is common in Florida. Another type of local government that is roughly equivalent to a unitary authority is a county when there are no municipal or township governments in the county. That is the case in Arlington County, Virginia, and Baltimore County, Maryland.
Canada.
Unitary authorities or "single-tier municipalities" exist as a single level of government in a province that otherwise has two levels of local government. One should not confuse municipalities in provinces with no upper-level of local government as single-tier municipalities, as these are the "only" level of local government in that province.
Germany.
In Germany a kreisfreie Stadt is the equivalent term for a city which is responsible for the local and the Kreis (district) administrative level.

John Dolmayan
music
John Dolmayan (born July 15, 1973 in Lebanon) is a musician. He is best known as the drummer for the Armenian-American heavy metal band System of a Down.

L. Ron Hubbard
music
Lafayette Ronald Hubbard (13 March 1911 – 24 January 1986) was an American science fiction writer and creator of Dianetics. He is the founder of the religion Scientology. Hubbard was born in Tilden, Nebraska to Harry Ross Hubbard and Ledora May Hubbard.

Gabriel Fauré
music
Gabriel Urbain Fauré (born Pamiers, Ariege, Midi-Pyrénées, May 12, 1845; died Paris, November 4, 1924) was a French composer, organist, pianist, and music teacher. He was the most important French composer of his time. The way he wrote music, especially his harmonies, had a big influence on many 20th century composers. Most French composers at the time became famous by writing operas, but Faure only wrote one opera. His most important works are his French songs, chamber music and piano music. His "Requiem" (which includes a solo, "Pie Jesu", for a treble singer or soprano) is one of the most popular of all requiems and can be performed with quite a small orchestra and choir. Other very popular pieces are his "Berçeuse" from the "Dolly Suite" for piano duet, the "Sicilienne" from the music for "Pelléas et Mélisande", and the song "Après un rêve" which is sometimes also played by a solo instrument, e.g. the cello.
His life.
Fauré came from the south of France. He was born into a large family and was sent to live with a foster-nurse for four years. When he was quite small he often played the harmonium at the small chapel attached to the school where his father was director. A blind lady heard him and told his father that he ought to send him to a good music school. His father did not want to at first, but when the boy was nine he was sent to study at the Ecole Niedermeyer in Paris. This was a school which trained young people to become church organists and choir directors. He spent eleven years there and had a good musical education. One of his teachers was the great composer Camille Saint-Saëns.
At first he held several jobs in churches, playing and accompanying the choirs. During the Franco-Prussian War Faure served in the army and did some teaching. When he returned to Paris in October of 1871 he got the job of choir accompanist at a big church in Paris called Saint-Sulpice. He often met up with Saint-Saëns and his friends who included the composers Lalo, Duparc, d’Indy and Chabrier. Several of these musicians, including Fauré himself, formed a music society called Société Nationale de Musique in 1871.
In 1874 Saint-Saëns retired from the church called the Madeleine and Fauré became choirmaster. In the same year he became engaged to Marianne Viardot, daughter of the singer Pauline, but then Marianne broke off the engagement. He travelled to Weimar to hear Richard Wagner's Der Ring des Nibelungen. Fauré liked Wagner’s music but it did not influence him.
In 1883 Fauré married Marie Fremiet. They had two sons. He had to spent a lot of time earning money by teaching to keep his family and so he did not have much time to compose except during the summer. His publishers did not pay him much money for his compositions.
In 1892 he became inspector of the music conservatories in the French provinces, which meant he no longer had to teach amateur students. In 1896 he finally became chief organist at the Église de la Madeleine. He also became professor of composition at Paris Conservatoire. Here he taught several students who became important French composers, including Maurice Ravel, Nadia Boulanger and Charles Koechlin. In 1905 he became director of the conservatoire.
As he became older he became deaf. High and low pitches sounded muddled to him. He retired from the Conservatoire in 1920 at the age of 75. In that year he received the Grand Cross of the Légion d’Honneur. It was unusual for a musician to have such a high honour. His health became poor, partly because he smoked heavily. He died in Paris from pneumonia in 1924 and was given a state funeral.
His music.
Gabriel Fauré is the greatest composer of French art song, or mélodie. He learned a great deal at the École Niedermeyer about how to write beautiful, flowing harmonies. He also studied the church modes. This can be heard in a lot of his music. He wrote several song cycles (groups of songs) including one called "La Bonne Chanson".
Fauré's piano works are mostly short works such as barcarolles, nocturnes and impromptus. They are often full of arpeggiated figures with the melody going from one hand to the other. His chamber works include piano quartets and quintets, a string quartet, a piano trio, two sonatas for violin and piano and two for cello and piano. His "Élégie" for cello and piano is especially well-known. He never showed a great deal of interest in writing for the orchestra. His orchestral works mostly consist of incidental music. His "Requiem" is popular both with amateur and professional choirs.

Pete Maravich
sports
Pete Maravich, also known as "Pistol Pete" Maravich, was an American basketball player. He played for Lousisana State University and averaged 44.2 points per game. That is the highest average ever in the history of college basketball. Then Maravich played for ten seasons in the NBA. He played for the Atlanta Hawks, New Orleans Jazz, Utah Jazz, and the Boston Celtics.
He is know for his great dribbling, passing and shooting abilitites. Maravich died in 1988.

Pelé
sports
Edison Arantes do Nascimento or Pelé was a footballer from Brazil. He was born on October 23, 1940 in Três Corações.
History.
He was given the title "Football Player of the Century" along with Diego Maradona by FIFA. Maradona was selected by a vote on the internet but FIFA believed there was a problem with this and chose to select both players for the title.
Teams.
From 1956-1974 he played for Santos FC, had 605 appearances, and scored 589 goals. From 1975-1977 he played for New York Cosmos, when he had 64 appearances, and scored 37 goals. Then from 1978-1980 he played for XI Classic then he retired at playing soccer football at 40 years old.

Marián Hossa
sports
Marián Hossa (born January 12 1979, in Stará Ľubovňa, Czechoslovakia, now Slovakia) is a Slovak professional ice hockey player.
His current club are the Pittsburgh Penguins, an ice hockey team in the NHL.
He plays in attack, preferably in right-wing. He is considered as one of the fastest skating players of the sport. He wears number 18 on his jersey.
In his career in NHL he also played for the team Ottawa Senators.

Niels Bohr
sports
Niels Bohr (October 7, 1885 - November 18, 1962) was a famous Danish physicist who helped discover quantum physics, the structure of the atom, and the atomic bomb. Bohr was awarded the Nobel Prize in 1922 for, in short, discovering the quantization of atomic energy levels.

Camille Saint-Saëns
music
Camille Saint-Saens (French: Camille Saint-Saëns) (born Paris 9 October 1835; died Algiers, 16 December 1921) was a French composer, pianist and organist. He was one of the greatest composers of his day. He composed lots of music of different kinds. Among his best works are his "Symphony no 3 (with organ) ", "Piano Concerto no 2", "Violin Concerto no 3", "Cello Concerto no 1", the opera "Samson and Delilah" and the "Danse Macabre". His most popular work, however, is the "Carnival of the Animals". Saint-Saens hated being thought of as “the composer of the "Carnival of the Animals". He said he had only written it for a bit of fun and he did not want anyone to perform it. Today it still remains one of the most popular pieces for children.
Life.
Three months after Camille was born his father died. Camille was often ill with tuberculosis when he was very small. He was brought up by his mother and his aunt. His aunt taught him the piano from when he was two. When he was ten he played piano concertos by Beethoven and Mozart at a public concert, playing everything from memory. He was very good at school and was interested in lots of subjects including science and philosophy. In 1858 he published some duets for harmonium and piano and he used the money to buy a telescope.
He studied music at the Paris Conservatoire and was a brilliant student, although he did not win the Prix de Rome. He soon became known as a composer, pianist and organist and he made many friends, among them Gounod, Berlioz and Rossini. Liszt thought he was the greatest organist in the world. Like Liszt, Saint-Saëns was often very kind to other composers and helped them to become known by playing and conducting their music. He was the first person to conduct Liszt’s symphonic poems in France. He himself wrote symphonic poems such as "Le Rouet d’Omphale" (1871) and "Danse Macabre" (1874). The idea of music which describes a story was quite a new idea at that time. He also helped people to like Bach whose music had been forgotten for a long time.
In the 1860s his fame spread and he also did some teaching at the Ecole Niedermeyer which educated young musicians for church music. His pupils included Faure, Messager and Gigout who all became life-long friends. He also founded the Societe Nationale de Musique which helped new music to be performed. Faure, Cesar Franck and Lalo were all members. The society gave first performances of works by Saint-Saens, Chabrier, Debussy, Dukas and Ravel and others.
Saint-Saens married a 19 year old girl. The marriage was not a success. They had two sons who died within six weeks of one another: the baby from an illness and the two-year-old from falling out of a fourth floor window. Saint-Saens blamed his wife and they eventually divorced.
For many years Saint-Saens travelled all over the world as a famous musician. Eventually he became less popular in France, but in England and America he was still very much admired. He played for Queen Victoria and spent some time studying original manuscripts of Handel in the library of Buckingham Palace. He was awarded the title of Doctor by the Universities of Oxford and Cambridge and was made a Commander of the Victorian Order because he had composed a march for the coronation of King Edward VII in 1902. He died in Algiers in 1921. His funeral was in the cathedral there, and his body was then taken back to Paris where he was given a state funeral at the church of Madeleine.
His Music.
Saint-Saens was more famous in the concert hall than he was in the theatre. He wrote 13 operas, but only one of them is still regularly performed: "Samson et Dalila" ("Samson and Delilah"). One of the arias from this opera, "Ma cœur s’ouvre à ta voix", is especially famous.
Saint-Saens wrote many concertos, symphonies, sonatas and chamber music. He often uses the style of dance music and creates a happy atmosphere by repeating certain patterns. His music is late Romantic, but based on the classical traditions rather than following the style of Wagner like many other French composers were doing at the time.

The Black Parade
music
"The Black Parade" is a 2006 album by the band, My Chemical Romance. It is the third album from the band. The album is a concept album. The songs on this album follow the life of The Patient, a man dying of cancer. The album takes the listener into The Patient's mind, fears, regrets, and accomplishments.
Much like their first two albums, "The Black Parade" offers a message of hope.
"The Black Parade" is: Ray Toro, Mikey Way, Gerard Way, Frank Iero, and Bob Bryar.

Walter Sutton
science
Walter Stanborough Sutton (April 5, 1877 - November 10, 1916) was an American biologist. He discovered that an organism has half the amount of chromosomes in sex cells than it has in its body cells.
Sutton was born in Utica, New York and raised in Russell, Kansas. He got Bachelors and Masters degrees from the University of Kansas. Sutton then went to Columbia University and got his doctorate in medicine in 1907.

Diana Burrell
music
Diana Burrell (born Norwich 25 October 1948) is an English composer. She went to Norwich High School for Girls and then studied music at the University of Cambridge. She started her career as a viola player, but soon she started to become well-known for her compositions and became a full-time composer.
Her first big orchestral piece was called "Landscape" (1988). It describes the wild, windswept countryside. Another orchestral work has a long title in German: "Das Meer so gross und weit ist da wimmelts ohne Zahlgrosse kleine Tiere" ("The Sea is so big and wide and swarming with numerous little animals"). It describes the sounds and the atmosphere of the sea.
Diana has written other orchestral works including concertos for viola, flute and clarinet, an opera "The Albatross" (1997), lots of choral works and chamber music. She likes modern architecture and her music sometimes shows this in the way it is shaped. She has also written music for young people such as "Lights and Shadows" (1989) which includes children’s choir, recorder group and lots of percussion.
Diana teaches at the Guildhall School of Music and Drama and is Artistic Director of Spitalfields Festival in London. She lives in East London.

Gerhard Armauer Hansen
science
Gerhard Hendrik Armauer Hansen (July 29, 1841 - February 12, 1912) was a Norwegian doctor and scientist who was famous for discovering the bacteria that causes leprosy in 1873. That disease is also called "Hansen's disease" in his honour.

Joe DiMaggio
sports
Joseph Paul DiMaggio (November 25, 1914 - March 8, 1999) was a Major League Baseball center fielder who played his whole career for the New York Yankees. He played from 1936 to 1942 and then joined the army in 1943 because of World War II. He came back a began playing again in 1946 until his retirement in 1951 at the age of 36. By the time he retired he had hit 361 home runs. DiMaggio died on the 8th of March of lung cancer. He is widely regarded as one of the best baseball players of all time.

Judith Weir
music
Judith Weir (born 11 May 1954 in Cambridge, England) is a Scottish composer. She is well-known for her theatre works, choral music, orchestral music and chamber music.
While she was still at school she trained with the composer John Tavener. She played the oboe in the National Youth Orchestra of Great Britain. She then studied at the University of Cambridge where her teacher was Robin Holloway.
Judith Weir’s music has harmonies which are very exciting and original. Her Christmas carol "Illuminare" has become very popular, but it is quite difficult and needs a good choir to pitch the notes of the dissonant chords. She often uses medieval history as inspiration for her music, as well as music from her native Scotland, e.g. piobaireachd, which is a kind of variation form using small intervals. Her music often tells stories. Her operas include "A Night at the Chinese Opera", "The Vanishing Bridegroom", "Blond Eckbert", and "Armida", an opera for television.
From 1995 to 2000, she was the Artistic Director of the Spitalfields Festival in London. She has composed works for the City of Birmingham Symphony Orchestra. She has received many honours, including the CBE in 1995.

Mark-Anthony Turnage
music
Mark-Anthony Turnage (born Grays, Essex, 10 June 1960) is an English composer. He is one of the most original composers in his country today.
Turnage studied at the Royal College of Music and won all the major prizes. He became famous when he wrote an opera called "Greek". It is typical of his musical style: quite lyrical but also very dramatic and aggressive. His music is often inspired by jazz. Other works include "Kai", "Rockaby", "Blood on the Floor", "Dispelling the Fears", "Drowned Out" and "Three Screaming Popes". He has written music for the English National Opera, City of Birmingham Symphony Orchestra and the Chicago Symphony Orchestra.

Michael Tippett
music
Sir Michael Tippett (born in London on January 2 1905 – died in London on January 8, 1998) was an English composer. He is one of the greatest and most original composers of the 20th century. He did not start to study music seriously until he was nearly grown up, and only become famous when he was about 40. The rhythms in his music and the tonality are very original. He is remembered for many kinds of music: opera, oratorio, orchestral music, chamber music and piano music. His oratorio "A Child of our Time" is especially well-known and often performed by choirs.
His Life.
Tippett spent his childhood in a small village in Suffolk. His father had retired and had bought a hotel in Cannes, France. Michael and his brother learned to speak French when they were very young. He was sent to school in Edinburgh when he was 13 but did not like it there so he went to the local Stamford Grammar School in Lincolnshire.
The only musical training he had as a child were his piano lessons. When he had finished his school years he decided he wanted to be a composer, but neither he nor his parents knew the best way to become a composer. He started having more piano lessons. Then someone said he should go to the Royal College of Music. He went there at the beginning of the summer term, 1923 and spent five years there studying music. He then moved to Oxted in Surrey and for six years he taught French at a school. He composed in his free time.
In Oxted there was a small choir. Tippett had sung with them while he was a student. Now he became their conductor and he learned a lot about music by getting the choir to sing English madrigals and other music including operatic music. He took some more lessons in composition from R.O.Morris at the RCM. He went to music camps where he learned more ideas about politics than about music. He agreed with a lot of the ideas of Trotsky. He became a pacifist and in 1940 he registered as a conscientious objector. In 1943 he spent three months in prison because he refused to help with the war effort.
Meanwhile Tippett had become director of music at Morley College. He made the choir there into one of the best choirs in England. He played a lot of music by Henry Purcell whose music was not as well known then as it is now. He also worked with young musicians who later became famous: the tenor Peter Pears, the countertenor Alfred Deller and the Amadeus String Quartet.
In 1951 he became a broadcaster with the BBC. Some of the talks he gave on the radio were published in his book "Moving into Aquarius". He continued a brilliant career as composer, conductor and broadcaster. He was director of the Bath Festival which he helped to improve a lot. He became internationally famous, especially in America. His "Symphony no 4" and his oratorio "Mask of Time" were written for performances in America. His last opera "New Year" was written jointly for the Houston Grand Opera, Glyndebourne and the BBC. He was made a CBE in 1966 and was knighted in 1966 and was made a Companion of Honour in 1979 and received an Order of Merit in 1983. He received many honours from universities.
Tippett died from pneumonia in 1998 after travelling to Stockholm for a festival which included all his works except his stage works. Although he was able to return home he died shortly afterwards.
His music.
It is unusual for a great musician to begin studying music properly at the age of 18. However, he was old enough to realize that he had a lot to learn. He studied counterpoint and was influenced by the way Classical composers had shaped their music. Beethoven especially was an inspiration for him. One of his best-known works is the "Concerto for Double String Orchestra" (1938-1939). It shows his love of folk music as well as interest in English music of the Renaissance. This music is exciting because of its beats, which keep changing, and its dance-like character.
"A Child of our Time" was an oratorio which used negro spirituals. He combined these with his own style of music. It is about something that really happened in 1938. A 17-year-old Jewish Polish boy killed a Nazi diplomat because the Nazis had taken away his parents. The Nazis were angry and killed lots of Jews in return. It was something which helped to lead to the World War II. Tippett’s music is about the cruelty that humans show towards one another.
Tippett’s operas include "A Midsummer Marriage" (started 1946, first performed 1955), "King Priam" (1958-61), "The Knot Garden" (1966-69) and "The Ice Break" (1973-76) and "New Year" (1989). He wrote several choral works. His orchestral works include 4 symphonies, a "Fantasia concertante on a Theme of Corelli" for strings (1953), a "Piano Concerto" (1953-55) and a "Concerto for violin, viola and cello" (1979). His chamber music includes piano sonatas and string quartets.
His writings.
Tippett published many of his writings. "Moving into Aquarius" consists of talks given on the BBC. In his autobiography "Those Twentieth Century Blues" he discusses many of his problems, including his homosexuality, which in his earlier years he could not talk about because it was illegal at that time.

Paul Watzlawick
science
Paul Watzlawick PhD (July 25, 1921 - March 31, 2007) was a theoretician in Communication Theory and Radical Constructivism. He also commented in the fields of family therapy and general psychotherapy. He lived and worked in California until his death in 2007 in Palo Alto.

Sally Beamish
music
Sally Beamish (born London, 26 August 1956) is an English composer. She has written music for orchestra, chamber music, vocal and choral music.
Sally studied the viola at the Royal Northern College of Music. Later she also studied in Germany and Italy.
Sally started her career playing the viola in a chamber group called the Raphael Ensemble. The experience of playing in small groups was important for her development as a composer. Her music often combines and contrasts solo instruments, exploring the sounds they can make.
She has written works for the Swedish and Scottish Chamber Orchestras and has had works performed at the BBC Proms. Her trumpet concerto, written for Håkan Hardenberger and the National Youth Orchestra of Scotland was performed at the Proms in 2003 with Martyn Brabbins conducting. She has also written concertos for the flute, viola, saxophone, percussion and accordion and is planning to write concertos for viola (her third), saxophone quartet and cello.
She has written a stage musical about the Highlands of Scotland. She lives in Scotland with her husband and young daughter.

Harrison Birtwistle
music
Sir Harrison Paul Birtwistle (born Accrington, July 15, 1934) is one of Britain's most important composers today.
Life.
In 1952 Birtwistle entered the Royal Manchester College of Music in Manchester on a clarinet scholarship. While there he met other young composers like Peter Maxwell Davies and Alexander Goehr. Together with pianist John Ogdon and conductor Elgar Howarth, he formed the "New Music Manchester" group, which put on performances of modern music, especially music using serialism.
Birtwistle left the college in 1955, then studied at the Royal Academy of Music and afterward made a living as a schoolteacher. In 1965 he got a Harkness Fellowship which gave him the opportunity to study composition in the United States.
In 1975 Birtwistle became musical director of the new Royal National Theatre in London, a post he held until 1983. He was given a knighthood in 1988 and was made a Companion of Honour in 2000. From 1994 to 2001 he was "Henry Purcell Professor of Composition" at King's College London.
His music.
His music is quite complicated and modern in style. Sometimes it reminds one of Igor Stravinsky and Olivier Messiaen. Sometimes he uses blocks of sound like Edgard Varèse. His first opera "Punch and Judy" is quite different from a traditional Punch and Judy children's entertainment. It is very serious and quite violent. He has written other operas: "The Mask of Orpheus" (1984), "Sir Gawain and the Green Knight" (1990), "The Second Mrs Kong" (1994), and "The Last Supper" (2000).
When "Gawain" was performed in 1994 at the Royal Opera House a group of hecklers booed and whistled loudly. However, this only made the opera more famous as lots of people read about it and came to hear it. He wrote a piece called "Panic" for alto saxophone, jazz drumkit and orchestra. It was a very loud, harsh piece and it was a shock for the audience when it was first performed at the Last Night of the Proms, a concert at which people normally expect to hear music with easy, sing-along tunes.

Hotter Than Hell
music
Hotter Than Hell is the second album from the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss.It was released on October 22, 1974.

Peter Maxwell Davies
music
Sir Peter Maxwell Davies, CBE (b. Salford, Lancashire, 8 September 1934), is an English composer and conductor. He is one of the most important composers today. He has received many honours, including his appointment as Master of the Queen’s Music. Davies' surname is "Davies"; "Maxwell" is his middle name, and his friends call him 'Max'.
Life.
Davies grew up in Lancashire. He learned to play the piano and started composing when he was still very young. After education at Leigh Grammar School, he studied at the University of Manchester and at the Royal Manchester College of Music (now part of the Royal Northern College of Music). He met other students there who became famous musicians: Harrison Birtwistle, Alexander Goehr, Elgar Howarth and John Ogdon. Together they formed a group which they called the “New Music Manchester”. This group performed a lot of contemporary music (music that was being composed at the time). After a short stay in Rome he got a job as Director of Music at Cirencester Grammar School from 1959 to 1962.
Davies still wanted to study with other composers, so he went to the United States to study with Roger Sessions, Milton Babbitt and Earl Kim. Then he moved to Australia, where he was Composer in Residence at the University of Adelaide from 1965-66.
He then returned to the United Kingdom, and moved to the Orkney Islands. Davies, who is openly gay, still lives there on the island of Sanday with his partner Colin Parkinson. In 1977 he started a big arts festival on Orkney, called the St Magnus Festival. This still takes place every year. He often uses it to give first performances of new works (often played by the local school orchestra).
Davies has held several posts including Artistic Director of the Dartington Summer School from 1979 to 1984 and has held posts. From 1992 to 2002 he was associate conductor/composer with the BBC Philharmonic Orchestra and he has conducted a number of other well-known orchestras.
He was given several honorary doctorates including one from the University of Oxford. He has been President of Making Music (The National Federation of Music Societies) since 1989. Davies was made a CBE in 1981 and knighted in 1987. He was appointed Master of the Queen's Music for a ten-year period from March 2004. He is also a professor of composition at the Royal Academy of Music.
Music.
Davies has written a lot of music. Some of his first works use serial techniques, sometimes combined with ideas from Mediaeval and Renaissance music, including bits of plainsong.
Pieces from the late 1960s combine these ideas with expressionism and a violent character, for example "Eight Songs for a Mad King" which is about King George III. Written for a singer and a small group of instruments the singer has to shout and screech at times, and also act. He wrote an opera "Taverner" about the Renaissance composer John Taverner. The orchestral piece "St Thomas Wake" (1969) uses many different styles of music, including foxtrots (played by a twenties-style dance band), a pavan by John Bull and Davies's own modern style. Many works from this period were performed by the Pierrot Players which Davies founded with Harrison Birtwistle in 1967 (they were reformed as The Fires of London in 1970 and stayed together until 1987).
Mathematics plays a part in Davies’ music. In his work "Ave Maris Stella" he uses a magic square. "Worldes Blis" 1969 shows the beginning of his more mature style. Some people think it is similar to Jean Sibelius.
Since his move to Orkney, Davies has often used Orcadian (the adjective of “Orkney”) or more generally Scottish themes in his music, and has sometimes set the words of Orcadian writer George Mackay Brown. He has written a number of other operas, "The Martyrdom of St Magnus" (1976), "The Lighthouse" (1980, his most popular opera), "Resurrection" (1987), and "The Doctor of Myddfai" (1996). Davies also became interested in classical forms, completing his first symphony in 1976. He has written eight numbered symphonies since, a Sinfonia Concertante (1982), as well as the series of ten "Strathclyde Concertos" for various instruments (pieces he wrote when he worked with the Scottish Chamber Orchestra). In 2002, he began work on a series of string quartets for the Maggini String Quartet to record on the Naxos record label (the so-called "Naxos Quartets"). His most recent one is No.9 (2006).
Davies has also written a number of lighter orchestral works such as "Mavis in Las Vegas" and "An Orkney Wedding, with Sunrise" which features the bagpipes and was played at the Last Night of the Proms in 1992 (with a bottle of whisky being passed round). He also wrote music for children including the operas "A Selkie Tale", "The Great Bank Robbery" and "The Spider's Revenge", and film music for Ken Russell's films "The Devils" and "The Boy Friend".
Maxwell Davies's short piano piece "Farewell to Stromness" entered the Classic FM Hall of Fame in 2003.

Love Gun
music
Love Gun is the sixth studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on June 30, 1977.

Alive II
music
Alive II is the second live album and eight album overall by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on November 28, 1977.

Gene Simmons (album)
music
"Gene Simmons" is a solo album by Gene Simmons, the bass player of the American hard rock/heavy metal band, Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Paul Stanley (album)
music
Paul Stanley is a solo album from the guitarist of the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Ace Frehley (album)
music
Ace Frehley is a solo album from the guitarist of the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Peter Criss (album)
music
Peter Criss is a solo album from the drummer of the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1978, as one of four solo albums released by the members of Kiss.

Lick It Up
music
Lick It Up is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1983.

Karol Szymanowski
music
Karol Szymanowski (October 3, 1882 - March 29, 1937) was a Polish composer. Next to Frederic Chopin, Karol was Poland's most famous composer. He is thought to be one of the greatest Polish composers of the first half of the 20th century.
Early life.
Szymanowski was born on his family's estate in Tymoszówka in what is today Ukraine.
School.
He studied in Berlin and Warsaw.
Music.
His music can be divided into three phases.
Early works before World War I showed his repertoire for the works of Frederic Chopin, Richard Wagner and Richard Strauss.
The second phase is influenced by the Orient and Mediterranean cultures. His music during this phase resulted in many of his best known compositions.
The third phase began in 1921. It has much what is similar to Polish folk themes. This work defined Polish themed music and is thought to include his greatest works. Initially, his music was not well accepted in Poland.
Works.
The works of Szymanowski include four symphonies, two violin concertos, the operas "Hagith" and "King Roger", the ballet-pantomime "Harnasie", the oratorio "Stabat Mater", as well as many piano, violin, vocal and choral compositions. His most popular works was his ballet "Harnasie" and opera "King Roger". "Harnasie" was first shown in Prague and later shown at the Paris Opera. It was received with acclamation and enthusiasm, both by critics and the public. Health and financial problems brought his work to an end in 1934. Szymanowski died after a short stay in a sanatorium in Lausanne, Switzerland.
Death.
He was buried on April 7, 1937 at the cemetery for the Polish nobles, in Pauline in Krakow. The exact day of his death is not certain, some say he died midnight, few minutes before March 29.

Animalize
music
"Animalize" is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 13, 1984.

Eubie Blake
music
Eubie Blake (February 7, 1887 - February 12, 1983) was an American pianist and composer. There is some problems about his birth date. He had said that he was born in 1883 during the latter part of his life. However, recently released documents - the 1900 United States census, his World War 1 draftcard, his Social Security registration and his passport registration - all say that he was born in 1887. People saying they were born earlier than they actuall were ("back dating") was common with musicians from that time. Jelly Roll Morton is another well known example of this. Blake also said that he composed his "Charleston Rag" in 1899. If this was true, he would have been 12 years old at the time. There is no evidence he was composing at that age or at that time. People who study Ragtime believe this may be another case of "backdating". Blake was born in Baltimore, Maryland.

Charles Koechlin
music
Charles Koechlin (pronounce:”Ke-klin” with “klin” to rhyme with French “vin”), (born Paris, November 27 1867; died Le Canadel, December 31 1950) was a French composer, teacher and writer on music. He wrote a very large amount of music, but very little of it was published because he was more interested in helping younger composers than making himself well-known. Some of his best works include his symphonic poems and his film music.
His life.
Koechlin was born in Paris, the youngest child of a large and wealthy family. His mother’s family came from the Alsace near the French border with Germany, and he was proud of his Alsation background. His grandfather on his mother’s side had started a cotton textile firm in Mulhouse and his father worked in the textile business. When Koechlin was 14 his father died. He showed an interest in music, but his family wanted him to be an artillery officer. However, he had tuberculosis and had to spent six months getting better in Algeria. After finishing his schooling he was allowed to enter the Paris Conservatoire in 1890. Two years later he was studying composition with Massenet, and in 1896 he was a pupil of Gabriel Fauré. Ravel was a pupil in the same class. Fauré had a big influence on Koechlin who wrote a book about him and helped him to arrange some of his music for orchestra.
Koechlin became a freelance composer and teacher. He married Suzanne Pierrard in 1903 and they had five children. At first he was comfortably off, but after World War I the family lost a lot of money and they had to sell their country house.
Koechlin had very free views about music, and this is probably why he never got a teaching job at the Piano Conservatoire. He also agreed with some things that the Communists thought. He did not like modern inventions like the telephone and radio. He looked like an old Russian patriarch with his long beard. He dressed in velvet trousers, sandals and a shepherd’s cape for bad weather. He liked outdoor activities such as swimming and mountaineering. He was offered the Legion d’Honneur in 1940 but refused it.
His music.
Koechlin composed in a variety of styles, even changing the style during a piece. He often liked quiet music with long chords which are played for the sounds they make rather than for giving the music a traditional shape. Sometimes there were no barlines in his music. He often composed in his head while on a train or climbing a mountain.
His works for orchestra include "Les Bandarlogs" which was based on the "Jungle Book" by Rudyard Kipling. Kipling’s “Bandarlog” are a troupe of monkeys in the forest. The music describes the monkeys, but Koechlin also gives it another meaning: he is criticising music critics, comparing them to monkeys. In the "Seven Stars Symphony" each movement is about a famous film star. They include Greta Garbo, Marlene Dietrich and Charlie Chaplin. He wrote a lot of chamber music and piano music, including some dances for Ginger Rogers.
Sources.
Robert Orledge, "Charles Koechlin (1867-1950) His Life and Works" (London, 1989)

WWE Championship
sports
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Championship is a professional wrestling world championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It is the original world title of WWE. Currently, it is the highest ranked championship on the SmackDown brand.
History.
The WWE Championship was originally known as the World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF) World Heavyweight Championship. Following the title's introduction in 1963, Buddy Rogers became the first champion on April 29. The World Wide Wrestling Federation joined the NWA in 1971 and was renamed the World Wrestling Federation in 1979. During this time, the title was called the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) Heavyweight Championship. It became known as the WWF World Heavyweight Championship when the promotion left the NWA in 1983. The title began to be called the WWF Championship in 1998.
In March 2001, the World Wrestling Federation purchased World Championship Wrestling. Soon after, "The Invasion" took place in which the ECW Alliance was ultimately dismantled. Following this, it was agreed to unify the title with the WCW Championship at Vengeance 2001. At the event Chris Jericho defeated The Rock and Stone Cold Steve Austin to win the WCW/World Championship and the WWF Championship respectively. As a result, Chris Jericho became the first Undisputed Champion in the World Wrestling Federation.
Following the WWE name change and the WWE Brand Extension, the Undisputed title was defended on the RAW and SmackDown! brands simultaneously while other titles became exclusive to either brand. However, when Brock Lesnar won the Undisputed Championship he was signed to appear and defend the title on the SmackDown! brand only, leaving the RAW brand without a top title. As a result, RAW General Manager, Eric Bischoff, commissioned the World Heavyweight Championship to be the main title for the RAW brand, stating that the Undisputed title was disputed for being defended only on one brand. Immediately afterwards, the title returned to being the WWE Championship.
The WWE Championship remained exclusive to the SmackDown! brand from August 26 2002 until June 6 2005, when the WWE Champion, John Cena, was drafted to the RAW brand during the 2005 WWE Draft Lottery. This left the RAW brand with the two top titles in WWE until the World Heavyweight Champion, Batista, was drafted to the SmackDown! brand on June 30 2005. On June 23, 2008, the WWE Championship was moved back to Smackdown! when Triple H was drafted by Smackdown.
Custom belt designs.
Special custom belts have been created for at least five different champions: "Superstar" Billy Graham (red leather strap), the Ultimate Warrior (white, blue and purple leather straps), "Stone Cold" Steve Austin ("Smokin' Skull" belt), John Cena ("Spinner" belt) and Edge ("Rated R Spinner" belt). A belt with an exceptionally long strap was created for André the Giant before WrestleMania III, however he never wore it as champion. Similarly, Edge had originally designed an entirely different custom belt than the "Rated R Spinner" design he used for his second reign, however the plans were scrapped due to time constraints. The "Spinner" belt's design has since become the WWE Championship's primary design, having also been used by Edge, Rob Van Dam, Randy Orton and Triple H. However since Randy Orton's reign, the WWE logo in the center of the belt is fixed in place and no longer spins.
Current champion.
The current champion is Jeff Hardy who beat Edge for the title at Armageddon 2008 in a match also including Triple H on December 14, 2008. He is in his first reign.

Crazy Nights
music
"Crazy Nights" is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 18, 1987.

Hot in the Shade
music
Hot in the Shade is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on October 17, 1989.

Hildegard of Bingen
music
Hildegard of Bingen (born Bemersheim nr. Alzey 1098; died 17 September 1179) was a German writer, composer and mystic. She was an abbess who is well-known for her literary works and her songs. She also wrote about medical and scientific things, and wrote letters to many important politicians.
Hildegard was born into a noble family. Her parents sent her to a monastery because she was the tenth child of the family. She took the veil (became a nun) at the age of 15. By the time she was 38 she had the title of “mother superior”. She founded (started) a monastery on the Rupertsberg in the Rhine valley near Bingen. Later she founded a daughter house on the other side of the river near Rüdesheim. She travelled a lot and talked to many important people. She later had the title of “abbess”. After she died several popes suggested she should be made a saint, but this never happened.
Hildegard had many visions, many of which she wrote down. She wrote lyrical poetry which was very colourful and had lots of visionary ideas. Her music does not use plainchant like the music of many other medieval composers at the time. It mostly has small patterns of melody which are repeated many times in slightly different ways. She wrote a morality play in verse with 82 melodies.
Hildegard of Bingen is the first composer whose life we know about. She was also the first woman to write about female sexuality.

Continuum (theory)
science
Continuum theories or models explain variation as involving a gradual quantitative transition without abrupt changes or discontinuities. It can be contrasted with 'categorical' models which propose qualitatively different states.
In physics, for example, the space-time continuum model explains space and time as part of the same continuum rather than as separate entities. A spectrum in physics (e.g. of light) is often termed either a 'continuous spectrum' (energy at all wavelengths) or 'discrete spectrum' (energy at only certain wavelengths).
In psychology, theories of mental phenomena can propose discrete differences between individuals (e.g. everyone has certain personality traits and not others) or a continuum (e.g. everyone lies somewhere on a particular personality dimension). This can also apply to fields such as law or sociology or ethics in explaining or judging variation in human behavior.
In psychiatry, categorical models seek to distinguish and define particular mental disorders or illnesses, but continuum or dimensional models propose that some people are more extreme than others on particular dimensions.

Joseph Goebbels
politics
Paul Joseph Goebbels (German pronunciation:) (29 October 1897 – 1 May 1945) was a German politician and the minister of propaganda during the Nazi regime. He studied literature and philosophy.
He was a close friend of Adolf Hitler. Goebbels stayed with Hitler in the Fuehrerbunker until Hitler's suicide on April 30 1945. After Hitler's death Goebbels was chancellor for one day, before he and his wife Magda Goebbels also killed themselves. Just before she died, Magda killed their six children.

Carl Maria von Weber
music
Carl Maria von Weber (born Eutin, Holstein, baptised 20 November 1786; died London), 5 June, 1826 in London, was one of the most important German composers of the early Romantic period. He wrote many operas, of which "Der Freischütz", "Euryanthe" and "Oberon" are especially famous. He wrote instrumental music, especially for the clarinet, and wrote very well for orchestra.
Early life.
Weber was the eldest of the three children of Franz Anton von Weber. The word “von” in front of a German surname normally means that the family had noble ancestry, but the Weber family do not appear to be of noble blood. Weber was never a strong, healthy child. He had a damaged hip-bone and always walked with a limp. His father worked in the theatre, and the family often moved from one town to another. This was difficult for his education. His mother was called Rosa, she influenced him to go to military school at the age of 20, but his love for music meant that he would go to Cranbrook in Germany. His daughter Laurel was well known for playing the viola in many Orchestras.
Weber’s mother died of tuberculosis when he was eleven. Later that year Weber went to Salzburg, to study with Michael Haydn (the brother of the famous Joseph Haydn), and later to Munich. He started to publish some piano music, and even composed an opera. When he was 14 the family moved to Freiberg in Saxony. He had an opera performed there, and he started to write articles as a critic in a Leipzig newspaper.
In 1801 the family went back to Salzburg and Weber had more lessons from Michael Haydn. He also studied in Vienna with a famous musician called Abbé Vogler. Through him he got to know another of his pupils, Giacomo Meyerbeer, who became a famous composer and was a close friend of Weber.
Success.
Vogler thought Weber was very talented, and helped him to get a job in Breslau. Weber had lots of good ideas about how to improve the music there: by changing the way that the orchestra sat, having more rehearsal time, not playing bad pieces of music, and pensioning off old singers. A lot of people there did not like these ideas and made life difficult for him. One night he absent-mindedly drank from a wine bottle. The bottle had engraving-acid inside, and it made him ill for two months. He was never able to sing again. When he tried to go back to work all the good changes he had made had been undone, so he resigned. He had a job in Karlsruhe for a short time, then went briefly back to Breslau, but because he owed people money there he disappeared and got a job in Stuttgart.
His lifestyle was rather wild, and he even got arrested once for debt and fraud. However, he continued to become well-known as a composer and wrote a lot of instrumental and religious music. He spent some time in several large cities including Prague and Berlin. In Dresden he worked hard to make German Opera a success (most operas were still Italian in those days).
Weber was not well. He was suffering from tuberculosis, but needed money to support his family. So when he was invited to go to London to compose and produce his opera "Oberon" he accepted the offer. He had already been having English lessons and learned to speak the language quite well. In 1826 he travelled to England where he finished composing "Oberon" and conducted its first performance on 12 April. He stayed on in England to earn some more money. He was looking forward to going home, but on 5 June, the night before he was due to go back to Germany, he died. He was buried in London. 18 years later Richard Wagner arranged for Weber’s body to be brought back to Germany to be buried in Dresden.
Weber left an opera "Die Drei Pintos" ('The Three Pintos') unfinished. Meyerbeer was going to finish it, but in the end it was Gustav Mahler who finished it and conducted the first performance of the completed work in Leipzig in 1888.
His music.
Weber was not only a great composer, but a very skilled pianist and conductor. He wrote a very large number of works including cantatas and songs, but most of these are not often heard today. One of his most popular works is called "Invitation to the Dance". It was written for piano, but later Hector Berlioz arranged it for orchestra and this is how it is often heard nowadays.
Weber wrote two Concertos for clarinet and orchestra and also a Concertino (a small concerto in one movement). Another one-movement concerto was the "Konzertstück in F minor" for piano and orchestra. His opera "Der Freischütz " is probably his best work, and the overture is often heard separately as a concert piece. The story of the opera is full of magic. It is written in German and has some spoken words as well as sung music (this kind of opera was called a Singspiel). This opera in particular influenced Richard Wagner who developed German opera in the 19th century.

Alive III
music
"Alive III" is a live album by the American hard rock and heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on May 18, 1993.

Kiss Unplugged
music
Kiss Unplugged is an album featuring the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss performance in MTV Unplugged on August 8, 1995. The album was released on March 12, 1996.

Psycho Circus
music
Psycho Circus is a studio album by the American hard rock/heavy metal band Kiss. It was released on September 22, 1998.

Dirty Deeds Done Dirt Cheap
music
Dirty Deeds Done Dirt Cheap is a studio album by the Australian hard rock band DC. It was released in November 1976 in Europe and delayed for release in USA until 1981.

Jimi Hendrix
music
Jimi Hendrix (born James Marshall Hendrix), (November 27, 1942 – September 18, 1970) was an American guitarist. Hendrix is thought to be one of the most influential musicians in the history of rock and roll music.
He became successful in England, and then became famous all through the world after he played at the Monterey Pop Festival in 1967. He was named "Greatest Guitarist of all Time" by Rolling Stone magazine in 2003. Hendrix taught himself how to play the electric guitar and usually played a Fender Stratocaster upside down with the strings attached upside down to help him play left-handed.
Early life.
Jimi Hendrix was born in Seattle on November 27, 1942. He was called Johnny Allen Hendricks when he was born. Later, his parents named him James Marshall Hendrix instead. He grew up without much money or attention; his parents divorced when he was nine years old, and his mother died when he was 16. At about the age of 14, Hendrix found his first guitar. It was a broken broomstick with one string that had been thrown away by another boy. He still managed to play several tunes on it. Soon after, at around 15, he managed to buy a proper acoustic guitar for $5 from a friend of his fathers. His first electric guitar was a white Supro Ozark that his father, Al Hendrix, had bought him. He did not have lessons and learned basic tunes and improvisation from watching Chuck Berry and Elvis Presley play live. He played without an amplifier.
School.
Hendrix finished middle school but did not graduate from his High School, Garfield High School. Hendrix told some reporters in the late 1960's that he had failed because people were racist there, and did not like him because he was an African-American. However, it was just because he could not get good enough grades and was unorganised. Hendrix then told the reporters that he was kicked out for being impolite to a teacher.
Early inspirations.
When Hendrix was young, he was a fan of Elvis Presley. He went to see Elvis play at Sick’s Stadium on September 1, 1957, and he drew a colour picture of him holding an acoustic guitar (seen). The original drawing can be seen in the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in Cleveland, Ohio. Even as an adult, he still loved Elvis. He went to a movie of Presley’s "King Creole" in Paris in late 1968, to give him inspiration to write songs. He also liked famous blues musicians such as Muddy Waters, Bo Diddley and Lightning Hopkins; and he played in the band of R&B star Little Richard. However, Hendrix and Richard did not get along. Richard did not like Hendrix' clothes, his being late and his showing off on stage.
The army.
After getting in trouble by stealing cars twice, Hendrix got the choice of either going to prison for two years or to join the US Army. Hendrix chose to join the Army on May 31, 1961 and was sent to Fort Campbell, Kentucky. Whilst in the army, his officers said that he was always caught sleeping on duty and needed to be watched at all times. He was bad with a gun and an officer said that "his mind apparently cannot function [cannot work properly] while performing duties and thinking about his guitar". However, the army was an important time for Hendrix, since it was there that he met another soldier and bass guitar player called Billy Cox. They would later play together in a small group called The King Kasuals.
On May 31, 1962, after being in the Army for one year, Hendrix’s officers thought it would be best for him to leave the army - he was always causing trouble. Hendrix agreed but tried to cover this up by saying he had been let go after breaking his ankle when he was landing his 26th parachute jump. He also spoke about his time in the army in interviews for a magazine, "Melody Maker", in 1967 and 1969. He said that he did not like serving the army and did not agree with their ways of doing things. When he was interviewed in the US, Hendrix never talked about his time in the army. When it was brought up in an interview on TV, Hendrix only said that he had been based at Fort Campbell.
Later life.
Hendrix' left-handed playing on a guitar made for right-handed people made him popular. His first proper concert was with a small band without a name, playing in a Synagogue. Hendrix was fired because he liked to show off his guitar playing too much. He later joined a band called The Velvetones, who played at the Yesler Terrace.
After leaving the Army, Hendrix and Billy Cox, whom had met in the army, moved together to Clarksville in Tennessee, where they played in their group, The King Kasuals. He and Cox played in small bars but they did not make much money. So, eventually, he and Cox moved to Nashville. They played in Nashville with many blues style songs. In November 1962, Hendrix went to his first studio performance. During his time in Nashville, Hendrix played in many other bands as rhythm and lead guitarist and vocals. This did not get him much money, but did give him experience of how bands worked.
Later, Hendrix left Nashville and went to Northern New York City. By January 1964, he moved to Harlem where he played at bars and clubs for money. Hendrix also won first prize in an amateur guitar contest at The Apollo Theatre. In 1966, Hendrix formed his own band instead of joining others. He called his band Jimmy James and The Blues Flames. The members were people that he met around town. One of them was a 15-year-old boy called Randy.
Hendrix played many gigs around New York City and many songs at a Café called "Café Wha?".
Hendrix got lucky, and in 1966, he became friends with the girlfriend of Keith Richards, guitarist for The Rolling Stones, Linda Keith. She liked Hendrix’ music and showed him to Chas Chandler, the manager for The Animals. Chandler told Hendrix to write a rock version of the song “Hey Joe” and when he did, Chandler brought him to London to sign a contract with him. Hendrix had to make a new band. He called it The Jimi Hendrix Experience'".
"Are you Experienced?".
The Jimi Hendrix Experience made its first album in 1967. It was called "Are You Experienced?".
When the album was being produced and sold, Hendrix travelled around the UK and some of Europe. On June 4, 1967, The Jimi Hendrix Experience played their last concert in London before going to America. In America many famous people came to see Hendrix play including Paul McCartney, George Harrison, Eric Clapton, Jack Bruce and Brian Epstein.
The album reached #2 in the UK charts. In 2001, VH1 named "Are You Experienced" as the 5th greatest album of all time. "Rolling Stone" magazine put it at number 15 on a list of the 500 greatest albums of all time in 2003.
"Axis: Bold as Love".
Hendrix’ second album came out in 1967. It was called "Axis: Bold as Love". It had famous songs in it, most famous being "Little Wing". There have been several other versions of the song by other musicians like Stevie Ray Vaughan, Henry "Hank" Marrion, Metallica, Eric Clapton, Sting and Pearl Jam. An important difference in the album from other albums he made was that Hendrix tuned his guitar down a semi-tone (to E flat). The album reached #3 in the US charts and #5 in the UK charts.
The album almost did not sell, since Hendrix lost the master tape of side one of the LP in the back of a taxi in London. Hendrix, Chas Chandler and an engineer called Eddie Kramer had to re-mix the songs in one night. They could not get the song "If 6 was 9" right, but Hendrix' bassist Noel Redding had a copy of it on tape. When the album was released, Hendrix was disappointed that the album was finished so quickly and he thought it could have been done better.
"Electric LadyLand".
Hendrix finished his third album, called "Electric LadyLand" - a double album with two LP's - in 1968. In this year, Chas Chandler (Hendrix’ manager) decided to leave Hendrix and so did Noel Redding. When Chandler left, Hendrix changed everything in his music. He began using different musicians and instruments. He used guitars with flutes and trombones all with distortion to get strange sounds. The album reached #1 album in the US. It reached #5 in the UK. In 2003, VH1 named the album the 72nd best album of all time, and the "Rolling Stones" magazine gave it 54th greatest album of all time.
Woodstock.
Hendrix went to play at Woodstock on August 18, 1969. That year, Woodstock made over $18,000 and has since become one of the most famous concerts in the world. Hendrix was told to play on Sunday evening, but did not arrive until Monday morning, which was unfortunate because of the 500,000 people that had paid to see him, around 180,000 were left and did not plan on staying his whole concert, they just wanted to see him in person for a few minutes. Hendrix then went on to play a two-hour concert that was described as awful. Hendrix’ large band had not practiced enough and could not keep up with Hendrix' fast guitar playing. But to make up for all of this, Hendrix played a version of Star Spangled Banner. He played this anthem with heavy distortion and screams from his guitar, and people thought that he was being anti-American and making fun of their anthem and country. Hendrix, in an interview, said that he "did not intend for his performance to be a political statement", he just wanted it to be another version of the national anthem.
Death.
On September 18, 1970, Jimi Hendrix was found dead in a basement of the Samarkand Hotel in London. He died after drinking too much, and then taking too many sleeping pills. He vomited and choked on his vomit because he could not regain consciousness. There are many different theories that were thought up. His girlfriend, who was with him at the time that he died, said that he was alive when she put him in the back of the ambulance, but hospital records say that Hendrix had been dead for some time before the ambulance had reached him. Some people say that Hendrix was alive, but that the paramedics did not properly hold his head while he was unconscious so he choked on his own vomit. A sad poem that was found in Hendrix’ apartment written by him made some think that he committed suicide.
The most likely explanation is that Hendrix just took too many sleeping pills while he was drunk, and then could not wake up as he vomited and choked as a result.
Burial.
Hendrix was buried in Renton, Washington in Greenwood Memorial Park on October 1 1970. His headstone was wrong because it shows a picture of Hendrix playing a Stratocaster, but the Stratocaster is right-handed, Hendrix played left-handed. Because Hendrix had so many fans, people were worried that the crowds of people wanting to look at his grave would damage other graves, so Hendrix’ father, Al Hendrix, had another memorial site built far from other graves. The memorial is a granite dome architecture, held up by three pillars and Hendrix is buried underneath. His autograph is at the foot of each pillar and a brass sundial is at the top of the dome. There is also a memorial statue of Hendrix playing a Stratocaster near the corner of Broadway in Seattle.
Fashion.
Hendrix had unique fashion and a Bob Dylan-style haircut. He wore scarves, rings and brooches. In his early career, he wore a dark suit with a silk shirt. Later, he wore bright blue velvet suits, red suits and flared trousers. In 1967, he started to wear a cowboy-style hat he called "The Westerner".
In 1968, Hendrix' started tying scarves to his legs and arms. In 1969, he wore his famous bandana.
Drugs.
Hendrix used drugs like LSD to get hallucinations. He also smoked marijuana and drank alcohol. Hendrix would become angry and violent when he was drunk.
However, no one knows if Hendrix took heroin or not. At his autopsy, there was no heroin in his body and he had no needle marks on his body.

Maynard James Keenan
music
Maynard James Keenan (born James Herbert Keenan on April 17, 1964) is an American rock singer, songwriter, musician, and producer. He sings in the band Tool, and also in the band A Perfect Circle. He has a side project called Puscifer.
Early life.
James Herbert Keenan was born in Ravenna, Ohio on April 17, 1964. His mother is Judith and his father is Michael, who was a high school teacher. Keenan's parents divorced when he was three years old, and Michael moved away. Keenan did not see him very much for the next 12 years. Later, his mother married someone else. He was mean and did not allow Keenan to be creative. When Keenan was 11, his mother, Judith, had a brain aneurysm that paralyzed her. Two years later, she told Keenan to move to Michigan with his father.
The Army.
Keenan joined the United States Army after he graduated from high school. He wanted to use the G.I. Bill to go to art school. He joined the United States Military Academy Preparatory School (West Point Prep School) where he picked up the nickname "Maynard". He did very well in his training, but said no to an offer to stay in the Army and work at West Point. He decided to start his music career instead.
Art.
After being honorably discharged from the Army, Keenan went back to Michigan to go to art school. Then, in 1988, he moved to Los Angeles, California to help design the inside of pet stores. He was fired from this job and then worked creating movie sets. He also played bass guitar in a band and sang for another band.
Tool.
Keenan met Adam Jones in Los Angeles. They started the band Tool in 1990. The band's line up later became Keenan as singer, Jones playing guitar, Danny Carey playing drums, and Paul D'Amour playing bass. D'Amour ended up leaving the band and Justin Chancellor took his place. Tool signed to Zoo Entertainment in November 1991.

Lukas Podolski
sports
Lukas Podolski (born June 4 1985 in Gliwice, Poland) is a Polish born German footballer. He plays for Bayern München. From 2004 until 2006, he played for 1. FC Köln. For the German national football team, he played 54 matches and scored 28 goals.
He is known for his nice fashion during press conferences. He often wears button down shirts and polished shoes. He has a girlfriend called Monika and they have a son. The son's name is Louis, he was born in April 2008.

Miroslav Klose
sports
Miroslav Klose (born June 9 1978 in Oppeln, Poland) is a Polish born German footballer. From 1999 until 2004 he played for 1. FC Kaiserslautern and from 2004 until 2007 for Werder Bremen. In 2007 changed to Bayern Munich. On the German national football team he has played in 80 matches since 2001, scored 41 goals and made 17 assists.

Oliver Kahn
sports
Oliver Rolf Kahn (born June 15, 1969 in Karlsruhe, Germany) was a German footballer. He also played the position of the goalkeeper for FC Bayern München. From 1988 until 1994, Kahn played for Karlsruher SC. He has played 86 matches for the German national football team.
After the world championship in 2006, he retired from the national team. After the season 2007/2008 he ended his career and stopped playing for his club Bayern München, too.
Kahn has won several titles with Bayern München, among them are the UEFA champions league, the UEFA cup, the intercontinental cup, eight national championships and six national cups.
In the world championships in 2002 he become vice champion with the German national team.
Kahns nicknames are "King Kahn" or "the titan".

Timo Hildebrand
sports
Timo Hidebrand (born April 5 1979 in Worms, Germany) is a German footballer. He is now the second goalkeeper of the German national football team. Hildebrand has played for VfB Stuttgart since 1999. In 2007 he changed to FC Valencia.

Philipp Lahm
sports
Philipp Lahm (born November 11 1983 in Munich, Germany) is a German footballer. He plays as a defender for Bayern München.
From 2003 until 2005 he played for VfB Stuttgart. He has played in the German national football team since 2004, with 3 goals in 46 matches.

Bastian Schweinsteiger
sports
Bastian Schweinsteiger (born August 1, 1984, in Kolbermoor, Germany) is a German footballer. At the moment, he plays for Bayern München. For the national team, he played 55 matches and scored 15 goals. In Germany he is famous for changing the colour of his hair very often. His girlfriend is the German model Sarah Brandener, whom he has dated since May 2007. He has an older brother called Tobias Schweinsteiger he plays for the SpVgg Unterhaching. The press gave him the Nickname 'Schweini', which comes from his lastname 'Schweinsteiger'.

Per Mertesacker
sports
Per Mertesacker (born September 29 1984 in Hannover, Germany) is a German footballer. He started playing for Werder Bremen in 2006. Before that, he played for Hannover 96. In the German national football team he has played 48 matches and has made 1 goal.

David Odonkor
sports
David Odonkor (born February 21 1984 in Bünde, Germany) is a German footballer. At the moment, he plays for Real Betis. Until 2006, he was playing for Borussia Dortmund. For the German national football team he has played 16 matches and made 1 goal.

Walther von der Vogelweide
music
Walther von der Vogelweide (born about 1170; died possibly in Würzburg around 1230) was a famous German poet and composer. He was the greatest of the German Minnesinger. These were people who wrote and sang songs about courtly love. Walther himself may have added “von der Vogelweide” to his name (it means “of the bird meadow”).
The German courtly love songs that had been written at the time were all very similar, but Walther gave these songs new life and made them very beautiful. Unfortunately we do not know any of his music, because he did not write it down. But he wrote his poems down. They are very original, sometimes humorous, sometimes serious, often just gently suggesting ideas carefully.
We do not know where Walther was born, but he wrote in a document that he had learned to sing and write poetry in Austria. The dialect he spoke shows that he must have come from Bavaria or Austria. He spent some time at the court of Duke Leopold V of Babenberg in Vienna. This was about 1190. He took part in public singing contests and had long discussions with other people about love and the way it should be written about in poetry.
In about 1198 he left Vienna and spent many years travelling around, visiting courts in Europe, entertaining dukes and princes, and singing his songs. He always wrote the words himself, he never used other poets’ words. That would have made him a simple “Spielmann”, but Walther was of noble birth (he had the title “Herr”). He often spent several weeks or months in a castle where he entertained people, and where he probably also fell in love with one of the ladies. He wrote about these love-affairs in his poetry.
Walther also wrote verses called “Sprüche" ("sayings"). These were about the history of the time. They were a kind of political propaganda and were used in political debates. Walther supported Emperor Otto IV in his arguments against the pope, persuading the emperor to go on the crusade which the pope had forbidden. We do not know whether Walther went with him on the crusade.

Let There Be Rock
music
Let There Be Rock is a studio album by the Australian hard rock band DC. It was released on June 23, 1977.

Jens Lehmann
sports
Jens Lehmann (born November 10 1969 in Essen, Germany) is a German footballer. He has played for Arsenal F.C. since 2003. Lehmann is the goalkeeper of the German national football team. He has played 60 matchs for the national team.
As an adult.
Jens Lehmann has played for Arsenal in 2002 in November. He has had lots of memories but now in 2007 he got injured and then got replaced by Manuel Almunia. He came back on December the 1st from his knee injury. Now Jens has played 1 or 2 games for Germany and now is probably going to quit Arsenal F.C. and he is thinking to go to a German team. And now Arsenal F.C. have to say another goodbye to their 3rd recent mover.
Jens has just began to play again after his bad injury (knee injury). He played at least a game for Germany on December the 6th 2007. Unfortunantly he let in 3 goals and saved 22 from going in to the goals. Jens now might live in Germany forever because he is leaving Arsenal F.C. and moves in July 2008 to VfB Stuttgart.

Steven Gerrard
sports
Steven Boy George Gerrard is an English football player. He was born on 30 May 1980. He is 1.85 m tall. (That is 6 feet, 1 inch.) Gerrard is currently playing for Liverpool, where he wears the number 8 shirt. He is the England vice captain, for which he wears the number 4. He usually plays as a central midfielder.
Personal life.
Gerrard was born in Whiston Hospital but grew up in the Liverpool suburb of Huyton.
Gerrard is engaged to Alex Curran and they got married on June 16 2007. They have two daughters: Lilly-Ella Gerrard (born February 23, 2004) and Lexie Gerrard (born May 09, 2006).
On 1 September 2006, he published his first autobiography, entitled "Gerrard: My Autobiography".

Torsten Frings
sports
Torsten Frings (born November 22 1976 in Würselen, Germany) is a German footballer. At the moment he playes for Werder Bremen. Before his change, he played for Bayern München (2004 until 2005, Borussia Dortmund (2002 until 2004, Werder Bremen (1997 until 2002).
In his youth he played for Alemannia Aachen (1990 until 1996, Rhenania Alsdorf (1988 until 1990 and Rot-Weiß Alsdorf (1982 until 1988).
He has played for the German national football team since 2001. He has played in 76 matches and scored 10 goals for his country.

Joachim Löw
sports
Joachim "Jogi" Löw (born 3 February 1960 in Schönau im Schwarzwald) is a former German footballer. He has been the coach of the German national football team since summer 2006.

Max Reger
music
Max Reger (born Brand, Bavaria, 19 March 1873; died 11 May 1916) was a German composer, organist, pianist and teacher.
Life.
Reger’s father was a schoolteacher who was an amateur musician. When he was a boy Max helped his father to rebuild an organ that was going to be thrown away. This was the instrument on which he learned to play. It was some time before he started proper lessons, but by the time he was a teenager he was playing the organ for church services. When he was 15 he went to Bayreuth to hear Wagner’s operas. This was the moment when Reger decided he wanted to become a musician.
Reger studied music in Munich and Wiesbaden with a famous teacher Hugo Riemann. He composed a lot of music, especially for the organ. His musical style was similar to that of Brahms, but he also learned a lot from the music of Bach, Mendelssohn and Schumann. He liked the symphonic poems of Liszt and these gave him the ideas for writing chorale fantasies for the organ, although he never wrote music that tells a story (programme music).
In 1902 Reger married. He and his wife adopted two children. In 1907 he became professor of composition at the University of Leipzig. He was a very good teacher. He became well-known abroad. He travelled to London where he spent hours in the art galleries. Then he bored his friends by talking all the time about the paintings. He conducted the orchestra at Meiningen, performing works by many composers, especially Brahms, Bruckner and his own.
Reger enjoyed eating and drinking. He regularly went to his local café where he would eat ten large sausages and drink ten glasses of beer. His health got bad, and he died of a heart attack in Leipzig, where he was visiting friends on his way home from the Netherlands.
Works.
Reger wrote an enormous amount of music, but very little of it is played nowadays. He wrote in a late-Romantic style. He is best remembered for his organ music. He liked to write fugues and sets of Variations. His "Fantasy and Fugue on BACH" is one of the hardest pieces ever written for organ. He wrote a lovely song called "Marias Wiegenlied" ("Mary’s lullaby).

Barack Obama
politics
Barack Hussein Obama II (born August 4, 1961) is a United States Senator from Illinois, and will be the 44th president of the United States. Obama won the 2008 United States presidential election on November 4, and will be the first African-American president when he is inaugurated.
Education.
At the Columbia University in New York City he studied political science, with a focus on international relations and he got a bachelor degree in 1983.
He also studied jurisprudence (science of law) for three years at the Harvard Law School. In 1991 he made his Juris Doctor degree 'magna cum laude' ('with great honor').
Presidential campaign.
Barack Obama's presidential campaign for the White House started in early June 2008 when he defeated Hillary Clinton in the 2008 Democrat primaries. He decided not to accept public funding and chose to raise all of his money himself. He has raised the most amount of money ever for a presidential campaign. He defeated Republican candidate John McCain in the election on November 4 by a wide electoral majority of 365 to 173. The popular vote was closer, with Obama receiving 53%, McCain 46%.
Family.
Obama has been married to Michelle Obama since 1992. She has a Bachelor of Arts degree and also a Juris Doctor degree from Harvard Law School. She worked as a lawyer.
They have two daughters, Malia Ann who was born in 1998 and Natasha ("Sasha"), born in 2001. They still live in Chicago, and are moving into the White House on January 20, 2009. He is planning on having a family dog after his inauguration.

Buckethead
music
Buckethead (Born Brian Carroll in 1969) is an American guitarist and composer. He is famous for his unique musical and personal style. He wears a white mask and a KFC bucket on his head while playing. He does this so that the show is about his music and not about him. He has composed several albums during his career. His longest album was made up of thirteen CDs, one for each letter in the title, "In Search Of The".

Robert Enke
sports
Robert Enke (born August 24 1977 in Jena, Germany) is a German footballer. He is the second goalkeeper of the German national football team. From 1997 to 1999 he made fifteen matches for the German under-21 national team. In 1999 he was nominated as one of three goealkeepers of the national team and he went to the FIFA confederations cup in the same year. After leaving Germany in 1999 and playing in Portugal, Spain and Turkey, he was not nominated. In 2006, already playing two years back home, he was nominated as a stand-by goalkeeper for the world championships. After that he returned to the team, in 2007 he made his first and only match for the team. In May 2008 he became goalkeeper number two after Jens Lehmann who was already 38 years old. Now that Jens Lehman is no longer playing for the National team, Robert Enke was the Number 1 until 8th Oct 2008, when he broke a bone of his right hand. He will probably have to pause for three months.
His club at the moment is Hannover 96. He has got a contract until the year 2010. In 2007 he became team captain in his club.

Tampa Bay Buccaneers
sports
The Tampa Bay Buccaneers are a American Football team in the National Football League (NFL). They are a part of the Southern Division of the National Football Conference. The Buccaneers are from Tampa, Florida. The team was founded in 1976. And are the champions from Super Bowl XXXVII.

Tomorrow Never Knows
music
Tomorrow Never Knows is a song from The Beatles's "Revolver" album, from 1966.
John Lennon wrote the song based on his readings of "The Psychedelic Experience", which adapted the "Tibetan Book of the Dead" for use as an LSD "user's manual", intending to give users a kind of religious experience. The song's title came from his bandmate Ringo Starr, who was known for his quirky but insightful comments about life.
Lennon wanted the sound of monks chanting, to complement the Beatles' recording of the song. It was not possible to do this, but Lennon's voice was played through a special speaker (called a Leslie speaker), to give it a warbling sound, like a voice calling from a hilltop. Other sounds on the record came from tape loops, playing over and over, and from a sitar.
The song has also been recorded by other artists. A dance cover version appeared in the 1990s.

Carl Nielsen
music
Carl Nielsen (born Sortelung nr Nørre Lyndelse on Funen, June 9, 1865; died Copenhagen, October 3, 1931) was a Danish composer. He is the most famous composer from Denmark and one of the most important composers of symphonies from the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
Life.
Carl Nielsen was the 7th in a family of 12 children. His father’s name was Niels Jørgensen. It was Danish tradition for a child to get his father’s first name as his surname, so Carl became Carl Nielsen (“son of Niels”).
The family was very poor and Carl had to help in the home. During the school holidays he looked after the geese. His father, who was a simple painter, played the violin and cornet in the village band. Carl soon learned to play the violin and joined in with his father’s band. He listened to music by Haydn and Mozart and became very interested in general knowledge. All his life he tried to learn new languages and was interested in literature, art and philosophy. He loved animals and the nature around him.
When he was 14, he had a job in the military orchestra in the nearby town of Odense. He played the horn and trombone. In 1884 some wealthy people in Odense paid for him to go to the Conservatory in Copenhagen. He studied music there and did quite well, but there was nothing yet to show that he would be a brilliant composer. He got a job as violinist in the Royal Chapel, a good orchestra which was conducted by Johan Svendsen. He got to know the music of Wagner, and he went to Germany to study it. Later he was not so keen on Wagner’s music, and he was not much influenced by it.
In 1891, he married Anne Marie Brodersen who was a sculptress. They travelled together to Italy where they saw lots of great art. When they returned to Denmark Nielsen started composing some of the music that was to make him famous. In 1901 the Danish government paid him money every year so that he did not have to teach and could spend his time composing. He also conducted the Royal Theatre when Svendsen retired. He often travelled to other countries and, later, did some teaching and examining at the Copenhagen Conservatoire. He was made director of the conservatoire in 1931, shortly before he died.
Nielsen suffered for several years from heart trouble. He died from this disease on October 3, 1931.
His music.
Carl Nielsen wrote nearly every kind of music: opera, chamber music, symphony, concerto, songs. His music was different from the Romantic music that other composers were writing at that time. Nielsen liked the music of the Classical period, especially Haydn and Mozart. He learned from them, but also used a lot of chromaticism and interesting orchestral sounds which made his music much more modern.
He wrote a serious opera called "Saul og David" and a comic opera "Maskarade". He wrote a lot of Danish songs which are very popular in Denmark.
By far the most important of his works internationally are his six symphonies and three concertos. The Fourth and Fifth Symphonies, especially, are performed very often by orchestras all over the world.
He wrote a very large work for organ called "Commotio".
Nielsen always said how important his simple village background was for his music. This can be heard clearly in his popular cantata "Fynsk Foraar" ("Springtime in Funen") which shows his love of the countryside where he grew up.

José Mourinho
sports
José Mário dos Santos Mourinho Félix (born January 26, 1963 in Setúbal) is a Portuguese football manager. He is the current manager of Serie A club Inter Milan. Mourinho is thought to be one of the best coaches in Europe. He won four league titles in a row (two at Porto and two at Chelsea). He has also won the UEFA Champions League and the UEFA Cup with Porto. For two consecutive years (2004 and 2005), Mourinho was named the world's best football coach by the International Federation of Football History and Statistics (IFFHS). After leaving Chelsea F.C., he was replaced by Avram Grant. He went to coach Inter Milan and won the Italian Super Cup in August 2008.

McLaren
sports
McLaren is a Formula 1 racing team which has recently diversified into other areas, such as making the Mercedes McLaren SLR supercar at its Woking factory. McLaren did set up for Bruce McLaren in 1963. McLaren's drivers are Lewis Hamilton and Heikki Kovalainen. In two last races of 2007, Hamilton lost the championship to Kimi Raikkonen. However, in 2008 McLaren won the title in Brazil after overtaking Timo Glock on last lap.

Haylie Duff
music
Haylie Katherine Duff (born February 19 1985) is an American actress and singer. She is best known for her supporting role on the television series "7th Heaven". She is the sister of Hilary Duff.
Duff was born in Houston, Texas. Her mother, Susan Duff, is a producer. Robert Erhard Duff, Haylie's father, lives at the family home in Houston. Haylie is two and a half years older than her sister.
Discography.
Duff wrote or co-wrote several songs on two of her sister Hilary's albums, "Metamorphosis" (2003), "Hilary Duff" (2004) and the song, "Gypsy Woman", on Hilary's 4th album, "Dignity". She has also done many songs for different soundtracks with her sister.

John Taverner
music
John Taverner (born about 1490 – died 18 October, 1545) was the most important English composer of his time. He was also an organist.
We cannot be sure exactly when Taverner was born. Some people think that he was a boy chorister at the church of Tattershall in Lincolnshire but his name does not appear on the list of choristers there. People now think that he worked there later as a lay clerk.
He got a job at Cardinal College (now called Christ Church) in Oxford but he could not stay very long because King Henry VIII made lots of changes to the way people had to worship in church. Taverner even hid some books which the king had forbidden under the floor, and he got into trouble for doing this. In the end the Cardinal did not punish him because, he said, he was “only a musician”.
In 1530 he seems to have gone back to Lincolnshire and stayed there for the rest of his life. He probably wrote no more music, but he was quite rich.
Taverner composed eight masses. The most famous one is called the "Western Wynde". It was a “parody mass”, which meant that it used a popular tune with that title. Another mass was called "Gloria tibi trinitas". This work set a fashion for pieces which were called "In Nomine"s, because the tune was from the Benedictus in the mass which sets the words “in nomine domine” (“in the name of the Father”). “In nomine”s were compositions for instruments which used this tune.
Taverner also wrote magnificats and motets.

John Tavener
music
Sir John Tavener (born London, 28 January 1944) is an English composer. He is one of the most important composers of today. Most of his music is inspired by religion in some way.
John Tavener went to Highgate School in North London. Another pupil there at the time was John Rutter. At school he studied piano, organ and composition and wrote music for the school orchestra. He also wrote music for the Presbyterian church where his family went and where his father was organist. In 1962 he went to the Royal College of Music where he studied the piano at first but then changed to composition. One of his early successes was a cantata called "Cain and Abel" which was performed by the London Bach Society. It was the performance of "The Whale" by the London Sinfonietta in 1968 that made him really famous. This work used collage, pre-recorded tape, amplified percussion and a chorus who used loudhailers. This kind of thing was very fashionable in the 1960s.
Another work written in 1968 was "In Alium". It was performed at the Proms. It was an unusual concert: three works by living composers were played in the first half. The audience were asked to vote for which one they wanted to hear again after the interval. They chose "In Alium".
The Beatles became interested in Tavener’s music. John Lennon heard The Whale and he decided to issue Tavener’s music on the newly formed Apple label.
Tavener became professor of composition at Trinity College. He continued to compose, although he often had difficulty finishing pieces. He was often worried that he might not be able to think of any new music. In 1977 he became a member of the Russian Orthodox Church. This changed his life. His music was very religious. He married his second wife and had two children. He was also very ill with heart trouble and even died on the operating table in hospital, but he brought back to life by the doctors.
He made a very important friend, Mother Thekla. She was an 80 year-old nun in the Orthodox Church, and she gave John a lot of advice and encouragement in his life.
A short piece for choir, "The Lamb" was written as a birthday present for his 3 year old nephew. It is very often sung by choirs at Christmas as a carol.
In 1989 his work "The Protecting Veil" was performed at the Proms. It was a work for cello and orchestra. The cellist was Steven Isserlis. This piece is one of the best known modern works for cello. He continued to write a lot of music. His "Song for Athene" was performed at the funeral of Diana, Princess of Wales in 1998. It was heard on television all over the world.
Tavener was knighted in 2000.

Wolfgang Schüssel
politics
Wolfgang Schüssel (born June 7, 1945 in Vienna) was the Chancellor of Austria from February 4 2000 until January 11 2007. From January 2006 until June 2006 he was the president of the European Union.

Yochanan Vollach
sports
Yochanan Vollach, also transliterated Jochanan Wallach or Yohanan Wallach, born 14 May 1945) is a former Israeli footballer superstar which played at: Hapoel Haifa, Maccabi Haifa, HKFC.
He was a member of the Israeli national team that competed at the 1970 FIFA World Cup.
At 1979 he retired and volunteered as general manager of Maccabi Haifa. Vollach was the Major reason for Maccabi's success.
Vollach has a masters degree in business administration from the Hebrew University of Jerusalem and is a retired Major in the IDF.
In recognition of his extensive volunteering to the sporting community as well as business success, he was awarded honorary citizenship by the city of Haifa, in 1993.
Today, Vollach is president of the Maccabi Haifa association and president and CEO of Newlog, a subsidiary of Israeli shipping magnate Zim.

Taj Mahal (musician)
music
Henry Saint Clair Fredericks, better known by the stage name Taj Mahal (born May 17, 1942), is an American blues musician. He has been performing and recording since 1964 and is still popular.

Manuel Friedrich
sports
Manuel Friedrich (born September 13, 1979 in Bad Kreuznach) is a German footballer with the position of the Defender. He has played for the team 1.FSV Mainz 05 and at the moment he playes for Bayer Leverkusen. Friedrich has played nine matches for the German national football team since 2006. During that time he has scored one goal.

Bruno Kreisky
politics
Bruno Kreisky (January 22, 1911 – July 29, 1990) served as Chancellor of Austria from 1970 to 1983. He is remembered in Austria as one of the people who helped shape the Austrian State Treaty. This treaty is the foundation of modern-day Austria. It was signed in 1955.

Pierre Boulez
music
Pierre Boulez (pronounce: “Boo-layz) (born Montbrison, Loire, 26 March 1925) is one of the most important French composers of modern classical music. He is also a very famous conductor.
Boulez as a composer.
Boulez started his university studies by studying mathematics. He then gave that up and went to the Paris Conservatoire to study music. One of his teachers was Olivier Messiaen. He wrote music in an atonal style, similar to the serial music of Anton Webern. Gradually his music became completely serial, so that everything about the music: the pitches of the notes, the length of the notes, the louds and softs, the accents were all organized in a mathematical way. This is called “total serialism” or “integral serialism”. This kind of music is very strange to listen to.
Boulez belonged to a group of composers who met in the summer at Darmstadt in Germany. This group is often called the “Darmstadt School”. He wrote music which was extremely hard to play e.g. "Structures book 1" for two pianos.
Perhaps his most famous piece is "Le marteau sans maître" ("The hammer without a master"). This piece, finished in 1957, is for a small group of instruments: flute, guitar, vibraphone, xylorimba (a cross between a xylophone and a marimba), percussion and viola and a singer (alto). It has very complicated rhythms and is influenced by jazz, gamelan music, African and Japanese music.
Boulez then tried out new ideas. He wrote works which would sound different at each performance because the players could improvise some ideas. "Pli selon pli" ("Fold upon fold") was a work for orchestra and soprano. It was based on a poem by Stéphane Mallarmé about a swan that could not fly away because it was stuck on the frozen lake. His piece "Eclat" (1965) also uses improvisation. The conductor is free to decide on how certain bits could be played and makes signs to the players to improvise in certain ways that the composers has written down. This kind of composition is sometimes called “Chance music” because it is different each time it is played. The American composer John Cage also experimented with Chance music.
In the 1970s he became interested in electronic music. The French president Georges Pompidou supported the building of a big Arts Centre in Paris. This centre included a large underground set of studios for music. It became known as IRCAM (translated from the French: Institute for Acoustical/Musical Research and Coordination). A lot of composers worked in IRCAM. They used computers, tape recorders etc, to compose music.
Boulez as a conductor.
Boulez is also a world-famous conductor. He has conducted many of the world's greatest orchestras. He was the chief conductor of the BBC Symphony Orchestra from 1971-1975, the New York Philharmonic from 1971-1977 and now he is Conductor Emeritus of the Chicago Symphony Orchestra. His concerts usually consist of music by the great 20th century composers such as Alban Berg, Claude Debussy, Gustav Mahler, Arnold Schoenberg, Igor Stravinsky, Béla Bartók, Anton Webern and Edgard Varèse—as well as lots of new music which he conducted when it had just been written.
Boulez has also written several books and articles on music.

Carl Philipp Emanuel Bach
music
Carl Philipp Emanuel Bach (March 8, 1714 – December 14, 1788) was a German musician and composer. He was the second of the five sons of Johann Sebastian Bach and Maria Barbara Bach. Besides composing and playing music he wrote a book called Essay on the True Art of Playing Keyboard Instruments. Many people learned about playing music from it.

Jeffrey Archer
politics
Jeffrey Howard Archer, Baron Archer of Weston-super-Mare (born May 15, 1940) is a British author and politician. He was a member of Parliament, Deputy Chairman of the Conservative Party and since 1992 is a life peer. His political career ended after an indictment for perjury. He is married to Mary Archer, a prominent scientist in solar power.
Early life.
Jeffrey Howard Archer was born in the City of London Maternity Hospital. When he was two weeks old he and his family moved to the seaside town of Weston-super-Mare, Somerset, where he spent most of his young life.
At Oxford he was successful in athletics, competing in sprinting and hurdling. He also made a name for himself in raising money for the then little-known charity Oxfam, famously managing to obtain the support of The Beatles in a charity fundraising drive. The band accepted his invitation to visit the Senior Common Room of his Brasenose College, where they were photographed with Archer and dons of the college, although they didn't play there. It was during this period that he met his future wife, Mary. They married in July 1966.
At the age of 29, he was elected as a Member of Parliament (MP) for a Lincolnshire constituency, holding the seat for the Conservative Party in a by-election on 4 December 1969.
In Parliament, Archer was on the left of the Conservative Party, rebelling against some of his party's policies. He urged free TV licences for the elderly and was against museum charges. Archer voted against restoring the death penalty saying it was barbaric and obscene.
Archer had to resign because of a scandal in October 1986 when the Sunday newspaper "The News of the World" led on the story "Tory boss Archer pays vice-girl". The article claimed that Archer had paid Monica Coghlan, a prostitute £2000 through an intermediary at Waterloo Station to go abroad. Unlike the "Daily Star", the newspaper did not allege that Archer had actually slept with Coghlan. Archer sued the "Daily Star".
Perjury and downfall.
Archer had been selected by the Conservative Party as their candidate for the London mayoral election of 2000. He was forced to withdraw from the race when it was revealed that he was facing a charge of perjury.
On 4 February, 2000 Archer was expelled from the Conservative Party for five years. On 26 September, 2000 he was charged with perjury and perverting the course of justice (i.e., obstruction of justice) during the 1987 libel trial.
A few months before the beginning of the perjury trial, Archer began performing in the star role in a courtroom play (which he also wrote) called "The Accused". The play was staged at London's Theatre Royal Haymarket and concerns the court trial of an alleged murderer from beginning to end. The play used the innovation of assigning the role of jury in the trial to the audience, with theatre-goers voting on whether Archer's character was innocent or guilty at the end of each night's performance. Archer would attend his real trial during the day and be judged in his fictional trial at the theatre in the evening.
The real life trial began on 30 May, 2001. On 19 July, 2001 Lord Archer was found guilty of perjury. He was sentenced to a total of four years' imprisonment by Mr. Justice Potts. The most ironic aspect of his trial was that he had fabricated the alibi for the wrong date. Archer never spoke during the trial. Ted Francis was found not guilty of perverting the course of justice.
On 21 July, 2003 he was released on licence, after serving half of his sentence, from HMP Hollesley Bay, Suffolk.
Many of Lord Archer's friends remained loyal to him.

Aston Martin
sports
Aston Martin Lagonda Limited is a luxury car company that was founded in 1913 by Lionel Martin and Robert Bamford.
The company name is derived from the Aston Clinton hill climb and one of the company's founders, Lionel Martin. Ford Motor Company owned Aston Martin until 2007, at which time it was sold to Investment Dar and Adeem Investments.

Michael Jordan
sports
Michael Jordan (born February 17, 1963) is a retired American basketball player. Many people believe Jordan is one of the greatest basketball players to ever play in the NBA. He won six championships playing for the Chicago Bulls and head coach Phil Jackson. The Chicago Bulls team set a record by winning 72 games. Jordan was part of this team and played together with men like Dennis Rodman, Scottie Pippen, and Toni Kukoc. Jordan also won two Olympic gold medals for basketball. His first was in 1984 as a college player and his second was in 1992 as an NBA player.
In the middle of his career in basketball, Jordan switched to a career in minor league baseball. He played for the Chicago White Sox minor league team, but hit only one home run during his whole baseball career. He eventually bought part of the Washington Wizards basketball team and was a part time player. Jordan is now officially finished with his basketball career.

Lawrence Taylor
sports
Lawrence Taylor (February 4, 1959) is a retired American football player who played for the New York Giants in the National Football League (NFL). Taylor was famous for sacking the other team's quarterbacks. After he reitred he got in trouble for doing drugs. He has since stopped doing drugs.

New York Giants
sports
The New York Giants are an American football team. They are a part of the National Football League (NFL). Even though they are called the New York Giants they do not play in New York. They play in East Rutherford, New Jeresy. New York is right across the Hudson river from East Rutherford,so they consider New York as home. The Giants play in Giants Stadium in which they share with the New york Jets. However in 2009 a new stadium will be opened right next to the sight of the old stadium. The New York Giants started playing in 1925. They have won six championships. On February 3, 2008, the Giants beat the New England Patriots (17-14) to win their third Super Bowl championship.The previous two Super Bowl victories came against the Denver Broncos and the Buffalo Bills (when they won the game on a missed last second field goal that went "wide right".

Hakeem Olajuwon
sports
Hakeem Olajuwon (January 21, 1963) is a retired American basketball player. Olajuwon travelled all the way from his home country of Nigeria to play basketball in the United States. He won two National Basketball Association (NBA) championships with the Houston Rockets.

Scottie Pippen
sports
Scottie Pippen (September 25, 1965) is a retired American basketball player. He played for the Chicago Bulls of the National Basketball Association (NBA) and won 6 championships.

Chicago Bulls
sports
Chicago Bulls are a American professional basketball team. They play in Chicago, Illinois. The Bulls are a part of the National Basketball Association (NBA).

Barry Bonds
sports
Barry Bonds (born July 24, 1964) is an American Major League Baseball player. He holds the Major League Baseball career home run record with 762 home runs. He has been accused of using Cumberland Posey to make his dick stronger, but it didn't work. He is currently a free agent. He is not signed with any team and is currently not playing baseball.
On November 15, 2007, Bonds was charged with perjury (lying) and obstruction of justice in a grand jury investigation relating to steroids.

Bill Russell
sports
Bill Russell (born February 12, 1934) is a retired American basketball player. Russell played for the Boston Celtics in the National Basketball Association (NBA). He won 11 championships; 11 is the most anyone has ever won in American basketball history.

Shakira
sports
Shakira Isabel Mebarak Ripoll (born February 2, 1977), known simply as Shakira, is a two-time Grammy Award-winning and eight-time Latin Grammy Award-winning Colombian singer, songwriter, instrumentalist, record producer, dancer and occasional actress.
The Colombian music artist is also known for having made a song named "Timor" based on fighting in East Timor between gangs (groups of criminals with guns), security forces (small, personal armies), and the government.

Princess Taiping
politics
Princess Taiping was a princess of Tang dynasty China. She was the daughter of Emperor Gaozong and Empress Wu Zetian. She became an important figure during her mother's rule as Empress in the second Zhou dynasty 690-705 AD.
Princess Taiping supported saving the Tang dynasty and the Li family. After the death of Empress Wu Zetian in 705, Princess Taiping joined with her nephew Li Longji (later Emperor Xuanzong) to get power for the Tang dynasty again. In 710, she and Li Longji stopped Empress Wei's plan to gain power.
Relationship with Li Longji.
Princess Taiping was also known for her beauty. In the Chinese history (mishi/秘史), it has been said that, after losing two marriages, Princess Taiping loved Li Longji. Mishi said that Emperor Xuanzong told of his love for his aunt in his autobiography. Li Longji confessed that he had fallen in love with Princess Taiping at first sight. He thought of her as a goddess-like figure. However, the truth is still unknown.
After Emperor Xuanzong became ruler in 712 AD, Princess Taiping's old age and power was seen as a threat to the young emperor, and she was given a death sentence to kill herself in 713 AD.

Javaris Crittenton
sports
Javaris Chrittenton (December 31, 1987) is an American basketball player. He went to Georgia Tech for college. Crittenton is now a point guard for the Memphis Grizzlies in the NBA.

Ali Khamenei
politics
Grand Ayatollah (Persian: آیت‌الله سید علی حسینی خامنه‌ای "ayatollah Seyyed `Ali Ḥoseyni Khamene'i") (born 17 July 1939), also known as Seyyed Ali Khamene'i, is the current Supreme Leader of Iran. He was the president of Iran from 1981 to 1989.

Bohuslav Martinů
music
Bohuslav Martinů (born Polička, Bohemia, 8 December 1890; died Liestal, Switzerland, 28 August 1959) was a Czech composer. He wrote an enormous amount of music. His music is often inspired by his native country.
His life.
Martinů was born in the tower of a village church and that is where he spent the first seven years of his life, isolated from the outside world. When he was old enough to go to school he had to climb the 193 steps down to the street every day. He started to have violin lessons from the local tailor. He was very shy because he was used to being all by himself with his family in the tower, but he made good progress and in 1905 gave his first violin recital.
Martinů soon started to compose and nothing else interested him very much. He went to the Prague Conservatory to study the violin but he preferred going to the theatre and reading. In 1909 he changed to the organ school but he did no work and got expelled.
He managed to avoid fighting in the World War I by composing. After the war he became a member of the Czech Philharmonic Orchestra, playing second violin.
In 1923 he moved to Paris where he stayed for 17 years. He was very poor. He had some lessons with Albert Roussel and soon became known as a composer. He married in 1931 and his wife worked hard to earn money so that he could spend his time composing. He liked to use Czech folk stories and literature as inspiration for his music.
In 1940 he had to leave Paris to escape from the Nazis. He spent several months living rough, often sleeping on station platforms. At last, in March 1941 he and his wife managed to get to New York.
Life in the United States was hard for him. He spoke no English and people there did not know his music. He had left all his scores behind. However, he worked hard and the famous conductor Sergei Koussevitsky asked him to write a symphony. His music still sounded very Czech. After World War II he very much wanted to go back to his own country, but the communist government made that impossible. He had a bad fall and it took him years to recover properly. He taught at Princeton University, then he retired to Nice in France. He died of cancer in Basle.
His music.
Bohuslav Martinů wrote a tremendous amount of music. He loved sitting down and writing music. Once he had finished a composition he was never very interested in hearing it performed or what happened to it. As a result some of his music is very good but some of it is less interesting. He wrote music of many kinds: operas, ballets, orchestral, chamber and keyboard music. One of his last works was called "Řecké Pašije" ("The Greek Passion") which uses Greek folk melody and church chant. He was never influenced by American music, he preferred the modes, folktunes, bagpipe drones and mountain calls of his native country. His music can often be described as neoclassical in style.

Link (The Legend of Zelda)
music
Link is a fictional character in "The Legend of Zelda" games and is the person you play as in all of the games. Link wears a green shirt and a long, floppy green hat on his head. Although link is the main character in the game, he never speaks. He is also left handed. He has large ears.

Grace Hopper
science
Grace Murray Hopper (December 9 1906 – January 1 1992) was an American computer scientist and United States Navy officer.
She was one of the first people to work with modern digital computers and the first programmers of the Harvard Mark I calculator. She developed the first compiler for a computer programming language.
She had the idea that programs could be written in a language that was close to English rather than in machine code or languages (such as assembly language) close to machine code, which is how it was normally done at that time. COBOL language was based very much on her philosophy.

Marin Alsop
music
Marin Alsop (born Manhattan, New York, October 16, 1956) is an American conductor.
She went to Yale University and then got a Master’s Degree from the Juilliard School in violin playing. She won the Koussevitzky Conducting Prize at the Tanglewood Music Center in 1989, where she studied with famous conductors such as Leonard Bernstein.
Alsop has conducted many of the world’s most famous orchestras. Since 2002 she has been the conductor of the Bournemouth Symphony Orchestra, and in 2007 she will become the conductor of the Baltimore Symphony. This will make her the first woman conductor of an important American orchestra.
Alsop has won many prizes and made lots of recordings. She has conducted and recorded many pieces by American composers, including the complete orchestral works of Samuel Barber.

Double Nickels on the Dime
music
"Double Nickels on the Dime" is a hardcore punk album made by the Minutemen. The album was recorded in 1984 and was given to the public in the same year. The album is very long and has 43 songs. It is thought to be a very good album and one of the best of the genre.

Timbaland
music
Timothy Z. Mosley, also known as Timbaland, (born March 10, 1971) is a Grammy Award-winning American record producer, rapper and songwriter. He is from Norfolk, Virginia.

Reggie Miller
sports
Reggie Miller (August 24, 1965) is a retired American basketball player. Miller was known for being a good jump shooter during his career. He played his entire career for the Indiana Pacers of the National Basketball Association (NBA).

Lily Allen
music
Lily Rose Beatrice Allen (born May 2, 1985) is an English pop singer. She is often compared to Amy Winehouse and Katy Perry. Lily Allen made her first album, called "Alright, Still" in 2006. It came out in the United States in early 2007.

Sean Paul
music
Sean Paul Ryan Francis Henriques (born January 8, 1973) is a popular and well-known Jamaican reggae and dancehall musician. He is also known by nickname, Sean Paul.

Theo Jörgensmann
music
Theo Jörgensmann (b. Bottrop, 29 September 1948 Germany) is a jazz clarinet player and composer.

William Byrd
music
William Byrd (born probably 1539 or 1540; died Stondon Massey, 4 July 1623) was the greatest English composer of his time. He wrote music of all types that were popular then: keyboard music for virginals and for the organ, vocal music, especially choral music, both for the church (“sacred”) as well as non-sacred (“secular”).
Byrd lived in a time of great changes. Henry VIII had broken away from the Roman Catholic church and had founded the Anglican Church. The monarch (king or queen) was the Head of the Church of England. During Byrd’s lifetime the monarchs who reigned had different ideas about what church music should be like. Byrd was always a Catholic. This sometimes made life difficult for him, but he was always faithful to the monarchy, and he had a lot of tact in dealing with people.
Byrd grew up in the Renaissance period. He lived into the 17th century which is the period known in music as the Baroque period. Nevertheless his music always sounds Renaissance in style.
Youth.
We know very little about Byrd’s early life. Most books say that he was born in 1543, but a document that was found recently makes us think he was probably born late in 1539 or in 1540. He may have come from Lincoln which is where his first job was, but he probably had some of his education in London. This is likely because we know he was a pupil of Thomas Tallis who worked in London. Tallis was in charge of the music of the Chapel Royal which was the best choir in England, and it is likely that Byrd sang in the choir when he was a boy. Queen Mary was on the throne at the time. She was Catholic and she liked church music to be quite long and complicated, with Latin words. This gave composers lots to do, and the young Byrd started composing church music at this time.
Lincoln period.
Around 1563 Byrd got the job of Organist and Choir Master of Lincoln Cathedral. This was an important job for such a young man, and he had an extra-large salary, so people must have thought he was a very good musician. By this time Queen Elizabeth I was on the throne. She had different ideas from Mary. She was Protestant, and liked church music to be simpler, although she still liked the Latin service. In Lincoln Byrd was sometimes told off for playing organ music that was too long and complicated. Byrd composed a lot of music for the cathedral. He also married in 1568 and they had at least seven children.
Chapel Royal.
In 1570 he got a job as Gentleman of the Chapel Royal in London. He may have done both jobs for a year or two, and he certainly continued to write music for Lincoln for some years after that. He settled in London and started to make many friends. He was very careful to get to know lots of important people who would be able to help him in his career.
In 1575 Queen Elizabeth gave William Byrd and Thomas Tallis together a patent for music publishing. This meant that they earned some money for every bit of music that was published, printed or sold in England. Music publishing had only just started in England. It was still very expensive to have music printed. Byrd thanked the Queen by publishing some of his Latin motets and dedicating them to her. They were called "Cantiones Sacrae" ("Sacred Songs"). He also wrote a collection of "Psalmes, Sonets and Songs" (1588) and "Songs of Sundrie Natures" (1589). His church music includes settings of the Service and many anthems such as the popular "Sing joyfully".
Later years.
In 1593 he moved with his family to Stondon Massey in Essex. He spent the rest of his life there. Most of his church music from that time on was in Latin. He wrote three settings of the Mass and two books of "Gradualia" which were large collections of music for the whole year.
Byrd also wrote a lot of keyboard music. Some of it was for a collection called "My Ladye Nevells Booke", some of it was for the "Fitzwilliam Virginal Book".
He died on July 4, 1623, and is buried in an unmarked grave in the Stondon churchyard.
His music.
Byrd’s music has a lot of variety, largely because of the different ideas people had various times during the period. There were lots of political and religious arguments between groups of people. In the early 17th century people were often sent to prison for writing Catholic music. Byrd seems to have escaped such punishment, although he was involved in several lawsuits. He was lucky that he was able to continue to live as a free man and compose. Being on good terms with the Queen must have helped him.
Byrd wrote music for the Anglican church and for the Roman Catholic church. His "Cantiones Sacrae" published in 1589 and 1591 are collections of Latin motets. These are the very best of Byrd’s works, and better than anything that was being written in Europe at that time. He probably wrote them for private (illegal) gatherings of Catholics, so this meant that he could write in whatever style he wanted. His music is very contrapuntal, representing the best of the English Renaissance style.
His Latin church music was forgotten after his death. It only became popular in the early 20th century when it was rediscovered.
Byrd also wrote very beautiful music for viols as well as a lot of keyboard music.

Jim Morrison
music
James Douglas (Jim) Morrison (December 8 1943 - July 3 1971) was the lead singer of the rock band The Doors.
Early years.
Morrison's father was officer for the United States Navy. This meant that he moved around very often. Morrison did not have many friends and read many books. When he went to high school in 1962, his teacher was amazed by his culture. In 1964 he went to the University of California, Los Angeles (UCLA).
The Doors of Perception.
One day in Venice Beach, Morrison saw Ray Manzarek. Manzarek had also gone to UCLA. Morrison sang some verses of "Moonlight Drive". Manzarek liked the intensity of the words to the song and asked Morrison to form a rock band with him. Morrison agreed and came up with the name "The Doors". The name was a reference of the Aldous Huxley book "The Doors of Perception" whose name came from a verse of the famous poet William Blake; "If the doors of perception were cleansed everything would appear to man as it is, infinite."). The Doors was formed by Jim Morrison, Ray Manzarek, John Densmore and Robby Krieger.
In the beginning, Morrison would sing without looking the audience. After a while, he learned the play with them instead. He would jump and fall at stage with screams and jokes, inspired by the Gustave Le Bon book:" Psychologie Des Foules".
The Lizard King.
Morrison became very famous all over the world as a poet, singer and sex symbol. Morrison had a problem with alcohol. He drank a lot and later albums were not as good as the first one. He wrote more poems and thought about stopping his career with The Doors. He took some drugs (mainly LSD) and become an addict. In 1969, in Miami, it was said that he was drunk and "exposed" himself.
My only friend, the end.
The last album, "L.A. Woman" was released in 1971. It is thought to be one of the bands best albums. That year Morrison decided to take a break and go to Paris. The July 3rd, he was found dead in his bathroom. The cause of his death is still not clear. Some believe that his heart failed or it was an overdose. Other people think it could have been a murder. His grave is at the Père-Lachaise, at the same place as Oscar Wilde, Molière or many other great poets and authors.
Posterity.
Jim Morrison is one one of the most famous singer of all time, his death at the age of 27 like Jimi Hendrix and Janis Joplin makes him a legend.

Paris Hilton
music
Paris Whitney Hilton (born February 17, 1981) is an American celebrity. She is also a socialite. She will receive part of the Hilton Hotels fortune. She might also inherit some of the real estate fortune of her father, Richard Hilton.
Hilton has been in the media for various reasons. She has become well known for the bad behaviour she sometimes shows in public. Another reason for her fame is that a home-made sex video (with her former boyfriend, Rick Solomon) leaked onto the Internet in 2003. Hilton and her friend Nicole Richie were the stars of the reality show The Simple Life for 5 seasons.
Legal problems.
On June 5, 2007, Paris Hilton was be put in prison for 45 days after being found guilty of driving a car while under the effects of alcohol (Drunk driving). The judge said that Hilton was to get no special treatment. On June 7, Paris Hilton was released from prison by the Los Angeles Sheriff's Department. The Sheriff's Department said that she had an "Undisclosed medical condition". They put an electronic surveillance strap on her foot which would make certain she stayed in her home for the next 40 days. Sources inside the prison said that Hilton was cracking under the pressure of being in jail and that Hilton had been harassed and threatened by the other inmates. Hilton was released after 22 days. Her time was shortened because of good behavior.

Split album
music
A split album is a music album which includes tracks by two or three separate artists.

János Bolyai
science
János Bolyai (December 15, 1802 – January 27, 1860) was a Hungarian mathematician, known for his work in non-Euclidean geometry.

Dookie
music
Dookie is the 3rd album by the band Green Day. It was released in 1994.

Ronnie James Dio
music
Ronnie James Dio (July 10, 1942 -) is an American heavy metal singer. He has performed with Black Sabbath, Rainbow, and his own band Dio. Dio was born in Portsmouth, New Hampshire.

Nicolas Sarkozy
politics
Nicolas Sarkozy, born on 28 January, 1955 in Paris, France,
has been President of France since 16 May 2007, succeeding Jacques Chirac.
He was the leader of the UMP, and was elected President of the French Republic on 6 May, 2007. He defeated Ségolène Royal, of the Socialist Party.
Sarkozy is known for his conservative law and order politics and his admiration for a new economic model for France. He wants a more liberalised economy for France because he sees the United States and the United Kingdom as positive examples. Until 26 March 2007, he served as the Minister of the Interior of France. His nickname Sarko is used by both supporters and opponents.

Johann Pachelbel
music
Johann Pachelbel (born Nuremberg (German:Nürnberg), baptized 1 September 1653; died Nürnberg, buried 9 March 1706) was a German composer and organist. He is very famous for his organ music. He also wrote other keyboard music and music for the Protestant church. His "Canon in D" has become a very popular piece of music and is very often played today at church weddings and other events.
Pachelbel was brought up in Nürnberg and had his first music lessons there. In 1669 he went to study at the university of Altdorf, but after a year he had to leave because his father could not afford to keep him. About a year later he went to study at the Gymnasium Poeticum in Regensburg. The directors of that school must have realized that he was an extremely talented musician, because they made an extra scholarship for him and allowed him to have special music lessons outside the school.
In 1673 he went to Vienna where he was deputy organist at St Stephen’s Church. He heard a lot more music there, especially the music of the catholic composers of South Germany and Italy. After a short while at Eisenach he got the job of organist at the Predigerkirche in Erfurt.
In 1681 he married, but his wife and their baby boy died in the plague. In 1684 he married again and the couple had five sons and two daughters. Pachelbel taught Johann Christoph Bach who later taught Johann Sebastian Bach.
Pachelbel became a very famous organist. He stayed in Erfurt until 1690. After another five years he became organist at St Sebald, Nürnberg where he stayed for the rest of his life.
His music.
Pachelbel is best known for his organ music. He wrote many organ pieces based on chorales while he was in Erfurt. In Nürnberg he wrote many piece called "Magnificat" fugues. These were preludes which were played before the singers sang the Magnificat. His organ music also includes toccatas, ricercares, fantasias and ciacconas. He wrote many suites for harpsichord and chamber music and vocal music.

Ségolène Royal
politics
Marie-Ségolène Royal (born 22 September 1953 in Dakar, Senegal), known as is a French politician. She is the president of the Poitou-Charentes region, a member of the National Assembly and a prominent member of the Socialist Party. On 16 November 2006, Socialist Party members elected her as their candidate for the 2007 French presidential election.
In the first round of voting in that election, on April 22, 2007, Royal received 25.87 percent of votes to qualify for the second round to face Nicolas Sarkozy who received 31.18 percent. On May 6, 2007 Sarkozy was elected to be the next President. Sarkozy won the election on May 6 with 53.06 percent of the votes, compared to Royal's 46.94 percent.
She is known for her admiration for some "Third Way" policies, for her controversial insistence on law and order issues and for her support of devolution and participatory democracy.
Bibliography.
Royal is the author unless otherwise noted.

Union for a Popular Movement
politics
The Union for a Popular Movement (French: "Union pour un Mouvement Populaire", UMP), is the main French centre-right political party.
The party has an absolute majority in the National Assembly but relies on its reluctant junior partner, the UDF, in the Senate. The UMP is a member of the European People's Party (EPP), of the Christian Democrat International (CDI) and of the International Democrat Union (IDU).
History.
Since the 1980s, the political groups of the parliamentary right joined forces around the values of economic liberalism and the building of Europe. Their rivalries had contributed to their 1981 and 1988 electoral defeats. Therefore some politicians were in favour of the formation of a confederation, a party.
UMP was founded from the merger of the Gaullist-conservative Rally for the Republic ("Rassemblement pour la République", RPR), the conservative-liberal Liberal Democracy ("Démocratie Libérale", DL), and a part of the centrist Union for French Democracy ("Union pour la Démocratie Française", UDF). Many Christian Democrats (such as Philippe Douste-Blazy and Jacques Barrot), the social-liberal Radical Party and the centrist Popular Party for French Democracy (both associate parties to UDF until 2002) joined the party.
The party was thus born out of the meeting of four major French political traditions: Gaullism, Liberalism (Republicanism), Christian Democracy (Popularism) and Radicalism.
The UMP generally supported the policies of President Jacques Chirac. However, in 2004, the party showed increasing signs of independence. The unpopularity with the electorate of Jacques Chirac and Jean-Pierre Raffarin's government led most members of the UMP to support Nicolas Sarkozy, a rival of Chirac. The party also publicly disapproved of Turkey's proposed membership in the European Union, which Chirac was in favour of.
The first president of the UMP, Alain Juppé, a close associate of Jacques Chirac, resigned on 15 July 2004. On 29 November 2004, Nicolas Sarkozy announced that he would officially take over the presidency of the UMP.
In the 2004 French regional elections the UMP suffered a heavy blow, securing only 2 out of 22 regions in Metropolitan France and half of the departments. This led to the fall of the Jean-Pierre Raffarin government (2001-04), and to the formation of a new cabinet, presided by another UMP politician, Dominique de Villepin.
On April 22, 2007 Nicolas Sarkozy won most of the votes in the first round of the 2007 presidential election. In the second round, he faced Socialist Candidate Ségolène Royal. On May 6, 2007 he won the Presidential election, garnering 53.35% of the vote.

Orlando Gibbons
music
Orlando Gibbons (born: Oxford, baptised 25 December 1583; died Canterbury, 5 June 1625) was an English composer and organist. He was one of the most important composers of his day. He is famous for his church music and organ music. He lived in the late Tudor and early Jacobean periods.
Gibbons was born in Oxford where his father was a city wait. The family moved to Cambridge and his brother Edward, who was 15 years older than Orlando, became Master of the Choristers at King’s College. Between 1596 and 1598 Orlando sang in the choir of King's College, Cambridge where his brother was master. He entered the university in 1598 and got the degree of Bachelor of Music in 1606. He married and had seven children.
James I made him a Gentleman of the Chapel Royal, where he was organist from at least 1615 until his death. In 1625 he became senior organist at the Chapel Royal, with Thomas Tomkins as junior organist. He was also keyboard player (mainly harpsichord) in the privy chamber of the court of Prince Charles (later King Charles I), and organist at Westminster Abbey. He died an early death in Canterbury of apoplexy, and a monument to him was built in Canterbury Cathedral.
Gibbons wrote a lot of keyboard works, around thirty fantasias for viols, some madrigals (the best-known being "The Silver Swan"), and many popular anthems. He was very good at writing counterpoint as well as lovely melodies. His famous verse anthem "This is the record of John" is often sung by choirs at Advent. It has a lovely solo for a countertenor who takes it in turns with the full chorus. Gibbons wrote two settings of the Evensong service: a long one with several verses, and the "Short" service. His full anthems include "O Lord in thy wrath", and the Palm Sunday setting of "O clap your hands together" for 8 voices.

Le Monde
media
"Le Monde" (English:"The World") is a French daily evening newspaper. In 2004, it had a circulation of 371,803 copies. It is amongst the newspapers most read in France. Its political opinion is slightly left-wing. In many countries outside France, this is the only French newspaper available.
The newspaper should not be confused with the monthly publication "Le Monde diplomatique'. "Le Monde" has 51% ownership of the monthly. Despite this, the monthly has a different editorial staff.
"Le Monde" was founded by Hubert Beuve-Méry. This was at the request of General Charles de Gaulle after the German army was driven from Paris during World War II. The newspaper took over the format of "Le Temps", because the reputation of the latter had suffered during the Occupation. Beuve-Méry reportedly asked for total editorial independence as the condition for his taking on the project. Its first edition appeared on December 19, 1944. "Le Monde" has been available on the Internet since December 19, 1995. It is the principal publication of Groupe Le Monde.

Ciwan Haco
music
Ciwan Haco (born 1957) is a Kurdish singer. He was born near Qamishlo in Syria. After finishing high school, he left for Germany in order to continue his studies. He studied music at the University of Bochum for three years. After university, he started his career as a singer. He combined Kurdish folk music with western style pop music, rock, blues, and jazz. He has released 14 albums. He become well-known on the kurdish music scene after he sang for more than 200.000 people in Batman, south Turkey, in 2003. Haco lives in Sweden with his wife. He has two children, Lorin, 7, and Rosa, 5.

Tata Young
music
Tata Young (born Amita Marie Young on December 14, 1980 in Thailand) is a Thai-American singer, model and actress. She became a singer when she was 15. Her first album was called "Amita Tata Young" and it was very successful. It sold more than a million copies in less than 5 months. In 2004, she made an English album called "I Believe". It sold many copies and made her famous in other countries as well.
In 2006 she made her second English album called "Temperature Rising", which made her even more popular, especially in Asia. In 2008 Tata Young released a Thai language album called "One Love".
Her next album is expected to be released in April 2009.

Aden Abdullah Osman Daar
politics
Aden Abdulle Osman Daar ("Aaden Cabdulle Cusmaan Daar") (1908-2007), was a Somali politician.
In February 1944, he joined the Somali Youth Club (later called the Somali Youth League). The group was a nationalist party that wanted independence for Somalia. Daar became a member of the party's steering board. In 1946, he was appointed as the secretary of one section of the party. He was chairman of the Somali Youth League from 1954 to 1956, and again from 1958 to 1959. In 1956, he was elected chairman of the Legislative Assembly.
When Somalia gained its independence on July 1, 1960, Daar was elected as the first president of Somalia. He was beaten in the 1967 presidential election against Abdirashid Ali Shermarke. He finished his term as president on June 10, 1967.

Nasjonal Samling
politics
Nasjonal Samling (Norwegian for "National Gathering" or "National Unity") was a fascist party in Norway, active in the period 1933-1945. The party was founded by Vidkun Quisling and a group of sympathisers. The party's paramilitary wing was called "Hirden" (the Hird).

Michaëlle Jean
media
Her Excellency the Rt. Hon. Michaëlle Jean (born September 6, 1957, in Port-au-Prince, Haiti) is a Haitian-born Canadian politician and journalist. She has been the Governor-General of Canada since 2005, replacing Adrienne Clarkson.

Ali Meshkini
politics
Ayatollah Ali Meshkini (born in 1922) has been the chairman of the Assembly of Experts of the Islamic Republic of Iran since 1984.

Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono
politics
General Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono (born September 9, 1949 in Pacitan, East Java, Indonesia), is an Indonesian retired military general and politician. He is the sixth President of Indonesia. Yudhoyono is the first president to be elected directly by voters. Yudhoyono won the presidency in September 2004. He defeated President Megawati Sukarnoputri. Yudhoyono became president on 20 October 2004.

Elliott Carter
music
Elliott Carter (born December 11, 1908) is an American composer. He is one of the most important composers of classical music of his time. He experimented with new ideas of composition. Although he is now one hundred years old, he is still composing today. He recently composed a piece called "Interventions for Piano and Orchestra" which was given its first performance in the Symphony Hall, Boston where it was played by the Boston Symphony Orchestra conducted by James Levine with the pianist Daniel Baremboim as soloist. The same players played it again a week later on 11 December 2008 in the Carnegie Hall, New York to celebrate Carter's 100th birthday.
Life.
Elliott Carter was born in New York. The composer Charles Ives noticed his talent and gave him encouragement, taking him to concerts. Carter studied English and music at Harvard University. He then went to Paris to study with Nadia Boulanger, returning to the USA in 1935 where he directed the Ballet Caravan.
In 1939 he married. The couple had one son.
He wrote a ballet called "Pocahontas". In 1940 the suite from this ballet got him the Juilliard Publication Award. From then on his got many more important awards and prizes for his music.
Carter has taught music and other related subjects in a number of well-known places including the Peabody Conservatory, Columbia University, Queen’s College, New York, Yale University and the Julliard School. He has received honorary doctorates from many universities and honours from many countries.
He has not written a large number of compositions, but the ones he has written are important works.
Music.
When Carter went to study in Paris in the early 1930s Stravinsky was the most famous composer who worked there. Carter was influenced to some extent by Stravinsky’s music as well as by that of his friend Charles Ives, but he worked hard to find a style of his own. Some of his music during the Second World War is quite tonal, but his later music uses more atonality (music not in any key) and has complicated rhythms. His best known works include the "Variations for Orchestra" (1954-5); the "Double Concerto" for harpsichord, piano and two chamber orchestras (1959-61); the "Piano Concerto" (1967), written as an 85th birthday present for Igor Stravinsky; the "Concerto for Orchestra" (1969) and "A Symphony of Three Orchestras" (1976).

Katharine McPhee
music
Katharine Hope McPhee (born March 25, 1984) is an American Pop/R&B singer. She was the runner-up to Taylor Hicks on the fifth season of the television show American Idol in 2006. Her first album, named "Katharine McPhee", was released January 30, 2007.

World Heavyweight Championship (WWE)
sports
The World Heavyweight Championship is the top wrestling honor for World Wrestling Entertainment's Raw brand. It was created on RAW to match SmackDown! WWE Championship in August 2002. Some of the past champions include Triple H, The Undertaker, Booker T, Batista, and Kurt Angle.
The World Heavyweight Championship was brought to Raw by then-General Manager Eric Bischoff after WWE Champion Brock Lesnar became exclusive to SmackDown. Bischoff awarded the championship to Triple H, but he had to defend it against his then-best friend, Ric Flair. Triple H was successful and has held the championship on five different occasions. Other holders of this prestigious championship include Shawn Michaels, Undertaker, Rey Mysterio and more.
Current Champion.
The title is currently held by John Cena who is in his first reign. He beat Chris Jericho for the title at Survivor Series 2008 on November 23, 2008 in Boston, Massachusetts.
See also.
List of World Heavyweight Champions (WWE)

Gene Simmons
music
Gene Simmons (born August 25, 1949 in Haifa, Israel) is an Israely-American hard rock bass guitarist and singer for the hard rock band Kiss.

Fox News Channel
media
Fox News Channel is an American cable television news network, owned by Fox Entertainment Group (a unit of Rupert Murdoch's News Corporation). The station is sometimes accused of being right-wing, but Fox do not agree with this.

Kevin Federline
music
Kevin Earl Federline (born March 21 1978) is an American entertainer, who dances, raps and models as his job. He is famous for being the former husband of pop singer Britney Spears. Federline has 4 kids, 2 with actress Shar Jackson and 2 with Spears.

John Travolta
music
John Travolta (February 18, 1954) is an American actor and dancer. He is notable for putting both his talents into one movie called "Grease" alongside Olivia Newton-John. He is also in an upcoming movie called "Hairspary".

Carrie Underwood
music
Carrie Marie Underwood (born March 10, 1983) is a US pop country singer. She won the fourth season of "American Idol". Her first album, "Some Hearts", has sold 6 million copies. Underwood has won one American Music Award, eight Billboard Music Awards, and two Grammy Awards (including Best New Artist).
She has had five songs reach number one on charts in the United States and Canada, including "Inside Your Heaven", "Jesus, Take the Wheel", and "Before He Cheats". In 2007, Underwood sang during one of the liveshows of American Idol, season 6.

Jordin Sparks
music
Jordin Brianna Sparks (born December 22, 1989 in Staten Island, New York) is an American singer. On May 23, 2007, she was declared the winner of the 6th season of the reality television show "American Idol". She is the youngest winner of the talent show "American Idol". She has released one studio album. Her debut single was called "Tattoo".

Taylor Hicks
sports
Taylor Reuben Hicks (born October 7, 1976) is an American singer, songwriter and musician. In 2006, he won the fifth season of "American Idol". His runner-up was Katharine McPhee. After he won, he was signed to Arista Records. His album called "Taylor Hicks" was released on December 12, 2006.

Ishy Bilady
music
"Ishy Bilady" is the national anthem (a song that represents the country) of the seven United Arab Emirates. The tune was written in the year 1971 without words to sing. Then, in the year 1996 Aref Al Sheikh Abdullah Al Hassan came up with words for the song.
Lyrics.
These are the words in Arabic, and English.
Arabic.
عشت لشعب دينه الإسلام هديه القرآن
دام الأمان وعاش العلم يا إماراتنا
Transliteration.
Dinu hul islamu Hadhyu Ul Qura`anu
daamal amaanu wa aashal alam ya imaaratinah
English.
Live, my land; may the union of our emirates live.
May you live for a people
Whose religion is Islam, and whose guide is the Qur'an.
May I strengthen you in the name of God, O homeland.
My land, my land, my land, my land.
May God protect you from the evils of time.
We have vowed to build, to work.
To work, to be loyal, to work, to be loyal.
However long we may live, to be loyal, to be loyal.
May safety endure, and the flag live, O Emirates,
We would all make sacrifices for you, and with our blood saturate you.
We would give up our souls for you, O homeland.

Carl Wilhelm Scheele
science
Carl Wilhelm Scheele (December 9, 1742 - May 21, 1786) a German-Swedish pharmaceutical chemist, born in Stralsund, Western Pomerania, Germany (at the time under Swedish rule), was the discoverer of many chemical substances, most notably discovering oxygen before Joseph Priestley and chlorine before Humphry Davy.

Johann Georg Albrechtsberger
music
Johann Georg Albrechtsberger (born 3 February 1736 in Klosterneuburg near Vienna; died 7 March 1809 in Vienna) was an Austrian composer, organist, music theorist and music teacher. He is most known today because he was Beethoven’s teacher for a time.
Life.
From the age of seven, Albrechtsberger was a choirboy. He had lessons in organ and music theory. As an adult, he had several jobs in churches in small towns. He became Kapellmeister at St Stephen’s Church, Vienna in 1793. This was the best job for a church musician in the empire.
Writing music.
Albrechtsberger wrote hundreds of compositions. He wrote most of them before he got the job in Vienna. He wrote in a classical style. Albrechsberger enjoyed doing things with music which were not normally done. He would ask string players to tune their strings in different ways (called “scordatura”). He would also write slow movements with muted strings. As well as classical sonatas he wrote lots of fugues. Several people, including Mozart, thought of him as the greatest organist in the world.
Teaching.
Albrechtsberger was a very important music teacher. Joseph Haydn thought he was the best teacher in Vienna. He was very interested in contrapuntal music of the Baroque period. He copied many fugues by Bach and other composers.
When Beethoven was a young man, he had some composition lessons from Joseph Haydn. When Haydn was going to travel to England for several months, he asked Albrechtsberger to teach Beethoven while he was gone. These lessons took place from 1793 to 1795. A few years later, Albrechtsberger said about Beethoven that “he learned absolutely nothing and will never accomplish anything decent”. Beethoven said that Albrechtsberger was a “musical pedant”.. However, Beethoven still studied Albrechtsberger’s books on music theory. The string quartets which Beethoven wrote near the end of his life show the influence of Albrechtsberger.

Hugo Chávez
politics
Hugo Rafael Chávez Frías (IPA:) (born July 28, 1954) is the current president of Venezuela. He is the leader of the "Bolivarian Revolution" and promotes his vision of democratic socialism, Latin American integration, and anti-imperialism. Chávez is also an ardent critic of neoliberal globalization and U.S. foreign policy.
Chávez is career military officer. He founded the left-wing Fifth Republic Movement after a failed coup d'état against former President Carlos Andrés Pérez. Chávez was
elected to serve as president in 1998. This was mainly because he promised to help the poor majority of Venezuelan people. He was re-elected in 2000, and 2006. He started a movement called Bolivarian Missions. Its goal is to fight disease, illiteracy, malnutrition, and other social problems. Abroad, Chávez is known for supporting alternative models of economic development. He has also spoken in favor of a collaboration of poor nations, especially those in Latin America.
Chávez's reforms have caused controversy, both inside Venezuela, and outside the country. Some people criticized the reforms, others supported them. Those people who support the reforms say that he has given more power to the poor, and that he has stimulated economic growth. Those who argue against the reforms say that he is an autocraŧ who has mismanaged the economy.
Some governments, especially the government of the United States see Chávez as a threat to global oil prices, as well as to regional stability. Others sympathize with his ideology or welcome his bilateral trade and reciprocal aid agreements.
In 2005 and 2006 he was named one of "Time" magazine's 100 most influential people.

Joan Jett
music
Joan Jett (born September 1958) is an American singer and is best known for her number one single "I Love Rock n Roll". Jett has a punkish, tomboy appearance and is a Democrat.

J. R. Richard
sports
James Rodney "J. R." Richard (born March 7, 1950) is a former Major League Baseball starting pitcher for the Houston Astros. Richard was excellent in basketball and baseball in high school. He was drafted by the Houston Astros in the first round of the 1969 amateur draft. He made his baseball debut on September 5, 1971, and pitched a complete game and had fifteen strikeouts. After that, he was one of the top pitchers in the National League, and in all of baseball. He led the league in many pitching categories. They include strikeouts, earned run average (ERA) and hits allowed per nine innings.
On July 30, 1980, Richard suffered a stroke and collapsed while playing catch before a game. He was sent to Methodist Hospital in Houston, Texas and had emergency surgery. The surgery removed a dangerous blood clot in his neck. The next year, Richard tried to make a comeback into baseball, but the stroke had slowed down his reaction time and vision. He then spent the next few seasons in minor league baseball. He was later released by the Astros on April 27, 1984. After baseball, Richard was involved in business. He had a few bad business deals and went through two divorces. This left him homeless in 1994. He then found help in a local church, and then became a minister and baseball instructor for young people in Houston.

Conrad Lant
music
Conrad "Cronos" Lant is the vocalist and bass player in black metal band Venom. He was born in 1963 in London, England.
History.
Cronos started to sing in 1978 in the band "Guillotine". Then he knew Jeffrey "Mantas" Dunn and they founded Venom.
In 1989 Cronos left the band to start a solo work. Venom couldn't go on without him and they stopped singing in 1993. Then Cronos returned in 1995 and rejoined the band.

Socialist Party (France)
politics
The Socialist Party ("Parti Socialiste", PS) is one of the largest political parties in France. It replaced the French Section of the Workers' International (SFIO) in 1969.
It is one of the social democratic parties.
It first won power under the Fifth Republic with François Mitterrand's victory at the 1981 presidential election.
The party's candidate for the 2007 presidential election, Ségolène Royal, was defeated by Nicolas Sarkozy by about 53% to 47%.
French socialism until 1969.
After the failure of the Paris commune (1871), French socialism was figuratively beheaded. Its leaders were killed or exiled. France's first socialist party, the Federation of the Socialist Workers of France ("Fédération des travailleurs socialistes de France" or FTSF), was founded in 1879.
In 1899, the participation of Millerand in Pierre Waldeck-Rousseau's cabinet caused a debate about socialist participation in a "bourgeois government". Three years later, Jaurès, Allemane and the possibilists founded the French Socialist Party while Guesde and Vaillant formed the Socialist Party of France. Then, in 1905, during the Globe Congress, the two groups merged in the French Section of the Workers International ("Section française de l'Internationale ouvrière" or SFIO). Jaurès became the party leader.
The French socialists were strongly pacifist, but following the assassination of Jaurès in 1914 they were unable to resist the wave of militarism which followed the outbreak of World War I.
The Socialists suffered a severe split over participation in the wartime government of national unity. In 1919 the anti-war socialists were heavily defeated in elections. In 1920, during the Tours Congress, the majority and left wing of the party broke away and formed the French Section of the Communist International ("Section française de l'Internationale Communiste" or SFIC). This party joined the Third International, that was founded by Lenin. The right wing, led by Léon Blum, kept the "old house" and remained in the SFIO.
In 1934, the Communists changed their line, and the three parties came together in the Popular Front, which won the 1936 elections and brought Blum to power as France's first Socialist Prime Minister.
After the liberation of France in 1944, the SFIO had a coalition with a powerful Communist Party (which became the main left-wing party) and the Christian Democratic MRP. This alliance did not survive the Cold War. Blum proposed the construction of a Third Force with the center-left and the center-right, against the Gaullists and the Communists. However, his candidate to lead of the SFIO, Daniel Mayer, was defeated by Guy Mollet.
Mollet was supported by the left wing of the party. Paradoxically, he spoke a Marxist language without questioning the alliance with the center and the center-right. He was Prime Minister at the head of a minority government in 1956. The SFIO returned to opposition in 1959.
The SFIO did not nominate a candidate for the 1965 election. Consequently, it supported the candidacy of François Mitterrand, a former minister of the Fourth Republic who had been a conservative, then an independent of the left. He was resolutely anti-Gaullist. He obtained an honourable result and faced De Gaulle in an unexpected second ballot. He thus appeared as the leader of the non-Communist left.
In order to exist between the Communist Party, leading the left, and the Gaullist Party, leading the country, the SFIO, Radicals, and left wing republican groups created the Federation of the Democratic and Socialist Left under Mitterrand's leadership.
The foundation of the PS and the "Union of Left" (1969-1981).
In 1969 the SFIO was replaced by the Socialist Party ("Parti socialiste" or PS). It was joined by pro-Pierre Mendès-France clubs (Union of Clubs for the Renewal of the Left led by Alain Savary) and left-wing republican groups (Union of Socialist Groups ad Clubs of Jean Poperen). During the Issy-les-Moulineaux Congress, Alain Savary was elected First Secretary with the support of his predecessor Guy Mollet. He proposed an "ideological dialogue" with the Communists.
Two years later, pro-François Mitterrand clubs (Convention of the Republican institutions), joined the party. Mitterrand defeated the Savary-Mollet duo by proposing an electoral programme with the Communists.
Mitterrand's presidency and the practice of power (1981-1995).
In 1981 Mitterrand defeated the conservative, Valéry Giscard d'Estaing, to become the first socialist elected President of France by universal suffrage.
The PS lost the majority in the French National Assembly in 1986, forcing Mitterrand to "cohabit" with the conservative government of Jacques Chirac. Nevertheless, Mitterrand was re-elected President in 1988 with a moderate programme entitled "united France". He proposed neither nationalisations nor privatisations. He chose as Prime Minister the most popular and moderate of the Socialist politicians, Michel Rocard. His cabinet included 4 center-right ministers but it was supported by only a plurality in the National Assembly elected in June 1988.
During his second term, Mitterrand focused on foreign policy and European construction.
Jospin and the "Plural Left" (1995-2002).
In opposition, the PS reconstructed a coalition with the other left-wing forces: the PCF, the Greens, the Left Radical Party and the MDC. This "Plural Left" ("Gauche plurielle") gained the 1997 legislative election and Jospin became Prime Minister of the third "cohabitation".
His policy was broadly progressive but had little to do with socialism as traditionally understood. The Aubry laws reduced the working time to 35 hours a week. A universal medical cover was instituted. However, the policy of privatization was pursued.
On April 21, 2002 Jospin was eliminated at the first round of the presidential election.
After the 2002 shock.
In the 2004 regional elections, the Socialists had a major comeback. In coalition with the former "Plural Left", they gained power in 20 of the 22 metropolitan regions (all except Alsace and Corsica) and in the four overseas regions. In fact, it benefited from a "sanction-vote" against the right.
On December 1, 2004, 59% of the members of the Socialist Party decided to approve the proposed European Constitution. However, several well-known members of the Party, including Laurent Fabius, and left-wingers Henri Emmanuelli and Jean-Luc Mélenchon, asked the voters to vote "no" in the 29 May 2005 French referendum on the European Constitution, at which the proposed Constitution was rejected.
2007 presidential elections.
For the 2007 presidential election, many potential candidates appeared: François Hollande, Laurent Fabius (who has joined the left-wing of the party), Dominique Strauss-Kahn (who claimed he represented "social-democracy"), Jack Lang, Martine Aubry and Ségolène Royal, who was favourite according to the polls.
On November 16, 2006, the members of the Socialist Party chose Ségolène Royal to be their candidate with a majority of 60%. Her challengers, Strauss-Kahn and Fabius, obtained 21% and 19% respectively.
After obtaining 25% of the vote in the first round of France's presidential elections Ségolène Royal qualified for the second round of voting but lost to Nicolas Sarkozy on May 6, 2007.

Olivier Messiaen
music
Olivier Messiaen (born Avignon, 10 December 1908; died Clichy, near Paris, 27 April, 1992) was a French composer and organist. He is the most famous French composer of the mid-20th century and one of the most important and original composers of his time. He was a brilliant organist and played the organ at the church of La Trinité in Paris for over 60 years. He wrote music for orchestra, piano and organ, most of which is very difficult to play. He was also a great music teacher who taught several young students who became well-known composers e.g. Pierre Boulez, Yvonne Loriod (who became his second wife), Karlheinz Stockhausen, George Benjamin and Iannis Xenakis.
Messiaen started to compose when he was seven years old. When he was given the score of Debussy’s opera "Pelléas et Mélisande" he could imagine the music in his head and he knew he wanted to be a composer. He went to the Paris Conservatoire when he was 11. His teachers included some famous composers such as Paul Dukas, Maurice Emmanuel, Charles-Marie Widor and Marcel Dupré. He was appointed organist at the church of La Trinité in Paris in 1930, a post he held until his death.
When World War II broke out Messiaen was made a prisoner of war in 1940. While he was held in a Silesian camp he composed a work which was to become a very famous piece of chamber music: the "Quatuor pour la fin du temps" ("Quartet for the end of time") for piano, violin, cello, and clarinet. He composed for these instruments because they were the instruments available. The piece was first performed by Messiaen and fellow prisoners to an audience of 5000 inmates and prison guards.
When he was free again in 1941 Messiaen became professor of harmony at the Paris Conservatoire. He composed 20 pieces for piano which are called "Vingt regards sur l’enfant Jésus" ("Twenty visions of the child Jesus"). He wrote a book about the way he composed, called "Technique de mon langage musical" ("The Technique of my musical language").
Messiaen soon became famous for his teaching and was invited to teach in other countries such as Germany, Hungary and the United States. He became interested in the rhythms of Greek and Hindu music.
His first wife died in 1959 and he remarried in 1961. He also became very interested in birdsong and spent a lot of time with his wife in the country with a tape recorder recording birdsong. He imitated the birdsong in his music, especially in piano pieces called "Oiseaux exotiques" ("Exotic birds") and the "Catalogue d’oiseaux" ("Catalogue of birds").
Messiaen wrote a lot of organ music which he performed himself. One very popular work is called "Transports de joie" ("Transports of joy"). A much longer work, consisting of nine movements, is the "La Nativité du Seigneur" ("The Birth of our Lord"). The last movement of this piece is a toccata called "Dieu parmi nous" ("God among us"). It has become a favourite piece for organists to play at recitals or after Christmas carol services.
Messiaen wrote a long piece for orchestra called the " Turangalîla " Symphony. It was first performed in Boston in 1949 with Bernstein conducting. The French government commissioned a piece called "Et exspecto resurrectionem mortuorum" ("And we expect the rising of the dead") which was dedicated to people who had died in the two world wars. It was performed in the Sainte-Chapelle in Paris and then in Chartres Cathedral in 1965 in the presence of General Charles de Gaulle. In 1966 Messiaen became professor of composition at the Paris Conservatoire.
His visit to the Grand Canyon inspired him to write a ten-movement orchestral piece called "Des Canyons aux étoiles" ("From the canyons to the stars"), which was first performed in 1974 in New York.
Messiaen had been asked in 1971 to write an opera for the Paris Opéra. At first he did not want to start such a large work, but in 1975 he was persuaded to accept the commission and began work on his "Saint-François d'Assise". It took him several years to compose. It was performed in 1983. Messiaen said that he preferred to call it a “spectacle” instead of an “opera”.
Messiaen retired from teaching at the Conservatoire in 1978. In 1987 he was given the highest rank: the Grand-Croix" of the "Légion d'honneur".
Messiaen was in a lot of pain near the end of his life. He needed operations on his back. He still managed to finish a piece called "Eclairs sur l'au delà", which was first performed by the New York Philharmonic Orchestra six months after the composer's death. Messiaen had also been composing a concerto for four musicians he felt particularly grateful to: his wife Loriod, the cellist Mstislav Rostropovich, the oboist Heinz Holliger and the flautist Catherine Cantin. This was nearly finished when Messiaen died, and Yvonne Loriod orchestrated the last movement with advice from George Benjamin.
The style of his music.
Messiaen said of himself that he was a “composer and rhythmician”. He meant by this that rhythm was very important in his music. He taught himself all about Greek metres although he did not speak the Greek language. He liked rhythms which use odd numbers. Very often a bar of his music may have one extra semiquaver so that there might be 17 semiquavers in a bar. He studied Hindu rhythms and found ways of changing the rhythms during the music. He was very influenced by the rhythms in Stravinsky’s famous piece "The Rite of Spring".
Messiaen’s harmonies are very individual. He was fascinated by scales which can only be transposed in two or three different ways. He called these scales “modes of limited transposition”.
Messiaen’s music is full of different sounds. He wrote extremely well for large orchestras and for the organ, using different instruments or organ sounds in very original ways, e.g. in "Chronochromie" (1960) for large orchestra and "Méditations sur le mystère de la Sainte Trinité".(1969), a work which uses styles from his earlier period together with birdsong. Messiaen had synesthesia which meant that music often made him think of particular colours. In his orchestra Messiaen often used an instrument called the ondes Martenot which was a kind of electronic keyboard instrument. His sister-in-law Jeanne Loriod was a famous player of the ondes Martenot. Messiaen was also influenced by Indonesian gamelan music. For a short time he experimented with total serialism.
In some of his later works such as the "La Transfiguration de notre Seigneur Jésus-Christ", for choir of 100 voices, seven instrumental soloists and large orchestra, composed in the late 1960s, he used a simpler musical language which has helped it to become very popular.
Messiaen was a devout Roman Catholic all his life. His religion was a very important influence on his life and music.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music & Musicians; edited by Stanley Sadie ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Owen Hargreaves
sports
Owen Lee Hargreaves is a Canadian-born English football player. He was born on the 20 January, 1981 in Calgary, Alberta, Canada. He plays his club football for Machester United, but was previously at Bayern Munich.

Joseph Priestley
science
Joseph Priestley (March 13, 1733 – February 8, 1804) was an English chemist, philosopher, clergyman, and teacher. He is known for his discovery of oxygen with Antoine Lavoisier.

César Franck
music
César Franck (born Liège, 10 December, 1822; died Paris, November 8, 1890), was a French composer, organist and music teacher of Belgian and German origin who lived in France. He was one of the great musicians of his time. He was organist at the church of Sainte Clotilde in Paris for more than 30 years and he taught many talented young musicians. Most of the music for which he is famous was composed when he was already quite old.
Life.
Cesar Franck was born in Liege, a town which is now in Belgium. His father came from near the German-Belgian border and his mother was German. His father wanted him to be a concert pianist. He was sent to study at the conservatoire in Liege before going to the Paris Conservatoire in 1837. In 1842 his father made him come back to Liège so that he could practise for his career as a virtuoso pianist. He went back to Paris in 1844 and stayed there for the rest of his life. He told his father he did not want to be a concert pianist. This made his father very angry.
During his first years in Paris, Franck made his living by teaching and playing the organ. In 1848 he married. His parents came to the wedding although they were still angry with him for not wanting to be a pianist.
In 1858 he became organist at a new church called Saint Clotilde Basilica. He stayed there for the rest of his life. It was a very important job for him. He decided to improve his organ playing, in particular in the use of pedals and in improvisation. At that time changes were being made in France to the pipe organ. Aristide Cavaillé-Coll was a very famous organ builder. He built an organ for Saint Clotilde Basilica and Franck gave the first recital on the new instrument in December 1859. Franck became famous for the way he improvised on the organ after the services. However, for many years he hardly composed anything.
Franck was becoming known as a teacher of organ and composition. His group of pupils became known as the "bande à Franck" (the "Franck band"). They included Henri Duparc who introduced him to Alexis de Castillon. De Castillon helped Franck to become better known as a composer by playing his music. Franck became organ professor at the Paris Conservatoire. In order to have this job he had to take on French nationality. His pupils included Vincent d'Indy, Ernest Chausson, Louis Vierne, and Henri Duparc. His organ works, especially the "Grande Pièce Symphonique", were some of best French organ music to come from France in over a century. They helped to prepare for the French symphonic organ style which was to include many famous composers from the late 19th century onwards: people such as Charles-Marie Widor, Louis Vierne, and Marcel Dupré.
In 1872 he wrote an oratorio "Rédemption". It was not a success when it was first performed, but this was mainly due to the instrumental parts which had been badly copied, and by the famous conductor Eduard Colonne who conducted it very badly. The work became popular years later after Franck had died.
Franck was now starting to compose the works which made him really famous. He wrote a very large oratorio called "Les Béatitudes". He then wrote a "Piano Quintet" and the symphonic poems "Le chasseur maudit" and "Les Djinns". His piano music included "Prélude, choral et fugue" and the "Variations symphoniques". In 1885 he was awarded the cross of the Legion d’honneur. A year later he became president of the Societe Nationale de Musique He wrote a "Sonata for Violin and Piano" and a "Symphony".
In 1890, Franck was knocked down by a horse tram while crossing the road. He died shortly afterwards, although he still managed to compose his "Trois chorals" for organ just before he died.
His music.
Many of Franck's works use "cyclic form", a way of making a long work with several movements sound like one piece by making the main theme or themes come back in later movements. He wrote in a Romantic style which was partly influenced by the music of Wagner and Franz Liszt. Franck had big hands and when he wrote for the piano he often made the pianist play chords with very wide stretches.
He remains famous for just a small number of compositions written in his last years. One of his best known shorter pieces is the motet "Panis Angelicus", which was originally written for tenor solo, but is more often heard sung by a soprano or treble.

Robert Burns
music
Robert Burns (January 25, 1759) - (1796) was a famous poet born in Alloway, Ayrshire, Scotland. Some of his most famous poems include "To A Mouse", "Auld Lang Syne", and "Tam O'Shanter". Burns is seen as the national poet of Scotland. Much of his work is written in Lowland Scots, rather than English. His poem and song "A Man's A Man For A' That" was sung at the opening of the Scottish Parliament in 1999.

Atlanta Thrashers
sports
The Atlanta Thrashers are an NHL ice hockey team. The team plays in Atlanta, Georgia. They have made the playoffs only once in seven seasons.

Jack Black
music
Jack Black (born Thomas J. Black, Jr. on August 28, 1969) is a Golden Globe Award nominated American actor, comedian and musician. He is an important member of the Frat Pack, a name used by members of the media for a group of comedians active in today's Hollywood movies. Black is also in demand for some of Hollywood largest movies and smallest indie films. He and Kyle Gass make up the comedy/rock duo Tenacious D. Black is also known by his nicknames, Jables or JB.

Ron Paul
politics
Ronald Ernest Paul (born August 20, 1935) is a Republican Congressman from the state of Texas.
He tried to become President of the United States in 2008. He also tried to become President in 1988 but he was defeated. He is for lower taxes, minimal government and against interventionism. He supports making United States money worth a certain amount of gold.

Markus Näslund
sports
Markus Näslund (born July 30, 1973, in Örnsköldsvik, Sweden) is a Swedish ice hockey player in the NHL. He was born in Ornskoldsvik, Sweden. He plays for the New York Rangers and is currently an alternate captain. He was considered very skilled and valuable and he was given the Lester B. Pearson award for the Most Outstanding Player in 2004.
MoDo Hockey.
Naslund began his career in Sweden, playing for Team Modo Hockey. Naslund was still quite young at that time. He played very well and was drafted by the NHL.
Pittsburgh Penguins.
In 1994, after being drafted by the NHL, he was taken in by the Pittsburgh Penguins. He started his rookie NHL years here. He did not play many games as he wasn't seen to be a great player at that time. Finally, the manager of the Penguins traded him to the Vancouver Canucks.
Vancouver Canucks.
After being traded to the Canucks, Naslund was not used in games. The Vancouver coach thought that he wasn't very good, so Naslund asked to be traded. But sadly he wasn't.
Suddenly, he was put in the lineup and did quite well compared to the rest of the team, which were struggling. In 2000, he was put with Todd Bertuzzi and they scored many goals together. Naslund was now a superstar and in 2004 he reached career highs and the NHL gave him the Lester B. Pearson award.
But in the 2006-2007 season, he struggled because Bertuzzi was traded away and it was much harder for him to score. But in the playoffs that year, he scored many goals in a short period of time. Naslund promised he would be much better next year.
New York Rangers.
In the 2008 offseason, the Rangers signed Naslund to a two year, $8 million contract. Naslund has spent most of his time with the Rangers playing on the team's first line with Scott Gomez as his center.

Sanjaya Malakar
music
Sanjaya Malakar (born September 10 1989) is an American singer who gained attention from appearing on the reality show "American Idol". He was voted off after the top 7 participants.

Roberto Luongo
sports
Roberto Luongo (born April 4, 1979) is a hockey goaltender in the National Hockey League (NHL). He is playing for the Vancouver Canucks.
Florida Panthers.
Roberto Luongo started playing in the NHL with the Florida Panthers. During the summer of 2006, Luongo was planning to stay in Florida. Instead, the general manager of the Panthers, Mike Keenan, sent him to the Vancouver Canucks, along with Lukas Krajicek, in return for Todd Bertuzzi, Alex Auld, and Bryan Allen. Luongo first said that he was sad because he was leaving so suddenly and Vancouver was very far away.
Vancouver Canucks.
In the 2007 season, Luongo was in Vancouver. He was voted into the All-Star Game as the starting goaltender. The Canucks went to the playoffs. It was Luongo's first time to reach the playoffs. In one game, against the Dallas Stars, he made around 70 saves, which is very close to breaking records.

San Jose Sharks
sports
The San Jose Sharks are an ice hockey team that plays in the National Hockey League. The team is based in San Jose, California and was founded on May 9th, 1990. It started playing in the NHL in autumn 1991. The team colours are pacific teal, grey, burnt orange and black. Because of this it is often called "Team Teal".
The Sharks host their games at HP Pavilion and are coached by Todd McLellan since summer 2008. Famous players for the Sharks are Joe Thornton, Jonathan Cheechoo, Rob Blake, Evgeni Nabokov, Dan Boyle and team captain Patrick Marleau.

Lil' Kim
music
Kimberly Denise Jones, better known as Lil' Kim, (born July 11, 1975 in Brooklyn, New York) is a rap artist.

Chen Shui-bian
politics
Chen Shui-bian (陳水扁) (born October 12, 1950 in Guantian, Tainan, Taiwan) is the President of Taiwan. His nickname is "Ah-bian" (阿扁). Chen is a member of the Democratic Progressive Party. He took office in 2000. This ended 55 years of Kuomintang rule in Taiwan.
Early years.
Chen Shui-bian is raised from a poor family in southern Taiwan. He worked hard and studied at National Taiwan University. He passed a test and became a lawyer in his junior year. He graduated from university in 1974.

Bobby Robson
sports
Sir Bobby Robson (born February 18, 1933) is a former English football manager. He played for the England football team in 20 games and scored 4 goals.
He managed Fulham F.C. and Ipswich Town F.C. before he managed the England national football team for eight years, from 1982-1990.

Ole Petter Andreassen
music
Ole Petter Andreassen (born September 22, 1975) is an Norwegian musician and producer. He plays guitar in heavy metal band The Cumshots.

Ville Valo
music
Ville Valo (born November 22, 1976) is a Finnish singer and songwriter. He is the lead singer in the Finnish rock band HIM. He lives in Helsinki, Finland.

Kurt Waldheim
politics
Kurt Josef Waldheim (21 December 1918 – 14 June 2007) was an Austrian diplomat and conservative politician. He was Secretary-General of the United Nations from 1972 to 1981, and President of Austria from 1986 to 1992. At the time of his death he was the oldest living former Secretary-General of the United Nations and the oldest living former President of Austria. On June 14, 2007, Waldheim died of heart failure.
Shortly before 1986, Waldheim published an autobiography. During his campaign to become president in 1986, it became public that some statements in that biography were not true. These were about his past. Waldheim was an officer for Germany in the Second World War. There was a commission of several historians who looked at the issue. They did find that Waldheim had behved as he should have done. He did not commit any War crimes. However, in his role of an officer, he must have known about the deportation of about 40.000 Jews into concentration camps. These transports, as well as the shooting of soldiers were a clear breach of law.
Because of this, he was not allowed to travel to the United States any more.
In 1990, he had a success: Saddam Hussein held several foreigners as hostages at the start of the Second Gulf War. When Waldheim heard this, he personally went to Baghdad. Through talks he could get Saddam to release the Austrian and the Swiss hostages (both countries are neutral)

Lucky Town
music
"Lucky Town" is a music album by Bruce Springsteen. It was produced by Bruce Springsteen with Jon Landau and Chuck Plotkin. The album was recorded by Toby Scott and mixed by Bob Clearmountain. It was released in 1992 under the copyright of Bruce Springsteen and was distributed by Sony Music.
Songs.
Bruce Springsteen plays all the instruments except the drums, which are played by Gary Mallabar.

Sara Paxton
music
Sara Paxton (born April 25, 1988, California) is an American actress and singer. She is best known for acting in the movies "Aquamarine", "Halloweentown 3" and "Darcy's Wildlife". Her mother is a Mexican Jew and her father is an American who converted to Judaism when marrying her mother.

Juan Perón
politics
Juan Domingo Perón (October 8, 1895 – July 1, 1974) was an Argentine general and politician. He served as President of Argentina from 1946 to 1955, ruling with Eva and again from 1973 to 1974 with his wife Isabel, who was his vice president. In Argentina, he and his second and wife Eva or Evita are considered icons by many people, especially members of Peronist party, which he started and is still popular today. He was elected in 1946. In 1955 he was overthrown and force to leave the country. In 1973, he returned and ran for President again with his third wife Isabel as Vice-President and was elected. He died less than a year after being elected. His widow, Isabel took his place, which made the first woman to be the head of a country's government in the Western hemisphere.

Nation of Domination
sports
The Nation of Domination (NoD) was a professional wrestling stable (a group of wrestlers who work together) in the World Wrestling Federation (WWF). The group was based on the Nation of Islam. It was created in the WWF by Faarooq. There were usually no more than four or five members of the NoD at any one time but as members left or became injured, other wrestlers would replace them. Members of the NoD included Rocky Maivia (The Rock), Crush, Savio Vega, D'Lo Brown, Ahmed Johnson, Kama Mustafa, Mark Henry and Owen Hart. The NoD separated in October of 1998.
The NoD fought mainly against Degeneration X, led by Triple H.

Dawn Fraser
politics
Dawn Fraser AO, MBE (born September 4, 1937) is an Australian champion swimmer. She is one of only two swimmers to win the same Olympic event three different times.
Swimming.
On 21 February 1956, at the age of 18, Fraser broke Willy den Ouden's world record for the 100m freestyle Ouden had held the record for twenty years. On 1 December of the same year, Fraser and the other swimmers for the Australian team won all three medals in the 100m freestyle at the 1952 Summer Olympics in Melbourne. Fraser beat her own world record winning that race. She got a second gold medal and world record as part of the Australian team in the 4x100m freestyle relay and got a silver medal in the 400m freestyle.
Four years later, at the 1960 Olympics in Rome, Fraser won the 100m again. This made her the first woman to defend an Olympic swimming title. She also placed fifth in the 400m and won silver medals in the medley relay and freesyle relay. This was the first time the medley relay was an Olympic event. On 27 October 1962, in Melbourne, Fraser became the first woman to swim the 100m in less than one minute. She swam the longer distance of 110 yards in 59.9 seconds.
At the 1964 Games in Tokyo, Fraser won the 100m again in a close race with Sharon Stouder of the United States. She became the first Olympic swimmer of either sex to win the same event three times. She also won a silver medal in the freestyle relay and placed fourth in the 400m. While in Tokyo, Fraser was arrested for taking a flag from the entrance to the Emperor's Palace. She said she was sorry she took it and the charges were dropped. The Emperor gave her the flag as a gift.
Politics.
In 1988, Fraser was elected to the parliament of New South Wales. She served until 1991.

Karen Carpenter
music
Karen Carpenter (March 2, 1950 – February 4, 1983) was an American singer and drummer who was most popular in the 70s. She is known as the singer of the group the Carpenters.
Childhood.
Karen Carpenter was born in New Haven, Connecticut on March 2, 1950. She played baseball a lot, and said that she likes being the pitcher. She has a brother, named Richard Carpenter. While Karen played baseball with her friends, Richard usually played the piano. Her parents, Agnes and Harold Carpenter, decided that they wanted to move to Downey, California, a city near Hollywood. They moved in 1963.
In Downey, Karen attended Downey High School. She was a good student, but didn't like gym. In order to get out of gym, she asked to be in the marching band instead. When she got into the marching band, the director gave her the glockenspiel, an instrument that sounds somewhat like a xylophone. Karen didn't like the glockenspiel and asked her band director if she could play the drums instead. Seeing Karen's natural talent for rhythm, the director approved. From then on, she practiced drumming on pots and pans before her parents finally bought her a drum set.
Pre-Career.
Her brother formed the Richard Carpenter Trio in 1965. Karen played the drums. Richard played the piano, and a friend named Wes Jacobs played the electric bass. They played jazz music at clubs in Hollywood. They entered the Battle of the Bands contest at the Hollywood Bowl in 1966. The Richard Carpenter Trio played "The Girl From Ipanema" and "Iced Tea," a song composed by Richard Carpenter. They won the Battle of the Bands that year. Afterwards, they signed with RCA Records, but the RCA thought their music wouldn't sell, so RCA let them go. The Richard Carpenter Trio made one last TV appearance on "Your All American College Show" in 1968, where they played "Dancing in the Street." Karen had a great drum solo. They won the "Your All American College Show" contest, too.
In 1967, Richard and Karen formed another group called Spectrum. Spectrum focused on making big harmonies, and the public didn't like their music. Both the Richard Carpenter Trio and Spectrum disbanded in 1968.
Career.
After five years of going nowhere, Richard and Karen Carpenter wanted to sign with a record label, but were constantly rejected. Joe Osborn, a bass player, had recording studio and let Richard and Karen record demo tapes. They sent in those demo tapes to a man named Herb Alpert. Herb Alpert appreciated Richard and Karen's music, and agreed to sign the two to his record label, A&M Records.
In April of 1969, Richard and Karen Carpenter signed to A&M Records as "Carpenters." They released their first album that year as well. It was called "Offering." It didn't have any popular songs on there, except for a song called "Ticket to Ride." When they released it as a single, the public's reaction was somewhat less than great. Too many people were accustomed to the Beatles' version.
The next year, Herb Alpert recommended a song called "(They Long to Be) Close to You." After being given the music, Richard Carpenter worked on on arranging it to invent their own sound. This song was their first major hit. It went to #1 on the Billboard Hot 100.
Later that year, the Carpenters recorded another song, called "We've Only Just Begun." It was originally for a commercial for a bank called "Crocker Bank", but Richard saw potential in it. He again began working on the arrangement and the song was released. Ultimately, "We've Only Just Begun" released it as a single, went to #2 on the Billboard Hot 100.
Throughout their career, Karen and Richard continued to be successful and release great singles. All of them placed in the top 20 until 1977. In 1977, both singles released only peaked at #32 and #35. Their last top 20 single was released in 1981, and it was called "Touch Me When We're Dancing."
Anorexia nervosa.
Anorexia nervosa is an eating disorder commonly known as "The Slimmer's Disease." It is a physological disorder that is characterized by fear of becoming fat, to the point of self-induced starvation. Victims of this disorder are typically perfectionists that have trouble showing their emotions. Karen Carpenter's eating disorder started in 1967, when the group "Spectrum" was still playing. Because she was moderately overweight, her doctor advised her to lose weight. Her doctor then a diet called the "Stillman Diet." She drank 8 cups of water everyday and avoided fatning foods. Karen lost about 25 pounds from the Stillman Diet. After she became successful, she decided that she neede to lose more weight. In 1975, she lost so much weight that she became ill. Eventually, she collapsed on stage and was sent to the hospital. At one time, she was only 70 pounds and 5'4" tall (five feet, four inches). A woman her height should be between 124 to 138 pounds. Becoming aware of her illness, she decided to gain weight. In 1982, she was the healthiest she'd been, but her heart failed. It's been proven that she had been abusing laxitives and thyroid pills. She may have also abused syrup of ipetac to induce vomiting, but that has not been proven. On February 4, 1983, Karen Carpenter died at the age of 32 from heart failure.
Records.
With the Carpenters, Karen Carpenter had a lot of records. Here is a list of them. The "italicized" words are the names of the records, and the things in the (parentheses) are the years that the records were released.

Walid Eido
politics
Walid Eido (in Arabic: وليد عيدو) (Beirut, 1942 - Beirut, June 13, 2007) was a Lebanese man who worked for the Lebanese Parliament, a government building in Beirut. He died with his son on June 13, 2007, with eight other people, when a bomb blew up just outside a famous amusement park. This was at the waterside of north Beirut.
His early life.
Walid Eido was Sunni Muslim. He was born in the Bachoura area of Beirut. He finished his studies at the Lebanese University in 1966. In the late 1990s, he worked for the Lebanese law of north Lebanon, but, in the year 2000, he quit to go into political life with Mr. Rafic Hariri and to be in the Lebanese parliament. Later on, he worked for the Lebanese Parliament. He used to belong to Al-Murabitun militant group at the time of the Lebanese civil war, he left the Murabitun when this group starts to expand and take bad members in.
Personal life.
Eido was married with three sons named Khaled, Zaher and Mazen. Eido was a good swimmer and the bomb exploded outside his favorite Beirut beach resort, Sporting Club.

Hassan Nasrallah
politics
Hassan Nasrallah (in Arabic: حسن نصرالله) (born August 30, 1960 - in Bourj Hammoud, Beirut) is the leader of the Islamist party in Lebanon called Hezbollah. He is also a Shi'a Muslim cleric. Some countries, like the United States and Britain, consider him to be a terrorist.
His early life.
Hassan Nasrallah was born in Bourj Hammoud, east Beirut. He was among ten children in his family. He went to Al Najah school, and then a public school in Sin el-Fil, Beirut. The civil war in 1975 caused his family to move to their old home in Bassouriyeh. There, he finished his secondary education at the public school in Tyre. He then joined the Amal Movement, a militant group that represents the Shi'a Muslims in Lebanon.

Björk
music
Björk Guðmundsdóttir (Better known as Björk'") was born on November 21, 1965 in Reykjavík, Iceland. She is an Icelandic singer, composer and actress. She mostly writes her own songs. She is best known for telling people how she feels with anger and for her unusual voice. She sings mostly in English but sometimes in Icelandic. She often makes music on her slaptop.
She has a son and a daugther, Sindri, and ísadòra. She lives in New York City, but also owns a home in Reykjavík.

Georg Danzer
music
Georg Franz Danzer (born October 7, 1946 in Vienna, died June 21, 2007, in Asperhofen) was an Austrian musician. He wrote and sang many songs. Many people think of him as the father of Austropop. This is because he usually sang his songs in the local dialect. He died of lung cancer at age 60.

National Democrats (Sweden)
politics
National Democrats (Swedish: "Nationaldemokraterna") is a minor political party in Sweden. It was formed in October 2001. The chairman of the party is Marc Abramsson.

Srinivasa Ramanujan
science
Srinivasa Ramanujan Iyengar (December 22, 1887 – April 26, 1920) was an Indian mathematician. He is considered to be one of the most talented mathematicians in recent history. He had no formal training in mathematics. However, he still made large contributions to number theory, infinite series and continued fractions.
He was mentored by G. H. Hardy in the early 1910s. After getting his degree at Cambridge, Ramanujan did his own work. He compiled over 3500 identities and equations in his life. Some of the identities were found in his "lost notebook". When the notebook was discovered, mathematicians proved almost all of Ramanujan's work. His discoveries have led to many advancements in mathematics. His formulas are now being used in crystallography and string theory.

Paul Erdős
science
Paul Erdős, also Pál Erdős, in English Paul Erdos or Paul Erdös (March 26, 1913 – September 20, 1996), was a famous Hungarian-born mathematician. He worked with hundreds of mathematicians on problems in combinatorics, graph theory, number theory, classical analysis, approximation theory, set theory, and probability theory.
Erdős number.
Because he was so prolific, friends created Erdős number. Erdős has a number of 0 (for being himself), and his direct collaborators were given the number 1. Their collaborators were given a number of 2, an so on.
The Erdős number was most likely first defined by Casper Goffman, a mathematician whose Erdős number is 1.

Amy Winehouse
music
Amy Jade Winehouse (born 14 September, 1983) is an English soul and R&B singer and songwriter. She was born to a family of jazz musicians and raised in Southgate, London. She is signed to Island Records and has released two albums under the label; "Frank" (2003) and "Back to Black" (2006).

The Internationale
music
"The Internationale" (French:L'Internationale, pronounced, Russian:С Интернационалом [S Internatsionalom], Chinese:國際歌 [Pinyin:Guójìgē]) is a highly well known French socialist, communist, and anarchist song. It is also sung in Russian and Chinese. The Russian version, written by Аркадий Яковлевич Коц (Arkady Yakolevich Kots), was, before 1944, the national anthem of the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics. The French words, written by Eugene Pottier, were originally supposed to be sung to the tune of "La Marseillaise". The song is known by its tune, and it's refrain, "Cest la Lutte Finale, Groupons-nous, et demain, L'Inter nationale, Sera le genre humain". The Chinese lyrics were written by 瞿秋白, or Qu Qiubai.

Manuel Fraga Iribarne
politics
Manuel Fraga Iribarne (born November 23, 1922 at Vilalba) was a Spanish and Galician politician. Fraga was a politician in Spain under Francisco Franco's dictatorial regime and in the democracy after Franco's death. He was the President of Galicia for 15 years until he died. Fraga governed Galicia strictly with a hard hand but he did a lot of good things for Galicia, helping build a strong economy of farming, fishing and construction.

Nelly Furtado
music
Nelly Furtado (born November 2, 1978) is a Canadian singer. She can also play many musical instruments. She learned to play the trombone and the ukulele at the age of nine. In later years, she learned to play the guitar and keyboard. She has released three albums. The first album was released in 2000 and was called "Whoa! Nelly". She become famous worldwide because the album was very popular. The first single released was "I'm Like a Bird" which earned her a Grammy Award. Her second album was "Folklore" released in 2003. It was not as popular as the previous album. Her third album in 2006 was "Loose" which spawned many hit songs including "Promiscuous", "Maneater", "Say It Right" and "All Good Things (Come to an End)". Furtado sings songs in English, Spanish and Portuguese.
On September 20, 2003, she gave birth to a daughter, Nevis.

Volta (album)
music
"Volta" is a 2007 album by Björk. She has claimed the album is about "returning to her roots".

Nelly
music
Cornell Haynes Jr (born November 2, 1974) is an American rapper. He his better known as his stage name Nelly. He won three Grammy Awards in 2003.

T.I.
music
Clifford Joseph Harris Jr. (born September 25, 1980 in Atlanta, Georgia, USA) is an American rapper, songwriter, actor and record producer. His stage name is T.I. He is also the leader of the southern rap group P$C.
He won two Grammy Awards in 2007 for Best Rap Solo Performance ("What You Know") and Best Rap/Sung Collaboration ("My Love" with Justin Timberlake).
Acting career.
T.I. has starred in "ATL". This was his first film. He also appeared in "American Gangster". and was featured on the soundtrack.
In September 2008, T.I. appeared as himself as a client of Ari Gold in the "Entourage".

Armenian Revolutionary Federation
politics
The Armenian Revolutionary Federation (ARF or ՀՅԴ) (Armenian: – Hay Heghapokhakan Dashnaktsutiun, Dashnaktsutiun, – Dashnak or Tashnag) is an Armenian political party founded in Tiflis (Tbilisi in modern day Georgia) in 1890 by Christapor Mikaelian, Stepan Zorian, and Simon Zavarian. The party works in Armenia and in countries where the Armenian diaspora is active, notably in Lebanon and the ethnically Armenian-dominated de facto Republic of Nagorno-Karabakh.
Museum.
The Armenian Revolutionary Federation History Museum was created during an official ceremony Friday 2007 at Yerevan's Kristapor Mikaelian Center, with the party's leaders and supporters on hand to mark this momentous occasion.
Opened in 1946, the ARF History Museum was in Paris and during the years has collected more than 3,000 artifacts describing the party's history. After the ARF's return to Armenia, the museum and the ARF archives have been sent to Armenia.
Giro Manoyan is one of the leaders of ARF.

Christoph Metzelder
sports
Christoph Metzelder (born November 5 1980 in Haltern am See, Germany) is a German footballer. In the German national football team he has played in 46 matches and scored no goal.

Vande Mataram
music
The Vande Mataram is the national song of India. It is not to be confused with the national anthem of India. The lyrics were written by Bankimchandra Chattopadhyay, in a mix of Sanskrit and Bengali. The song was written in 1876, but published in 1882. The title means "Long live the Mother[land]". The first version of the Flag of India had "वन्दे मातरम्" (Vande Mataram) written on it.
Controversy.
Jana Gana Mana was chosen over "Vande Mataram"as the National Anthem of independent India in January 24, 1950, although before this date, "Vande Mataram" was trated as such. Vande Mataram was rejected because Muslims offended by calling India "Mother Durga" (a Hindu goddess) equating the nation with Hinduism, and by its origin as part of "Anandamatha", a book they felt had an anti-Muslim message.
Full version.
सप्त कोटि कण्ठ कलकल निनाद कराले
तुमि विद्या तुमि धर्म, तुमि ह्रदि तुमि मर्म
Translation.
Cool with thy winds of delight,
Green fields waving Mother of might,
Over thy branches and lordly streams,
Who hath said thou art weak in thy lands
When swords flash out in seventy million hands
Thy dreadful name from shore to shore?
With many strengths who art mighty and stored,
To thee I call Mother and Lord!
Thou who saves, arise and save!
To her I cry who ever her foe drove
Thou art wisdom, thou art law,
Thou art heart, our soul, our breath
Though art love divine, the awe
In our hearts that conquers death.
Thine the strength that nerves the arm,
Thine the beauty, thine the charm.
In our temples is but thine.
Thou art Durga, Lady and Queen,
With her hands that strike and her
In thy soul, with jewelled hair
Mother sweet, I bow to thee,
"translated by Sri Aurobindo"
Translation.
Cool with thy winds of delight,
Green fields waving Mother of might,
Full version.
তুমি বিদ্যা তুমি ধর্ম, তুমি হৃদি তুমি মর্ম

Enya
music
Enya (born Eithne Patricia Ní Bhraonáin on 17 May 1961 in Gweedore, County Donegal, Ireland) is an Irish singer. She is famous for hits such as "Orinoco Flow" (1988) and "Anywhere Is" (1995).
She has also won 4 Grammy Awards and has become one of the world's most successful female singers. Her vocal range is mezzo-soprano.
She was brought up with the Irish language, and did not have English until she attended primary school.

Ghevont Alishan
science
Father Ghevont Alishan () (1820-1901; also spelled Ghevond Alishan) was an ordained Armenian Catholic priest, historian and a poet.

Yuri Andropov
politics
Yuri Vladimirovich Andropov (1914-1984) was a Soviet politician and General Secretary of the CPSU from November 12, 1982 until his death just fifteen months later.

Meg White
music
Meg White was born on December 10, 1974 in Grosse Pointe Farms, Michigan. She is an American drummer and vocalist. She is best known for having large breasts and is one half of The White Stripes with her ex-husband Jack White.
Meg's playful yet simple style of drumming has drawn so much debate about her ability that is referenced in the movie "School of Rock". In reference to her simple approach to drumming, Meg said "That is my strength. A lot of drummers would feel weird about being that simplistic."

Tomomi Kahala
music
Tomomi Kahala, sometimes spelled Kahara (華原 朋美 "Kahara Tomomi" born August 17, 1974 in Tokyo) is a Japanese female singer. Her nickname is "Tomochan", and special skill is Horse riding. Her most famous song is "I'm Proud", "I Believe".

Paulo César Fonseca do Nascimento
sports
Paulo César Fonseca do Nascimento (also called Tinga) is a Brazilian soccer player (midfield) who is playing for Borussia Dortmund.He came in 2006 from gremio Porto Alegre, after he haf won the Copa Libertadores. Before that, he played for J. League side Kawasaki Frontale.

Mona Sahlin
politics
Mona Ingeborg Sahlin (born Andersson on March 9, 1957 in Sollefteå, Sweden) is the new leader for the Swedish Social Democratic Party after Göran Persson's 10 years as leader. She was the minister responsible for gthe handling of the Heart 2 Art Exhibition in Stockholm 2002.Sahlin will lead the party into the new election in 2010 where she can become the first female Prime minister in Sweden if the party wins the election.

Swedish Social Democratic Party
politics
The Swedish Social Democratic Party is Swedens biggest political party. The party has been in the lead with a Prime minister for the longest and most amount of time in Sweden. Mona Sahlin is the current and so far only leader for the party who has been a women. The party lost to the Moderate party in the 2006 elections and will have a new chance to take over the power again in 2010.
Olof Palme one of Sweden's most famous politicians was the party leader for many years before hes murder in 1986.

Olof Palme
politics
Olof Palme (January 30, 1927 – March 1, 1986) (murdered) was a Swedish politician. He was the leader of the Social Democratic Party from 1969-1986 to his death and Prime Minister of Sweden from 1969 - 1976 and 1982 - 1986. He was shot dead in Stockholm after going to the cinema on February 28 1986. The killer has never been arrested, and the gun has never been found. His murder is still a mystery for Swedish police, even though many people have been arrested during the years.

Elena Paparizou
music
Elena Helena Paparizou (born January 31, 1982) in Örgryte, Sweden, is a Greek singer and model who won the Eurovision Song Contest in 2005 for Greece.

John Cage
music
John Milton Cage, Jr. usually known as just John Cage, (born September 5, 1912, died August 12, 1992) was a composer of Scottish ancestry. He was one of the first composers (or "musicians") to introduce different styles of music to popular culture. He made mostly avant-garde music and electronic music, and was very well known for making the piece 4'33", which challenged what music is. He also wrote music for pianos that had been "prepared" by having screws and nails placed in them.
4'33".
This piece is in 3 movements (sections), and is special in that all of the movements are silent, the score having the Latin word for silence three times (tacit,tacit,tacit). Many people think that it is just a joke because of this, as there is nothing to listen to. It was written in 1952, and is 4 minutes and thirty three seconds long. Cage got the idea from being in a soundless chamber, but realising that even here there was no true silence because he could hear his heart beating.

Hrant Dink
media
Hrant Dink (Armenian: Հրանդ Տինք, IPA: [həɹɑnt diːnk]) (September 15 1954 – January 19 2007) was a Turkish-Armenian editor, journalist and columnist.
History.
As editor-in-chief of the bilingual Turkish-Armenian newspaper "Agos" (Ակօս), Dink was a prominent member of the Armenian minority in Turkey.
Death.
Hrant Dink was assassinated in Istanbul on January 19, 2007, by Ogün Samast, a 17 year old ultra-nationalist Turk.

Agos
media
"Agos" (, "Furrow") is an Armenian weekly newspaper published in Turkey, established 5 April, 1996. It is published in Istanbul and has a circulation of around 5,000. It has both Armenian and Turkish pages as well as an on-line English edition. Hrant Dink was its chief editor from the newspaper's start until his assassination outside of the newspaper's offices in Istanbul in January 2007.
Hrant Dink's son Arat Dink who worked as the executive editor of the weekly was named as a co-defendant in the dispute brought against Hrant Dink for insulting Turkishness. After Hrant Dink's murder, the editor-in-chief of the weekly became Etyen Mahçupyan and Arat Dink continued to work as the executive editor.

Paula DeAnda
music
Paula DeAnda (born 1989 in Corpus Christi, Texas) is an American singer. She is best known for her 2007 hit songs "Doing Too Much", "Walk Away (Remember Me)" and "Easy". DeAnda is of Mexican descent.
Easy.
Easy is a song by DeAnda. It also has a remix with Bow Wow. This version is used in the PC video game, "Bratz Babyz".

Rihanna
music
Rihanna (born Robyn Rihanna Fenty on February 20, 1988) is a Barbadian singer. She became famous with her debut single "Pon De Replay" in 2005. Her other hit songs are "If It's Lovin' That You Want", "SOS", "Unfaithful" and "Umbrella". She is Guyanese as well.

Aiko (singer)
music
Aiko (born November 22, 1975) is a Japanese singer. She has a high popularity among young people. Her most famous song is "Sakuranotoki". Aiko has won several Japan Gold Disc Awards.
Aiko debuted in 1998. She sings songs aboout love and girl's feelings. Her famous songs are "Hanabi", "Boyfriend", "Kabutomushi", "Kirakira" and so on.

Ai Otsuka
music
Ai Otsuka (born September 9, 1982) is a Japanese pop female singer-songwriter and pianist from Osaka, Osaka Prefecture, Japan.

JC Chasez
music
JC Chasez (born Joshua Scott Chasez on August 8, 1976 in Washington, D.C.), is an American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer, best known as one of the lead vocalists in the pop group *NSYNC.

Ricky Martin
music
Enrique Martín Morales (born December 24, 1971), is a Grammy Award and Latin Grammy Award-winning Puerto Rican pop singer. He rose to fame, first as a member of the Latin boy band Menudo, then as a solo artist since 1991. He has sold over 55 million albums around the world, charting twenty one top-ten hits on the U.S. Latin Charts, eight of which reached number one, and a total of over thirty hit singles.

Hilary Hahn
music
Hilary Hahn (born November 27, 1979 in Lexington, Virginia) is an American Grammy Award–winning violinist.
Biography.
She was born into a Lutheran family and moved to Baltimore, Maryland at the age of three and began playing the violin one month before her fourth birthday in the Suzuki Program of Baltimore’s Peabody Conservatory.
Hahn became interested in the violin after taking a walk with her father in their Baltimore neighborhood (Zaustinsky 1999). The two passed a branch of the Peabody Conservatory that advertised music lessons for four-year-olds and observed a music lesson where a young boy was playing "Twinkle Twinkle Little Star". Hahn began taking lessons the following week and participated in a Suzuki class for about a year.
In 1995 Hahn made her international debut in Germany with a performance of the Beethoven Concerto for Violin and Orchestra in D Major with Lorin Maazel and the Bavarian Radio Symphony Orchestra. The concert was broadcast on radio and television throughout Europe. A year later, Hahn debuted at Carnegie Hall in New York as a soloist with the Philadelphia Orchestra.
By the age of sixteen, Hahn had completed the Curtis Institute's university requirements, but elected to remain at the Institute for several more years to pursue additional elective courses, until her graduation in May of 1999 with a Bachelor Of Music degree. During this time she regularly coached violin with Jaime Laredo, and studied chamber music with Felix Galimir and Gary Graffman. In an interview with PBS in December 2001, Hahn stated that of all the musical disciplines, she is most interested in musical performance (PBS Interview).
Hahn has played with orchestras such as the London Symphony Orchestra, New York Philharmonic, Singapore Symphony Orchestra, just to name a few. She debuted with the Chicago Symphony Orchestra in March of 2007.
She began performing and touring in a crossover duo with singer-songwriter Josh Ritter in 2005 and (early 2007) with singer-songwriter Tom Brosseau.
Career.
In 2001, Time Magazine named Hahn as “America’s Best” young classical musician. Throughout her career, Hahn has performed with numerous orchestras around the globe. She previously recorded five albums with Sony Classical, but now records exclusively for Deutsche Grammophon.
In 1996 Sony Music signed Hahn to an exclusive recording contract, which made her one of the youngest exclusive artists in the label’s history. Hahn’s first recording, released in 1997, featured selected solo sonatas and partitas by J.S. Bach, and spent weeks as a bestseller on the Billboard classical charts.
In addition to being a solo violinist, Hahn has also performed as a chamber musician. Since the summer of 1992 she has performed nearly every year with the Skaneateles Chamber Music Festival in Skaneateles, New York. Between 1995 and 2000 she spent performing and studying chamber music at the Marlboro Music Festival in Vermont, and in 1996 she served as an artist and a member of the chamber music mentoring program of The Chamber Music Society of Lincoln Center.
From Sony Classical to Deutsche Grammophon.
Hahn signed with Deutsche Grammophon in 2003 after her contract with Sony expired in 2002. After Hahn completed her part of the contract with Sony, which was for five recordings over six years, she decided against renewing the contract due to the fact that she and Sony did not agree on her future projects (Lark Ascending).
Personal.
In an interview with "Strings Magazine" conducted in 1999, Hahn cited several people as being influential on her development as a musician and a student. Two of these influences include David Zinman, the conductor of the Baltimore Symphony and Hahn’s mentor since she was ten, and Lorin Maazel, with whom she worked in Europe with the Bavarian Radio Symphony Orchestra. In the interview, Hahn also stated that she enjoys watching movies, reading, and writing in her free time. Other hobbies that she lists include: meeting new people, exploring cities, ballet, working out, swimming, and bike riding. She also enjoys animals and rowing (The Daily Princetonian).
What she plays.
Hilary Hahn plays an 1864 Vuillaume violin that was formerly owned by the Russian violinist Samuel Lande who was a friend of Klara Berkovich, Hahn’s first teacher. Hahn uses Dominant strings and bows by French bow makers Paul Jombar and Emil Miquel (Zaustinsky 1999).
On playing Bach.
"Bach is, for me, the touchstone that keeps my playing honest. Keeping the intonation pure in double stops, bringing out the various voices where the phrasing requires it, crossing the strings so that there are not inadvertent accents, presenting the structure in such a way that it's clear to the listener without being pedantic - one can't fake things in Bach, and if one gets all of them to work, the music sings in the most wonderful way."

Asbarez
media
Asbarez Newspaper began its publication in August 1908 in Fresno as a weekly. After several successful decades the offices and publishing headquarters moved to Los Angeles in the early 1970's. Today it is still active.
Asbarez is the official publisher of the Armenian Revolutionary Federation Western United States Central Committee, and mainly serves the more than 500,000 strong Armenian-American community in the Western states.
On May 1, 1970 when Asbarez began publishing its English section. Today, that section, which became a daily publication in January 1993, is the voice of the community and a source of information within the halls of Congress, in libraries around the country and newsrooms of major media outlets.

Gibraltar Chronicle
media
The Gibraltar Chronicle is a newspaper published daily in Gibraltar since 1801. It is not only the oldest newspaper in Gibraltar, but also the second oldest English newspaper in the world.

Alan Johnston
media
Alan Graham Johnston (born May 17, 1962) is a British journalist working for the BBC. On March 12, 2007, he was taken by a group of armed men in Gaza. He was kept as a hostage until he was let free on July 4.

Kieran Richardson
sports
Kieran Edward Richardson (born 21 October 1984 in Greenwich, London) is an English footballer currently playing for Manchester United He is a left-sided midfielder who is also comfortable playing in central midfield. He has also played at left back during Manchester United's recent injury crisis. Charley Uchea, a cousin to Kieran, is one of the Big Brother UK housemates in 2007. Kieran has boycotted Big Brother and his cousin saying that she only using his fame to promote herself in the programme.
Other websites.
plays central midfield for Roy Keane's Sunderland team

Democratic Progressive Party
politics
The Democratic Progressive Party (DPP) (Traditional Chinese:; Simplified Chinese:; abbreviated to or; Hanyu Pinyin: Mínjìndǎng) is a major political party in the Republic of China (Taiwan). The party has been linked with the pan-green coalition and de-jure Taiwan independence movementy. The DPP is a member of Liberal International and a founding member of the Council of Asian Liberals and Democrats. The DPP represented Taiwan in the Unrepresented Nations and Peoples Organisation.

Kick the Can Crew
music
Kick the Can Crew is a Japanese hip-hop group. The style is 3MC and 1DJ. The group was started by 1996, but it broke up in 2004.

Angela Aki
music
Angela Aki (born September 15, 1977) is a J-pop singer-songwriter. Her former Japanese name is Aki Kiyomi. She was born in Itano of Tokushima prefecture. Her father is Japanese and her mother is Italian-American. She is bilingual in English and Japanese. She was raised in Japan, but she moved to Hawaii when she was fifteen. Then she went to university at George Washington University. She released an indie album in the United States in 2000, called "These Words". Now she is signed under Sony Japan.

Luigi Galvani
science
Luigi Galvani (September 9, 1737 – December 4, 1798) was an Italian physician who lived and died in Bologna. In 1771, he found out that the muscles of dead frogs twitched when hit by a spark. He was a pioneer in modern obstetrics, and discovered that muscle and nerve cells produce electricity. He is well known as the inventor of chemical cells.

Please Please Me
music
"Please Please Me" was a 1963 album by The Beatles. It was their first album. Ten of its songs were recorded all in one day, on February 11th 1963, and was an example of what they played live at the time.
Songs on the album.
Songs not credited above were written by John Lennon and Paul McCartney, two members of the band.

Cher
music
Cheryl Sarkisian LaPierre (better known as Cher) (born on May 20, 1946) is an American actress, singer, songwriter, author and entertainer. She has won an Academy Award, a Grammy Award, an Emmy Award and three Golden Globe Awards.
Cher first became famous in 1965 as one half of the pop/rock duo Sonny & Cher. She has also released 25 albums as a solo artist, and has 22 "Billboard" Top 40 entries over her career. These include twelve Top 10 singles and 5 number one singles.
She became a successful television star in the 1970s, and a movie actress in the 1980s. In 1987, she won the Academy Award for Best Actress for her role in the romantic comedy "Moonstruck".

Myleene Klass
music
Myleene Angela Klass (born April 6, 1978) is an English classical pianist, commercial model, television and radio presenter, and former member of the UK pop group Hear'Say. Her pop success achieved 4 Top 10 singles, 2 of which were UK Number Ones. Hear'Say also released 2 albums, "Popstars" and "Everybody".

Beverley Mitchell
music
Beverley Ann Mitchell (born January 22, 1981) is an American actress and country music singer. She is perhaps best known for her role as Lucy Camden-Kinkirk on the television series "7th Heaven".

Nanne Grönvall
music
Nanne Grönvall (born Marianne Elisabeth Nordqvist on May 18 1962 in Stockholm) is a Swedish singer-songwriter. Her musical career started in the 1980s group "Sound of Music". The trio participated twice in the Swedish Eurovision Song Contest selections, Melodifestivalen, finishing fourth both times; in 1986 with "Eldorado" and in 1987 with "Alexandra". Over the following ten years she established herself as a songwriter in Melodifestivalen, writing two songs for the 1992 competition and the 1995 runner-up "Det vackraste" ("The Most Beautiful Thing") performed by Cecilia Vennersten.

Ian Craig Marsh
music
Ian Craig Marsh (born 11 November 1956) is a British musician, a founding member of the electronic band The Human League.

Samvel Babayan
politics
Samvel Babayan (Armenian: Սամվել Բաբայան), was the Commander in Chief of the Nagorno-Karabakh Defense Army from 1994 to 2000.
At a February 26 meeting on a case of the March 22, 2000, an assassination attempt against Arkady Ghoukasyan in Stepanakert. Babayan was sentenced to 14 years in prison.

Mai Kuraki
music
Mai Kuraki (born October 28, 1982 in Funabashi, Chiba) is a Japanese female pop and R&B singer.
Her father is a movie director, Isomi Yamasaki.
She has appeared in her father's movies in her childhood.
She started her activity as a singer on 1999 when she was 17 years old with her first single CD "Love, Day After Tomorrow".
It became a million seller records.
First album “delicious way” was sold 35 million records.
After graduating Ritsumeikan University in Kyoto on 2005, she is concentrating on musical activities.
The lyrics are written by her most of the times.
But she is not composing the music. Music is offered by composers.
For arrangement, it is often commissioned to “Cybersound” in Boston.
She was influenced by Michael Jackson.

Ashlee Simpson
music
Ashlee Simpson (born October 3, 1984) is an American pop rock singer, songwriter, and actress, and younger sister of pop singer Jessica Simpson. In 2004, she released an album called "Autobiography" and starred in her own reality series "The Ashlee Simpson Show". Simpson was criticized when she used a pre-recorded vocal track for a performance on "Saturday Night Live" in October 2004. Simpson released another album in 2005 called "I Am Me". In 2008 Ashlee married Pete Wentz, from the band Fall Out Boy, she is now expecting a child in fall.

Agnes Carlsson
music
Agnes Carlsson (often credited as simply Agnes), born March 6 1988 in Vänersborg, is a Swedish singer who rose to popularity after winning "Idol 2005", the Swedish version of "Pop Idol", shown by TV4. The October 10th 2006 SVT confirmed that Agnes would participate in the Swedish Melodifestivalen 2007 with her song "More than a girl", but she got disqualified because she talked about the song in an interview with Aftonbladet. She is the third only Idol winner who was previously a "Wildcard" on the show, next to Canada's Ryan Malcolm and Kazakhstan's Almas Kishkenbayev. Agnes advanced to the finals as the jury's choice.

Kelly Rowland
music
Kelly Rowland (born Kelendria Trene Rowland on February 11, 1981) is a Grammy Award-winning American R&B singer, songwriter, dancer, and occasional actress, who rose to fame as one of the founding members of the successful R&B girl group Destiny's Child, the world's best-selling female group of all time selling over 100 million records worldwide.

Michelle Williams (singer)
music
Michelle Williams (born Tenitra Michelle Williams on July 23, 1980) is an American gospel and R&B singer, songwriter, and actress. She was a background singer for Monica, before rising to fame as one-third of the successful Grammy Award-winning musical group Destiny's Child, the world's best-selling female group of all time, selling over 100 million records worldwide. Williams is now playing the character Shug Avery in the play "The Color Purple"

Toni Braxton
music
Toni Michelle Braxton (born October 7 1967 in Severn, Maryland) is an American R&B singer, songwriter, and actress. She was popular during the '90s. She has won the Grammy Award six times. She is famous for her husky alto vocal timbre. The RIAA named Braxton as one of the top selling artists of all time.

Edmund Burke
politics
Edmund Burke (January 12, 1729 - July 9, 1797) was an important Irish politician, and writer. Many people consider Burke to be one of the founders of conservatism. He became a member of the British House of Commons in 1765, and was known for his support for the American Revolution and his attacks against the French Revolution. His most famous book was "Reflections on the Revolution in France", which created many of the ideas in conservatism. Some of his other writings include the book ' and the treatise on beauty "A Philosophical Enquiry into the Origins of Our Ideas of the Sublime and Beautiful". He was also one of the founders of the "Annual Register", a review of politics which was published every year and had information on the history of the last year.

JoJo (singer)
music
Joanna Noëlle Levesque (born December 20, 1990), known by her stage name JoJo, is an American singer. She is a pop and R&B singer, songwriter, record producer, and actress.

Kareem Abdul-Jabbar
sports
Kareem Abdul-Jabbar (born Ferdinand Lewis Alcindor, Jr. on April 16, 1947) is an American former professional basketball player and current assistant coach. He was known as Lew Alcindor before changing his name in the fall of 1971, several years after converting to Islam. He is considered one of the greatest players of all time. He has also had numerous TV and film appearances.

Hayden Panettiere
music
Hayden Leslie Panettiere (born August 21, 1989) is an American actress, singer, and a Grammy Award nominee.

Ben Affleck
sports
Benjamin Géza Affleck (born August 15, 1972) is a Golden Globe Award-nominated American movie actor, director, and Academy Award-winning and Golden Globe Award-winning screenwriter. He became famous in the late 1990s, after acting in the movie "Good Will Hunting", and has since become a Hollywood star, having acted in several important movies.

Miley Cyrus
music
Miley Ray Cyrus (born Destiny Hope Cyrus, November 23, 1992, in Franklin, Tennessee) is an American actress, singer, and songwriter. She is best known for her role in "Hannah Montana".
Miley Cyrus is known as Miley Stewart on "Hannah Montana". She has a little sister Noah Cyrus who has starred on Hannah Montana twice. She also has an older sister named Brandi, a older brother named Trace and a younger brother named Braison.Her dad is Billy Ray Cyrus and is her stage father, too.
She legally changed her name to Miley Ray Cyrus. Cyrus has moved on a quick path to success. She loves to hang with friends and says, she couldn't be happier. Miley Cyrus is known on the TV show as Miley, Mile, Miles, or Hannah Montana. She released a new album called 'Breakout' with 12 songs,she also has her own Barbie doll. She has been on The Suite Life of Zack and Cody and on The Suite Life of That's so Hannah Montana with Raven Simo'ne.
During the film Hannah Montana, Miley knew Jonas Brothers, and she fell in love with Nick Jonas. They broke up in 2007, but just now, she wrote a song called "7 things". It talks about the seven things that she hates and likes about Nick.

Carmen Electra
music
Tara Leigh Patrick (born April 20 1972), commonly known as Carmen Electra, is an American glamour model, television personality, dancer, singer and actress.

Gene Kelly
music
Eugene Curran Kelly (August 23, 1912 – February 2, 1996), better known as Gene Kelly, was an American dancer, actor, singer, director, producer, and choreographer.
Kelly was a great example of 20th century filmed dance, famous for his energetic and athletic dancing style, his good looks and the likeable characters that he played on screen. Although he is probably most famous today for his act in "Singin' in the Rain", he was the most important actor in the Hollywood musical film industry from the mid 1940s until its decadence in the late 1950s. In 1999, the American Film Institute named Kelly among the Greatest Male Stars of All Time, ranking at No. 15.

Old World Underground, Where Are You Now?
music
"Combat Baby" was also a single in the UK.
Track listing.
All tracks written by Metric.
Official samples.
Metric's official website has short clips of this album on their.
Lyrics.
Lyrics for this album can be found on.

Chris Daughtry
music
Christopher Adam "Chris" Daughtry (born December 26, 1979) is a popular American singer, best known for being the fourth-place finisher on American Idol, and for being the lead singer of Daughtry, who released their first hit album in 2006.

Melinda Doolittle
music
Melinda Marie Doolittle (born October 6, 1977) is an American singer, best known for being the third-place finalist on "American Idol".

Stefan Kießling
sports
Stefan Kießling (born January 25, 1984 in Lichtenfels, Upper Franconia) is a German footballer. Right now he plays for Bayer 04 Leverkusen.

Richard Childress Racing
sports
Richard Childress Racing is a NASCAR racing team that is owned by Mr. Richard Childress. The team has operated for over 10 years and has provided many victories for their employees. Notable racers include Dale Earnhardt and Jeff Burton and they drive Chevrolet cars.

Bobby Darin
music
Walden Robert Cassotto (May 14, 1936 – December 20, 1973), better known as Bobby Darin, was an American pop singer, most famous during the 1950s. His hits included "Mack the Knife", "Dream Lover", "If I Were a Carpenter", "Splish Splash", and "Beyond the Sea". He also helped Wayne Newton begin his musical career.
Darin was married to actress Sandra Dee from 1960 to 1967. They had a son, named Dodd. Darin died late in 1973 after heart surgery.
In 2004 a movie, "Beyond the Sea", was made about Darin's life and career. Actor Kevin Spacey, a longtime Darin fan, produced and starred in the movie, with Kate Bosworth as Sandra Dee.

Slash (musician)
music
Saul Hudson or Slash (born July 23, 1965) is a guitarist. He was born in England to a white English father and an African-American mother. Slash is the guitarist for the group Velvet Revolver and the former guitarist for Guns n' Roses and Slash's Snakepit. He is also known for his long curly hair and top hat, and he often plays a 1959 Gibson Les Paul. He was an alcoholic and he was several times vinculated with drugs, but his talent was never put in doubt.

Billie Joe Armstrong
music
Billie Joe Armstrong is the lead singer and guitarist for the punk rock band Green Day. He was born in Oakland, California, on February 17, 1972, and was given his first guitar "Blue" at the age of 11 by his father Andy. He started Green Day in 1987 with his friend Mike Dirnt and later added Al Sobrante as a drummer. When Sobrante left the band to go to college, Tre Cool replaced him as a drummer. The band gained a following in the punk scene before becoming extremely popular after releasing "Dookie" in 1994. The band has been very popular ever since and Armstrong is considered by many to be one of the best punk frontmen of all time. He has stated that he is bisexual.

Pratibha Patil
politics
Pratibha Patil (Marathi: प्रतिभा पाटील, born December 19, 1934) is the 13th and is now India's president. She is the first woman to hold this post. She was sworn into the nation's top office on July 25, 2007 by the Chief Justice of India K. G. Balakrishnan. She succeeds Dr. A.P.J. Abdul Kalam.

Dan Fogelberg
music
Daniel Grayling "Dan" Fogelberg (August 13, 1951 – December 16, 2007) was an American singer, songwriter and multi-instrumentalist, whose music was inspired by sources as diverse as folk, pop, classical, jazz, and bluegrass music. He was most popular in the late 1970s and early 1980s.

Cristiano Ronaldo
sports
Cristiano Ronaldo dos Santos Aveiro (spoken IPA), (born 5 February 1985 in Funchal, Madeira), better known as Cristiano Ronaldo, is a Portuguese footballer. He plays for the English club Manchester United F.C. and Portugal. In the 2007-08 season, he became the only player in the last 25 years to win both the FIFPro "Player of the Year" and the FIFPro "Young Player of the Year" awards in the same season. In that season, he scored a total of 41 goals and won the European Golden Shoe, an award which is given to the top scorer. Cristiano Ronaldo is said to be "one of the best in the world". In the current season, he led Manchester United to win the English Premier League. On May 21, 2008 he missed the penalty kick against rival Chelsea, but his team still won the Champions League.

Tony Parker
sports
William Anthony "Tony" Parker (born) is a French basketball player who is married to Eva Longoria.

Chip Douglas
music
Chip Douglas (born Douglas Farthing Hatlelid) is an American musician and songwriter. He became a producer when he worked with The Monkees on their music. He also worked with The Turtles, first as bass guitarist and arranger, then later as producer.

Giovanni Domenico Cassini
science
Giovanni Domenico Cassini, also known as Jean-Dominique Cassini, (June 8, 1625–September 14, 1712) was an Italian-French astronomer, engineer and astrologer. Cassini was born in Perinaldo in the Republic of Genoa (part of Italy).
Discoveries.
Cassini, along with Robert Hooke discovered the Great Red Spot on Jupiter in around 1665. He also discovered the four of Saturn's moons, as well as the Cassini Division in Saturn's rings.

Christiaan Huygens
science
Christiaan Huygens (April 14, 1629–July 8, 1695) was a Dutch physicist, mathematician and astronomer, born in The Hague. He was noted for his arguments that light was in the form of waves. He discovered Saturn's largest moon Titan in 1655. He also did detailed studies on Saturn's rings, and in 1656, he discovered that they are made up of rocks. He worked on the making of accurate clocks, and invented the pendulum clock on Christmas 1656.

Lorenzo Music
music
Lorenzo "Jerry" Music was an American voice actor. He was born Gerald David Music on May 2, 1937, in Duluth, Minnesota. He died in 2001
Music was most famous as the voice of Carlton the Doorman in the television series "Rhoda" (which starred Valerie Harper and Julie Kavner), and as the cartoon voice of Garfield the Cat.

Socialist Unity Party of Germany
politics
The Socialist Unity Party of Germany (SED) (German: "Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands") was the governing party of East Germany from 1949, when East Germany was created, until the elections of 1990.
The SED was created in 1946 when the Soviet Union forced the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD) members and the Communist Party of Germany (KPD) members who lived in the Soviet-occupied parts of Germany and Berlin. After 1990, the party reformed itself as the Party of Democratic Socialism (later in 2005, the Left Party.PDS). It is still popular in the former East German territory, winning seats at state and local elections. In the September 2005 Bundestag election the PDS was in coalition with WASG (Electoral Alternative for Labour and Social Justice), which was formed by Oskar Lafontaine who left the SPD. The PDS and WASG are joining together in 2007.
A famous SED poster read: "To learn from Stalin means to learn how to win". Later, the word "Stalin" was replaced with "the USSR". When Gorbachev was president of the USSR the famous slogan was abandoned, as the SED did not believe there was anything to learn from his ideas about perestroika.
At first the SED had a branch in West Berlin, but in 1962 the West Berlin branch was separated from the SED proper and became a "separate" party called the Socialist Unity Party of West Berlin ("Sozialistische Einheitspartei Westberlins" - SEW).
The Final Days.
Between the fall of the Berlin Wall in November 1989 and the election in March 1990, the old Social Democratic Party was re-established as a separate party, while the rest of the SED lost a lot of members and renamed itself the Party of Democratic Socialism (PDS) at a special party meeting in December 1989. By becoming the PDS the party survived the reuniting of East Germany any West Germany, and eventually started growing again, managing to get representatives elected to the Bundestag.
General Secretaries of the Central Committee of the SED.
"(known as "First Secretary" from 1953 - 1976)"
These three party leaders are also the equivalent of the Prime Minister or President in other countries.

Buck the World
music
"Buck the World" is the second album by rapper Young Buck. Its title is a play on the expression "Fuck the World". "Buck the World" was released on March 27, 2007.
Production included Dr. Dre, Jazze Pha, J.U.S.T.I.C.E. League, Polow Da Don, and Lil Jon amongst others. Guest appearances included 50 Cent, Chester Bennington (from Linkin Park), Young Jeezy, Bun B, Trick Daddy, and Lyfe Jennings amongst others.
The first single was "I Know You Want Me" produced by Jazze Pha, who also made a guest appearance on the track. The second single was "Get Buck", produced by Polow Da Don. The third single, "U Ain't Goin' Nowhere", was released on May 18 2007.

Johannes Rau
politics
Johannes Rau (January 16, 1931, Wuppertal – January 27, 2006, Berlin) was a German politician of the SPD. He was the eighth President of the Federal Republic of Germany from July 1, 1999 until June 30, 2004 and minister president of North Rhine-Westphalia from 1978 to 1998.
Education and work.
He was born in Barmen, Wuppertal. His family was Protestant, and he was active in the Confessing Church, a part of the German Protestant Church which was against Nazism.
Rau left school in 1949 and worked as a journalist and publisher.
Political biography.
Rau was a member of the All-German People's Party (GVP), which was founded by Gustav Heinemann, who also became a president of Germany. This party only existed from 1952 until 1957.
In 1958 Rau and Heinemann joined the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SDP), where he was active in the Wuppertal branch. He served on the City Council (1964-1978), where he was as chairman of the SDP Group (1964-1967) and later as Mayor (1969-1970).
In 1958 Rau was elected a member of the "Landtag" (state parliament) of North Rhine-Westphalia. In 1967 he became chairman of the SPD group in the Landtag, and in 1970 Minister of Science and Education in the cabinet of Minister President Heinz Kühn. He founded five universities in North Rhine-Westphalia during the 1970s. He also startedand initiated Germany's first distance learning university at Hagen (modelled on the "Open University" in Britain).
In 1978 Rau became Minister President of North Rhine-Westphalia, where he remained until 1998, winning four elections for the SPD, which became biggest party in the Landtag each time and gained an absolute majority three times, in 1980, 1985, 1990 and finally 1995. From 1995 onwards, Rau led an SPD-Greens coalition in NRW.
In 1987 Rau tried to become chancellor of Germany for the SPD, but lost to Helmut Kohl's Christian Democrats (CDU). In 1994 Rau tried for the first time to become Federal President, but lost to Roman Herzog.
Rau twice served as President of the Bundesrat in 1982/83 and 1994/95, and was deputy for the Federal President. In 1998 Rau stepped down from his positions as SPD Chairman and Minister President, and on May 23, 1999, was elected Federal President by the Federal Assembly of Germany to succeed Roman Herzog (CDU). On July 1, 2004, he was succeeded by Horst Köhler.
In 2000 Rau was the first German head of state since the Holocaust to address the Knesset, the Israeli parliament, in German. Some Israeli delegates to walked out, but Israeli President Moshe Katsav supported and praised him for bridging the gap between the two states.
Following a long history of heart disease, he died a few days after his 75th birthday.
Private life.
Johannes Rau was a practising Christian. He was sometimes called, "Brother John", to make fun of his intense Christian belief; but, he sometimes used this term himself.
On August 9 1982 he married the political scientist Christina Delius (born 1956). Christina Rau is a granddaughter of Gustav Heinemann, former President of Germany. The couple had three children: Anna Christina, born 1983, Philip Immanuel, born 1985 and Laura Helene, born 1986.
After leaving office, Rau lived with his family in the federal capital Berlin. However, they also kept a house in Wuppertal.
Johannes Rau died on January 27, 2006 in Berlin.

Roman Herzog
politics
Roman Herzog (born April 5, 1934) is a German politician (CDU) and was the President of Germany from 1994 to 1999.
Biography.
He studied law in Munich, Bavaria and took the first stage law exam in 1957. In 1958, he gained the title Dr.jur. (doctor of laws) and worked in the University of Munich until 1964, where he passed his second law exam. He wrote "Die Wesensmerkmale der Staatsorganisation in rechtlicher und entwicklungsgeschichtlicher Sicht" ("Characteristics of State Organization from a Juristic and Developmental-Historical Viewpoint"), and was given the title of professor in 1964. In Germany "professor" is a title meaning senior teacher, not a job name. Herzog taught at the University of Munich until 1966. From 1966 he taught state law and political science as a full professor at the Free University of Berlin (FUB). In 1969 he moved to the FUB in Speyer, and was the University President from 1971 to 1972.
In 1973 he entered politics, and became a member of the Bundesrat for Rhineland-Palatinate. He was minister for culture and sports in the Baden-Württemberg Land Government from 1978. In 1980 he was elected to the State Parliament ("Landtag"), and took over the state Ministry of the Interior.
Roman Herzog was also always active in the Protestant Church. Since 1982 he has been a member of the synod (parliament) of the Protestant Church of Germany. He has been a member of the Evangelical Church in Germany since 1972.
In 1983 he became vice president of the Federal Constitutional Court of Germany in Karlsruhe, and president over from 1987 to 1994, when he was elected President of Germany by the Bundesversammlung ("Federal Convention"). His term ended in 1999, when he was succeeded by Johannes Rau.
His wife, Christiane Herzog, died on June 19, 2000. He later married Alexandra Freifrau von Berlichingen.

Billy Cox
music
Billy Cox is a bassist, best known for playing with guitarist Jimi Hendrix. He was born in West Virginia.
Billy first met Hendrix in the early part of the 1960s, when they were both in the United States Army. Cox played with Hendrix in an R&B band called the King Kasuals. The two played at clubs in Nashville, Tennessee. While in England, Hendrix asked Cox to join him in a new band; Cox said no. The spot instead went to Noel Redding.
They met again in 1969, when Hendrix asked on Cox to play bass in the experimental band "Band of Gypsys".
Billy Cox also played at Woodstock.
In 1971 Cox released his album "Nitro Function".

Stevie Ray Vaughan
music
Stephen "Stevie" Ray Vaughan (born October 3, 1954 in Dallas, Texas – August 27, 1990) was an American blues guitarist. He was one of the world's most influential electric blues guitarists. In 2003, "Rolling Stone" magazine ranked Stevie Ray Vaughan #7 in their list of the 100 Greatest Guitarists of All Time.

Muddy Waters
music
McKinley Morganfield (April 4, 1913 – April 30, 1983), or Muddy Waters, was an American blues musician and is considered "the Father of Chicago blues". He is also the actual father of blues musician Big Bill Morganfield. Muddy Waters is considered to be one of the greatest bluesmen of all time, and in 2004 he was ranked #17 in Rolling Stone Magazine's list of the "100 Greatest Artists of All Time".

Little Richard
music
Richard Wayne Penniman (born December 5 1932), better known as Little Richard, is an African-American singer, songwriter, and pianist, who began playing in the 1940s and recorded his songs from 1951.

Jennifer Warnes
music
Jennifer Warnes is an American singer. She first became famous during the late 1960s, and was a regular performer on "The Smothers Brothers Comedy Hour".
In the late 1970s, she had hit records including "Right Time of the Night" and "I Know a Heartache When I See One". In the 1980s, she sang duets with Joe Cocker ("Up Where We Belong") and Bill Medley ("(I've Had) The Time of My Life"), which were also hits.

Ruben Studdard
music
Ruben Studdard (born September 12, 1978) is an African-American singer who won season 2 of American Idol. His runner up is Clay Aiken.

Glen Campbell
music
Glen Campbell (born April 22, 1936) is an American musician and singer. Nearly all of his solo works have been in the Country music genre. Before his solo career, he played guitar on rock and pop music records, including "Mary, Mary" by The Monkees. Campbell joined The Beach Boys for a short time, when Brian Wilson became ill.
Campbell guest-starred on "The Smothers Brothers Comedy Hour". He later hosted a series of his own, "The Glen Campbell Goodtime Hour".
His popular songs include "Galveston", "By The Time I Get to Phoenix", "Wichita Lineman", "Try a Little Kindness", "Gentle On My Mind", "Sunflower", and "Hey Little One". Many of his popular songs were written by Jimmy Webb, a talented young songwriter. In 1975, Campbell's most popular song was "Rhinestone Cowboy". The song became a phenomenon, and rhinestone-covered clothing became a fad.
Campbell had more hits after "Rhinestone Cowboy". These include "Country Boy (You Got Your Feet in L. A.)" and "Can You Fool?" but his career was not going well in the late 1970s. He seemed to suffer from public overexposure. His romance with Tanya Tucker, a much-younger country singer, did not help the way many people saw Campbell. He stopped recording, and cut back on his public appearances.
Years later, Campbell returned to recording and appearing on television. In the 1990s, people were again interested in his music and career. Personal problems, though, seemed to get as much attention as the good things in his career. These problems included when Campbell was arrested for drunk driving. His music is still popular with fans, and is part of popular culture.

ITunes
sports
iTunes is a media player made by Apple. It came out on January 10, 2001 at the Macworld Expo in San Francisco. iTunes is used for playing and sorting music and video files. It also lets users see and change what is on their iPod or iPhone.
iTunes is a free download for Mac OS X and Microsoft Windows from Apple's website. The download is also included with QuickTime, a program used to play videos. It also comes with all Apple Macintosh computers, and some HP and Dell computers.
iTunes store.
The iTunes Store is an online store built into iTunes. iTunes can connect to the iTunes Store if there is an internet connection to buy and download music, music videos, television shows, iPod games, audiobooks, podcasts, and movies. The files from the iTunes Store use Digital Rights Management (DRM) to prevent piracy. However, iTunes now sells music and videos called iTunes Plus, which are higher quality and have no DRM. They are the same price as iTunes songs with DRM.

Lee Hazlewood
music
Lee Hazlewood (9 July 1929 – 4 August 2007) was an American country singer, songwriter, and record producer. Lee Hazlewood was most famous because he wrote the song "These Boots are made for Walkin" for Nancy Sinatra.

Simon Barere
music
Simon Barere (September 1, 1896–April 2, 1951) was a Russian pianist. He was born in Odessa, Ukraine.
Barere died of a massive bleeding in brain during a performance of Grieg's Piano Concerto at Carnegie Hall with Philadelphia Orchestra.

Gro Harlem Brundtland
politics
(IPA:) (born April 20, 1939) is a Norwegian politician, diplomat, and physician, and an international leader in sustainable development and public health. She is a former Prime Minister of Norway, and was the Director General of the World Health Organization. She now is a Special Envoy on climate change for the United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon.

James Edward Keeler
science
James Edward Keeler (September 10 1857–August 12 1900) was an American astronomer.
He worked at Lick Observatory beginning in 1888 but was appointed director of the University of Pittsburgh's Allegheny Observatory in 1891. He returned to Lick Observatory as its director in 1898, but died not long after in 1900. He had married in 1891 and left a widow and two children.
He discovered two asteroids, although the second was lost and only recovered about 100 years later.

Marlene Dietrich
music
Marlene Dietrich; (December 27, 1901 – May 6, 1992) was a German actress, singer, and entertainer. She is considered as being the first German actress to become successful in Hollywood.
In her long career, starting as a cabaret singer, chorus girl and film actress in Berlin in the 1920s, Hollywood movie star in the 1930s, World War II entertainer at the front of war during the 1940s, and finally as an international stage show performer from the 1950s to the 1970s, Dietrich became one of the most important movie icons of the 20th century. The American Film Institute ranked Dietrich No. 9 amongst the Greatest Female Stars of All Time.

John Terry
sports
John George Terry is an English professional football player. He was born on December 7, 1980 in London. Terry plays as a defender and is the captain of Chelsea in the English Premier League and the former captain of the England national football team.
Terry is known as one of the best defenders in the world. He was voted best defender in the UEFA Champions League in 2005. He was also the only English player to be named in the group of best players for the 2006 FIFA World Cup. He wears the number 26 shirt for Chelsea and the number 6 shirt for England. It was John Terry who missed the penalty which could have won the Champions League 2008. He slipped when he was taking the penalty, giving Manchester United the title.
Career.
Terry was a Chelsea Youth player. Before he became a defender he was a midfielder. To help Terry get some first team experience he was loaned out to Nottingham Forest.
Personal life.
John is married to his childhood sweetheart Toni Poole, who supported him financially when he was a Chelsea F.C trainee. They married on 15 June, 2007, in a stately home near their mansion in Chelsea. They have one-year-old twins, Georgie and Summer.

Tommy Lee Jones
sports
Tommy Lee Jones (born September 15, 1946) is an American actor and director. He won the Academy and the Golden Globe awards in 1993 for his role in the movie "The Fugitive".

Woody Allen
music
Woody Allen (born Allen Stewart Königsberg on December 1, 1935) is an American film director, writer, actor, jazz musician, comedian, and playwright, who has won the Academy Award three times, as well as many others in his very long career.
His many works and his cerebral film style, mixing satire and humor, have made him one of the most respected film directors in the modern era. Allen writes and directs his movies and has also acted in most of them. To inspire himself for his movies, Allen uses literature, philosophy, psychology, Judaism, European cinema and New York City, where he was born and has lived all life.

Austin Lightning
sports
The Austin Lightning is an amateur soccer team in Austin, Texas. It is in the Mid South division of the South Conference of the Premier Development League of the United Soccer Leagues.
The club was founded in 2003, when it was moved from Lafayette, Louisiana. The team finished last in the division in the 2007 season, due in part to scheduling difficulties caused by record amounts of rain in Austin, which cause fields to be closed on match days. The Austin Lightning are coached by Jaime Mimbela. Their colors are red and white.

Jiří Bělohlávek
music
Jiří Bělohlávek (born 24 February 1946 in Prague) is a Czech conductor. He is the principal (main) conductor of the BBC Symphony Orchestra.
Bělohlávek studied conducting with Sergiu Celibidache. Bělohlávek he went to the Prague Conservatory and Academy of Performing Arts in Prague. He won the 1970 Czech National Conducting Competition and soon became famous in his country and abroad.
Bělohlávek was chief conductor of the Prague Symphony Orchestra from 1977-1989. He became principal conductor of the Czech Philharmonic Orchestra in 1990 for a short time. Then he founded the Prague Philharmonia "(Pražskou komorní filharmonii)" in 1994, They gave concerts all over the world together and made many recordings. He is still their conductor laureate (honorary conductor).
From 1995-2000, Bělohlávek was principal guest conductor of the BBC Symphony Orchestra. In 2006 he became their principal conductor. He conducted them at the Proms that year. In 2007 he will conduct at the Last Night of the Proms for the first time.
Bělohlávek also conducts in the United States. He first conducted at the Metropolitan Opera (Met) in December 2004, conducting Leoš Janáček's "Kát'a Kabanová" with Karita Mattila in the title role. He returned to the Met in January and February of 2007 for the same composer's "Jenůfa," once again with Mattila, and with Anja Silja as the Kostelnička. Other guest conducting appearances in the US have been with the Philadelphia Orchestra and the Saint Louis Symphony Orchestra.
Trivia.
His name "Bělohlávek" means "Whitehead". It is pronounced "Bye-lo-hla-vek".

Urbain Le Verrier
science
Urbain Le Verrier (March 11, 1811 – September 23, 1877) was a French mathematician who was famous for co-discovering the planet, Neptune.

Pim Fortuyn
politics
Wilhelmus Simon Petrus (Pim) Fortuyn (, (February 19, 1948 – May 6, 2002) was a Dutch politician. He was the leader of the LPF ("Lijst Pim Fortuyn"), a right-wing political party. He was very popular and was expected to win the 2002 elections, but a few days before the elections, he was killed by an animal rights activist. He did not like the religion of Islam, and did not want to let Muslims from other countries come to the Netherlands.

Rafał Wiechecki
politics
Rafał Wiechecki (born September 25, 1978 in Piotrków Trybunalski) is a Polish politician.
He is member of the League of Polish Families. From May 5 2006 to August 13 2007 was the minister of Polish government. He was the youngest cabinet minister in Polish history.

Gordan Nikolitch
sports
Gordan Nikolitch (born 1968) is a Serbian violinist. He is the leader of the London Symphony Orchestra.
Gordan Nikolitch began playing the violin when he was seven. He studied at the Musikhochschule (music conservatoire) in Basel, Switzerland. He worked with many famous people including the composers Witold Lutosławski and György Kurtág. He became particularly interested in Baroque music and contemporary music.
Gordan has been the leader of the Orchestre d’Auvergne and the Orchestre de Chambre de Lausanne before becoming the leader of the London Symphony Orchestra. He has made many recordings, especially of violin music which is not well known. He often plays chamber music. The violin he plays was made in Cremona in 1776 by a violin maker called Lorenzo Storioni.

Hank Williams
music
Hiram King Williams (1923-1953), better known as Hank Williams (and sometimes as Hank Williams Sr.), was an American musician and songwriter.
Williams is known as "the Father of Country and Western Music", because his songs were some of the first to come from that genre. As with many musical pioneers, Williams did not set out to create a new kind of music. He simply wanted to make music that his listeners would enjoy, that he would also enjoy making for them.
Some of Williams's songs are "Your Cheatin' Heart", "Hey Good Lookin'", "Jambalaya", and "Cold, Cold Heart". The songs were easy to remember, and many fans sang along when they heard them. Other singers began to include Hank Williams songs in their repertoires. Williams made recordings, performed on radio and early television, and also made live appearances.
Sadly, Williams was one of the first superstars to have problems with alcohol and drugs. Well-meaning fans and friends would buy Williams drinks, or invite him to parties, and he would lose control. He began to miss shows, and to give bad performances because of the effects of drugs and alcohol. He lost many of his best engagements, and his reputation suffered.
Williams died at age 29 in early 1953, after a binge of alcohol drinking. He left behind a wife and son, Hank Williams Jr., who also grew up to become a country musician. Williams's songs are still popular, and sung by many musicians. Hank Jr. performed his father's music for many years, but later found success with songs of his own.

Smokey Robinson
music
William ("Smokey") Robinson (born 1940 in Detroit, Michigan) is an American singer and songwriter. Most of his hit records were on Motown Records or one of its labels, and many of them were performed with The Miracles, his longtime band. Robinson's mother died when he was young, and his sister raised him afterwards.
Robinson met Berry Gordy when Motown first became famous. He showed Gordy the lyrics to a song he had written. When Gordy asked if Smokey had any other songs, the young man pulled out a notebook with nearly a hundred of them. Few of the songs had potential, but Gordy liked what he saw in Robinson, and signed him and his band to Motown. Gordy helped Robinson become a better songwriter, and sometimes they wrote together. Some of Robinson's songs, like "My Girl" and "My Guy", were hits for other Motown artists.
Robinson's hits with the Miracles included "Goin' to a Go-Go", "You Really Got a Hold On Me", "Shop Around", "Ooh Baby Baby", "Mickey's Monkey", and "Baby, Baby Don't Cry". Stevie Wonder gave Robinson an unfinished song he'd begun in the studio, to see if he could add lyrics and a tune. The song reminded Robinson of circus music, and he remembered "I Pagliacci", an opera about clowns. The finished song was called "The Tears of a Clown", and it became another hit.
Robinson left the Miracles during the 1970s, and began a solo career. The Miracles still had hits (like "Love Machine"), and so did Robinson, with songs like "Cruisin'" and "Being With You".
In the 2000s, Robinson went into the frozen food business, with a line of gumbos and similar cuisine.

Gennady Rozhdestvensky
music
Gennady Rozhdestvensky (born 4 May 1931, Moscow) is a Russian conductor. Rozhdestvensky was born into a musical family. His name at first was Gennady Nikolayevich Anosov. When he started his musical career, he took his mother's maiden name.
Rozhdestvensky studied conducting with his father Nikolai Anosov at the Moscow Conservatory. He studied piano with the great pianist Lev Oborin. When he was 20 years old, he conducted Tchaikovsky's "Nutcracker" ballet at the Bolshoi Theatre. He soon became famous. He gave the first performances of many works of Soviet composers, as well as the first Russian performance of Benjamin Britten's "A Midsummer Night's Dream".
Rozhdestvensky has conducted many orchestras and made many recordings.
In 1969, he married the pianist Viktoria Postnikova.
Rozhdestvensky is known for keeping his rehearsals short. He does this so that the orchestra do not get tired and are fresh for the performance. Sometimes he walks about the stage while he conducts. He does not stand on a podium (a raised platform).
Orchestras he has conducted.
He has also conducted many of the world's greatest orchestras, including the Berlin Philharmonic, the Royal Concertgebouw, the Boston Symphony Orchestra, the Chicago Symphony Orchestra, the Cleveland Orchestra, and the London Symphony Orchestra.

Thomas Midgley
sports
Thomas Midgley (born 18 May 1889; died 2 November 1944), was an American inventor. He invented a lot of things. His two most famous inventions are both now banned because they are dangerous for the world environment: the use of lead in petrol (gasoline) and the use of chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs) in refrigerators. Midgley was accidentally killed by something he was inventing.
Early life.
Midgley was born in Beaver Falls, Pennsylvania. His father was also an inventor. He grew up in Columbus, Ohio, and graduated from Cornell University in 1911 with a degree in mechanical engineering.
Discovery of Ethyl.
In 1921 Midgely discovered that if tetra-ethyl lead (TEL) was added to petrol it helped to stop the engine knocking. The company he worked for, Dayton Research Laboratories, advertised the invention, but they did not call it "lead " because everyone knew that lead was poisonous. Instead, they called it "ethyl". When lead was added to petrol huge amounts of lead went into the atmosphere causing health problems all over the world. Midgley himself had to take long periods of holiday because his health was suffering through lead poisoning.
Lead continued to be put into petrol although several people working at the factory in DuPont's Deepwater, New Jersey died. GM and Standard Oil continued by using a more dangerous high-temperature method of using lead. More people started to suffer from lead poisoning: they started to hallucinate, became insane and died. In October 1924 Midgley talked at a press conference and told everybody that lead was safe. He put a bottle of the chemical under his nose and breathed it in for a minute. However, the plant was shut down after that.
Discovery of Freon.
In the 1930s Midgley developed a non-poisonous substance called CFC (chlorinated fluorocarbon) for use in refrigerators, inhalers and aerosol spray cans. He was given many high awards for his work and in 1944 he became president and chairman of the American Chemical Society.
His death.
In 1940, at the age of 51, Midgley became ill with polio which left him very disabled. He found it difficult to get out of bed. He decided to invent a complicated system of strings and pulleys to lift him from his bed. One day he got caught up in the ropes and died of strangulation.
After his death.
Midgley died before the days when people realized that CFCs were destroying the ozone layer which prevents harmful rays from the sun reaching the earth. They are now banned in refrigerators, but are still used in some countries.
In the United States it was not until 1973 that people started to produce gasoline without lead and, in 1996, the Clean Air Act banned the sale of leaded fuel for use in on-road vehicles. However it is still legal in the U.S. for aircraft, racing cars, farm equipment, and marine engines until 2008. Leaded gasoline is still common in South America, Africa, and some parts of Asia and the Middle East.

Franz Lehár
music
Franz Lehár (born 30 April 1870; died 24 October 1948) was an Austrian composer of Hungarian descent. He was the leading composer of operettas in the 20th century. He is still one of the most popular composers of light music.
His life.
Lehár was born in Komáron in the Austro-Hungarian Empire. Today the town is called Komárno and it is in Slovakia. He was the eldest son of a bandmaster in the Austro-Hungarian army. He studied violin and composition at the Prague Conservatory. Antonín Dvořák told him he should be a composer. After graduation in 1899 he joined his father's band in Vienna, as assistant bandmaster. In 1902 he became conductor at the historic Vienna Theater an der Wien, where his first opera "Wiener Frauen" was performed in November of that year.
He is most famous for his operettas. The best known one is "The Merry Widow" (in German: "Die lustige Witwe") which is probably the most popular of all operettas. He also wrote sonatas, symphonic poems, marches, and a number of waltzes, some of which come from his famous operettas. Some of the songs from his operettas have become very well-known, especially "Vilja" from "The Merry Widow" and "You Are My Heart's Delight" ("Dein ist mein ganzes Herz") from "The Land of Smiles".
The tenor Richard Tauber sang in many of his operettas. Six of them had parts especially written for him.
Lehár died in 1948 in Bad Ischl, near Salzburg where he was also buried. His villa in Bad Ischl is now a museum in his memory.

Britské listy
media
Britské listy are an Internet newspapers published in the Czech Republic. It usually presents left-wing political opinions. General editor of Britské listy is Jan Čulík.

Mandy Moore
music
Amanda Moore is an American pop singer and actress. She was born on April 10, 1984 and she has been active since the late 1990s and the 2000s.

Biathlon
sports
Biathlon (not to be confused with duathlon) is a term used to describe any sporting event made up of two disciplines. However, biathlon usually refers specifically to the winter sport that combines cross-country skiing and rifle shooting. Another popular variant is summer biathlon, which combines cross-country running with riflery.

John Couch Adams
science
John Couch Adams (June 5 1819–January 21, 1892), was an English mathematician and astronomer. Adams was born in Laneast, Cornwall and died in Cambridge, England. He was famous for co-discovering the planet, Neptune.

A. C. Bhaktivedanta Swami Prabhupada
sports
A. C. Bhaktivedanta Swami Prabhupada, also known as Srila Prabhupada (September 1 1896–November 14 1977) was the person who created the ISKCON movement.

Patti LaBelle
music
Patti LaBelle (born Patricia Louise Holt on May 24, 1944) is an American R&B and Soul singer. She is known for her high vocal belting (using the chest to make high pitch sounds). She is known for such songs as "New Attitude" and "On My Own".

Whitney Houston
music
Whitney Elizabeth Houston (born August 9, 1963) is an American pop and R&B singer. She is known for her beautiful and powerful voice. She is known for such songs as 'I Will Always Love You' or I wanna dance with some body and her version of 'The Star Spangled Banner.'.She is one of the most succesful female artists of all time. Her most famous albums are The Bodyguard (The best selling sountrack album of all time)her debut album Whitney Houston (The best selling debut album of all time) and album Whitney.She is known as the Voice. whitney Houston also played in the Preacher's Wife. These past few years Whitney Houston has had trouble with drugs. However, Whitney showed her love and devotion to singing by retraining her voice and by making a new album. Whitney's new album comes out in November 2008!

Gwen Stefani
music
Gwen Renée Stefani is an American singer. She was born on October 3, 1969 in United States. She has a child and a husband. She has millions of fans around the world.
Early life.
Gwen Stefani was born and raised in Fullerton, California.

Teddy Randazzo
music
Teddy Randazzo (May 13, 1935 - November 21, 2003) was an American singer, songwriter and record producer, best known for his work in the 1950s and 1960s. One of the groups he worked with was Little Anthony and the Imperials.
Randazzo appeared as himself in a 1962 movie, "Don't Knock the Twist", which was about the Twist craze of the early 1960s.

Hank Ballard
music
Hank Ballard (November 18, 1936 - March 2, 2003) was an American musician and songwriter. One of his songs, "The Twist", became a huge hit for singer Chubby Checker, and began an international dance craze.

Emily Osment
music
Emily Jordan Osment (born March 10, 1992 in Los Angeles, California) is an American actress and singer.She is most famous for her roles of Gerti Giggles in the "Spy Kids" trilogy, and Lilly Truscott in "Hannah Montana".

My December
music
"My December" is Kelly Clarkson's third album. The songs Never Again, Sober and One Minute have been released.

Alberto Gonzales
politics
Alberto Gonzales (born August 4, 1955) is an American jurist who is the 80th Attorney General of the United States. Gonzales was appointed to the position in February 2005 by President George W. Bush. While Bush was Governor of Texas, Gonzales was part of his general counsel, and later was the Secretary of State of Texas and then was on the Texas Supreme Court. From 2001 to 2005, Gonzales served in the Bush Administration as White House Counsel.
On August 27, 2007, Gonzales announced that he is quitting his position as Attorney General, and that his last day will be September 16, 2007. He did not say why he is leaving. He is the highest-ranking Hispanic ever in the United States federal government.

Liam Neeson
sports
William John "Liam" Neeson OBE (born June 7, 1952) is an Irish actor, nominated for many awards including the Oscar. He is Famous for his role as Oskar Schindler in the 1993 movie "Schindler's List", and after that he has appeared in several popular movie series, including the "Star Wars" prequel trilogy, "The Chronicles of Narnia" and "Batman Begins". He has also continued to play real-life characters, including Michael Collins and Alfred Kinsey.

Stacy London
media
Stacy London (born May 25, 1969 in New York City, New York) is an American fashionconsultant and mediapersonality. She known best for her role as a co-host on the makeover reality program "What Not to Wear".

Ashley Tisdale
music
Ashley Tisdale (born July 2, 1985) is an American actress and singer. She is known for co-starring in the movies "High School Musical" and "High School Musical 2". She also played candy counter girl, Maddie Fitzpatrick, on the Disney Channel television series "The Suite Life of Zack and Cody". She began singing and acting at an early age. She has released one studio album called "Headstrong". Some of her songs are "Be Good to Me", "Headstrong", "Not that Girl" and "Over It". Her original hair color is brown but she changed it for the series "The Suite Life of Zack and Cody".

Vanessa Hudgens
music
Vanessa Anne Hudgens (born December 14, 1988) is an American actress. She is also Polish, Luxembourgish, Irish, and Indian. She is most well known for starring in "High School Musical" and "High School Musical 2" on Disney Channel. Hudgens has won many awards and been nominated since "High School Musical". She has been on many TV shows and movies. She began acting and singing at an early age.

Let It Be
music
"Let it Be" was a 1970 album and movie, by rock band The Beatles. It was the last Beatles project finished before the band broke up.
History.
After the "White Album" ("The Beatles") was released in late 1968, the Beatles talked about making a television special, where they would play songs from the album for an audience. It would be the band's first live public performance since 1966.
As 1969 began, the band decided instead to begin work on a new set of songs, and film the process of rehearsing and recording all the songs, then performing them live. The project was titled "Get Back", and a song by that name was worked up during rehearsals. The band agreed to perform all the songs without studio retouching or overdubs, as they had long used.
First week: Twickenham Film Studios.
The Beatles rented a soundstage at Twickenham Film Studios, where their instruments and equipment were set up. They were used to working from afternoons until late at night on music, but had to arrive between eight and ten o'clock in the morning, to meet the filming schedule. The band did not use this setup for long. The early hours and the cold, huge soundstage made them uncomfortable.
There was also friction between the Beatles, and it showed. The Beatles could not agree on where to perform the show, and for how large an audience. The suggested locations ranged from Los Angeles, California to Tunisia, and the size of the audience from a few dozen to thousands of people. Nobody had a location in mind that the rest liked, and George Harrison decided he did not want to perform a public concert at all.
Paul McCartney took charge of the rehearsals, and drove the band hard to play his new songs just the way he imagined them. The other Beatles became tired of this, because it did not give them much chance to improvise, the way they were used to doing. George Harrison got especially tired of McCartney telling him what to play, and his own songs not getting the attention they deserved. John Lennon also had new songs, but was more interested in spending time with Yoko Ono than in making another Beatles record. He was also critical of Harrison's new songs. Yoko Ono gave her opinions on the band's music, which they were not used to hearing from anyone but their producer, George Martin. McCartney and Harrison resented Ono's being at Lennon's side constantly. Ringo Starr tried to play the peacemaker, but did not always succeed. Harrison walked out during one lunch break, saying he had had enough. The band stopped work on the production, and decided to find a new location to work.
The next weeks: Apple Studio.
Harrison went to a Beatles business meeting, a few days after he left the rehearsal. McCartney agreed to mend his ways, and let Harrison have more input. Lennon and Harrison also made up. The idea of finishing "Get Back" with a public show was dropped. Nobody wanted to return to the movie studio, and they began to look for another place to work on their new songs.
"Magic Alex", a Greek-born inventor, had been hired by the Beatles to build them a new recording studio, in the basement of the townhouse which was the home of their company, Apple Corps. Alex spent a great deal of money over many months, trying to make a first-rate facility. He did not understand recording or studio technology well, though, and the studio he made had many technical problems. The Beatles only found this out when they tried to use the place to record. Things did not work, and this added to the tension felt by the band, and the people who worked for them.
George Martin was able to help the Beatles, by working around the problems in the basement studio. He borrowed recording equipment so the band could finish their project. The movie cameras were also set up in the basement, and the Beatles went back to work on their music. This time things were as crowded as the first location was cavernous, and again the band and their crew were uncomfortable.
The Beatles usually "warmed up" by playing old songs they had learned growing up. Many of these were captured on camera or tape during the sessions. Not all the songs were complete, or true to their original versions. When the band went from playing old songs to trying out new ones, problems came up. Lennon, McCartney, and Harrison each wanted certain things for their music, and enough time to make the records the best they could be. This did not always work out, and they sometimes insulted each other for trying to outdo the others, or for letting their musical influences show. It made the sessions unpleasant.
George Harrison helped the morale of the band, when he brought a guest musician, Billy Preston, to the sessions. All of the Beatles liked Preston, and got along while he was there. He played keyboards along with the band, and gave the records a fuller sound. McCartney's girlfriend Linda brought her daughter Heather to the studio, and they helped cheer things up. Linda sang background vocals on "Let it Be", a gospel-like song by McCartney.
The question of where and when to finally perform the new songs was settled, when the Beatles decided to give a show on the roof of Apple headquarters. This happened on January 30, 1969, early in the afternoon. The Beatles performed for the movie cameras, and for anyone who could hear them outside.
As it happened, the music coming from the rooftop caused a traffic jam along Savile Row, where the building was located. Local police came to Apple, and tried to stop the show. Mal Evans, one of the Beatles's most trusted helpers, went downstairs and talked to the police, to stall them until the band could finish playing. After performing "Get Back", "Don't Let Me Down", "I've Got A Feeling", "One After 909", "Dig A Pony", and another version of "Get Back", the band went inside.
The next day, the Beatles gave another show, back in the Apple basement. This show was for the cameras, though, and not a live audience. They performed "Two of Us", "Don't Let Me Down", "Let it Be", "Get Back", and "The Long and Winding Road". Some of these songs were too hard to record outdoors, with their keyboard parts.
Post-Production.
The film crew shot more than a hundred hours of movie footage, which was more than enough to make a television special. The Beatles worked a little longer on the recordings of the "Get Back" songs, ending up with over twenty-nine hours of session tapes. The problem was, nobody was happy with the music that had come from the sessions. The band members had argued and disagreed on camera, and did not always make their best efforts on each other's songs, or to get along. This was plain to anyone who saw the footage, or listened to the dialogue between songs.
George Martin tried to remix the recordings, and make an album from the songs, while the Beatles' film personnel tried to edit the movie footage into the TV special the band wanted. The band's problems were only magnified by the results, and they blamed each other, and the people who worked for them, for what showed. The Beatles decided to abandon the project, and work on other things. Only one single was released from the sessions, with the songs "Get Back" and "Don't Let Me Down". Billy Preston's name appeared underneath the band's, and stories started that Preston might join the Beatles. He never did, but he signed a recording contract with Apple Records, their record label. The other songs stayed "in the can".
The "Get Back" project became another problem that was dividing the Beatles. There was also trouble with Apple Corps, and personal issues between the band members. They had begun to make music apart the year before, and this increased as they stopped getting along as people. McCartney and Lennon both married their girlfriends, and lost control of their publishing company, Northern Songs. George Harrison began to play with musicians outside the Beatles. Ringo Starr started a new career as an actor in movies. The Beatles issued a new single, with the songs "The Ballad of John and Yoko" and "Old Brown Shoe". John and Paul played on the first song, and George and Ringo on the second. They had stopped working as a unit, and George Martin stopped coming to recording sessions, which he had never done before.
"Abbey Road".
During the summer of 1969, the Beatles felt sorry for the way the "Get Back" sessions had gone. They wanted to forget that time, and make another new album of songs, back at Abbey Road Studios. George Martin decided to come back, on the band's promise that they really would work together "like the old days", with Martin taking charge. The band kept their promise. "Abbey Road" was the result, and was issued in the early fall. As the record was being released, the Beatles met to discuss future projects. John Lennon, freshly back from his first non-Beatles concert, playing in Toronto, surprised everyone by announcing that he was quitting the band. He agreed to not make a public announcement, because this would have hurt the band's chance to renegotiate their recording contract. Lennon instead focused on his and Yoko Ono's new group, the Plastic Ono Band.
"Let it Be".
At the end of the year, Apple's accountants told the Beatles that they would have to release some kind of album and program from the "Get Back" sessions. They had spent too much money on the project to just forget about it. Glyn Johns, a young music producer, tried to assemble an album from the session tapes, but he also couldn't please the Beatles. Anxious fans and insiders worked together and released a bootleg album from Johns's mix. Even though it was an unauthorised album, it sold many copies and received radio airplay. The public wanted to hear the songs, good or bad.
Phil Spector, a legendary producer who predated the Beatles, had always wanted to work with them. Allen Klein brought Spector to England early in 1970 to meet them. John Lennon and George Harrison got along well with Spector, who produced a record of Lennon's song "Instant Karma!" the same day he wrote it. Lennon and Harrison gave their OK for Spector to work on the recordings, and Ringo Starr played along with the musicians Spector hired, to make overdubs. This went against the original plan to present the songs live, but was accepted to "sweeten" – and finish – the recordings.
An eighty-minute program was edited together from the film footage, and the band decided it would make a better movie than a television show. The Beatles had a contract with United Artists, who agreed to distribute the movie, which was titled "Let it Be". (The "Get Back" title was dropped, since "Get Back" had already appeared as a single almost a year earlier.)
Some of the new songs that appeared in the movie, including "Across the Universe" and "I Me Mine", were not finished on record. A session was scheduled in January 1970 to record full versions of some songs, but John Lennon refused to attend. George Harrison made a joke about this, during a take of "I Me Mine", referring to Lennon as "Dave Dee", another British musician.
Spector applied his "Wall of Sound" style to the Beatles recordings, including an old tape of "Across the Universe", so it could appear on record. His finished album was listenable, and showed none of the troubles that affected the band during the sessions, but it didn't sound the same as other Beatles albums. Paul McCartney hated the changes Spector made to his songs on the album, especially "The Long and Winding Road", but he could not stop the album from being issued.
Another problem was the timing of the record's release. Allen Klein had succeeded in remaking the Beatles's recording deal, and McCartney wasn't bound by the same promise Lennon had been, to not say he was leaving the band. His first solo album, finished early in 1970, included a press release stating that he had no further plans to work with the Beatles. This effectively broke up the band. He also wanted the album released ahead of "Let it Be".
Ringo Starr, who also had a solo record ("Sentimental Journey"), due to appear, was sent to ask McCartney to change his release date. The two argued, and McCartney threw Starr out of his house. The release schedule was changed, so McCartney could have his wish. Starr's album appeared earlier than planned, and "Let it Be" was pushed back from April to May.
Reception.
"Let it Be" was both a hit movie and a hit album, and won a Grammy Award for Best Soundtrack. Paul McCartney accepted the award. The news that the Beatles were breaking up was very sad to their fans, however, and the knowledge made watching the movie a bittersweet experience. Many fans and critics did not like Spector's changes to the Beatles style on record, and said so publicly.
A souvenir book was also issued, but instead of being a real document of the sessions, the book was censored and heavily edited, and reflected little of what was intended. It never appeared in the United States.
Late in 1970, John Lennon issued a solo album, "John Lennon/Plastic Ono Band", which made his feelings plain in its last song, "God": Lennon sang "I don't believe in Beatles." He gave a long interview to "Rolling Stone" magazine, which was later published as a book, "Lennon Remembers". He told his side of the "Let it Be" story, declared "That movie was set up by Paul, for Paul", and said he regretted not announcing that he quit the Beatles first.
When home video came along in the 1970s, "Let it Be" became a popular rental and sales title. Over time, the Beatles asserted their copyright control over the movie, and copies were withdrawn. The movie has been planned as a reissue many times, but has yet to be officially released on DVD.
In 2003, recording engineers went back to the old session tapes, and used digital remastering to make a new version of the familiar "Let it Be" songs. The new version was close to what the Beatles had wanted to make in the first place, and had none of Spector's post-production work. The album was issued as "Let it Be... Naked", and was praised as a "real"-sounding recording.

Linda McCartney
music
Lady Linda Louise Eastman See McCartney (1941-1998) was the first wife of musician Paul McCartney. She is the mother of artists Heather McCartney and Mary McCartney, fashion designer Stella McCartney, and musician James McCartney. Her father was attorney Lee Eastman, whose law partner was his son (Linda's brother) John Eastman. Her mother was Louise Linder, who was an heiress to a department store fortune.
Early life.
Linda grew up in Scarsdale, New York, and attended Sarah Lawrence College. She enjoyed music, and sang girl group songs with friends. When the Beatles became famous in America, she attended one of their concerts. She never considered a musical career.
Linda married a geologist, John See, and they had a daughter, named Heather. See wanted to move to Africa to work, and take his wife and daughter. Linda did not want to go, and they were divorced. She became a photographer, and took pictures for magazines and the press.
Before long, she began to photograph rock bands and singers. She became well-known for this. The Rolling Stones once made her the exclusive photographer for one of their public appearances. In time, she visited England, to photograph the pop stars there.
The Beatles.
Linda had been attracted most of all to John Lennon of the Beatles when she first saw them. In person, though, she was charmed more by another Beatle, Paul McCartney, when they met. McCartney was engaged to actress Jane Asher, but she wanted to wait to have children, and McCartney did not. Their engagement ended. McCartney loved to spend time with Linda's daughter Heather, and the three of them seemed to make a family. Linda and Heather moved into McCartney's home during 1968.
Early in 1969, Linda became pregnant. She and McCartney were married, and had a baby (named Mary after McCartney's own mother) the next year. During this same time, the Beatles were growing apart. They had business problems, and no longer had the same kinds of plans or hopes. Linda hoped her father and brother, whose clients were mostly entertainment personalities, could help solve the business problems. The fact that they were her family (and now McCartney's, by marriage) did not put the other Beatles at ease. They chose Allen Klein to represent them instead. Klein and the Eastmans did not get along, and this caused further problems. The Beatles began to break up late in 1969.
Besides the band's problems, Paul McCartney and John Lennon had grown apart personally. Lennon divorced his first wife Cynthia in 1968, and started a relationship with Japanese artist Yoko Ono. They were also married in 1969. Lennon and Ono spent as much time as possible together, and McCartney often felt out of place. McCartney and Linda also spent a lot of time together, but separated to work on their own projects. Linda and Yoko did not get along well, but each supported their men, and encouraged them to believe in themselves. Later, some fans blamed one or both women for breaking up the Beatles, but their role was not crucial to that. It was one of many factors that drove the band apart.
After the Beatles.
Paul McCartney suffered from depression for a time, when the Beatles ended. It had been his longtime band, made up of good friends, and he had lost both. He turned to his family for comfort. Linda and their children were always there. McCartney and Lennon argued in the media, and Linda also took verbal jabs at Lennon and Yoko Ono. Surprisingly, when they met in person, everyone usually acted in a completely different way, and were kind to each other.
Linda began to sing with her husband, and to help him to write new songs. He wanted her to do this, and liked her input. He also wanted to perform again for small audiences, as the Beatles had done in their early days. He taught Linda to play piano, so she could share in the experience. Linda did not become a virtuoso musician or singer, but she added to the sound of McCartney's new band, which he called Wings. The couple enjoyed performing together, as part of a band.
Adding other musicians, Wings began to play small shows, sometimes turning up at a school or club in the morning and asking to play, for no charge. As they played more, they began to give regular concerts, and to go on tours. The McCartneys would bring their children along during their school vacations. The McCartney children did not realise their parents were celebrities, and the family atmosphere between all of them was strong.
Although now a musician, Linda continued her photography, and published books of her works. She and McCartney also became vegetarians, out of their love of animals. Linda became a crusader for animal rights and related causes. She learned and made recipes for vegetarian meals, and began to write cookbooks.
After Wings ended, Linda still recorded and performed with her husband, but she was now recognized as an activist for social causes, and for charity work. She launched a line of vegetarian frozen dinners. They became popular, and in time made Linda wealthy on her own. Paul McCartney was knighted in 1997, and Linda was named Lady McCartney.
In the late 1990s, she developed breast cancer, which had killed McCartney's mother years earlier. Medicine had advanced since that time, but Linda lost her battle with cancer. She died in 1998, at the Arizona ranch she owned with her husband. A memorial service was held in London, England, and former Beatles George Harrison and Ringo Starr attended, marking the last time they and Paul McCartney appeared and performed together in public.

Jeff Hardy
music
Jeffrey Nero "Jeff" Hardy (born August 31 1977) is an American professional wrestler. He is currently working on the "SmackDown!" brand of World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE), where he is the reigning WWE Champion. He is the younger brother of "ECW" superstar, Matt Hardy. When not wrestling, Hardy enjoys motorcross and scupture. He is also the founder of the "Peroxwhy?gen".
Career.
Jeff Hardy says that Sting, The Ultimate Warrior, and Shawn Michaels were the reasons why he wanted to get into wrestling as a child. Jeff had been on seen on WWF television as early as age 16. His first WWF match, against The 1-2-3 Kid, came on May 25, 1994 in Erie, Pennsylvania. Early on, Jeff, along with his brother Matt and friends, started their own wrestling organization, the TWF (Trampoline Wrestling Federation). In it they would perform many of the moves they saw on TV. The federation eventually became a part of a county fair in North Carolina, U.S.. Jeff, Matt, and friends then began to work for other independent wrestling companies. They drove all over the East Coast of the United States, working for companies many small companies.
The Hardy Boys (1998-2002).
The Hardy brothers eventually caught the eyes of the World Wrestling Federation. Jeff was only 16 at the time. After being signed to a contract in 1998, they were trained by Dory Funk, Jr. in his Funkin' Dojo. They were trained with other notable wrestlers such as Kurt Angle, Christian, Test, and A-Train. When the team was finally brought up to WWF TV, they formed the tag team called The Hardy Boyz. During this time, they were managed by Michael Hayes. In 1999, they fought mainly with Edge and Christian.
The team of Matt and Jeff won the WWE Tag Team Championship six times. Because of this, they would be known as one of the most successful tag teams in WWE history. In 2000, Matt and Jeff found a new manager in their real-life friend Lita. Together, the three became known as "Team Xtreme".
Jeff was well known for his high risk stunts in many of the Hardy Boy's matches. He made a name for himself because of the riskes he took during this time. In 2001, Jeff would also hold the WWF Intercontinental, Light Heavyweight and Hardcore Championships.
Singles competition (2002-2003).
After years in the tag team division, Jeff fought The Undertaker in a Ladder match for the Championship. Jeff did not win, but earned the Undertaker's respect. Jeff competed for singles titles several times, but did not win.
Jeff was released from WWE on April 22, 2003. The reasons given for the release were Jeff's strange behavior, drug use, and not showing up for matches. Hardy also said "burn out" and the need for time off were reasons for leaving WWE.
Total Nonstop Action Wrestling (2004-2006).
Hardy started wrestling in Total Nonstop Action Wrestling on June 23 2004 at the TNA pay-per-view, the "Second Anniversary Show". He was in a match against A.J. Styles for the X - Division title. The match ended in a no-contest when Kid Kash and Dallas interfered. Hardy returned to TNA on July 21 and was given a chance to fight for the NWA World Heavyweight Championship. Hardy challenged for the title on September 8 but lost to NWA World Heavyweight Champion Jeff Jarrett.
World Wrestling Entertainment (2006-present).
On August 4 2006, WWE announced that Hardy was working with the company again. He returned on the August 21 episode of "RAW". On the day of his return, Hardy defeated Edge by disqualification when Lita pulled Edge out of the ring. After failing to win the Intercontinental Championship from Johnny Nitro over the next few weeks, Hardy finally defeated Nitro to win his second Intercontinental Championship on the October 2 edition of "RAW". On the November 6 episode of "RAW", Hardy lost the Intercontinental Championship back to Johnny Nitro. Just a week after he lost the title to Nitro, Hardy won it again on the November 13 edition of "RAW". This was Hardy's third time as Intercontinental Champion.
On the November 21 episode of "ECW" Jeff teamed with his brother Matt for the first time in almost five years to defeat the Full Blooded Italians.
With Jeff Hardy still feuding with Johnny Nitro in 2007, Jeff was challenged once again by Johnny Nitro at New Year's Revolution 2007 for the Intercontinental Championship. Hardy once again defeated Nitro. Hardy later lost the title to Umaga. On the September 3 edition of "RAW", Jeff successfully captured his 4th WWE Intercontinental Championship by defeating Umaga for the title. At Armageddon 2007, Hardy will fight Triple H, with the winner getting a WWE Championship match at the Royal Rumble. This match was seen to many as the most important match of Hardy's career, as his win against Triple H has finally moved Hardy into the top level of the roster and the race for the WWE Championship. However, he lost to Randy Orton at the Royal Rumble. He will fight in the Elimination Chamber at No Way Out on February 17th for a place in the main event at Wrestlemania.
Jeff Hardy came second in the Elimation Chamber match, being beaten by Triple H. He has competed in various matches and was going to WrestleMania XXIV to fight in the Money in the Bank ladder match. Jeff lost the Intercontinental Championship to Chris Jericho on the March 10 edition of "RAW". The next day, it was confirmed that Jeff Hardy had been put on 60-day suspension, as he failed his second drug test. This meant that he did not compete at WrestleMania.
Jeff Hardy returned the May 12, 2008 edition of "RAW", when General Manager William Regal told him he was to pay for his "sins" (read the paragraph before) by fighting Umaga. Jeff Hardy won with a ""Whisper in the Wind".
On December 14, 2008 at Armageddon he won the WWE Championship.

Hans Christian Ørsted
science
Hans Christian Ørsted (August 14, 1777 – March 9, 1851) was a Danish physicist and chemist. He is best known for discovering the relationship between electricity and magnetism known as electromagnetism.
Ørsted was also a writer and poet. His poetry series "Luftskibet" ("Airship") was inspired by the balloon flights of his physicist friend, Étienne-Gaspard Robert.

Anne Robinson
media
Anne Josephine Robinson (born September 26, 1944) is an English television presenter and television game show hostess who is most famous for hosting the BBC game show, "The Weakest Link" which earned her the nickname "Queen of Mean". She was also one of the presenters on the long-running British consumer affairs series, "Watchdog", from 1993 to 2001.

Deryck Whibley
music
Deryck Whibley (born March 21, 1980) is a Canadian singer and musician from the band Sum 41. He is the husband to Avril Lavigne.

Rainbow jersey
sports
The Rainbow jersey is a special jersey worn by world champion cyclists during races.
It is mainly white with five horizontal bands in the UCI colours around the chest. From the bottom up the colours are: green, yellow, black, red and blue, the same colours that appear in the rings on the olympic flag. There are different jerseys for each discipline (road racing, track racing, cyclo-cross, BMX, and the types of mountain biking).
A cyclist must wear the jersey when competing in the same discipline, category and speciality that he is world champion for. For example, the world road race champion would wear the jersey while competing in stage races and one-day races, but would not during time trials. Similarly, on the track, the world individual pursuit champion would only wear the jersey when competing in other individual pursuit events.
A champion who does not wear the rainbow jersey can be fined 2500 to 5000 Swiss francs..
The team's sponsor pays a lot of money to have their name on each rider's jersey. They can still put their names on the world champion's jersey, but probably smaller because there is less space. Sponsor's do not mind because the world champion gets a lot mkre publiitc than ordinary rids.
A world champion who is leading a stage race wears the race-leader's jersey, not the world champion's, but only while he is leader.

Abdus Salam
science
Doctor Abdus Salam (January 29, 1926; Santokdas, Sahiwal Punjab – November 21, 1996; Oxford, England) was a Pakistani theoretical physicist and Nobel laureate in Physics for his work in Electro-Weak Theory.
During the war years a scheme was set up for the farmers to study abroad. He as a result went to England for studies. In 1951 he returned to Pakistan, but he found that he was cut off from the rest of the scientific world there. He again went to England where he started having interest in the Grand Unified Theory.
He believed that if the Creator of the universe was one then the origin of all the forces had to be be single also. He then set off to unify the Electromagnetic and the Weak Nuclear Force.
According to another scientist, Peter Higgs, a field existed i.e. the Higgs field. it had many corrugurations. Abdus Salam concluded that the Z and W particles, the weak force carriers, travelled on these rough features therefore they gained mass. while the photons travelled along these uneven features and therefore were massless.

Discovery Channel Pro Cycling Team
sports
The Discovery Channel Pro Cycling Team was a professional racing team.
The US Postal Service stopped sponsoring their team in 2004. The Discovery Channel took over sponsorship in June 2004 in time for the new UCI ProTour
On February 10 2007 Discovery Channel decided not renew its sponsorship of the team at the end of the 2007 season. The decision to end its sponsorship is believed to be related to the sacking of Discovery Networks president Billy Campbell by David Zaslav, the new president of Discovery Communications the same day.
On 10 August 2007 Tailwind Sports, who are the team's licence holders, said the team would stop racing at the end of the year<. They could not find a new sponsor and blamed bad publicity about doping in the 2007 Tour de France.
The most famous member of the Discovery Channel team was Lance Armstrong who won seven Tours de France before he retired in 2005.
Current members of the team, such as 2007 Tour de France winner Alberto Contador, 3rd placed Levi Leipheimer and George Hincapie all had to find new teams. Hincapie joined Team T-Mobile. Many think Contador may have trouble finding a new team because of rumours about being involved in the very big Operation Puerto doping scandal.
2007 squad.
As of April 30, 2007.

Charles Gounod
music
Charles-François Gounod (born Paris 18 June 1818; died Saint-Cloud (France) 18 October 1893) was a French composer. Gounod (pronounce: “Goo – no”) wrote many different kinds of pieces, but he is best known today for his operas "Faust" and "Roméo et Juliette" and, especially, for the very popular “Ave Maria” which is a melody that goes with a prelude by Johann Sebastian Bach.
Early life.
Gounod was born in Paris. His father was a painter and engraver. His mother was his first piano teacher. When his father died in 1823 his mother started a school for piano tuition. Gounod soon showed musical talent and went to study at the Paris Conservatoire. He studied with three teachers, all of whom died soon after Gounod became their pupil. The first time he competed for the Prix de Rome he did not get it, but the second time, in 1839, he was successful. This meant that he could go to Rome to learn more about music.
In Rome he liked the religious music of the 16th century by composers such as Palestrina. He did not much like the modern opera composers such as Donizetti and Bellini. Gounod also spent some of the year in Austria and Germany. He passed through Leipzig where he met Mendelssohn, whose music made a big impression on him.
Gounod returned to Paris where he got a job as director of music at a church. He thought of becoming a priest, but then he changed his mind. He left his job in the church. Some time later he became friends with the singer Pauline Viardot and her husband Louis. He spent some time at their house composing the opera "Sapho".
He composed the "Messe Sollennelle", also known as the "Saint Cecilia Mass". This work was first performed in London during 1851 and it helped him to become famous. By this time he was married. He had a job in charge of several choirs. He started to write a lot of choral music.
He wrote two symphonies in 1855, although they are not often played today.
Middle period.
In 1856 he started to write the opera by which he is now best remembered: "Faust" (1859), based on the first part of the play "Faust" by Goethe. The opera was produced in 1859 and soon was performed in many countries, especially in Germany. The composer Richard Wagner was the most important opera composer in Germany and his operas were quite different, so he said that Gounod’s operas were silly. Gounod had liked Wagner’s music until then, but when Wagner made rude remarks about his music Gounod decided he did not like Wagner’s music.
When the Franco-Prussian war broke out in 1870 Gounod went to live in England. He stayed there for five years becoming the first conductor of what is now the Royal Choral Society. Gounod wrote a lot of music for choirs at this time, including a motet composed especially for the grand opening of the Royal Albert Hall in 1871. He worked very hard, although he was often depressed about the war situation in France. His house in Saint-Cloud had been destroyed. He returned to France in 1875 and was glad to be back with his family.
He wrote much chamber music, including four string quartets, but these are hardly ever played today.
Last years.
Later in his life, Gounod became very interested in religion again. He wrote a lot of religious music, including his famous musical setting of Ave Maria based on the first prelude from Book I of the "Well-Tempered Clavier" by J.S. Bach and "Hymnus Pontificius" the anthem of Vatican. He also wrote two oratorios, including "Mors et vita" which Queen Victoria liked so much that she asked for it to be played in the Royal Albert Hall in 1886.
He was just finishing a requiem called "Le Grand Requiem" when he died. He was given a state funeral. He asked for all the music at his funeral to be chant only.

Rugby World Cup Sevens
sports
The Rugby World Cup Sevens is the world's premier international contest in the Sevens version of rugby union, first held in Scotland in 1993 and held every four years. The winning trohy is the Melrose Cup, named after the Scottish town of Melrose where the first sevens game was played. The current holders are Fiji who have won the Cup twice since it was first played in 1993.

Louis P. Lochner
media
Louis P. Lochner (born Ludwig) (February 22, 1887 – 1975) was a Pulitzer Prize winning American journalist at the Associated Press. He won the Pulitzer Prize for his work reporting the news from Nazi Germany.

Ernest MacMillan
music
Sir Ernest MacMillan (born Mimico, Ontario, 18 August 1893; died 6 May 1973) was a famous Canadian conductor and composer.
MacMillan's father was a Scottish Presbyterian minister and musician. He was a child prodigy. He gave his first organ recital in Massey Hall at the age of ten. After studying in Britain and gaining the ARCO and FRCO diplomas at the Royal College of Organists, he studied modern history at the University of Toronto from 1911 to 1914.
Prisoner in Germany.
In 1914 he went to Europe. He wanted to study at the Paris Conservatoire but this was closed because of the political situation. He went on to Germany to attend the Bayreuth Festival, but World War I started and he was taken prisoner and kept at the Ruhleben civilian detention camp near Berlin. He helped the other people who were prisoners in the camp to put on concerts. He gave talks about classical music and conducted a performance of the Gilbert and Sullivan opera "Mikado" as well as a pantomime version of "Cinderella". This helped him to get experience in conducting. He also took part in the drama productions. He studied hard and was given a BA degree from the University of Toronto (1915) and a D Mus from the University of Oxford (1918), although he was locked up in the camp all this time.
After the war.
After the war he returned to Canada where he gave organ recitals and lectured about his experiences in Ruhleben. From 1926 to 1942 he was principal of the "Toronto Conservatory of Music", later to become the Royal Conservatory of Music. He was the conductor of the Toronto Symphony Orchestra between 1931 and 1956. He did a lot for music in Canada,and he was knighted in 1935 by King George V. In 1969 he was made a Companion of the Order of Canada. He died in Toronto in 1973.
When he conducted he often took the music very slowly. This gave him the nickname "Lord Largo" ("Largo" means "slow and broad" in music). He had an amazing musical memory and he could improvise very well. MacMillan helped to record and preserve the traditional songs and music of Canada's aboriginal or First Nations people. He had an important influence on almost every part of Canadian musical life.

Benjamin Dale
music
Benjamin Dale (born London 17 July 1885; died London 30 July 1943) was a British composer.
Dale won many prizes at the Royal Academy of Music for composition when he was still very young. He wrote a " Piano sonata in D minor" which shows the influence of Romantic composers such as Liszt and Schumann. It was played by pianists such as York Bowen and Dame Myra Hess who were becoming famous. He wrote music for viola for Lionel Tertis to play.
He was in Germany when World War I broke out and was a prisoner in the camp at Ruhleben. There were other musicians there, including the Canadian Ernest MacMillan who later became a famous conductor. They organized a lot of musical events at the camp. Ernest MacMillan gave lectures about each of the nine symphonies by Beethoven, after which he and Dale would play the whole symphony in a piano duet arrangement.
After the war he worked as an Associated Board examiner. He became professor of harmony at the Royal Academy of Music. He continued to compose music. His ballade for violin was especially popular. Dale’s music is not played much today, but there have been some attempts to make his music known again through CD recordings.

Pierre Curie
science
Pierre Curie (Paris, France, May 15, 1859 – April 19, 1906, Paris) was a French physicist.
He shared the 1903 Nobel Prize in physics with his wife, Marie Curie and Henri Becquerel
Work.
Pierre Curie is not as well known as Marie Curie. But Pierre and his brother did a lot of important work before Pierre married and started working with his wife Marie Curie. They were the first to use the term "radioactivity," and were pioneers in its study. Pierre and his brother Jacques built a special meter for measuring small amounts of electricity which Pierre and Marie used in their other discoveries.
Pierre died after a carriage accident in Paris on April 19, 1906. His head crushed under the wheels. If he had lived he would probably have died by radiation poisoning as Marie did. As they were the first to study radioactivity they did not know how dangerous it was.
After Pierre's death a group of scientists at the Radiology Congress decided to honour him by naming the unit of radioactivity a curie.
Children.
Pierre and Marie Curie's daughter Irène Joliot-Curie and their son-in-law Frédéric Joliot-Curie were also physicists involved in the study of radioactivity, and were also awarded the Nobel prize for their work. Their other daughter Eve wrote her mother's biography. His grand-daughter Hélène Langevin-Joliot is a professor of nuclear physics at the University of Paris and his grandson, Pierre Joliot, who was named after him, is a noted biochemist.

Agha Petros
politics
Agha Petros (Syriac: ܐܓܐ ܦܜܪܘܣ; born 1 April 1880, died 2 February 1932) was an Assyrian General during World War I. Petros was born in the Lower Baz village, Ottoman Empire.
Agha Petros defeated the Turks in Sauj Bulak and drove them back to Rowanduz. Agha Petros had no real influence over Assyrians or Armenians, and was not trusted by many of them.

The New York Times
media
The "New York Times", often called just the "Times" is a newspaper maker in New York City and is made worldwide. It is owned by The New York Times Company, which makes 15 other newspapers.
"The New York Times" also has a national list of bestselling books, in several categories.

James Chadwick
science
Sir James Chadwick, (born 20 October 1891; died 24 July 1974) was an English physicist and Nobel Prize winner who is best known for discovering the neutron.
Biography.
James Chadwick was born in Bollington, Cheshire, England. He went to Manchester High School, and studied at the Universities of Manchester and Cambridge.
In 1913, Chadwick went to Berlin in Germany to work with the scientist Hans Geiger. He also worked with Ernest Rutherford. He was still in Germany when World War I broke out and he was interned in Ruhleben P.O.W. Camp just outside Berlin. The camp, which had more than 5,000 detainees (prisoners of war) had been a horse race course. There were stables, each with 27 horse boxes. The detainees lived in these boxes. The detainees were allowed to do things to keep themselves busy. Chadwick worked with a young scientist called Charles Ellis. Together they set up a laboratory in the stables where they worked on the ionisation of phosphorus and also on the photo-chemical reaction of carbon monoxide and chlorine.
Research at Cambridge.
After the war, Chadwick returned to Cambridge where he worked with Ernest Rutherford, studying the emission of gamma rays from radioactive materials. They also studied the transmutation of elements by bombarding them with alpha particles, and investigated the nature of the atomic nucleus.
In 1932 Chadwick made a very important discovery: he discovered the particle in the nucleus of an atom that became known as the neutron because it has no electric charge. In contrast with the helium nuclei (alpha particles) which are positively charged, and therefore repelled by the strong electrical forces in the nuclei of heavy atoms, this new tool in atomic disintegration need not overcome any electric barrier and is capable of penetrating and splitting the nuclei of even the heaviest elements. In this way, Chadwick prepared the way towards the fission of uranium 235 and towards the creation of the atomic bomb. For this important discovery he was awarded the Hughes Medal of the Royal Society in 1932, and later the Nobel Prize for Physics in 1935. Later, he found out that a German scientist had discovered the neutron at the same time. But Hans Falkenhagen (Rostock) was afraid of publishing his results. When Chadwick learned of Falkenhagen's discovery, he offered to share the Nobel Prize with him. Falkenhagen, however, modestly refused the honour. He was also nicknamed "Jimmy Neutron" because of his discovery of the neutron.
Liverpool.
Chadwick became professor of physics at Liverpool University in 1935. He worked on the possibility of an atomic bomb. Later he realized that the nuclear bomb really was going to be made. He found it very frightening that the science he had been working on could lead to such a terrible weapon. He started to take sleeping pills.
He joined the Manhattan Project in the United States, which developed the atomic bombs dropped on Hiroshima and Nagasaki. Chadwick was knighted in 1945.
Return to Cambridge.
After the war, Chadwick moved to Cambridge University as master of Gonville and Caius College.
He died in Cambridge on 24 July 1974.

Wilhelm Reich
science
Wilhelm Reich (March 24, 1897 – November 3, 1957) was an Austrian-American psychiatrist and psychoanalyst. He made important contributions to Psychotherapy. His work also contributed to the sexual revolution of the 1960s and 1970s.

Jules Massenet
music
Jules Massenet (born Montaud nr. Saint-Étienne, 12 May 1842; died Paris, 13 August 1912) was a French composer. He is most famous for his operas, although he wrote a large amount of other music as well.
Early years.
Jules’ father had a business making agricultural tools. His mother gave him his first piano lessons. In 1847 his father retired and the family moved to Paris. When he was ten years old he went to the Paris Conservatoire for piano and solfège studies. Over a period of ten years he studied there, gaining many prizes. He was taught composition by Ambroise Thomas who was an excellent music teacher.
Jules earned enough money to keep himself by giving piano lessons. He also played timpani in the orchestra of the Théâtre Lyrique. This helped him to get a good knowledge of French composers such as Gounod (especially his "Faust") as well as music by Gluck, Mozart and Beethoven. He was also very keen on the music of Berlioz and Wagner.
In 1863 he won the Prix de Rome (it was his second attempt). This allowed him to spend two years in Italy. During this time he travelled a lot but hardly composed anything.
Early career.
In 1866 he returned to Paris where he married. He gave piano lessons. At this stage he had hardly written anything important. However, soon he was to start writing many famous works. He became friends with other composers: Saint-Saëns, Bizet, Delibes, Lalo, Fauré, Duparc and others. Several of these people competed in writing operas for competitions. Massenet wrote several works, but he found writing operas difficult. His operas never won any prizes.
Years of fame.
In 1870 he served in the National Guard during the Franco-Prussian war. After the war he continued to compose, and he became professor of composition at the Conservatoire. He spent many years working on an opera "Le Roi de Lahore". This was a great success and helped him to become internationally famous. For many years he spent the winter in Paris and the summer in various places in the country where he could compose. His pupils at the Conservatoire included Pierné, Koechlin, Hahn, Enesco. In 1884 his opera "Manon" was produced at the Opéra-comique. This made him clearly the most famous opera composer of his time. It was an opéra-comique with some speech over the music. During the next 28 years he composed another 20 operas. Another opera that was particularly famous was "Werther". It was first performed in 1892 in Vienna and a year later in Paris. It was soon being performed in all the big European opera houses.
Some of his greatest operatic roles were written for the young American soprano Sybil Sanderson. This includes the main role in his popular opera "Thaïs". The story is set in Egypt and is about a monk who tries to persuade Thaïs to give up her life as a prostitute. However, he soon finds he is falling in love with her himself. This mixture of religion and salvation became an extremely popular subject for operas at that time. The "Méditation" from "Thaïs" is a short piece for violin solo. It is one of the best-loved of all Romantic violin solos.
He continued to compose lots of music even when his health was failing during his last years. He was a quiet, family man who hated it when people made a fuss about him. He liked best to spend his evenings quietly at home, or in the countryside during the summer. He continued to compose in a Romantic style to the end of his life, even though many composers around him (e.g. Debussy) were writing music which was more “modern” sounding.

La Borinqueña
music
La Borinqueña is the national anthem of Puerto Rico. The current official music and words were made up in 1903 and have been taught in schools and accepted by the public. The music was officially made the national anthem by the government in 1952, and the words in 1977. The title refers to the Taíno (Native American) name for the island of Puerto Rico, "Boriken" or "Borinquen".

Boy (album)
music
Boy was Irish rock group U2's first album, from the year 1980.
History.
Before this album came a single, a song that is played on its own, called "I Will Follow". It was very popular, and was played on college radio stations and made people know who U2 were. People mostly thought of "I Will Follow" as a Christian song, showing how all of the members of U2 were Christians, but none of the band members has said that that is true. This album is somewhat about Bono's life as a child, and his mother's death when he was 14.
At first, the producer of band Joy Division, Martin Hannett, was supposed to produce (help record) the album, but he was sad about the suicide of Ian Curtis, so he did not help record the album. It was produced by Steve Lillywhite, and recorded in a Dublin studio called Windmill Lane Studios. Some songs were written in the studio, like "An Cat Dubh" and "The Ocean". Some other songs had already been written, and U2 were performing them often, like the songs "Stories for Boys", Out of Control", and "Twilight". The Edge, U2's guitarist, recorded all of the songs using his Gibson Explorer guitar and his Fender Stratocaster guitar.
"Boy" reached #63 on the Billboard album charts, a list of the most popular albums in the U.S., and was not on the popularity charts in the United Kingdom. The song "I Will Follow" reached #20 on a popularity chart called the Mainstream rock charts. People said that their live shows were too predictable and that Bono, the singer, used too much echo in his singing, but their playing showed that they could play very well. People also said that Bono was a "charismatic and passionate" singer, meaning that he sang very emotionally and that people could connect to him. "Boy" is the only U2 album that every song has been played live, including all of the b-sides (songs that are extra songs on a single). On the list of the 500 greatest albums of all time, made by the rock magazine Rolling Stone, "Boy" was 417th on the list.
Album Cover.
The boy on the cover of the album is a boy named Peter Rowan. Rowan is the brother of Bono's friend Guggi, and he is a famous Irish photographer. He has been on other U2 album covers, including Three and War. The person who took the picture has made other U2 covers, too. In case that the band could be blamed for pedophilia, they changed the cover to a stretched picture of the four band members.
Track Listing.
All of the songs were written by U2, and all of the lyrics were written by Bono.
There were two singles released from this album. They were "I Will Follow" and "A Day Without Me". The album that came before "Boy" was called "Three". On very early copies of "Boy", there is a 30-second instrumental piece that is am early version of "Fire", which was on a later album called "October".

Team Milram
sports
Team Milram is an Italian-registered UCI ProTeam established in 2006. The team is often called a German team because its main sponsor is Milram, part of the Nordmilch company from the "Land" Bremen.
Milram took over the ProTeam licence of Domina Vacanze. Erik Zabel and Alessandro Petacchi are the team’s top cyclists. There are 25 other riders, mainly from Germany and Italy. Milram is the third team in the UCI ProTour with a German main sponsor.
The team manager is led by Italian Gianluigi Stanga, who has been a team manager in professional cycling since 1983. The directeurs sportifs (Sports Directors) are the Italians Vittorio Algeri, Antonio Bevilacqua and Oscar Pellicioli. Gerry van Gerwen from the Netherlands is the commercial manager.
Milram only joined the UCI ProTour in 2006. Since then they have won 88 podium positions (that is, finished a race either first, second, or third) (24 first, 29 second, 35 third).
Team MILRAM reorganised itself for its second season. Five new riders joined and eight riders left the team. The most prominent new rider is Igor Astarloa, 2003 World Champion from Spain. Additionally, the team added Brett Lancaster, the up-and-coming riders Marcel Sieberg and Niki Terpstra, as well as neo pro Sebastian Schwager. After breaking his kneecap in 2006, Alessandro Petacchi regained his top form and won some races.
There is a MILRAM Continental Circuit Team, and those young riders and those from other U23 teams are helped so they can develop their skills
2007 ProTeam.
As of January 5, 2007.

Joe Cole
sports
Joseph John "Joe" Cole is an English professional football player. He was born on November 8, 1981 in Romford, London. Cole plays as a mid fielder for Chelsea of the English Premier League and the England national team.
Joe Cole trained at West Ham United at the start of his career. He moved to Chelsea in 2003 for a prize of £6,600,00 and scored 10 goals for Chelsea in the 2004-2005 season. Cole currently wears the number 10 shirt for Chelsea.

Joshua Bell
music
Joshua David Bell (born 9 December 1967) is an American violinist. He is considered one of the greatest violinists of today.
Childhood.
Bell was born in Bloomington, Indiana, United States. His father was a psychologist and therapist. He began violin lessons at the age of four after his mother found that her son had taken rubber bands from around the house and stretched them across the handles of his dresser drawer to pluck out music he had heard her play on the piano. His parents got him a very small violin and started giving him lessons. He learned the violin very quickly, but also had time to enjoy things such as video games and sports.
Bell's first violin teacher suggested that he should learn with Josef Gingold. Bell says that Gingold was a great teacher. At the age of fourteen, Bell appeared as a soloist with the Philadelphia Orchestra conducted by Riccardo Muti. He studied the violin at the Indiana University's Jacobs School of Music, while managing to graduate from Bloomington High School North in 1984.
Career.
Joshua Bell first played in the Carnegie Hall, New York in 1985 with the Saint Louis Symphony Orchestra. He has since performed with almost all of the world's major orchestras and conductors. He has played all the well known concertos as well as new works. In 1993 he gave the first performance of Nicholas Maw's violin concerto which was dedicated to him. The recording of this work won Bell a Grammy award. He performed the solo part on John Corigliano's Oscar-winning soundtrack for the movie "The Red Violin" and was also featured in "Ladies in Lavender". Bell also made an appearance in the movie "Music of the Heart", a story about the power of music, with other famous violinists.
Bell's violin is a 300-year-old Stradivarius violin called the Gibson ex Huberman, which was made in 1713, a time when Stradivarius was making his best instruments. This violin had been stolen twice from the previous owner, Bronislaw Huberman; the last time the thief confessed as he was dying to having stolen it. Bell had held and played the violin, and its owner at the time jokingly told Bell the violin could be his for four million dollars. Shortly afterwards, by chance, Bell came across the violin again and discovered it was about to be sold to a wealthy German to become part of a collection. According to the Joshua Bell website Bell "was practically in tears." Bell then sold the Stradivarius violin that he had at the time for a little more than two million dollars and bought the Gibson ex Huberman for a little under the four million dollar asking price. His first recording made with the Gibson ex Huberman was "Romance of the Violin". It sold more than 5,000,000 copies and remained at the top of classical music charts for 54 weeks. In September 2006 he made a CD called the "Voice of the Violin" and was released in September 2006. It has songs arranged for the violin. He played the song "Vocalise" by Rachmaninoff in the Royal Albert Hall at the Last Night of the Proms in 2007. He is a visiting professor at the Royal Academy of Music in London.
In an unusual experiment the Washington Post asked Bell to stand in the street and busk (play his violin) by the entrance to a Washington Metro station one cold morning in January 2007. During the 45 minutes that he played more than 1000 people passed him but only a few people stopped to listen, most of whom were children. Only one person recognized him and one other person realized he was a great violinist.
Personal life.
Bell lives in in Manhattan. He is keen on sports such as golf and tennis. He has never married, although he has one child, born in July 2007, by a former girlfriend.

Eric Cantona
sports
Eric Daniel Pierre Cantona (born May 24, 1966 in Paris) is a French former footballer. He is one of Manchester United F.C.'s greatest players. Cantona has more than 140 appearances with Manchester United. He ended his professional footballing career with the team. Cantona had earlier played for Leeds United before moving to Manchester United in 1992. He has also played for France from 1987 to 1994. He retired from football in 1997

Yasuo Fukuda
politics
Yasuo Fukuda (福田康夫) was Prime Minister of Japan, 2007-2008. He was born on July 16, 1936 in Japan. He was preceded by Shinzo Abe. He hosted the G8 meeting in Hokkaido in July 2008, but resigned on September 1 2008, due to low approval ratings and political deadlock. He was suceeded by Taro Aso.

Tamaz V. Gamkrelidze
science
Tamaz (Thomas) V. Gamkrelidze (Georgian თამაზ გამყრელიძე) (born October 23, 1929) is a Georgian linguist, orientalist and public benefactor, Academician (since 1974) and President (since February, 2005) of the Georgian Academy of Sciences (GAS), Doctor of Sciences (1963), Professor (1964).
Gamkrelidze was born in Kutaisi. His brother Revaz Gamkrelidze is also an Academician, a famous mathematician.

Montel Vontavious Porter
sports
Alvin Burke, Jr. (born October 28, 1973), better known by his ring name Montel Vontavious Porter or MVP, is an American professional wrestler. He is best known for his time in World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE), where he is currently signed to the SmackDown! brand. He is a former, one time WWE Tag Team Champion with Matt Hardy and former WWE United States Champion.

Harry Shearer
music
Harry Julius Shearer (born December 23, 1943 in Los Angeles, California) is an American comedic actor and writer. Shearer is most famous for playing the voices of several minor characters for "The Simpsons" (1989 to present).

Daniel Schneidermann
media
Daniel Schneidermann (born April 5, 1958 in Paris) is a French journalist. He mainly reports about televised media. He is most active in weekly columns. Schneidermann has written in "Le Monde" and is presently in "Libération". He also can be seen on the television program "Arrêt sur images" ("Freeze-frame"), broadcast by the public television channel France 5.

Didier Drogba
sports
Didier Yves Drogba Tébily is a professional football player from the Ivory Coast. He was born on March 11, 1978 in Abidjan and currently plays for Chelsea FC in the English Premier League, wearing the number 11 shirt. Drogba is the current African Footballer of the Year. In season 2006-2007, he was the top scorer of the English Premier League with 20 goals. Drogba played for Le Mans at Ligue 2 in 1998. He moved to Olympique de Marseille in 2003 and scored 29 goals in the next season. In July 2007, Drogba moved to Chelsea.

Nigella Lawson
media
Nigella Lawson (born January 6, 1960) is an English television chef, journalist, television presenter and food-writer. She presented the cooking show "Nigella Bites" on Channel4 from 2000 to 2001. After that series, she went on to present two cookery series called "Nigella's Christmas Kitchen" and "Nigella Express" on BBC2.
She has written many cooking books which have been translated into lots of different languages and are popular in the United Kingdom and the United States.

Johann Heinrich Schmelzer
music
Johann Heinrich Schmelzer (born Austria some time between 1620 and 1623; died in Prague some time between 29 February and 20 March) was a German composer. He was one of the most important composers of instrumental music in the mid-17th century.
Nothing is known about his early life. He became a member of the imperial chapel in the mid 1630’s. His job there was probably a violinist. We know very little about his life, except that over the years he became a famous composer. The emperor must have liked him because he gave him presents of money and gold chains.
In 1671 he became deputy Kapellmeister at the imperial court. In 1673 the emperor gave him the honorary title “von Ehrenruef” which he put after his name. A few years later the court moved to Prague to try to escape the plague that was killing so many people in Vienna. At the end of 1679 the emperor’s Kapellmeister died and Schmelzer became Kapellmeister. It was the first time that the Kapellmeister at the Habsburg court had not been a foreigner but an Austrian. However, the following March Schmelzer died of the plague.
Schmelzer wrote a lot of music for small groups of instruments as well as a lot of ballet music. His dance suites are made up of several dances such as galliard, bourree, sarabande, gigue, gavotte and allemande as well as more unusual dances. He wrote several sonatas for two violins and continuo. They are full of fast scales and arpeggios. He also seems to have written church music, but it has all been lost.

Anton Webern
music
Anton Webern (born Vienna 3 December 1883; died Mitterill 15 September 1945) was an Austrian composer. Webern and Alban Berg were the most famous pupils of Arnold Schoenberg, the composer who had invented the twelve tone system. This style of composition is often called the “Second Viennese School”. Webern was probably Schoenberg’s first pupil, and Berg joined them a few weeks later. Webern used the rules of the twelve tone system very strictly in his music. His compositions had a lot of influence on composers of the mid-20th century who were interested in serialism, especially Karlheinz Stockhausen and Pierre Boulez. Most of Webern’s compositions are very short.
Early years.
Anton was born Anton von Webern. Webern’s father was a mining engineer who later got an important government job. The family had belonged to the nobility which is why they had “von” before the family name. In 1918 a law was made in Austria to stop people from using “von” as part of their name, and so from then onwards he was always known as “Anton Webern”. Anton learned to play the cello and the piano. They had a country house where the family spent the summer, and the young boy spent a lot of time composing, especially songs to the poems of famous German poets such as Stefan George and Richard Dehmel. Together with his friend and cousin Ernst he read the philosophical books of Friedrich Nietzsche, studied modern paintings and listened to the music of Richard Wagner. His father took him to the Bayreuth Festival.
He went to study at the University of Vienna where he continued to compose a lot of music. By 1906 he had been given a doctorate for writing about the composer Heinrich Isaac.
Influence of Schoenberg.
When Webern became a pupil of Schoenberg he was joining a small group of musicians who were to be life-long friends. Alban Berg was a member of this group. The music these people were writing sounded very modern at the time and they had to face a lot of criticism. Berg and Webern were official pupils of Schoenberg only for two years, but they continued to work with him, often copying out music for him. They also helped him financially and, when Schoenberg moved to Berlin, Webern moved there to be near him.
In 1911 Webern married a cousin. They had four children. Webern wrote several works, many of them extremely short. He applied for the same conducting job at the Prague opera seven times and, although five times he was offered the job, he kept changing his mind and, when he did accept it, he always resigned soon afterwards. He also had a job at the theatre in Stettin for a short time.
He was persuaded to go on a course of psychoanalysis by the psychologist Albert Adler. After two months he said that he was cured, and he accepted a job at the theatre in Stettin. However, World War I broke out and the theatre was soon closed. He wanted to enter military service, so he joined the army, but he was never happy. He managed to leave the army by getting a job at the theatre in Prague again. Meanwhile Schoenberg had been made to join the army. This made Webern feel guilty so he left Prague without telling anybody. He joined the army again, asked for Schoenberg to be released from the army. When Schoenberg was released, Webern again lost interest in the army and managed to get his job in Prague back. Then he moved to be near Schoenberg. In 1920 Schoenberg persuaded him to go back to Prague, but again he soon left. This was the last time he tried to have a job conducting in the theatre.
Mid career.
Webern composed more and more twelve-tone music in these years. He also had conducting jobs which brought in some money. He was a very good conductor. He was only interested in music by German and Austrian composers. He tried to get several teaching jobs, but the only one he managed to get was at the Israel Institute for the Blind in Vienna, where he taught for six years.
Later years.
During the 1930s Webern faced many difficulties. He did not have much money, Schoenberg went to live in France and then United States because of the political situation in Europe. Alban Berg died in 1935 and his own conducting career came to an end. When the Nazis came to power in Austria they banned Webern’s music because they thought it was bad (they called it “degenerate art”). His son was killed fighting in World War II. Four months after the war had ended he was sitting on the veranda of his daughter’s house smoking a cigar after dinner when he was shot dead by one of the occupying troops. He was supposed to have been inside because there was a curfew on. His son-in-law had just been arrested for selling things on the black market.
His music.
Webern’s early music is in an Expressionist. Later he used more and more the twelve tone system. He liked using very high and very low notes, as well as silences in his music. Although most of his pieces are very short they are very concentrated: every note is part of a careful plan. Officially he composed 31 works, and these fit onto 6 CDs. A lot of his music still sounds very modern to us today.

Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh
politics
Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh (12 February 1911 – 21 March 1978,) served as fifth President of Ireland, from 1974 to 1976. He was elected after the death of President Childers, but he resigned in 1976 after a clash with the government. He also had a notable legal career, including serving as Chief Justice of Ireland.
Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh was born in Bray, County Wicklow.
Career.
Ó Dálaigh trained as a lawyer. He became Ireland's youngest Attorney-General in 1946 under Taoiseach Éamon de Valera. He was re-appointed as Attorney-General in 1951 and in 1953 he became the youngest member of the Supreme Court. Less than a decade later, he became Ireland's youngest Chief Justice.
When Ireland joined the European Economic Community, Jack Lynch appointed Ó Dálaigh as Ireland's judge on the European Court of Justice. When President Childers died suddenly in 1974, all parties agreed to nominate Ó Dálaigh for the post.
President of Ireland.
Ó Dálaigh proved to be a mixed success as president. While popular with Irish language enthusiasts and artists he had a strained relationship with the Coalition Government.
In 1976 he decided to refer a series of tough state security Bills to the Supreme Court to test their constitutionality. This worried and angered members of the to the Fine Gael-Labour national coalition government. Ó Dálaigh then announced that he would sign the bill at midnight of the 15th of October, which he made public. There was a historical precedent for the referral of this bill. Dubhghlas de hÍde referred the Offences Against the State (Amendment) Act of 1939 to the Supreme Court. Jim Duffy claims that, as a result of this, the PIRA arranged an attack in Mountmellick which resulted in the killing of Garda Clerkin. Others would dispute that the PIRA would have held the President's opinion in such high regard as their members at the time did not recognise the State of which Ó Dálaigh was then the Head.
Ó Dálaigh's actions were seen by government ministers to have contributed to the killing of this Garda and greatly abgered them. The following day, following a minor car accident, Paddy Donegan, a controversial and outspoken Minister for Defence, described the incident as a "thundering disgrace". The president thought the minister meant that the "President was a disgrace", not what the "President was doing was a disgrace". Donegan, a known alcoholic, was likely under the influence of alcohol at the time he spoke. He was speaking to members of the Irish Defence Forces, and was only at the barracks to open a new cookhouse. Donegan insulted the President, who is Head of the Defence Forces in front of the defence forces. created a major political incident. Ó Dálaigh thoughtvthat the President and the Minister of Defence would be unable to work together.
The apologetic Donegan immediately offered his resignation, But Taoiseach Liam Cosgrave refused the offers an offer he repeated subsequently. Cosgrave never met the President personally to apologise, added to two years in which Cosgrave had failed to do his constitutional duty to regularly brief the President, and the manner in which his government treated the President, it was the last straw for President Ó Dálaigh.
He became the first Irish president to resign.
The incident meant even more people saw the Government as arrogant and out of touch with public opinion and contributed to their defeat in the 1977 general election.
The opposition proposed outgoing EEC Commissioner Patrick Hillery for the presidency. Hillery served two unchallenged terms of office before retiring at the end of his second term in 1990.
Death and assessment.
Ó Dálaigh died in 1978, less than two years after leaving office. He is buried in Sneem, County Kerry.
Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh was the most politically naïve president, but the Government he worked with was notable for its own inability to offer him the help to overcome the problem. The Taoiseach did not support Ó Dálaigh when Donegan attacked him.

Léo Delibes
music
Léo Delibes (pronounce: LAY-oh De-LEEB) (born St. Germain-du-Val, France, 21 February 1836; died St. Germain-du-Val 16 January 1891) was a French composer of Romantic music. He is particularly famous for his ballets, especially "Coppélia", and operettas and operas, of which "Lakmé" is the most famous.
Life.
Delibes’s father worked for the post office. His mother was musical and played the piano. Her father, the composer’s grandfather, had been a baritone in the Opéra-Comique and she had a brother who was an organist and professor at the Paris Conservatoire.
When Delibes’s father died in 1847 his family moved to Paris so that the young Léo, who was 11, could continue having a good musical education. At first he found it difficult living in a large city as he was used to the countryside. He was a student of the well-known composer and teacher Adolphe Adam. At first he did well in his music lessons and won prizes, but after a few years he no longer won any prizes. He never tried to win the Prix de Rome which is what all French students of composition normally want to do. As a young boy he sang in choirs. Later he became a church organist and an accompanist at the Théâtre-Lyrique.
Soon Delibes started to composer operettas. He wrote 14 operettas in 14 years. He was commissioned to write some music to celebrate the emperor’s return from Algiers. The piece he wrote was called "Alger". It was a huge success. The emperor gave him a gold medal, personally fastening a pin with diamonds to his lapel. In 1864 he became chorus master at the Opéra where he coached the chorus to sing many famous operas. Two years later he started to write ballets. These became very successful and three years later he stopped writing operettas.
In 1870 his ballet "Coppélia" was produced. By 1884 it had been performed 100 times. Together with "La Sylphide" and "Giselle" it was one of the most popular of all ballets. The story is about a man who makes a mechanical doll. Another popular ballet he wrote was "Sylvia". His most successful opera was "Lakmé" which was first performed at the Opéra-Comique in 1883. It gives great opportunity for the main soprano, especially in the song called the "Bell Song". Musicians usually think "Lakmé" is his greatest work.
Delibes died in 1891, and was buried in the Cimetière de Montmartre, Paris.
Delibes’s reputation.
Delibes started to compose at a time when ballet had become less popular in France than it had been earlier. Around the time of the Revolution there had been lots of performances of ballet, but during the 19th century there was less interest with the exception of "La Sylphide" and "Giselle". Delibes was to change that. He had a great gift for writing easy melodies. At one time he thought he ought to compose like Wagner, using richer harmonies and leitmotifs, but fortunately he chose not to, following instead the style to which he was so well suited. "Coppélia" is in the repertoire of all major ballet companies, and several of its tunes are familiar to people even if they do not know where they come from. The Flower duet from "Lakmé" became particularly well-known in recent years through an advert for British Airways.

Erskine Hamilton Childers
politics
Erskine Hamilton Childers (11 December 1905 – 17 November 1974), was the son of Robert Erskine Childers (author of the spy thriller "The Riddle of the Sands". He was the fourth President of Ireland from 1973 until his death in 1974, and a TD from 1938 until 1973.
He was appointed Tánaiste in 1969.
Biography.
Childers was born in London. He moved to Ireland after the First World War and lived in County Wicklow with his father Robert Erskine Childers. His father helped bring guns to Ireland for the Easter Rising, and opposed the treaty that set up the Irish Free State. The younger Childers was educated at Gresham's School, Holt, and Trinity College, Cambridge, hence his striking British upper class accent.
In 1922, when Childers was 16, his father was executed by the Irish Free State. Before his execution the older Childers made his son promise from to find every man who had signed his father's death warrant out and shake his hand.
After finishing college in Britain Childers worked in a tourism board in Paris, until Éamon de Valera invited him back to Ireland to work for the Irish Press. He became a naturalised Irish citizen in 1938.
As member of Fianna Fáil, he held a number of ministerial posts in the cabinets of Éamon de Valera, Seán Lemass and Jack Lynch, becoming Tánaiste Deputy head of the government) in 1969. Erskine's period as a minister was controversial. One commentator described his ministerial career as "spectacularly unsuccessful", but others praised his willingness to take tough decisions.
Childers was elected the fourth President of Ireland on 30 May, 1973, defeating Tom O'Higgins by 635,867 votes to 578,771. Childers, though 67, was an extremely hard-working and He died suddenly of a heart attack in November 1974, while making a public speech to the Royal College of Physicians in Dublin.
Childers' state funeral in St. Patrick's Cathedral, Dublin, was attended by world leaders including Nelson Rockefeller, Vice-President of the United States, Earl Mountbatten of Burma (representing Queen Elizabeth II), Harold Wilson, the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and presidents and crowned heads of state from Europe and beyond. He was buried County Wicklow. At first it was expected that President Childers' widow, Rita, would be offered the office of president to continue his work, but it went instead to the former Chief Justice, Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh.
One of Childers' sons, also called Erskine was a UN civil servant and Secretary General of the World Federation of United Nations Associations. A daughter by 2nd wife Rita, Nessa Childers, is a councillor for the Green Party on Dún Laoghaire-Rathdown County Council.
Additional reading.
John N. Young, "Erskine H. Childers: President of Ireland"

Patrick Hillery
politics
He was Ireland's first EuropeanCommissioner, serving for three years until he became President in 1976. He never faced an election, because both time he ran for president he was unopposed.
Early & private life.
Patrick John Hillery, known as "Paddy Hillery", was born in Spanish Point, Miltown Malbay, County Clare in 1923. He attended University College Dublin, where he studied medicine. In 1947 he returned to his home town where he followed in his father’s footsteps as a doctor. A a doctor he also spent a year working as coroner for West Clare.
Hillery married Mary Beatrice (Maeve) Finnegan on October 27, 1955. Together they had a son, John, and a daughter, Vivienne, who died after a long illness in 1985, shortly before her eighteenth bithday.
Domestic political career.
Hillery was asked by Éamon de Valera to be his running mate in the 1951 general election. won the election and Hillery was successful on his first attempt to get elected. He only became a minister after de Valera retired as Taoiseach in 1959.
Government minister: 1959-1973.
As Minister for Education, Hillery established comprehensive schools and Regional Technical Colleges.
After another election win in 1969 Hillery became Minister for External Affairs (renamed Foreign Affairs in 1972), one of the top cabinet posts. After "Bloody Sunday"), he travelled to the United Nations in New York to demand UN involvement in peace-keeping on the streets of Northern Ireland. In 1972, he negotiated Irish membership of the European Economic Community, a process that was completed in 1973.
European Commissioner.
Following Ireland's successful entry into Europe Hillery was rewarded by becoming the first Irishman to serve on the European Commission. He was appointed Vice-President of the Commission as well as having special responsibility for Social Affairs. Hillery's most famous policy was to force EEC member states to give equal pay to women.
In 1976 the new Fine Gael–Labour Party National Coalition Government of Liam Cosgrave said they would not re-appointed him the Commission. He thought about returning to medicine, perhaps moving with his wife, Maeve (also a doctor) to Africa. When President Cearbhall Ó Dálaigh resigned, Hillery agreed to become the Fianna Fáil candidate in the election.
President.
He was elected without a contest as the only candidate, becoming President of Ireland on 3 December, 1976.
After 1982 people thought he was a very good and honest President. Before then he had been written off as boring and dull. In 1982 the Taoiseach, Fine Gael's Garrett Fitzgerald, lost a vote in Dáil Eireann. Dr Fitzgerald asked for a general election. As President he did not have to agree, and Dr Fitzgerald would have had to resign. This meant Dáil Éireann might choose Charles Haughey as Taoiseach. Hillery thought a new election was best, but many people from the President's own party tried to persuade him otherwise.
President Hillery refused to speak to any opposition party politicians, but when Charles Haughey, who was Leader of the Opposition, had rang the President's Office he "threatened" to end the career of the army officer answered and refused on Hillery's "explicit" orders to put the call through to the President. Hillery called the Irish Army's Chief of Staff the following day and as Commander-in-Chief of the Army had ordered the Chief of Staff to make sure that no politician ever interfered with the career of the young army officer.
In 1983 Hillery was again elected unopposed. Hillery left office in 1990 (he had served the maximum two terms), widely applauded for his integrity, honesty and devotion to duty. However he re-entered public life in 2002 during the second referendum on the Nice Treaty, when he urged a "yes" vote. The referendum was carried.

Mary Robinson
politics
Mary Robinson (; born 21 May 1944) was the first female President of Ireland, serving from 1990 to 1997. She she had been an academic, barrister, and member of the Irish senate from 1969 to 1989.
She defeated "Fianna Fáil's" Brian Lenihan and Fine Gael's Austin Currie in the 1990 presidential election, the first time Fianna Fáil had lost a presidential election.
She resigned the presidency four months ahead of the end of her term of office to begin a five year term in the United Nations, as United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. In 2002 Robinson became Honorary President of Oxfam International.
Background.
Born Mary Therese Winifred Bourke in Ballina, County Mayo in 1944, Mary Robinson was the daughter of two medical doctors. The Bourke family has been in Mayo since the thirteenth century. One ancestor was a leading activist in the Irish National Land League in Mayo and the Irish Republican Brotherhood; an uncle, Sir Paget John Bourke, was knighted by Queen Elizabeth II after a career as a judge in the Colonial Service; while another relative was a Roman Catholic nun.
Robinson got the permission of the then Archbishop of Dublin, John Charles McQuaid to study in Trinity College, Dublin(TCD); at the time Roman Catholics were forbidden by church rules from studying in TCD without special permission, called a dispensation.. TCD once did not allow Catholics to study. In her twenties, she was appointed Professor of Law in the college.
Career in Seanad Éireann.
She was elected one of Trinity College's three members of Seanad Éireann in 1969.
In 1982, the Labour Party entered into a coalition government with Fine Gael. Many expected Robinson to be the attorney-general, but the Labour party leader instead picked an unknown, new senior counsel called John Rogers. Shortly afterwards, Robinson resigned from the party in protest at the Anglo-Irish Agreement, she said that unionist politicians in Northern Ireland should have been consulted as part of the deal.
Robinson decided not to seek re-election to the senate in 1989. One year later she agreed to become the first Labour candidate for the presidency and the first woman candidate in what was only the second presidential election to be contested by three candidates since 1945.
Candidates from other parties.
The main opposition party, Fine Gael was no well organised. They gambled that former Taoiseach Garret FitzGerald would run as its candidate (but for two years he had been saying no), then they asked Peter Barry, who had previously been willing to run but had run out of patience and was no longer interested. The party's third choice was the former civil rights campaigner Austin Currie, a new TD and former minister in Brian Faulkner's power-sharing executive in Northern Ireland from 1973-1974.
Fianna Fáil chose Tánaiste and Minister for Defence, Brian Lenihan. Lenihan was popular and widely seen as humorous and intelligent. Like Robinson he had made liberal policy reforms. In the 1960s he abolished censorship, for example. He was seen as a near certainty to win the presidency. The only question asked was whether Robinson would beat Currie and come second.
But Taoiseach Charles Haughey of Fianna Fáil was not popular, and the Labour Party leader Dick Spring was becoming more popular.
Election Campaign.
During the campaign people found out that what Lenihan had told friends in private showed he had lied in public about the 1982 dissolution of Dáil Éireann.
Lenihan denied he had pressured the President but then a tape was produced of an 'on the record' interview he had given to a postgraduate student the previous May where he talked about trying to apply pressure. Lenihan claimed that "on mature recollection" he hadn't pressured the President and had been confused in his interview with the student. But the government threatened to fall over the issue.
Lenihan was dismissed as Tánaiste and Minister for Defence.
Lenihan still managed to win the first count. In the Single Transferable Vote system Austin Currie was eliminated and his second choice votes were counted. Most were for Robinson. Lenihan became the first Fianna Fáil presidential candidate in the history of the office to lose a presidential election. Robinson now became President.
Presidency.
Robinson was a popular president, before he died in 2002 Brian Lenihan said that she was a better president than he ever could have been. She often visited Britain, and became the first Irish president to visit Queen Elizabeth II at Buckingham Palace. She welcomed visits by senior British royals, most notably the Prince of Wales to Áras an Uachtaráin. On one trip to Belfast she met with the local MP, Gerry Adams, the President of Sinn Féin. Foreign Minister Dick Spring, who was leader of the Labour Party, privately advised her not to meet Adams. However the Government did not formally advise her not to meet with him, so she felt it would be wrong,not to meet the local member of parliament during her visit, and was photographed publicly shaking his hand. During her various visits to Northern Ireland, she in fact regularly met politicians of all parties, including David Trimble of the Ulster Unionist Party and John Hume of the Social Democratic and Labour Party.
Charles Haughey died not like her, even stopping her from delivering the important BBC Dimbleby Lecture. Haughey's successors as Taoiseach, Albert Reynolds (Fianna Fáil: 1992-94), John Bruton (Fine Gael: 1994-97) and Bertie Ahern (Fianna Fáil:1997-) never hid their admiration of her work. Bruton and Ahern both tried to get her the United Nations High Commissioner for Human Rights.
High Commissioner for Human Rights.
Robinson became the United Nations High Commissioner for Human Rights on 12 September 1997, resigning the Presidency a few weeks early with the approval of Irish political parties in order to take up the post. Newspaper reports say that she had been asked by Secretary General of the United Nations Kofi Annan to become a public campaigner
Robinson was the first High Commissioner for Human Rights to visit Tibet, making her trip in 1998. During her tenure she criticised the Irish system of permits for non-EU immigrants, and criticised the United States' use of capital punishment. Though she had initially announced her intention to serve a single four-year period, she extended the term by a year following an appeal from Annan, allowing her to preside over the 2001 World Conference against Racism, Racial Discrimination, Xenophobia and Related Intolerance in Durban, South Africa, as Secretary-General. Robinson's posting as High Commissioner ended in 2002.
Trinity College.
Mrs Robinson is the twenty fourth, and first female, Chancellor of University of Dublin.
The Elders.
On July 18, 2007 in Johannesburg, South Africa, Nelson Mandela, his wife Graça Machel, and Desmond Tutu convened a group of world leaders to contribute their wisdom, independent leadership and honesty to tackle some of the world's toughest problems. Nelson Mandela announced the formation of this new group, The Elders, in a speech he delivered on his 89th birthday.
Archbishop Tutu will serve as the Chair of The Elders. The founding members of this group also include Graça Machel, Kofi Annan, Ela Bhatt, Gro Harlem Brundtland, Jimmy Carter, Li Zhaoxing, Mary Robinson and Muhammad Yunus.
The Elders will be independently funded by a group of Founders, including Richard Branson, Peter Gabriel, Ray Chambers; Michael Chambers; Bridgeway Foundation; Pam Omidyar, Humanity United; Amy Robbins; Shashi Ruia, Dick Tarlow; andThe United Nations Foundation.
As president she signed two very important Bills that she had fought for throughout her political career
Other source material.
Media coverage in "The Irish Times", "The Irish Independent", "The Examiner" (now renamed the "Irish Examiner"), "The Star", The Irish Mirror, "The Irish Sun", "Sunday Tribune", "The Sunday Independent", "The Sunday Times", "The Times", "The Daily Telegraph" and "The Guardian". Also briefing notes issued on various occasions (notably state, official or personal visits by Robinson abroad) supplied by the Irish Department of Foreign Affairs, The Foreign and Commonwealth Office, Buckingham Palace, Áras an Uachtaráin, the Holy See and the press offices of the United Nations (including the text of her Romanes Lecture in November 1997). Some background came via an interview with Mrs. Robinson.
"The Korea Liberator:" Criticism of Robinson's failure to speak out while North Korea deliberately starved two million of its people to death, largely during her tenure (warning: graphic image).

Achtung Baby
music
"Achtung Baby" is the seventh studio album by Irish rock band U2. It was put in stores on 19 November 1991. The album came almost two years after the lead singer, Bono, said that the band would "have to go away and dream it all up again," after their 1988 album, "Rattle and Hum" was criticized.
"Achtung Baby" shows a very big change in U2's sound because they began to use alternative rock and electronic sounds in the rhythm, more production, and more guitar effects, also including darker and more personal song words. The results were much more adventurous and less traditionally rock-based than their previous albums, and "Achtung Baby" is one of U2's best-selling and most-liked albums.

John McCain
politics
John McCain (born August 29, 1936 in the Panama Canal Zone) is a United States Senator from Arizona. He was been chosen by the Republican Party for the party's candidate in the United States presidential election, 2008. He is married to business woman Cindy McCain.
McCain's father and grandfather served in the U.S. Navy. McCain went to the U.S. Naval Academy and later served during the Vietnam War. His plane was shot down. He was captured by the "Viet Cong", a name given to the North Vietnamese military who finally took over the entire country. While captured, he was called a "POW" (Prisoner of War). He was held in prison for several years and tortured, resulting in long-term damage to his body.
Presidential campaigns.
Later, he became a U.S. Senator. He tried to get the Republican Party to choose him to be their candidate for President of the United States before, but George W. Bush got it. He tried again for it in 2008, and got chosen this time. He was defeated in the election on November 4 by Barack Obama.

Neue Zürcher Zeitung
media
The Neue Zürcher Zeitung (often shortened to NZZ) is a Swiss daily newspaper. It is based in Zürich. It is one of the oldest newspapers that is still published today. It was first published (as "Zürcher Zeitung") on January 12, 1780. Politically, the paper holds liberal values. Other newspapers which are still published, and have a similar age, are the Wiener Zeitung (published since 1703) and the Hildesheimer Allgemeine Zeitung (published since 1705).

Avet Terterian
music
Avet Terterian (1929 - 1994) was a leading Armenian composer, awarded by Konrad Adenauer prize.
He composed eight (completed) symphonies, an opera and several chamber works.
Several of his symphonies are recorded (the date 1973 in the Musicweb review of the Melodiya recording of symphony 3 is probably a typographical error, since the publisher's listing also gives 1975 for the first performance of that work.) Much of his music is available from.
Yekaterinburg's annual music festival is named after him.

Tadeusz Kościuszko
politics
Andrzej Tadeusz Bonawentura Kościuszko (; 1746 – 1817) was a Polish and Belarussian national hero, general and a leader of the Kościuszko Uprising (which bears his name) against the Russian Empire. He fought in the American Revolutionary War as a colonel in the Continental Army on the side of Washington. In recognition of his dedicated and faithful service he was brevetted by the Continental Congress to the rank of Brigadier General in 1783, and became a naturalized citizen of the United States that same year.

Louis de Broglie
science
Louis-Victor-Pierre-Raymond, 7th duc de Broglie, (August 15, 1892 – March 19, 1987) was a French physicist who discovered that electrons have two natures similar to both particles and waves.

Alfonso Daniel Rodríguez Castelao
politics
Alfonso Daniel (30 January 1886 – 7 January 1950), also known as Castelao'", was a Spanish writer on Galician language and one of the main symbols of Galicia. As a politician, caricaturist, and writer, he is one of the leading figures of Galician culture and identity.
(1886–1929) Early life.
In 1886, Alfonso Daniel Rodríguez de Castelao was born on 30 January in Rianxo, Galicia, Spain.
Castelao spent his childhood and adolescence in Santa Rosa de Toay, Argentina. In 1900, the Castelao family returned to Rianxo. In 1908, he obtained his degree in Medicine from the University of Santiago de Compostela. The next year, he passed his doctorate in Madrid, where he started to become known as a caricaturist, and settled down in Rianxo, joining the political movement Action Galicia ("Acción Gallega" in Spanish). As a caricaturist, Castelao focussed on the everyday in a humorous way, although after the cruelty and tragedy of the Spanish Civil War, he turned to using his art to denounce the misery of Fascism.
In 1916, he moved to Pontevedra, where he joined the Irmandades da Fala and participated in the "Asembleia Nazonalista de Lugo", signing an important national declaration. In 1920, he became editor of the magazine "Nos" and travelled through France, the Netherlands and Germany. In 1922, he wrote the novel "Un Ollo de Vidro" and in 1924 he joined the "Seminario de Estudos Galegos" and founded the "Coral Polifonica de Pontevedra". Two years later he published "Cousas", and in 1929 he travelled to Brittany to study its stone crosses and publish "As Cruces de Pedra na Bretaña".

Leo von Caprivi
politics
Georg Leo von Caprivi, later Georg Leo "Graf" von Caprivi de Caprara de Montecuccoli (), born; February 24, 1831 – February 6, 1899) was a German major general and politician, who succeeded Otto von Bismarck as Chancellor of Germany. Caprivi was German Chancellor from March 1890 to October 1894.
Biography.
Born in Charlottenburg, Berlin to a family of Italian and Slovenian origin, Caprivi joined the army in 1849 and fought in the Austro-Prussian War in 1866 and the Franco-Prussian War in 1870.
He liked Bismarck, and once said. Kaiser Wilhelm II was arguing with Bismarck about changes to the government. In February 1890 the Kaiser told Caprivi to come back to Berlin. Caprivi was told that he would take over from Bismarck if Bismarck did not do what the Kaiser wanted. Caprivi became chancellor on March 18 1890.
Caprivi's government was friendlier to the Social Democrats and to the United Kingdom. The Zanzibar treaty of July 1890, meant Germany gave control of Zanzibar, an island near German East Africa to Britain in return for the island of Heligoland in the North Sea. Caprivi also got the Caprivi Strip added to German South West Africa. This is a narrow strip of land that links German South West Africa (now called Namibia), to the Zambezi River.
In 1892 Caprivi resigned as Prussian Minister President and was replaced by Count Botho zu Eulenburg. Prussia was so powerful in the German Empire that having different people as Imperial Chancellor and Minister President made it hard to govern the country. Caprivi and Eulenburg were dismissed in 1894 and Prince Chlodwig of Hohenlohe-Schillingsfürst took both jobs.

Roger Guillemin
science
Roger Charles Louis Guillemin (born January 11, 1924 in Dijon, Bourgogne, France) received the National Medal of Science in 1976, and Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine in 1977 for his work on neurohormones.
Completing his undergraduate work at the University of Burgundy, Guillemin received his M.D. degree from the Medical Faculty at Lyon in 1949, and went to Montréal, Québec, Canada to work with Hans Selye at the Institute of Experimental Medicine and Surgery at the Université de Montréal where he received a Ph.D. in 1953. The same year he moved to the United States to join the faculty at Baylor College of Medicine at Houston. In 1965, he became a naturalized citizen of the United States. In 1970 he started a laboratory, San Diego where he worked until retirement in 1989.
Guillemin and Andrew V. Schally discovered the structures of TRH and GnRH in separate laboratories.

B'Day Anthology Video Album
music
"B'Day Anthology Video Album" is a video album, released by the American R&B singer-songwriter Beyoncé. It was released alongside "B'Day Deluxe Edition" on April 3, 2007.

Upgrade U
music
"Upgrade U" is an R&B/hip hop song written by Beyoncé Knowles.

Dangerously in Love
music
"Dangerously in Love" is the solo debut album by American R&B singer Beyoncé, released on June 24 2003 in the United States and June 23 2003 in the United Kingdom on Columbia Records.

Until the End of Time (Justin Timberlake song)
music
"Until the End of Time" is a R&B song written by Justin Timberlake, Tim Mosley, and Nate Hills and is the first single from the deluxe edition of his studio album "LoveSounds". Although the song has not been officially released yet, it currently receives heavy radio airplay on Mainstream Urban stations. The Benjamin Wright Orchestra also appears on the song. The official date was June 5, 2007 for mainstream urban radio. The single version of the song featuring Beyoncé Knowles debuted on US radio on September 26, 2007 and the official single release will be on November 13, 2007.
Music video.
A music video has been shot at the three major destinations: Philippines, Indonesia and Los Angeles (US) on October 24, 2007. The video was released on MTV, November 22, 2007.

B'Day
music
"B'Day" is the second studio album by American R&B singer Beyoncé, released by Columbia Records on 1 September 2006 outside North America, on September 4, 2006 worldwide, and on September 5, 2006 in Canada and the United States. The album's title comes from the fact that September 4, the date of worldwide release, is Beyoncé's birthday (2006 being her 25th). "B'Day" won the award for "Best Contemporary R&B Album" at the 49th Annual Grammy Awards. A two-CD deluxe edition of the album, including previously unreleased material in English and Spanish, was released on April 3 2007.
B'Day Deluxe Edition.
Columbia Records released "B'Day - Deluxe Edition", an expanded two-CD edition of R&B singer Beyoncé Knowles's "B'Day", on Tuesday, April 3 2007 in the U.S. and on Monday, April 23 2007 in the UK. In addition to the original twelve tracks from the album, disc one features five brand-new songs in English and disc two features six new Spanish language tracks. The album also featuers a cover of Des'ree's "Kissing You" renamed "Still in Love (Kissing You)". On the same day, a DVD featuring video clips for all tracks from "B'Day" was released as a Wal-Mart exclusive. With the release of the deluxe edition, "B'Day" made a jump from number sixty-nine back up to number six on the Billboard 200, selling 126,000 copies, and also went to number one on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums.
The Australian, European, and Japanese versions include both the deluxe edition of "B'Day" as well as the music video DVD.
In the week of April 22, the Deluxe Edition of B'Day and the Anthology Video album, which include the song "Still in Love (Kissing You)", were pulled from distribution because of a lawsuit filed by British singer Des'ree. The lawsuit is over Beyoncé's cover of Des'ree's "I'm Kissing You", which was given permission, but within certain limits; the song could not be used in video form, and the title should not be changed. On March 27, according to the complaint, they discovered that Beyoncé and her record label planned to include the song on the re-release anyway, changing the title of the song and making a video. In a letter to Beyoncé's lawyer and her distribution group Sony, the Royalty Network called the move "completely unacceptable". The version of the Deluxe Edition with the track has been discontinued and replaced by a version with the international track "If" and placing "World Wide Woman" in the main track list.

Peter Pears
music
Sir Peter Pears (his name rhymes with “cheers”) (born Farnham 22 June 1910; died Aldeburgh 3 April 1986) was an English tenor and life-long partner of the composer Benjamin Britten.
Pears was at school at Lancing College. He then studied music at Keble College, Oxford. He was organist at Hertford College, Oxford but left Oxford without taking his degree. He later studied singing for two terms at the Royal College of Music.
He met Britten in 1934, when he was a member of the BBC Singers. Pears and Britten gave their first recital together in 1937 at Balliol College, University of Oxford. In 1939 they went to America together because of World War II. However, in 1942 they decided to return to their own country. Back in England they performed Britten's song cycle "Seven Sonnets of Michelangelo" together at the Wigmore Hall in London (Britten was an excellent pianist), and then recorded them for EMI, their first recording together.
Peter Pears was a great inspiration for Britten’s vocal writing. Many of Britten's operas have a main tenor role which was written for Pears to sing. Britten also wrote over 100 songs with piano accompaniment. Britten also wrote works for tenor and orchestra. These include "Les Illuminations", "Nocturne", the "Serenade for Tenor, Horn and Strings" and the Canticles. In Britten’s operas he sang "Peter Grimes" and "Albert Herring" (title roles), "The Beggar's Opera" (Macheath), "Owen Wingrave" (Sir Philip Wingrave), "Billy Budd" (Captain Vere), "The Turn of the Screw" (Quint), "Death in Venice" (Aschenbach) and the three Church Parables.
Pears helped to write the words for "A Midsummer Night's Dream", based on the Shakespeare play. In most of Britten’s operas Pears sang serious roles, but in A Midsummer Night’s Dream he had a comic role: the part of Flute the Bellowsmender. In this role he was dressed up as a female and did a parody of the great opera singer Joan Sutherland singing the mad scene from "Lucia di Lammermoor ".
Pears’s voice was a lyrical tenor, not a heavy, operatic one. Britten was extremely skilful in writing music for him which suited his voice very well. He sang regularly at the Royal Opera House and many other opera houses in Europe and the United States.
He was also a great singer of Franz Schubert's "Lieder", usually with Britten as accompanist, and he often sang the part of the Evangelist in Johann Sebastian Bach's Passions.
His last great role written for him by Britten was as Aschenbach in "Death in Venice". He sang this in 1973 at the Aldeburgh Festival, and the following year in the Royal Opera House. Britten by then had heart disease and was too ill to go to the performances, dying in 1976.
Pears continued to live in the Red House, Aldeburgh. After he retired from performing he continued to teach young singers at the Britten-Pears Foundation. He was awarded a CBE in 1955 and knighted in 1977.
In his last years Pears also suffered from heart disease. He died ten years after Britten.
He is buried next to him in the churchyard of Saint Peter and Saint Paul's Church in Aldeburgh.
There are many recordings of Pears’s singing including almost all the music that Britten wrote for him as well as the roles of the Evangelist in Johann Sebastian Bach’s "St Matthew Passion" and "St John Passion " and Gerontius in Elgar’s "Dream of Gerontius ".

Richard von Weizsäcker
politics
Dr. Richard Freiherr von Weizsäcker (born April 15 1920) is a German politician, and a member of the CDU party. He was President of Germany from 1984 to 1994.
He was born in Stuttgart as the son of the diplomat Ernst von Weizsäcker and brother of physicist and philosopher Carl Friedrich von Weizsäcker. His grandfather Carl von Weizsäcker had been Minister President of Württemberg
In war he served in the German Army. He was wounded in East Prussia in 1945 and was sent home to Stuttgart. Then he continued his study of history in Göttingen and eventually studied law. As a law student he was a member of his father's defence team at the Eleventh secondary Nuremburg Trial. He took his first judicial state exam in 1950, the second in 1953, and in 1955 was promoted "doctor juris". In 1953 he married Marianne von Kretschmann; they have four children.
Richard von Weizsäcker joined the CDU in 1954 and was a member of the Bundestag (German Parliament) from 1969 to 1981. He was elected vice president of the Bundestag 1979-1981, but did not stand for re-election, because he became the Governing Mayor () of West Berlin (1981-1984).
He was elected President of Germany by the Bundesversammlung (Federal Convention) in 1984, succeeding Karl Carstens.
Although now an elder statesman, Richard von Weizsäcker is still involved in politics and charitable affairs. He was the chair of a commission installed by the then SPD-Die Grünen government for reforming the Bundeswehr.
He has served on many international commissions. He was chairman of the Independent Working Group on the future of the United Nations and was one of three 'Wise Men' appointed by European Commission President Romano Prodi to consider the future of the European Union.
von Weizsäcker has written may books, including
His autobiograghy called is "From Weimar to the Wall: My Life in German Politics" (1999).

Peter Hook
music
Peter "Hooky" Hook (born February 13, 1956 in Salford, England) is an English bass guitar player. He played in the bands Joy Division, New Order, Revenge and Monaco.

Bernard Sumner
music
Bernard Sumner is a singer with the band New Order. He is also known as Bernard Albrecht. He was born in 1956 in Salford, England. He plays guitar and keyboard.

William Walton
music
Sir William Walton, (born Oldham, 29 March 1902; died Ischia, Italy, 8 March 1983) was a British composer and conductor. He was one of the most important British composers of the mid-20th century, a period that included Benjamin Britten and Michael Tippett. His music has very lively rhythms which are often jazzy.
Early years.
Walton’s family were musical but they had very little money. Both his parents sang, and Walton sang in the local church choir. His father would hit him if he made a mistake. This may be why in later life he was so careful about every note he wrote.
At the age of ten he joined the choir of Christ Church Cathedral in Oxford. He learned the piano and violin. He was only 16 years when he went to University of Oxford where he was at Christ Church, Oxford. Most of what he knew about composing he taught himself. He studied the scores of works by Stravinsky, Debussy, Sibelius and others. He had some lessons from Hugh Allen, the cathedral organist. At Oxford Walton became friends with two poets: Sacheverell Sitwell and Siegfried Sassoon. Most of the music he wrote when he was very young has been lost, but the choral anthem "A Litany", written when he was just fifteen, shows his musical talent with its modern harmonies.
Walton left Oxford in 1920 without a degree having failed his exams three times. He went to live with the Sitwell family, who introduced him to many important people, including the composer Constant Lambert and song writer Noel Coward. He also travelled with the Sitwells to Italy. In 1923 he set one of Edith Sitwell’s poems to music. The piece was called "Façade". The music was very jazzy and almost jokey, and it sounded very modern to many people at that time.
During the 1920s, Walton earned some money playing the piano at jazz clubs, but he spent most of his time composing in the Sitwells' attic. The orchestral overture "Portsmouth Point" (which he dedicated to Sassoon) was the first work which shows Walton’s real style. In 1929 the Viola Concerto started to make him really famous. This was followed by "Belshazzar's Feast" (1931), the Symphony No. 1 (1935), the coronation march "Crown Imperial" (1937), and the Violin Concerto (1939). All these works are very popular today.
After World War II.
During World War II, Walton did not have to do military service so that he had time to compose music for propaganda films, such as "The First of the Few" (1942), and Laurence Olivier's adaptation of Shakespeare's "Henry V" (1944). After composing a second string quartet (1946) Walton spent most of the next seven years writing his opera, "Troilus and Cressida" (1947-1954). The opera was not very popular. This was because his music was rather Romantic, very different from a lot of modern music that was in fashion in the 1950s, especially the music of Pierre Boulez and his followers.
Walton also composed the music for two more Shakespeare-Olivier films - the Academy Award-winning "Hamlet", and "Richard III". Walton, however, did not win Oscars for any of his Shakespeare-based scores.
Walton then started to write more orchestral music: the Cello Concerto (1956), the Symphony No. 2 (1960), and the "Variations on a Theme by Hindemith" (1963). He started to have many honours: He was knighted in 1951 and received the Order of Merit in 1968. People liked his one-act comic opera "The Bear", when it was performed at the Aldeburgh Festival in 1967, and he was asked by people from all over the world for new music. His song-cycles from this period were given their first performances by famous singers such as Peter Pears and Elisabeth Schwarzkopf.
In his last years, Walton found composition more and more difficult. He tried to compose a third symphony for André Previn, but later gave up. His last works were mostly church music or reworkings of older pieces.. He had settled on the island of Ischia in Italy in 1949 with his Argentinian wife Susana Gil. He died there in 1983.
Since his death, Walton's music has been performed and recorded a lot. People no longer think of him as old-fashioned, but as a composer who had a very strong personality which can be heard clearly in his music.
Walton was knighted in 1951 and appointed to the Order of Merit in 1967.

Muzio Clementi
music
Muzio Clementi was a composer who lived from 1752 to 1832. He was born in Rome, Italy.

Ciara
music
Ciara Princess Harris (born October 25, 1985) professionally known as Ciara, is an American singer, songwriter, record producer, dancer, and actress. Ciara made her debut in the summer of 2004 with the "Billboard" number-one single "Goodies". The album "Goodies" was released the fourth quarter of 2004 and first quarter of 2005. It produced three top two singles on the Billboard Hot 100, selling over 2.6 million in the U.S., and three million worldwide, and earned various awards and nominations.
Ciara's second album, ', was released in December 2006. It has spawned the hit singles "Get Up", "Promise", and "Like a Boy". The album has sold nearly two million copies worldwide.

Bartolomeo Tromboncino
music
Bartolomeo Tromboncino (born Verona around 1470; died in or near Venice in 1535 or later) was an Italian composer. He lived in the Renaissance period. He is famous as a composer of songs called "frottole". He is also remembered because he murdered his wife.
We know very little about his life. He probably grew up in Mantua. In a letter he says that he came from Verona. Until around 1500 he lived and worked in Mantua, but sometimes he went to other towns when he was in trouble. In 1499 he found his wife with another man, so he murdered her. He may also have murdered the other man. We cannot be sure about this.
He does not seem to have been punished. This may be because a wealthy lady called Isabella d'Este liked him.
From 1502 Tromboncino was employed by a rich lady called Lucrezia Borgia. She is remembered today because she was a very bad woman. He wrote music for the court and for her wedding to Alfonso d'Este. Sometime before 1521 he moved to Venice, where he probably spent the rest of his life.
His frottole are very lively and full of fun. He played the trombone. This is how he got his name. He also wrote some serious sacred music.

Boy George
music
George Alan O'Dowd, better known as Boy George (born June 14, 1961 in Eltham, London) is a rock singer-songwriter and Club DJ. He grew up in a large, working-class Irish family. The family which originally came form Thurles, in Co. Tipperary, Ireland.
O'Dowd was a part of the British new romantic movement which emerged in the late 1970s and was popularised in the early 1980s. He and Marilyn, born Peter Robinson were regulars at 'The Blitz' (regulars being labelled as Blitz Kids), a highly stylised nightclub in London run by Steve Strange of the musical group Visage, and a place which spawned many early 1980s pop stars such as Spandau Ballet. Essentially the new romantics based their image on the coolness of David Bowie and high fashion, and the music of David Bowie, Kraftwerk, Marc Bolan and post punk New Wave see Taboo.
O'Dowd gained fame with his group Culture Club during the 1980s. His music is often classified as blue-eyed soul, since he was heavily influenced by Rhythm and Blues and Reggae. Early recordings with Culture Club showed that O'Dowd's vocals had an emotional quality which was like American soul music of the 1960s and 1970s. His later solo work has also touched on glam rock influences and was particularly influenced by David Bowie and Iggy Pop.
Boy George is also known for his flamboyant and androgynous appearance back in the 80s and early 90s.

Pervez Musharraf
politics
Pervez Musharraf () (born August 11, 1943) was the twelfth President of Pakistan. Previously, he was Chief Executive of Pakistan as well as former Chief of Army Staff of the Pakistan Army.

Geri Halliwell
music
Geraldine Estelle "Geri" Halliwell (born 6 August 1972) is an English pop music singer. She is very famous for being in the popular pop group the Spice Girls.
She left the Spice Girls in May 1998 and continued singing as a solo. In 2007, she reunited with the Spice Girls to do a world tour.

Get Me Bodied
music
"Get Me Bodied" is a song written by Beyoncé Knowles, Sean Garrett, Solange Knowles, Angela Beyince, Makeba Riddick, and Swizz Beatz for Knowles' second studio album, "B'Day" (2006). Produced by Swizz Beatz, Sean Garrett, and Beyoncé, it was released as the album's fifth single in the United States on July 10, 2007, and has since reached number 68 on the U.S. "Billboard" Hot 100.

Listen (song)
music
"Listen" is a song performed by American R&B singer-songwriter Beyoncé Knowles in the 2006 film "Dreamgirls". It was released as the first single from the film's soundtrack album on December 5, 2006 in the United States and on was released in the United Kingdom on February 19, 2007. The song can also be found as a hidden track on international editions of the singer's second solo studio album, "B'Day" (2006).

Irreemplazable
music
"Irreemplazable" is a Spanish and Spanglish fare EP by female R&B singer Beyoncé Knowles. It was released on August 28 in US. At the same time, a CD/DVD combo was released exclusively at Wal-mart. The DVD features behind the scenes documentary entitled La Evolucion Latina de Beyoncé (The Latin Evolution of Beyoncé) as well as the music video for Beyoncé's "Get Me Bodied" (Timbaland remix) featuring Voltio.

Suga Mama
music
"Suga Mama" is an R&B/soul/funk/rock song written by Beyoncé Knowles, Rich Harrison, and Makeba, and produced by Knowles and Harrison for Knowles' second solo album, "B'Day" (2006). It features a sample of Jake Wade and the Soul Searchers' song "Searching for Soul", which was written by Chuck Middleton. The music video for the song was released on television in the United Kingdom in April 2007.
Music video and other promotion.
The "Suga Mama" music video was released to UK music channels in April 2007. It is black-and-white and was co-directed by Melina and Knowles for the "B'Day Anthology Video Album", which was released the same month; it was one of eight videos shot in two weeks for the album. It begins with Knowles sitting in a chair, wearing men's clothing and smoking a cigar. She gets up and begins to pole dance. The remainder of the video presents Knowles dancing on top of a sugar cube, dancing with backing dancers whose faces are partially concealed, lying in a circle of light and riding a mechanical bull. Knowles said she is meant to "slowly become a woman" during the video, adding "Well, a sexier woman — I'm always a woman."
Knowles rehearsed the pole dancing using two ballet bars, which was when it was decided to add a pole above her head to form an arc. Though Knowles is from Texas, she had never previously been on mechanical bull. There were no problems during warm-ups, but the man operating the bull during the video shoot programmed it to go faster, causing Knowles to fall off when she tried to perform tricks such as lifting up her foot, leaning back and turning around. To minimise the time Knowles spent on the bull, the director shot the sequence at twelve frames per second (see frame rate) and Knowles sang twice as quickly, but it wasn't until 4:00 a.m. that they completed work.
"Suga Mama" was included on the set list of Knowles's 2007 tour, The Beyoncé Experience, and "The Tennessean" wrote that the song "was even sexier and more gutbucket than on record". A remix of the song features rapper Consequence.

Westdeutscher Rundfunk
media
The Westdeutscher Rundfunk (WDR, official "Westdeutscher Rundfunk Köln") is a German public-broadcasting institution based in the Federal State of North Rhine-Westphalia with its main office in Cologne.
WDR is a constituent member of the consortium of German public-broadcasting institutions, ARD.
The WDR produces the regional television service WDR Fernsehen (formerly known as WDF and West3) and six regional radio channels.

Deutsche Welle
media
Deutsche Welle or DW is Germany's international broadcaster. It broadcasts news and information on shortwave, Internet and satellite radio in 29 languages (DW-RADIO). It has a satellite television service (DW-TV) that is available in four languages, and there is also, a 30-language online news site. "Deutsche Welle", which in English means "German Wave", is similar to international broadcasters such as the BBC World Service, Radio Canada International, Voice of America, and Radio France Internationale.

Hollywood (Jay-Z song)
music
"Hollywood" is the fourth single from Jay-Z's latest solo album Kingdom Come. The song features Jay-Z's longtime girlfriend, R&B singer Beyoncé. The song is also featured on Beyoncé's B'Day Deluxe Edition with more of Beyoncé's vocals and less of Jay-Z's under the title "Welcome To Hollywood".
Music video.
A video for Jay-Z's album version does not exist but an official video was created for "Welcome to Hollywood" using clips of different Beyoncé videos (much like the "Lose My Breath" megamix on the Destiny's Child Fan Pack II). The video is played as an interlude on Beyoncé's B'Day Tour, The Beyoncé Experience.

Friedrich Ebert
politics
Friedrich Ebert (February 4, 1871 – February 28, 1925) was a German politician (SPD).
He was Chancellor of Germany and its first president during the Weimar period.

Petr Eben
music
Petr Eben (Žamberk, 22 January 1929; died Prague 24 October 2007) was a Czech composer and organist. Many musicians think of him as the most important Czech composer of the late 20th century. He was known world wide for his organ playing. He was especially good at improvisation.
His Life.
Eben grew up in Český Krumlov in south Bohemia. He learned to play the piano, and later the cello and organ. Because his father was a Jew he had to leave school in 1943 and spent the rest of the war years in concentration camp in Buchenwald. In the camp he saw many terrible things, including graves into which the Nazis were throwing lots of murdered Jews. These terrible things influenced his music in later years. He had a strong faith and this helped him to survive during 40 years of living in Czechoslovakia under communist rule.
After the war he went to Prague Academy for Music where he studied the piano with František Rauch and composition with Pavel Bořkovec. In 1955 he got a job as lecturer at Charles University in Prague. He stayed there until 1990. He was the country’s best composer, and he should have had promotion, but the communist politicians did not allow this. He went to church every Sunday with his family. This did not help his career in a communist state.
After the Velvet Revolution in 1989, when his country became free from the Soviet Union, he started to become a national hero. He was made Professor of Composition and president of the Prague Spring Music Festival. Many music festivals performed his compositions, and he traveled to hear the concerts in spite of the fact that he was starting to become ill. His music was often played in England, where he had spent two years as professor of composition at the Royal Northern College of Music in Manchester from 1978 to 1979. In March 2007 the BBC Symphony Orchestra under their Czech conductor Jiří Bělohlávek performed his "Vox Clamantis", a work he had written in 1968 which shows the Czech people’s longing to be free.
His compositions.
Eben continued during his lifetime to develop the style of music in which he wrote. He was interested in Czech folk music and he wrote down many folk songs that he heard in Moravia. He listened to plainchant in church music. All this helped him to develop his own style of composition. He is best-known abroad for his organ music, especially works such as "Musica Dominicalis" ("Sunday Music") which includes a popular piece called "Moto Ostinato". Other organ works include "Faust" (1980), "Job" (1987) and "A Festive Voluntary" which is a set of variations on the tune of "Good King Wenceslas", written for the reopening in 1986 of the organ at Chichester Cathedral which had just been restored. He also wrote a lot of music for orchestra as well as chamber music. He composed some beautiful music for children’s choir, including church music called "Liturgical Songs".

Cy Young
sports
Denton True "Cy" Young (March 29, 1867 – November 4, 1955) was an American baseball player who was a pitcher for five different professional baseball teams from 1890 to 1911. He set many pitching records during his 22-year career in Major League Baseball (MLB), some of which have stood for 100 years. When Young retired from baseball, he had won a total of 511 games in his career, the most in MLB history and 94 more wins than Walter Johnson, who is second on the list.
In 1956, the MLB created the Cy Young Award. The award is given each year to the pitcher who is voted the most effective in each of the two leagues. Young was voted into the Baseball Hall of Fame in 1939. During his professional career, Young won 30 or more games in a season five times, with ten other seasons of 20+ wins. He also pitched three no-hitters, including the first perfect game of baseball's "modern era."
In addition to wins, Young holds the MLB records for most career innings pitched (7,355), most career games started (815), and most complete games (749). He also retired with 316 losses, the most in MLB history (the only other pitcher with more than 300 career losses was Pud Galvin). Young also had 76 career shutouts, the fourth most in history.
In 1999, 88 years after his final Major League appearance and 44 years after his death, editors at "The Sporting News" ranked Cy Young 14th on their list of "Baseball's 100 Greatest Players". That same year, baseball fans named Young to the Major League Baseball All-Century Team.
Early life.
Young was born in Gilmore, Ohio, a farming community located in eastern Ohio. Young went by the name "Dent Young" in his early years.
He was raised on a farm and was sometimes called "Farmer Young" and "Farmboy Young". Young stopped going to school after he finished 6th grade.
Professional career.
Young began his professional career in 1889 with the Canton, Ohio team of the Tri-State League, a professional minor league. The catcher who warmed up Young gave him the nickname "Cyclone" because of the speed of his fastball. Reporters then shortened the name to "Cy". "Cy" became the nickname he used the rest of his life.
In 1890, Young signed for $500 with the Cleveland Spiders, which had moved up from the American Association to the National League the previous year.
Two years later, the National League moved the pitcher's mound from fifty feet away from the home plate (where it had been since 1881) to sixty feet and six inches. In the book "James Guide to Pitchers", sports journalist Rob Neyer wrote that the reason for the move was that pitchers like Cy Young, Amos Rusie, and Jouett Meekin threw too fast at the shorter distance.
On September 18, 1897, Young pitched the first no-hitter of his career in a game against the Cincinnati Reds. Although Young did not walk a batter, the Spiders committed four errors while on defense.
Before the 1899 season, Frank Robison, the owner of the Spiders, bought the St. Louis Browns, thus owning two clubs at the same time. Just weeks before the start of the season, most of the better Spiders players were transferred to St. Louis, including three future Hall of Famers: Young, Jesse Burkett and Bobby Wallace. Despite the changes in the team members, St. Louis finished fifth in both 1899 and 1900. The Spiders lost 134 games, the most in MLB history, before folding.
In 1901, Young left St. Louis and joined the American League's Boston Americans for a $3,500 contract. Young stayed with the Boston team until 1909.
Young was traded back to Cleveland before the 1909 season, this time to the Cleveland Naps of the American League. He split 1911, his final year, between the Naps and the Boston Rustlers.
On September 22, 1911, Young shut out the Pittsburgh Pirates and their pitcher Babe Adams 1-0, for his last career win. However, two weeks later, Young's 906th and final game ended badly: the last eight batters of Young's career combined to hit a triple, four singles and three doubles.
Young's legacy.
Young retired after the 1911 season with 511 career wins. His win total set the record for most career wins by a pitcher. At the time, Pud Galvin had the second most career wins with 364. Walter Johnson, then in his fourth season, finished his career with 417 wins and is now second on the list. However, Johnson broke Young's career record for strikeouts.
Cy Young's career is seen as a bridge from baseball's earliest days to its modern era. When Young's career began, pitchers delivered the baseball underhand and fouls were not counted as strikes. The pitcher's mound was not moved back to its present position of 60 feet, six inches until Young's fourth season. He did not wear a glove until his sixth.
Young also said that his offseason farming chores, including wood chopping, kept his pitching arm in good shape until he was 44. Even at the time of his retirement, his arm was healthy, but Young had gained weight and was unable to field his position anymore. In three of his last four years, he was the oldest player in the league.
The first Cy Young Award was voted on in 1956, and was given to Brooklyn's Don Newcombe. Originally, it was a single award covering the whole of baseball. The honor was divided into two Cy Young Awards in 1967, one for each league.

Giuseppe Piazzi
science
Giuseppe Piazzi (July 7, 1746 – July 22, 1826) was an Italian astronomer who was famous for discovering the asteriod, now dwarf planet "Ceres".

Henry Cavendish
science
Henry Cavendish (October 10, 1731 - February 24, 1810) was a British scientist. He is famous for discovering hydrogen.
He measured the earth's mass and density with Cavendish Experiment.
He studied at Peterhouse College, which is part of the University of Cambridge but he couldn't graduate in there.
He built a laboratory near London, where vhe worked for nearly fifty years, but he only published about 20 scientific papers. Evenso, he is called one of the greatest scientist of his period.
Cavendish claimed that the force between the two electrical objects is inversely proportional to their distance's square. He explained the concept of electric potential, which was already known in Math but had been never used in electrical experiments until that day. He developed the thought of all points on a good conductor's surface have the same potential energy beside a common reference point. Because of no possibility to measure electric current, he used his body as a machine which measures strength of electric current. All Cavendish's explorations in his notebook was found and confirmed by James Clerk Maxwell.

Alexey Ekimyan
music
Alexey Ekimyan (, (April 10, 1927, Baku - April 24, 1982, Moscow) was a famous Armenian-Russian composer, and author of popular songs. Ekimyan was also a General of Soviet militsia (police) and was the head of Criminal Investigation Department of Moscow region. He was considered the only popular composer in the world who ruled a law-enforcement department at the same time. Ekimyan awarded by the "Renowned Master of the Arts" Armenian SSR official title.
Ekimyan's first song for the Moscow International Festival (1957) was approved by Vano Muradeli ("I don't know if you would become a general, but you would become a composer!"). His songs were performed and recorded by prominent Soviet singers that include Lyudmila Zykina, Iosif Kobzon, Lusine Zakaryan. Some hits by Ekimyan were chosen for the "Song of the Year" all-Soviet festivals during the 1970s-'80s.
The documentary film-concert "Paths of My Memory" (1979, 27 min.) by Yerevan Studio is dedicated to the Alexey Ekimyan.
Ekimyan died on April 24, 1982. He is buried in Yerevan, Armenia.

Mikael Tariverdiev
music
Mikael Tariverdiev was a prominent Soviet composer, who was born of Armenian parents in Georgia but lived in Russia.
He is an author of over 100 romances and 2 operas. But most of all he is known for his music in many popular Soviet movies.
Mikael Tariverdiev was a recipient of multiple awards, including the USSR State Prize (1977) and the prize of the American Academy of Music (1975). He was made People's Artist of Russia in 1986.
The Best Music prize at the largest Russian national film festival Kinotaur is named after Tariverdiev.

Live in Atlanta
music
Destiny's Child: Live in Atlanta features Destiny's Child performing live in Atlanta, Georgia at Philips Arena on July 15, 2005 during their Destiny Fulfilled... And Lovin' It which sponsored by McDonald's, it was also known as the last tour of Destiny's Child. It has been released on March 28, 2006 in the United States. The DVD debuted at #1 on the Billboard Music DVD charts breaking record sales about 500,000 copies at first week, instead of those numbers Nielsen SoundScan tracked sales of 50,000 because the restrictions about retail, international deliveries and e-packages, RIAA already certified the DVD as Platinum.
This was also released as a two-disc CD but only seemingly in Japan.

Johann Christian Bach
music
Johann Christian Bach (born Leipzig, 5 September 1735; died London, 1 January 1782) was a composer of the Classical period. He was the eleventh and youngest son of the great composer Johann Sebastian Bach. He is often called 'the London Bach' or 'the English Bach', because he spent many years living in London. He became internationally famous, both as a composer and as a performer. Mozart liked his music, and learned a lot about how to write good concertos by looking at the concertos of J. C. Bach.
Childhood.
Johann Christian Bach’s parents were Johann Sebastian and Anna Magdalena Bach. He was born in Leipzig, Germany. His famous father was one of the last composers of the Baroque period. His father was already 50 when J. C. Bach was born, so it is not surprising that by the time Johann Christian had grown up the style of music had changed a lot since Johann Sebastian had been writing his great works. Johann Christian belonged to the Classical period. He was 15 when his father died. He moved to Berlin and his half-brother Carl Philipp Emanuel Bach, who was already a famous composer, gave him more music lessons.
Italy.
Johann Christian lived in Italy for many years from 1756, first studying counterpoint with Padre Martini in Bologna and later with Giovanni Battista Sammartini. He became an organist at the cathedral in Milan in 1760. However, he soon started to become successful as an opera composer and he left his cathedral job so that he could work in the theatre and travel more in Italy.
Johann Christian had been brought up in the Lutheran church, but in Italy he became a Catholic. He married the Italian soprano Cecilia Grassi. She was about eight years older than Johann Christian and, perhaps because of this, they never had children.
London years.
In 1762 he moved to London. He was very successful there, and earned plenty of money to live comfortably. He knew the royal family and many important aristocratic people as well as famous people such as the painter Gainsborough and the musician and writer Charles Burney. King George III and Queen Charlotte went to hear his first London opera "Orione" in 1763. He gave the Queen music lessons.
He lived at a time when the piano was becoming a popular instrument and the harpsichord was becoming old-fashioned. J. C. Bach wrote a lot of music for the piano and gave the very first concert of piano music in London in 1768. He wrote 6 keyboard concertos and dedicated them to the Queen. The last movement of Concerto no 6 was a set of variations on "God Save the King". This became a very popular piece of music at the time. He wrote many songs that became popular in his time. They were often performed in Vauxhall Gardens, a park where many people went to be entertained.
He gave many concerts together with Carl Friedrich Abel, a well-known player of the viola da gamba. Abel and Bach may have known one another as children because both their fathers had worked together in Cöthen in Germany. In April 1764 J. C. Bach met the 8-year-old Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart who visited London with his father Leopold. They played duets on the harpsichord together.
He composed cantatas, chamber music, keyboard and orchestral works, operas, symphonies and songs. He had many works published in London and Paris.
During his last years he lost a lot of money. The Bach-Abel concert series lost money, and one of Bach’s servants stole £1000 from him which was a very large sum on those days. His health started to become bad and, when he died, he left his wife with a lot of debt. Queen Charlotte helped to pay a lot of the debt, and his widow went back to Italy.
He was buried in St Pancras churchyard, London.

Taylor Swift
music
Taylor Alison Swift (born December 13, 1989) is an American country pop singer-songwriter. She had her first hit, "Tim McGraw", in 2006 at the age of 16.
She won CMT's "Breakthrough Video of the Year" award in 2007 for "Tim McGraw". She was also nominated by the Academy of Country Music for "Top New Female Vocalist".

Socialist Reich Party
politics
The Socialist Reich Party of Germany (German: "Sozialistische Reichspartei Deutschlands") was a political party in West Germany. It was formed in 1949.
It was openly Neo-Nazi and admired Hitler. It split from the German Empire Party. Leaders included Otto Ernst Remer, a former Major General, and Fritz Dorls.
The SRP claimed West Germany's first Chancellor, Konrad Adenauer only did what the United States told, and that Karl Dönitz was the last legal of Germany.
The SRP also said that the Holocaust never happened, and that the ovens of the Dachau concentration camp were built by the United States after 1945. The SRP also wanted Europe to be led by a reunited German Reich, and that it would not be capitalist or communist.
The SRP never criticised the Soviet Union because the Russians funded the SRP because it was anti-American. The only other party modern in postwar Germany was ehe Communist Party of Germany. It did not get Soviet funds because the Russians thought it was useless.. SRP leader Remer once said that if the USSR ever did invade Germany, he would "show the Russians the way to the Rhine".
The SRP had its own paramilitary organisation, the Reichsfront.
The SRP had about ten thousand members and it won 16 seats in the Lower Saxony Landtag election, and 8 seats Bremen.
It was banned in 1952 by the Federal Constitutional Court of Germany, the only court with the power to do so.

Deutsche Reichspartei
politics
The Deutsche Reichspartei (DRP) ("German Reich Party", "German Imperial Party" or "German Empire Party") was a nationalist political party in West Germany. It was a merger of the German Conservative Party - Deutsche Right Party (DKP-DRP) and the old Hessian Nationaldemokratischen Partei (NDP).
The initial founders of the party were among others: Alexander Andrae, Oskar Lutz, Hans Bernd von Grünberg, Wilhelm Meinberg, Otto Heß, Hans Schikora, Heinrich Kunstmann, Adolf von Thadden.
In 1949 the Sozialistische Reichspartei (SRP) split away from it. This was because the Empire Party was not neo-Nazi, and did not want to be associated with Adolf Hitler.
Instead the party preferred to say how good the Second German Empire (1870-1919). The Deutsche Reichspartei did become more national socialist after 1952. This is when the Sozialistische Reichspartei was banned by the Federal Constitutional Court of Germany and a lot of its members re-joined the Empire Party.
The party was not very successful in the 1950s, but seemed to be getting more popular after the state elections of 1959. But the success did not last, and the party held its final conference in 1964 when it was dissolved. It was quickly replaced by the new Nationaldemokratische Partei Deutschlands.

Trinny Woodall
media
Trinny Woodall (born Sarah-Jane Woodall in February 8, 1964) is an English expert in fashion, author, television presenter and journalist.
Trinny Woodall first became famous when she presented a reality show called "What Not to Wear" with Susannah Constantine on the BBC. She then was on "The Oprah Winfrey Show" in 2004 and helped American people with their clothes and appearance. She then presented "Trinny & Susannah Undress" on ITV in 2006 and "Trinny & Susannah Undress The Nation" in 2007.
She has also written lots of fashion books with Constantine in Britain and America which have been made into many languages. Their first major book, "What Not to Wear", sold 670,000 copies and won a British Book Award.

Susannah Constantine
media
Susannah Caroline Constantine (born June 3, 1962) is an English television presenter, fashion expert, author and journalist. In her early career, Constantine worked with famous fashion designers like John Galliano. She met Trinny Woodall in 1994 at a party and wrote about fashion in a newspaper called "The Telegraph". Susannah Constantine also dated the member of the royal family, David, Viscount Linley in the 1980s.
Constantine and Woodall became famous when they presented a reality show in Britain called "What Not to Wear". In 2002, they won a Royal Television Award for being the best presenters. In 2006 Constantine hosted another fashion show on ITV called "Trinny & Susannah Undress". She has also been on "The Oprah Winfrey Show" with Trinny Woodall, and helped women with their clothes. They have made many fashion books which have been successful in America and Britain, and have been translated into many languages. It is thought that the books have sold 2.5 million copies around the world.

Anna Wintour
media
Anna Wintour (born November 3, 1949 in London) is an English-American editor and journalist. Wintour is currently the chief editor at a famous fashion magazine called "Vogue". She has been the editor since 1988.
Life.
Anna Wintour stopped going to school at 16 and started her career in fashion. She worked on magazines in America called "New York" and "Home & Garden". She then went back to Britain and worked on a British magazine known as "Vogue". She later worked on the American version, making them both more popular and successful. Wintour supports young fashion designers and is sometimes called "Nuclear Wintour" because of her demanding personality.
"The Devil Wears Prada".
It is thought that Anna Wintour was the inspiration behind the demanding editor, Miranda Priestly, in the novel "The Devil Wears Prada". The author of the book, Lauren Weisberger, had worked as the personal assistant of Anna Wintour at "Vogue". It has been suggested that the setting and Priestly were based on "Vogue" and Wintour, but Weisberger denies this, and says that Wintour is given her own appearance near the end of the book.
Before the book started selling, Wintour told the "New York Times", "I always enjoy a great piece of fiction. I haven't decided whether I am going to read it or not."
"Ugly Betty".
Wintour is also mentioned in "Ugly Betty" when Wilhelmina Slater is going to get a better job at "MODE" (the magazine) after Bradford Meade is arrested. She does not accept a lunch invitation from Anna Wintour, saying she should have called back in 1998, not 2007.

Dwight Hicks
sports
Dwight Hicks was born April 5, 1956 in Mount Holly, New Jersey. He was a professional American football player. He played the defensive back position for the Toronto Argonauts in 1978. He also played in the National Football League (NFL) for the San Francisco 49ers from 1979 to 1985 and for the Indianapolis Colts in 1986. Before that, Dwight Hicks played for the University of Michigan. He is a four-time Pro Bowl selection from 1981 to 1984. He helped the 49ers to win 2 NFL Championships in Super Bowl XVI and Super Bowl XIX.
Hicks led the NFL in interceptions in the 1981 season, and return yards. He went on to be very important in the Super Bowl. After the 49ers lost a fumble on the opening kickoff, the Cincinatti Bengals got the football to San Francisco 5-yard line. Hicks made an interception and stopped the Bengals from scoring.
In Hicks eight NFL seasons, he had 32 interceptions, 602 interception return yards, 14 fumble recoveries, 112 fumble return yards, and 4 touchdowns.
Hicks went on to become a popular character actor in movies such as "The Rock", "Jack", "Armageddon", and "In the Mix" after his football career. He also made appearances on many television programs. Some shows that he appeared on include "Nash Bridges", "The Pretender", "The Practice", "The X-Files", "ER" and "The O.C."

Jeanne Demessieux
music
Jeanne Demessieux (born Montpellier, France, 13 February 1921; died Paris, 11 November 1968), was a French organist and composer.
She started to learn the piano when she was very young and was soon learning at the Paris Conservatory. Her family moved to Paris so that she could continue to have music lessons there. She became a student at the Conservatoire in 1933. In the same year she got a job as organist of the St. Esprit church in Paris. She had this job for 29 years.
Between 1936 and 1939, she studied organ privately with the famous organist Marcel Dupré, and in 1939 she joined his organ class at the Conservatory. After receiving a first prize in organ performance and improvisation in 1941, Jeanne Demessieux studied five more years with Dupré in Meudon, before she played her first recital at Salle Pleyel in Paris in 1946. This was the beginning of her career as an international recitalist. She played more than 700 concerts in Europe and the United States.
Jeanne Demessieux had an amazing musical memory: she could play more than than 2,500 works without the printed music, including all the organ works of Johann Sebastian Bach, César Franck, Franz Liszt, Felix Mendelssohn-Bartholdy and Marcel Dupré.
She was also an amazing improviser. When she gave her first concert in London she was given four tunes by four different people and was asked to improvise a long piece of music on the organ using all those tunes.
Jeanne Demessieux made many recordings. She taught the organ at Nancy and Brussels. She had plans to record all the organ works Olivier Messiaen. However, sadly she died of cancer before she was able to start work on these plans.
She wrote many compositions, especially for the organ. These include: "Nativité",
"Six Études", "Sept Méditations sur le Saint-Esprit", "Triptyque", "Twelve Choral-Preludes on Gregorian Chant Themes", "Te Deum"

Mike Gravel
politics
Maurice Robert Gravel, better know as Mike Gravel (born May 13, 1930 in Springfield, Massachusetts) is an American politician, a member of the Democratic Party. He served as a United States Senator from Alaska (1969-1981) and, previously, as member of the Alaska House of Representatives (1953-1966, speaker from 1965-1966). He is currently a candidate for the Democratic Presidential nomination in 2008.
Gravel is primarily know for his successful effort to end military draft during the Vietnam War and put the Pentagon Papers into the public record in 1971.
Currently as a Presidential candidate he is advocating imminent withdrawal of US Armed Forces from Iraq, expanding of the health care, and social security, preventing global warming. He is also one of the earliest and the most prominent advocates of direct democracy in the United States.

Iva Zanicchi
music
Iva Zanicchi (born January 18, 1940) is a italian singer

António de Oliveira Salazar
politics
António de Oliveira Salazar called a dictator by some people and a Statesman by others was perhaps the only politician in modern Portuguese history to stir passions years after his passing away.An academic, Dr Salazar was a Professor of Economics and perhaps the most educated and urbane European leader of the time.
Following a military revolution in 1926 which overthrew a civilian government of squabbling politicians and a country close to penury Dr. Salazar was invited to put right the finances of what was then a failed state, Dr Salazar was Finance Minister for 13 days, resigned in disgust over interfering politicians and soldiers and went back to his university. He was again persuaded to take over as Finance Minister in 1928 which he did conditionally on an assurance of greated powers for himself and minimal interference from the government. Salazar continued as minister until 1932 and was widely credited with turning the flagging economy around.
Dr Salazar was Prime Minister from 1932 until 1968.
He ruled Portugal for almost 40 years, managing to keep Portugal away from the Second World War and preventing also a Spanish invasion by keeping friends on both sides. Salazar died in 1970. Often called a fascist by his opponents, Dr Salazar's regime was instrumental in issuing Portuguese nationality documents to thousands of fleeing Jews though Europe and ultimately through Portugal a boarding point for the ultimate flight to North America.Unfortunately Dr Salazar's contribution to this humanitarian cause was never acknowledged as this activity had to be toned down & wound up in the later years of the war. Embassy staff in Europe particularly in Vichy France some say for reasons other than just humanitarian turned a limited covert operation into a massive flood, provoking a angry rumble from a powerful Germany. Ironically some such embassy officials are feted to this day as the valiant individuals who helped the desperate Jews.
A little known fact is that Salazar's Portugal was the only European nation at the time to have non white people at all levels of administration and judiciary. Dark skinned people termed "colonial subjects" in other colonial empires were accorded full civil status by Portugal. It was the only State anywhere in the western world to have non European Members of Parliament. This status was however not universally available to the Blacks of the African territories i.e. those who were not "assimilados" (literately translated to "assimilated")which meant those Africans who had not given up their tribal customs nor reached minimum educational standards.Roughly 4% of the African populace was considered "assimilado" whilst in the overseas colonies of Cape Verde,India and China 100% were considered assimilados even though in the latter two territories, people were not largely of the Roman Catholic faith nor did most speak the Portuguese language.
In the mid sixties Portugal and its colonies found themselves in the front line of the Cold war, with a proxy war which drained Portugal of its resources. Salazar was blamed for a War he had no control over and the consequent impoverishment of his country. Thousands from mainland Portugal fled into neighbouring European countries particularly France to avoid the military draft and the war in africa. Most took up menial jobs and were a convinient source of low cost labour in Europe. This expatriate segment of society got increasingly empowered after a Military coup overthrew the government of Salazar's successor Marcello Caetano in 1974. Many returned to Portugal to become next generation Politicians.
The the term "fascist regime" probably stems from a attempt by this sizable group to demonize the fallen regime and justify their flight from a country at war.
Salazar is still loved by some of the people of Portugal today, and was voted the greatest Portuguese man of all time. Apologists say that it was more as a way of showing frustration with the current political events and politicians in Portugal than actually a true devotion.A great segment of the Portuguese people though may beg to differ.

Nicole Scherzinger
music
Nicole Scherzinger (born June 29, 1978) is an American actress and singer. She was one of the group members in Edens Crush after winning a spot from the reality show Popstars. Scherzinger was later a member of the Pussycatdolls. On November 16, 2007 Nicole released her first single album.

Walter Scheel
politics
Walter Scheel (born July 8, 1919) is a German politician (FDP).
Biography.
Scheel was born in Solingen.
During World War II, he served in the Luftwaffe, the last years of the war as a Radar operator on a Me 110 night fighter.
He was federal minister of economic cooperation and development (1961-1966), but he persuaded the FDP to leave Ludwig Erhard's coalition government in late 1966. This forced elections in Germany, and Kurt Georg Kiesinger became chancellor.
In 1969 his party formed a new coalition with the Social Democrats. He became Foreign Minister and Vice Chancellor. With Willy Brandt his foreign policy meant the Federal Republic of Germany promised not to try and get back the parts of Germany given to Poland and the USSR. The treaty with Poland actually defined the western border of Poland, not the border between Poland and Germany. It is the same thing, but meant Poland could sign a treaty with West Germany that described the border of East Germany.
When Brandt resigned on May 7 1974, Scheel, was acting chancellor, for about a week, until Helmut Schmidt was elected Chancellor.
A few weeks later, Scheel was elected Federal President of West Germany, a post he held from July 1974 until June 1979.
Like most ex German presidents, Scheel retired from political life term ended. He did sometimes appears on political talk shows or events. At the funeral of the murdered businessman Hanns Martin Schleyer in October 1977, Scheel gave a speech entitled "shame".

Norman Mailer
politics
Norman Kingsley Mailer (January 31, 1923 – November 10, 2007) was an American writer and journalist.
Along with Truman Capote, Joan Didion, and Tom Wolfe, Mailer writes creative nonfiction, sometimes called New Journalism, but which covers the essay to the nonfiction novel. He was awarded the Pulitzer Prize twice and the National Book Award once on his journalism career. In 1955, Mailer, along with Ed Fancher and Dan Wolf, first published "The Village Voice", which was showed to the Greenwich Village. In 2005, he won the Medal for Distinguished Contribution to American Letters from The National Book Foundation.

Kelly Osbourne
music
Kelly Osbourne (b. October 27 1984 in London) is an English singer and actress. She is the daughter of the singer Ozzy Osbourne.
She also presents a show on BBC Radio 1 called "The Surgery" on a Sunday evening.

Co-operative Party
politics
The Co-operative Party is a small socialist political party, in the United Kingdom. It does not put candidates for election, its candidates must be members of the Labour Party as well, and stand as "Labour and Co-operative Party" candidates.
The party today.
It is the political arm of the wider British co-operative movement, and all members of the party must be members of a co-operative business. Those who want to stand for election must also be members of the Labour Party.
Most of the party’s income is from grants made by the retail co-operative societies, and from the fee charged for managing the political affairs of Co-operatives UK, formerly known as the Co-operative Union. Local parties are not based on constituencies, but around a major local retail society, which gives most of the money a local Party Council has. The Party council organises local branches to organise local activity and liaise with Constituency Labour Parties. Some Parties exist without Society support, known as voluntary parties.
At first the Co-operative Party was mostly concerned with the trading and commercial problems of the co-op movement. Since the 1930s it has become a more mainstream political, but it still wants better recognition and protection for co-operative business, the social economy, and to advance support for co-operatives and co-operation across Europe and the developing world. The party also stands for a sustainable economy and society.
In 2005 there were 29 MPs in the Co-operative Parliamentary Group, who are also members of the Parliamentary Labour Party in the British House of Commons, 8 Members of the Scottish Parliament, 4 Members of the Welsh Assembly and 11 Members of the House of Lords, as well as over 700 local councillors. There is also an informal Co-operative Party group in the European Parliament.
The election agreement between the Co-operative and Labour Parties means that 30 candidates can stand as "Labour Co-operative" candidates, and get money for election expenses from the Co-operative Party. There are many other Labour MPs who are Co-operative Party members but are not sponsored. One of these was Gareth Thomas MP, chair of the Co-operative Party since 2001 and of the Co-operative Congress in 2003, who was invited to join the parliamentary group in 2003. The Party has not registered a logo with the electoral commission for use on ballot papers, as candidates use the Labour Party "Rose" logo. Under UK law a party and a logo must be registered if either are to be used on a ballot paper in an election
The Party holds an annual conference. The 2006 conference was held in Sheffield in September 2006.
The current General Secretary is Peter Hunt..
Joint Parliamentary Committee.
The "Joint Parliamentary Committee" was set up in 1881 by The Co-operative Union. It was not set up to get MPs elected, but to watch over what was happening in parliament, and to lobby sympathetic MPs. The Co-operative Union Annual Congress tried to get a regular party set up but the retail societies would not give any money.
The Great War.
At the start of the war, the many retail societies in the Co-op movement grew, partly because they were very public about "anti-profiteering". Making a large profit in war time was seen as not being patriotic or helping the country. When conscription (men were ordered into the army) was started and food and fuel supplies restricted, the co-op societies began to suffer. The co-ops were started by ordinary workers, but the government distribution committees and draft tribunals were usually run by members of the upper classes and gentry. Co-ops smaller amounts of food to sell, and coop managers were often drafted, whereas business opponents were able to have even clerks declared vital for the war effort. Co-op Societies were also made to pay "excess profits tax" even though as co-operatives they made no profits.
The 1917 Congress in Swansea decided to set up a Co-operative Party, the decision was passed by 1979 votes to 201.
Central Co-operative Parliamentary Representation Committee.
An Emergency Political Conference was held on 18 October 1917. As a result the "Central Co-operative Parliamentary Representation Committee" was formed in 1917, with the objective of putting co-operators into the House of Commons. This was soon re-named the Co-operative Party.
At first the party put forward its own candidates. The first was H J May, later Secretary of the International Co-operative Alliance. He was unsuccessful at the 1918 Prestwich by-election.
Ten people stood in the 1918 general election. One candidate was elected: Alfred Waterson who became a Member of Parliament for the Kettering seat. Waterson took the Labour whip in Parliament. In 1919, 151 Co-operative Party local councillors. Waterson retired from Parliament in 1922, but four new Co-operative MPs were elected that same year, including A.V. Alexander. All of them took the Labour whip. Six were elected in 1923 and five in 1924.
However, since the 1927 Cheltenham Agreement, the party has had an electoral agreement with the Labour Party, which allows for a limited number of "Labour Co-operative" candidates. This means that the parties do not waste resources by opposing each other. The agreement has been changed several times, most recently in 2003. The 2003 agreement was the first between the Labour Party and the Co-operative Party, instead of the Co-operative Societies. After the first formal agreement, nine Labour Co-op MPs were elected at the 1929 general election, and Alexander was made a cabinet minister. However, only one was returned at the 1931 election against the backdrop of a massive defeat for Labour.
The rise of the sister party.
The Labour party recovered from the bad election of 1931 and was in government during World War II. This helped the Co-operative Party through the formal election links.. In 1945, 23 Labour Co-op MPs were elected and two had high office in the Labour government - Alexander and Alfred Barnes, who had been chair of the Party.
After the war the co-operative movement declined and so did the influence of the Party. By 1983 only eight Labour Co-op MPs were elected. However, in 1997, all 23 candidates won seats in Parliament and, in 2001, only one was defeated, Faye Tinnion who had stood against the Leader of the Conservative Party, William Hague. Gordon Brown is very interested in the co-operative principles of self-help, and this support allowed the co-operative movement to make representations, and sponsor important bills on updating company law, employee share ownership and micro-generation of energy.
Noted co-op politicians.
See and List of Labour Co-operative Members of Parliament for wider lists.
Nicholas Russell, the 6th Earl Russell (and grandson of the philosopher, 3rd Earl Bertrand Russell) is a strong supporter of the Co-operative Party and secretary of its Waltham Forest branch; he is vocal in his call for the abolition of the House of Lords.

Les Six
music
Les Six (pronounced "Le sees") is French for "The Six". Les Six were a group of six French composers who were friends around the year 1920. They were young at the time, and they shared a lot of ideas about music. The composer Eric Satie called them "Les Nouveaux Jeunes", but then a man called Henri Collet called them "Les Six" in an article he was writing, and that name was always used for them after that.
In their music they tried to be different from Richard Wagner and other composers of Romantic music, and different from Debussy and Ravel who had been writing Impressionistic music. They also wanted to write in a simple way instead of using complicated rhythms such as those of Stravinsky or twelve tone music like Arnold Schoenberg. Many of their pieces were quite short. They liked strong, masculine music, especially jazz.
The six composers did not stay together for very long as they soon developed their own personal styles in their compositions.
After 1920.
It was really only in 1920 that all six composers were together. They had all been inspired by Jean Cocteau and Eric Satie. By 1921 Louis Durey had already left the group. Les Six continued to be associated with the style of French music from around the 1920s. They still remained friends, and used to visit a bar known as "La Gaya" which became "Le Boeuf sur le Toit" (The Ox on the Roof): the title of Milhaud's ballet. The group published an album of piano pieces together called "Album des Six". Five of the members worked together on the music for Cocteau's work "Les Mariés de la Tour Eiffel"
The name "The Six" was a reference to the group of Russian composers who had been known as "The Five".

Georges Auric
music
Georges Auric (born Lodève, France, 15 February 1899; died Paris 23 July 1983) was a French composer. He was one of the six composers who became known as Les Six.
Auric was a child prodigy. He composed a lot of music from the age of 10, but most of these early works he destroyed later. He grew up in Montpellier. In 1913 his parents moved to Paris so that he could study at the Paris Conservatoire. He studied with the composer Vincent D'Indy at the Schola Cantorum.
By the time he had joined Les Six he had already become a composer with a strong, personal style of writing. His music is often energetic and aggressive.
Auric wrote ballet music for Diaghilev. When Jean Cocteau started making motion pictures at the beginning of the 1930s Auric began writing film music. He wrote soundtracks for a number of French and British films, and then for Hollywood movies, too. "The Song from Moulin Rouge" made it to the hit parade.
In 1962 he gave up writing for moving pictures when he became director of the Opéra National de Paris and then chairman of SACEM, the French Performing Rights Society. Auric continued to write classical chamber music, especially for wind instruments, for the rest of his life.

Louis Durey
music
Louis Durey (born Paris, 27 May 1888; died Saint-Tropez, France, 3 July 1979) was a French composer. He was the oldest, but probably the least well-known of the six composers who are called Les Six.
Louis Durey was the son of a businessman. He had no idea that he wanted to be a composer until he heard the opera Pélléas et Mélisande by Claude Debussy. He was then already 19 years old. He taught himself how to compose.
Durey became a member of the group called Les Six in 1920. However, he did not take part in the music they wrote together in 1921 called "Les Mariés de la Tour Eiffel". This made Jean Cocteau very annoyed.
Durey became interested in left-wing politics and later joined the Communist Party. During the years of the Nazi occupation of World War II, he worked with the French Resistance and wrote anti-Fascist songs. After the war he had strong Communist ideas. This made it difficult for him to be successful in the world of music.
In 1950 he got the job of music critic for a communist newspaper in Paris.
He wrote a lot of music during his life, but there were many years when he wrote nothing. He composed songs, chamber music and choral works.
Louis Durey died at Saint-Tropez, Provence-Alpes-Côte d'Azur, France.

Arthur Honegger
music
Arthur Honegger (born Le Havre, 10 March 1892; died Paris, 27 November 1955) was a Swiss composer, who was born in France and lived a large part of his life in Paris. He was a member of the group of composers called Les Six. His most popular piece of music is an orchestral work called "Pacific 231", which imitates the sound of a steam locomotive.
His full name was Oscar-Arthur Honegger, but his first name was never used. He studied harmony and violin in Paris until his parents moved to Zürich, Switzerland, when he studied at the Conservatory there. He then went back to Paris to study with Charles Widor and Vincent d'Indy. He wrote a ballet "Le dit des jeux du monde" in 1918. In 1926 he married Andrée Vaurabourg, a pianist and fellow student at the Paris Conservatoire. They did not often live together because Honegger wanted peace and quiet in order to compose. However, they often went on tour together, and his wife played the piano parts to his compositions. They had one daughter, Pascale, born in 1932. Honegger also had a son, Jean-Claude (1926-2003) whose mother was the singer Claire Croiza.
In the early 1920s he became famous with the "dramatic psalm" "Le Roi David" ("King David"), which is still often sung by choirs. He wrote a lot of music between the wars, including the oratorio "Jeanne d'Arc au bûcher", one of his best works. It tells the story of Joan of Arc.
During World War II Honegger could not leave Paris. He joined the French Resistance. He became very depressed by the war. He continued to write very serious music, including four symphonies (numbers 2-5) and some religious music.
Honegger loved trains. As a student he had spent some time travelling to Paris twice a week by train from Le Havre. His popular orchestral work "Pacific 231" describes a train on the Canadian Pacific Railway. It was an early work written in 1923.
Arthur Honegger died of a heart attack on 27 November 1955.
Honegger's music is different to that of the other members of Les Six. Honegger liked the Romantic music of Wagner, Strauss and Reger. His music is tonal but with some strong dissonances. His musical style was also influenced by the music of Johann Sebastian Bach.

Darius Milhaud
music
Darius Milhaud (pronounced "DAR-yus MEE-yoh") (born Marseille, 4 September 1892; died Geneva 22 June 1974) was a French composer. He was a member of the group called "Les Six". He is one of the most important French composers of the 20th century. He wrote more than 400 compositions. His music is often influenced by jazz and polytonality (music in more than one key at once).
Life.
Milhaud's family were Jewish. He grew up in Aix-en-Provence. His father was an almond dealer. When he was very small he often listened to the songs that were being sung by the women who were sorting out the nuts. They were folksongs from the Provence. When he was a young man he liked to go for walks in the Provence country. This was an important part of his life.
Milhaud's parents liked music. His father was a pianist and often played at local music gatherings. His mother had a nice contralto voice. When he was seven he learned to play the violin. He loved the music of Claude Debussy whom he met only once.
Milhaud studied in Paris at the Paris Conservatory where he met Arthur Honegger and Germaine Tailleferre who were also to become members of Les Six. He studied composition under Charles-Marie Widor and harmony and counterpoint with André Gédalge. He also studied privately with Vincent d'Indy. He taught himself to play the piano. In Paris he was able to listen to music by a lot of great composers.
He was terribly sad when a close friend was killed in World War I. He decided to go to Brazil. He worked there for nearly two years, deciphering codes. He liked the sounds of the jungle. This was to influence his music. The other great influence was jazz which he heard in 1922 in New York.
Milhaud returned to France and worked very hard. He often travelled. In 1940 he had to emigrate to the United States because the Nazis were arresting Jewish musicians. In America he gave lectures.
His health became poor. He had rheumatoid arthritis and, by 1948, he was in a wheelchair. He still continued to travel for as long as possible.
In 1925 Milhaud married an actress called Madeleine. She often performed speaking parts in her husband's musical works, e.g. in his oratorio "Jeanne d'Arc au bûcher (Joan of Arc at the stake)". She devoted herself to looking after him in his final years. She died in Paris on 17 January 2008 at the age of 105.
His works.
Milhaud's most popular works include "Le Boeuf sur le Toit" (ballet), "La création du monde" (a ballet for small orchestra with solo saxophone, influenced by jazz), "Scaramouche" (for Saxophone and Orchestra, also for two pianos), and "Saudades do Brazil" (dance suite). His autobiography is called "Notes Sans Musique" ("Notes Without Music"), later rewritten as "Ma Vie Heureuse" ("My Happy Life").

Massoud Barzani
politics
Massoud Barzani (born 16 August, 1946) is the first president of Iraqi Kurdistan.

Nechervan Idris Barzani
politics
Nechervan Idris Barzani (Kurdish:نێچیرڤان بارزانی, Nêçîrvan Îdrîs Barzanî) (born September 21, 1966) has been the Prime Minister of Iraqi Kurdistan since March 2006.

Francis Poulenc
music
Francis Poulenc (born Paris, 7 January 1899; died Paris, 30 January 1963) was a French composer. He was one of the group of six composers who became known as Les Six. He composed music in many different forms: song, chamber music, oratorio, opera, ballet music and orchestral music. His music is easy to like at first hearing: it is much simpler than the music of many other composers who were writing modern music at the time. At first the music critics did not think he was a serious composer, but later people realized the importance of his music. He is the greatest writer of French song (mélodie) since Fauré.
Early life.
Poulenc came from a wealthy family. His father had a large pharmaceutical business. His mother, an amateur pianist, taught him to play the piano. The Catholic faith was important to him, as well as the artistic life. These two influences shaped his personality. The music critic Claude Rostand said that Poulenc was “something like a monk but also a rascal.
Poulenc wanted to study music at the Paris Conservatoire after his school years, but the death of both his parents changed his plans. He had lessons from Ricardo Viñes who was a great teacher for him and helped him develop as a person. Poulenc wrote his first compositions for his teacher. He met many famous people including the composers Satie, Auric and Falla and writers such as Apollinaire. He started to get his works performed, and Stravinsky helped him to get them published in London. He continued to compose while he was doing his military service, and became a member of Les Six. These six composers did not all compose in the same way, but they were good friends.
Poulenc felt that he needed more lessons and he studied with Charles Koechlin. He was asked by Diaghilev to write ballet music for "Les Biches". He composed his "Concerto for Two Pianos" and the "Organ Concerto". He was very upset by the death of Raymonde Linossier who was the only woman he ever wanted to marry. Poulenc was becoming aware that he was gay. He had a lot of emotional problems with big changes of mood.
His friendship with the singer Pierre Barnac was a great help to him professionally. Barnac was a baritone. Poulenc composed about 90 songs for him. They gave many concerts together.
Poulenc spent some periods of his life composing and other periods performing. He made a series of broadcasts on French radio. He composed a great deal of music during the 1950s. He died suddenly of a heart attack in 1963.
His music.
Poulenc was an excellent pianist and he wrote a lot of music for the piano, especially during the 1930s. He liked to create blurred effects by using the sustaining pedal a lot. Some of his best piano writing is in the accompaniment to his songs.
Poulenc’s early chamber music often uses jazz ideas. He wrote several sonatas for various instruments. He liked writing for wind instruments. His "Piano Sextet" is for piano and five wind instruments.
He wrote several works for orchestra as well as music for the stage and choral music. His "Gloria" is often performed by choirs. Children like his "Story of Babar the Elephant". It is for a storyteller and piano. Jean Françaix made an arrangement for an orchestra.

Germaine Tailleferre
music
Germaine Tailleferre (born Saint Maur Des Fossés, France, 19 April 1892; died Paris, 7 November 1983) was a French composer. She was one of the famous Group Les Six.
She was called Marcelle Taillefesse when she was born. When she was grown up she changed her last name to "Tailleferre" just to annoy her father because he had refused to let her study music. She studied piano with her mother at home, composing short works of her own and then began studying at the Paris Conservatoire. There she met Louis Durey, Francis Poulenc, Darius Milhaud, Georges Auric and Arthur Honegger. She won several prizes at the Conservatoire. She often met with her friends who became known as Les Six.
In 1923 Tailleferre began to spend a great deal of time with Maurice Ravel at his home in Monfort-L'Amaury. Ravel encouraged her to enter the "Prix de Rome" Competition. In 1925, she married Ralph Barton, an American caricaturist, and moved to Manhattan, New York. She stayed in the United States until 1927 when she and her husband returned to France. They divorced shortly afterwards.
Tailleferre wrote many of her most important works during the 1920s, including her 1st Piano Concerto, The Harp Concertino, the Ballets "Le Marchand d'Oiseaux" (the most often performed ballet in the repertoire of the Ballets Suédoises during the 1920s) and "La Nouvelle Cythère" which was commissioned by Diaghilev.
In the 1930s she composed the Concerto for Two Pianos, Choeurs, Saxophones and Orchestra, the Violin Concerto, the Operas "Zoulaïna" and "Le Marin de Bolivar",and her masterwork, "La Cantate de Narcisse" which she wrote with Paul Valéry. Her work in film music included "Le Petit Chose".
When World War II started she had to escape across Spain to Portugal and from there to America.
After the war, in 1946, she returned to her home in France where she composed a lot more music, much of which was not published until after her death. She was accompanist at a children's music and movement class. She wrote shorter pieces towards the end of her life because her arthritis made writing difficult.
Tailleferre carried on composing until a few weeks before her death.

Fatah
politics
Fatah is a Palestinian nationalist political party. Fatah is an acronym for Harakat At-Tahriri Al-Filistiniya. That means Palestinian National Liberation Movement in English. It was created by Yasser Arafat in the late 1950s. In 1968 Fatah joined the Palestinian Liberation Organization, and in 1969 it got a leadership role. When it was founded, it did not accept the existence of Israel, but now the group officially does. The political part of the party is not considered a terrorist group by any country, but its military part, the al-Aqsa Martyrs Brigades is considered a terrorist group. Fatah says that the Brigades are not a part of the party but Israel says that Fatah supports the al-Aqsa Martyrs Brigades.
Fatah and the Al-Aqsa Martyrs' Brigades.
Leaders of the brigades, and other members have said they are a military group that is a part of Fatah. On their website, and on posters they post the Fatah Emblem. Leaders of Fatah have said they didn't create the brigades, or make them the military of Fatah. Since 2002 leaders in Fatah have tried to get the brigades to stop attacking Israeli citizens.

Ebba von Sydow
media
Ebba von Sydow (born February 18, 1981 in Gothenburg, Sweden) is a Swedish journalist and author. She is the great-granddaughter of Swedish prime minister Oscar von Sydow, and also related to actor Max von Sydow and politician Björn von Sydow.

Taylor Horn
music
Taylor Ashley Horn (born October 12, 1992) is an American pop singer-songwriter and actress. To date, she has released two albums, one EP and a single. She has worked with Grammy Award winning songwriter Don Rollins on her third album "Changes" and was a subject of interest in the British documentary, "Britney's Redneck Roots" about fellow pop singer and Kentwood, Louisiana resident, Britney Spears. She also played Lilly Rose Walker in a made-for-television movie for PBS titled "Artists in the Forest" in 2004, although the movie never aired.

Seattle Seahawks
sports
The Seattle Seahawks are a professional American football team from Seattle, Washington. They started playing football in 1976. They are currently members of the Western Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Seahawks played football in the SuperBowl in 2005, but were defeated by the Pittsburgh Steelers. The Quarterback (player who either throws the ball or gives it to a runner) for the Seahawks is Matt Hasselbeck.

Communist Party of China
politics
The Communist Party of China (spelled as 中国共产党 in Chinese, also called the CPC) is the dominant political party and founder of the People's Republic of China. The leader of the CPC is named Hu Jintao

Ludwig Büchner
science
Friedrich Karl Christian Ludwig Büchner (March 29, 1824 – May 1, 1899) was a German philosopher, physiologist and physician who became one of the exponents of 19th century scientific materialism.
Büchner was born at Darmstadt, Germany, on March 29, 1824. From 1842 to 1848 he studied physics, chemistry, botany, mineralogy, philosophy and medicine at the University of Giessen. In 1852 he became lecturer in medicine at the University of Tübingen, where he published his great work "Kraft und Stoff: Empirisch-naturphilosophische Studien" (Force and Matter: Empiricophilosophical Studies, 1855). In this work, he sought to demonstrate the indestructibility of matter and force. The extreme materialism of this work excited so much opposition that he was compelled to give up his post at Tübingen. He retired to Darmstadt, where he practiced as a physician and contributed regularly to pathological and physiological magazines.
He died at Darmstadt on May 1, 1899.
Ludwig Büchner was the brother of Georg Büchner, a famous playwright.

Josh Beckett
sports
Josh Beckett (born May 15, 1980) is a Major League Baseball starting pitcher for the Boston Red Sox.

Curt Schilling
sports
Curtis Montague (Curt) Schilling (born November 14, 1966 in Anchorage, Alaska) is an American Major League Baseball starting pitcher. Schilling is a right-handed starting pitcher for the Boston Red Sox. He has won World Series championships in 2001 with the Arizona Diamondbacks and in 2004 and 2007 with the Red Sox. Schilling began his career on September 7, 1988 playing for the Baltimore Orioles.

Adam Dunn
sports
Adam Dunn (born November 9, 1979, in Houston, Texas) is an American Major League baseball player. He is an outfeilder for the Cincinnati Reds. He bats left-handed and throws right-handed.

Kevin Rudd
politics
Kevin Rudd (born 21 September 1957) is the 26th Prime Minister of Australia. He is the leader of the federal Australian Labor party. He won the federal 2007 election and is now Australia's 26th prime minister.
Before he was elected to Parliament, Rudd was a diplomat and a government worker. Rudd won a seat in Parliament in 1998. The Australian Labor party elected him the Leader of the Opposition in December 2006. He won the 2007 federal election because of work agreements and global warming. As Prime Minister he has already signed the Kyoto Protocol and will take Australian troops out of the Iraq conflict.

Miami Heat
sports
The Miami Heat (also known as just HEAT) are a team in the National Basketball Association in Miami, Florida. It was started in 1988. They won the 2006 NBA Finals. Dwyane Wade is their current star player.

Fiona Apple
music
Fiona Apple McAfee Maggart, or Fiona Apple (born September 13, 1977) is an American musician.

Destiny Fulfilled
music
"Destiny Fulfilled" is the fourth studio album by the American R&B trio Destiny's Child. The album features the top five singles "Lose My Breath" and "Soldier" along with the top twenty single "Cater 2 U" and top thirty single "Girl".
"Destiny Fulfilled" debuted prematurely at number-nineteen on the Billboard 200 selling 61,000 copies a week before its official release. During its first official week of sales the album sold over 497,000 (558,000) copies and rocketed to number two on the pop charts behind Eminem's "Encore" and number one on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums chart (for two weeks). The album sold over 337,000 copies in its second week (number four), 164,000 in its third (number nine) and 214,000 in its fourth (number seven). "Destiny Fulfilled" was certified Triple platinum by the RIAA after only eight weeks on the chart in January, 2005. It spent nine weeks in the top ten and fifty weeks on the Billboard 200 and has sold 2.7 million copies in the US according to Nielsen SoundScan. The album has sold 6 million copies worldwide, to date.

Kanye West
music
Kanye Omari West (born June 8, 1977) is an American record producer and rapper. He rose to fame in the mid 2000s. His first two albums, "The College Dropout" and "Late Registration", received many awards (including six Grammys), critical acclaim, and commercial success. West also runs his own record label called GOOD Music. West's mascot and trademark is a teddy bear. A teddy bear has appeared on the covers of his three albums as well as the single cover for his song "Stronger".
On Saturday, November 10, 2007, at 8:30 PM PST Kanye West's mother, Donda West, was pronounced dead. Her death was due to complications from cosmetic surgery involving a tummy tuck and breast reduction procedure.TMZ reported that West was advised not to go through with the surgery by Beverly Hills physician Andre Aboolian. She had a health condition that could lead to a heart attack if she went through with the surgery. West was referred to an internist by her physician. West never met with the internist and had the procedures performed by someone other than Aboolian. "Access Hollywood" reported that Oprah Winfrey had introduced West to the doctor who performed the surgery (Jan Adams). Winfrey has denied this.

Giro Manoyan
politics
Giro (Kiro) Manoyan () is an Armenian politician, one of the leaders of ARF Dashnaktsutiun and the head of "Armenian Cause" Office.
Manoyan attended and finished Concordia University in Montreal, Canada. In the 1980s he was the Executive Director of the Armenian National Committee of Canada. From 1989 to 1999, he edited the Horizon Weekly Armenian newspaper. Since 2000, he is the Director of the International Secretariat of the Armenian Revolutionary Federation Bureau in Yerevan.

Los Angeles Lakers
sports
The Los Angeles Lakers are an National Basketball Association team located in Los Angeles, California. The Lakers play their home games at Staples Center, which they share with the Los Angeles Clippers, their sister team the Los Angeles Sparks of the WNBA, the Los Angeles Kings of the National Hockey League, the Los Angeles Avengers of the Arena Football League and the NBA Development League's Los Angeles D-Fenders. The Lakers were originally known as Minneapolis Lakers. Many famous players played on the Los Angeles Lakers' team, like Wilt Chamberlain, the only NBA player to score 100 points in a game.

Shavo Odadjian
music
Shavo Odadjian () (born April 22 1974, Yerevan, Armenia as Shavarsh Odadjian) was the bassist for the Armenian American-based alternative metal band System of a Down and now Dj and vocal of Achozen.
Biography.
In his youth, Shavo used to spend his time skateboarding and listening to punk rock and heavy metal music. He started managing the band "Soil" with Malakian and Tankian in 1993 after meeting them in a recording studio. In 1995, Shavo became the permanent bassist of the band. They then named themselves "System of a Down" after a poem titled "Victims of a Down" authored by bandmate Daron Malakian.
Odadjian is a popular DJ in the LA area met by "Dj Tatic", taking part in such events as the "Rock/DJ Explosion" on March 2 2001 at The Roxy in Hollywood and collaborating with bandmate Tankian on SerArt, the singer's side project with Armenian musician Arto Tunçboyacıyan.

Xavier Rudd
sports
Xavier Rudd (born 1978) is an Australian musician. He grew up in the small town of Torquay, Victoria, Australia. When Rudd was young, he learned to play the didgeridoo on a vacuum cleaner hose.
Rudd is known for playing at music festivals and concerts in Australia and in North America. He has many fans in Australia, his home, as well as Canada, where he has recorded a few live albums.
Some of his songs have political themes that deal with the environment and the rights of Aboriginal Australians.
Personal life.
Rudd is a father of two sons, Joaquin and Finojet, and a husband to his Canadian wife, Marci. He claims to have his son Joaquin's sock with him when he travels, because of the fact that his family often can't travel with him.
Rudd also describes himself as a full-time "barefooter", which means that he does own any shoes or other footwear. Rudd is also a vegetarian.

Leftover Salmon
music
Leftover Salmon is an American rock and jam band from Boulder, Colorado.

Cesc Fàbregas
sports
Cesc Fàbregas (born May 4, 1987) is a Spanish footballer. He plays as a central midfielder for Arsenal in the English Premier League. He also plays for the Spanish national team. He signed to play for Arsenal in 1999 and began playing in 2003.

Erik Satie
music
Erik Satie (born Honfleur (France), 17 May 1866; died Paris, 1 July 1925) was a French composer. He is mainly remembered today for his eccentricity (the strange ways in which he behaved). He often gave his compositions unusual titles such as "Piece in the form of a pear". His best known compositions are the three piano pieces which he called "Gymnopédies". The first of these pieces, in particular, is a very famous piece of music: it is a simple tune over a gentle accompaniment. Satie sometimes used unusual instruments such as sirens and typewriters.
Satie was more than just an eccentric. He played a very important part in the development of music in France in the late 19th and early 20th century. He was important because of the ideas he had, and many people were influenced by him. Ways of composing that were used later in the century such as very chromatic music and Minimalism had already been suggested by Satie. Satie was not a brilliant composer, but he was happy to compose well in a simple way. He was also interested in other arts such as literature and painting and he was associated with the new ideas called "esprit nouveau" (new spirit) which was fashionable in France around the time of World War I.
Early years.
He was born Alfred Eric Leslie Satie, but when he was grown up he always spelt his name “Erik”. His father had been in the shipping business, but the family then moved to Paris. He was still quite young when his mother died and he was sent back to his birthplace, Honfleur, to be brought up by his father’s parents. However, his grandmother drowned, so he was sent back to Paris again where his father taught him. His father had remarried. His new wife was a pianist and sent young Eric to have piano lessons at the Paris Conservatoire.
Satie hated his piano lessons. His teacher said that he was the laziest pupil in the Conservatoire. He was bad at sight-reading, but he continued with his lessons because this would make it possible for him to do just one year of military service instead of five. In fact, he did less than a year in the army because he deliberately got himself ill with bronchitis. While he was getting better he started to compose. His father published a few songs he had written. However, he did not get on well with his family and he left home in 1887.
The young Satie.
Satie soon got to know many people in the famous cabaret Chat Noir. He grew his hair long and wore a frock coat and a top hat. He wrote a ballet which most people found shocking. He became friends with Debussy who was one of the only people who understood the serious reasons for Satie’s unusual behaviour.
In 1890 he moved to new rooms on a top floor of a house so that people to whom he owed money could not get at him. He tried to compose in a simple style and became interested in mystical religion and Gothic art. He inherited a small amount of money with which he bought himself seven velvet suits which were all exactly the same: one for each day of the week. He started a church called Église Métropolitaine d’Art de Jésus Conducteur (Metropolitan Church of Art of Conductor Jesus), but nobody belonged to the church except himself.
At the end of 1898 he moved to Arceuil, a suburb of Paris. He spent the rest of his life there. He stopped performing in public and earned money by playing the piano in cafés and pubs. Every morning he walked the 10 kilometres into Paris, stopping on the way at cafés to drink or compose. He wore a bowler hat, wing collar and always carried a rolled-up umbrella. If it was raining he kept his umbrella underneath his coat to keep it dry. He also carried a hammer in case anyone attacked him. Late at night he walked home again or took the last train back. His flat was a terrible mess.
Rise to fame.
In 1905, at the age of 39, he became a student again and studied music at the Schola Cantorum. He wanted to become a better composer. He learned how to write fugues. He still liked to use parody in his music.
In 1911 Maurice Ravel played some of Satie’s piano pieces in public. Suddenly people began to take notice of Satie. They realized that he had been one of the first Impressionist composers. Debussy conducted his "Gymnopédies" in his arrangement for orchestra. Music critics started to write articles about Satie. He was at last becoming famous. He had some humorous piano pieces published. He was earning some money from his compositions, so he was able to give up playing in cabarets. He met Jean Cocteau who introduced him to Diaghilev for whom he wrote the music for "Parade". Some people loved it, some hated it, but people were taking notice of him. He was asked to write more theatre music. He was a very important influence on the six composers who were known as Les Six. He was asked to write a symphonic drama which he called "Socrate". Many musicians think it is his best piece.
Final years.
In the 1920s he wrote many articles for newspapers and journals and became associated with the art movement known as Dada. His ballets "Relâche" and "Mercure" both shocked the audiences when they were first performed. "Relâche" is an early example of what later became the theatre of alienation.
Satie drank heavily and became ill. He got cirrhosis of the liver and died in 1926. When his friends entered his flat after he died, there was so much mess that they had to throw away two cartloads of rubbish before they could get at his papers and manuscripts.
His music.
Satie was involved with dance, theatre and cabaret for most of his life and that is what much of his music is written for. He was always trying out new ideas in his music. He was capable of writing in a late Romantic style with chromatic harmonies, but he also wrote in more modern styles, often using very simple ideas. He was always more interested in beautiful melodies than in writing complicated rhythms. His three "Gymnopédies" are still extremely popular. They seem to come from an old-fashioned world where there is great simplicity. His three "Gnossiennes" (1890) sound more Oriental, and Satie wrote some very strange remarks in the music. His piano piece "Vexations" (1893) is a short piece with strange, chromatic chords, which the pianist is then supposed to play 840 times. "Uspud" was an early example of what later became the “Theatre of the Absurd”. The text was all written in lower-case letters: the first time this had ever been done. He wrote many cabaret songs.
Later, after he had studied at the Schola Cantorum, he became famous, and then wrote lots of piano pieces with funny titles and strange comments (e.g. “like a nightingale with toothache”). "Parade" has strange instruments such as typewriters. "Socrate" was his most serious work.
After his death all the people he had insulted wrote about Satie that he was a bad composer. As a result he was almost forgotten until the 1960s when John Cage became interested in his music and made it popular again. Many Surrealist artists were often inspired by Satie’s music and ideas.

Vahan Totovents
media
Vahan Hovhannesi Totovents (1893 - 1938) was an Armenian writer, poet and public activist.
Biography.
Vahan Totovents was born in Mezire, Western Armenia (modern Turkey). He studied in Armenia and Istanbul, then at Wisconsin University which he finished in 1915.
He was a volunteer in Caucasian front during World War I, and served as the bodyguarder, translator and secretary of General Andranik Ozanian, about whom he wrote memoires and published them in 1920. In Tbilisi Totovents edited "Hayastan" paper, the official organ of Andranik.
Since 1922 he lived in Yerevan, Soviet Armenia. In 1938 he became a victim of Stalinism.
Works.
The works of Totovents were published from 1907. He is the author of "Doctor Burbonian" (1918), "Death battalion" (1923), "New York" (1927), "Baku" (v. 1-3, 1930-34), "Jonathan, Son of Jeremiah" novels, stories and dramas. He influenced to Armenian literature especially by his "Life on the Old Roman Road" autobiographical novel (1930, "A piece of sky" film by Henrik Malian) which "reflect the society, culture, and mores not only of the Armenians of his childhood but also of their neighbors in the waning days of the Ottoman Empire".

Houston Chronicle
media
The "Houston Chronicle" is the largest daily newspaper in Texas, USA. As of March 2007, it is the ninth largest newspaper circulating in the United States. With the demise of its long-time rival the "Houston Post", its nearest major competitors are located in Dallas-Fort Worth.

The Times-Picayune
media
"The Times-Picayune" is a daily newspaper published in New Orleans, Louisiana, United States.

Émile Durkheim
science
Émile Durkheim (April 15, 1858 – November 15, 1917) was a French sociologist. He is known for his contributions in sociology and anthropology. He is considered as one of the founding fathers of Sociology.
Durkheim was born in the eastern French province of Lorraine. He studied at École Normale Supérieure. He made contributions to subjects such as education, crime, religion, suicide, and many other topics related to sociology.

Alexander von Humboldt
science
(September 14, 1769 – May 6, 1859) was a Prussian naturalist and explorer. His older brother was the Prussian minister, philosopher, and linguist Wilhelm von Humboldt. Humboldt's work on botanical geography was very important in the field of biogeography.
Humboldt was born in Berlin. His father, Alexander Georg von Humboldt, was a rewarded major in the Prussian Army. He married Maria Elizabeth von Colomb in 1766. The couple had two sons, the younger was Alexander.
In his childhood Humboldt already liked to collect plants, shells, and insects. Humboldt's father died very early (in 1799). From that time on his mother took care of his education.
Between 1799 and 1804, Humboldt travelled to Latin America and was the first scientist who wrote about it. He was one of the first who said that South America and Africa was once one continent.
Late in his life he attempted to bring together different fields of science in his work "Kosmos".

Chick Corea
music
Armando Anthony "Chick" Corea (born June 12, 1941) is a multiple Grammy Award winning American jazz pianist/keyboardist and composer.

Harry Kewell
sports
Harry Kewell (born September 22, 1978 in Smithfield, Sydney Australia) is an Australian football player. He currently plays for Galatasaray in the Turkish Super League and the Socceroos.
He used to play for Leeds United. His junior club was Marconi Stallions. He can play as a midfielder, a striker or a wing.
Career.
Harry Kewell started playing for Liverpool in 2003 before that he played for Leeds United. He was offered more money at other clubs such as Arsenal, Chelsea, A.C. Milan, Manchester United, Barcelona, Juventus and Real Madrid but eventually he chose to play at Liverpool. And Now Galatasaray FC

Dennis Kucinich
politics
Dennis John Kucinich (born October 8, 1946) is a United States Representative from Ohio. He is a hopeful for President of the United States in 2008. He is a Democrat.

Bill Richardson
politics
William Blaine "Bill" Richardson III (born November 15, 1947) is the Governor of the United States state of New Mexico. He was a candidate for President of the United States in the 2008 election. He is a Democrat.

Mike Huckabee
music
Michael Dale "Mike" Huckabee (born August 24 1955) is a former governor of the U.S. state of Arkansas. He was governor from 1996 to 2007. He is a Republican. He is also a Southern Baptist minister. He wanted to be President of the United States in the 2008 election, but did not get picked by his party.

Rudy Giuliani
politics
Rudolph William Louis "Rudy" Giuliani (born May 28, 1944) is a politician from New York in the United States. He is a Republican and campaigned to become President of the United States in 2008. Giuliani was mayor of New York City from January 1, 1994 to December 31, 2001. Giuliani became more well known during and after the September 11, 2001 attacks on the World Trade Center. In 2001, "Time" magazine named him "Person of the Year" and he received an honorary knighthood from Queen Elizabeth II in 2002.
Rudy was campaigning in 1993 with the show Seinfeld where he appeared as the NYC Mayor candidate as the "over count" cholesterol man by eating too much yogurt. This "product placement" of Mayor Giuliani is often referred to as an excellent example of electioneering and boosted his popularity accordingly.

Max Bruch
music
Max Christian Friedrich Bruch (January 6, 1838–October 2, 1920) also known as Max Karl August Bruch, was a German Romantic composer and conductor who wrote over 200 works, including three violin concertos, one of which is a staple of the violin repertoire.
He had a long career as a teacher, conductor and composer, moving among musical posts in Germany: Mannheim (1862-1864), Koblenz (1865-1867), Sondershausen, (1867-1870) Berlin (1870-1872), Bonn, where he spent 1873 -1878 working privately. At the height of his reputation he spent three seasons as conductor of the Royal Liverpool Philharmonic Society (1880-83). He taught composition at the "Berlin Hochschule für Musik" (the Berlin Conservatoire) from 1890 until his retirement in 1910.
His conservatively structured works, in the German romantic musical tradition, placed him in the camp of Romantic classicism exemplified by Johannes Brahms, rather than the opposing "New Music" of Franz Liszt and Richard Wagner. In his time, he was known primarily as a choral composer.
His "Violin Concerto No. 1 in G minor", Op. 26 (1868) is one of the most popular Romantic violin concertos. It uses several techniques from Felix Mendelssohn's "Violin Concerto in E minor".

André-Marie Ampère
science
André-Marie Ampère (January 20, 1775 – June 10, 1836) was a French physicist and mathematician who helped discover electromagnetism. An electrical unit called the ampere is named after him.
Life.
Ampere was born in Lyon, France in 1775. During his childhood, Ampere's father taught him Latin, until he found out that his son was talented in mathematical studies. However, young Ampere continued his study on Latin, so that he could understand and master the works of Euler and Bernoulli. In his later life, Ampere began to distinguish himself in mathematical field; not only was he specialized in mathematical field, but also he studied history, travels, poetry, phiolosophy, and the natural sciences.
During the years of French Revolution, a great sorrow came to Ampere's life; he lost his father who was executed by revolutionaries. The death of his father brought a huge impact to Ampere.
In 1796, he met the daughter of a blacksmith living near Lyon named Julie Carron, and married her in 1799. Afterward, Ampere worked as a professor in Lyon, giving lessons in mathematics, chemistry, languages, and physics. He continued working as a professor even after the death of her wife in 1803. However, her death bothered Ampere for the rest of his life. Ampere passed away at Marseille and buried in the Cimetiere de Montmartre, Paris. In his work "Journal et correspondence", we can see his amiability and childlike simplicity of his character.
Works.
Ampere is most known for establishing the relationship between electricity and magnetism, and combining them into a new field called electromagnetism, or electrodynamics. On September 11, 1820, Ampere heard from the discovery of H.C.Orsted that a magnetic needle can be activated by a voltaic current. Only a week later, he came up with a much more advanced version of that kindred phenomena. It was such a amazing development. On the same day, he also discovered that parallel wires carrying currents attract or repel each other. This has later become fundamentals of a field called electrodynamics.

Enrico Fermi
science
Enrico Fermi (September 29, 1901 – November 28, 1954) was an Italian physicist who worked on the first nuclear reactor and helped make quantum theory. He also was important to particle physics, and statistical mechanics. Fermi won the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1938 for his work on induced radioactivity and was one of the most important scientists of the 20th century.

Oskar Lafontaine
politics
Oskar Lafontaine (; born September 16, 1943 in Saarlouis-Roden) is a left-wing German politician and a founder member of the new political party "Die Linke".
Education and family.
Lafontaine studied physics at the Bonn University and the Saarland University from 1962 to 1969.
He is Roman Catholic and is married to Christa Müller who leads a campaign against genital mutiliation in Africa. They have a son, Carl Maurice, born 1997.
Political rise.
Lafontaine's political career began locally as mayor of Saarbrücken. He became widely known as a critic of chancellor Helmut Schmidt's support for the NATO plan to put Pershing II missiles in Germany. From 1985 to 1998 he was minister-president of the Saarland. As minister-president, Lafontaine tried to keep the traditional industries of steel production and coal mining in the state with subsidies. He was also President of the Bundesrat in 1992/93.
Chancellor candidacy.
In the German federal election of 1990, Lafonntaine was the SPD's Chancellor candidate. The party lost because of support for the CDU who were the government during reunification. During the campaign he was attacked with a knife by a mentally deranged woman after a speech in Cologne. His carotid artery was slashed and he remained in a critical condition for several days.
Political comeback.
At the "Mannheim convention" in 1995, Lafontaine was elected chairman of the SPD, replacing Rudolf Scharping. He was mainly responsible for bringing the whole of the SPD against Helmut Kohl and his CDU party, instead of cooperating with the CDU. Lafontaine said that any help given to Kohl would only help to keep the CDU in government.
This idea put the SPD ahead in the opinion polls in September 1998. He was appointed Federal Minister of Finance in the first government of Gerhard Schröder.
Minister of Finance.
During his short time as Minister of Finance, Lafontaine was a figure of attack by UK Eurosceptics. This was especially because he wanted to make taxes the same in the European Union. This would have meant some UK taxes would increase.
On March 11, 1999, he resigned from all his official and party offices, saying that not getting any help from other members of the cabinet. Later he become known for his attacks against Angela Merkel's government in the tabloid Bild-Zeitung which is generally considered conservative.
The Left Party.
On May 24, 2005 Lafontaine left the SPD. On June 10, he said he would run as the lead candidate for the The Left Party.PDS (Die Linkspartei), a coalition of the Electoral Alternative for Labour and Social Justice (WASG), which is based in western Germany, and the Party of Democratic Socialism (PDS), which was the successor to the East German communist party
He joined the WASG on June 18, 2005 and was selected to head their list for the 2005 Federal Election in North Rhine-Westphalia on the same day. He also stood in the Saarbrücken constituency, but lost. Nevertheless, the result of the Linkspartei in the Saarland was the best in any of the federal states in the West of Germany.
Criticisms of Lafontaine.
An article by Lafontaine on Erich Honecker, state and party leader of the GDR and a Saarländer like him, in the magazine Der Spiegel was criticized by many people who said it concentrated on a few good things Honecker did, and ignored the bad things. In the late 80s and early 90s he lost some support from left-wing people because he seemed to want pro-business policies and he called for a reduction of the influx of Germans from Eastern Europe and asylum-seekers.
Books.
Oskar LaFontaine: "The Heart Beats on the Left" Polity, ISBN 0745625827

William Lassell
science
William Lassell (June 18 1799 – October 5 1880) was a British astronomer, born in Bolton, Lancashire, England.

François Arago
science
François Jean Dominique Arago (Catalan: Francesc Joan Dominic Aragó; February 26, 1786 – October 2, 1853) was a French mathematician, physicist, astronomer and politician.

Johann Gottfried Galle
science
Johann Gottfried Galle (June 9, 1812 in Radis, Saxony-Anhalt – July 10, 1910 in Potsdam, Brandenburg) was a German astronomer at the Berlin Observatory who, with the help of student Heinrich Louis d'Arrest, was the first person to view the planet Neptune, and know what he was looking at (September 23, 1846). He used the calculations of Urbain Le Verrier to know where to look.

Victoria Beckham
music
Victoria Caroline Beckham (born April 17, 1974) is an English singer and fashiondesigner. She is very famous for singing with the pop group the Spice Girls. She is also very famous for being married to David Beckham, who is a very famous football player. Her nickname is Posh Spice, because she loves to wear clothes that look good on her.
She had a short solo career after the Spice Girls in 2001. After that, she created clothes and perfumes with her husband, David.
She reunited with the Spice Girls for a world tour in 2007.

Spice (album)
music
Spice was the first album by the Spice Girls. It was released in the United Kingdom in 1996, and in the United States in 1997. It was the most successful album by a girl group ever. It sold 23 million copies around the world.
There were 5 songs that were very successful from this album. The most successful was "Wannabe," which went to #1 on many music charts around the world.

Kurt Weill
music
Kurt Weill (born Dessau, 2 March 1900; died New York, 3 April 1950), was a German composer who later became an American. Although he was trained as a composer of classical music he wrote many songs in a popular, jazzy style. He is particularly remembered for the music he wrote for the plays of the German dramatist Bertolt Brecht, as well as for musicals he wrote when he lived in New York. He also wrote symphonies and chamber music, especially during his early career.
Early years.
Kurt Weill grew up in a religious Jewish family. During his teens he started to get experience working in a theatre in Dessau, where he learned a lot from the theatre conductor Albert Bing. When he was 20 he went to study at the Berlin Musikhochschule where he studied with the composer Humperdinck. He did not like it there, and soon started a three year period studying with the composer Busoni. Busoni was a good teacher for him and encouraged him to study counterpoint carefully in order to be a good composer. Then he introduced Weill to the music pubishers Universal, who published all his music for the next ten years.
German career.
In 1924, Busoni died. Weill started to work with the playwright Georg Kaiser who wrote plays in an Expressionistic style. Together they wrote an opera "Der Protagonist" (1926) which made Weill famous. The next year he worked with Bertolt Brecht. Together they wrote five songs which soon developed in a "Songspiel" under the title "Mahagonny". Between 1927 and 1929, Brecht and Weill wrote a new piece, an opera called "Aufstieg und Fall der Stadt Mahagonny" ("Rise and Fall of the City of Mahagonny"), in which five songs from the "Songspiel" were used again.
In 1924, he met the singer and actress Lotte Lenya. He married her in 1926, divorced her in 1933 and married her again in 1937.
In 1928, he wrote the music for a play by Brecht which was to become world-famous. It was called "Dreigroschenoper" ("The Threepenny Opera"). It was based on an opera called "The Beggar's Opera" which had been written in 1728 by John Gay. The "Threepenny Opera" includes a song which became Weill's most famous song, "Mack the Knife". Weill stopped working with Brecht in 1930 because they had political disagreements. Brecht was becoming more and more interested in Communism, but Weill did not want to be a “Communist composer”.
In Berlin, Weill taught composition to several young composers. He also gave many radio broadcasts. By 1929, he was well-known enough as a composer to make his living just from his compositions.
Exile.
Weill had to flee from Nazi Germany in March 1933. As a famous and popular Jewish composer, he was a target of the Nazi authorities, who criticized and even interfered with performances of his later stage works, such as "Aufstieg und Fall der Stadt Mahagonny", "Die Bürgschaft" (1932), and "Der Silbersee" (1933). He went first to Paris, where he started a work with Jean Cocteau but it was not finished. He wrote one more work with Brecht: the ballet "The Seven Deadly Sins". In 1934, he completed his "Symphony No.2", his last purely orchestral work, conducted in Amsterdam and New York by Bruno Walter.
American years.
In 1935, Weill went to America with his wife Lotte Lenya. The rest of his life he spent writing for the American stage. He became a naturalized citizen of the United States in 1943. He thought most of his compositions in Germany had been destroyed by the Nazis. He never spoke German again except when writing to his parents who had escaped to Israel.
Weill changed his musical style. He wrote in a popular way, working with writers such as Ira Gershwin. He wrote an opera "Street Scene" for which he won an award. He took part in political movements, encouraging America to join in the war.
Weill died of a heart illness in New York City in 1950.

Meteora (album)
music
"Meteora" is the second studio album by Linkin Park. It was released on March 25, 2003. The album has sold 5.5 million copies in the USA and over 15 million worldwide also.

Sean Watkins
music
Sean Watkins is a United States guitarist most famous as a member of Californian acoustic trio Nickel Creek.

Sara Watkins
music
Sara Watkins is a United States violinist most famous as a member of United States bluegrass band Nickel Creek.

Garth Brooks
music
Troyal Garth Brooks (born February 7, 1962) is an American country music singer-songwriter. He uses rock elements into his recordings and live performances. Brooks was successful in the country singles and country album charts and later also proved popular in the mainstream pop arena, exposing country music to a larger audience.
Brooks has had one of the most successful careers in popular music history, with over 70 hit singles and 15 charted albums to his credit. Throughout the 1990s he broke records for both sales and concert attendance. In 1999, looking to expand his career boundaries, Brooks began a multimedia project involving a fictitious alter ego known as Chris Gaines.
In 2001, Brooks officially retired from recording and performing, after having conflicts between his career and family. During this time he has sold millions of albums through an exclusive distribution deal with Wal-Mart and has released new singles from time to time.
On November 6, 2007, "The Ultimate Hits" was released.

Alexis Bouvard
science
Alexis Bouvard (June 27, 1767 – June 7, 1843) was a French astronomer. He is particularly noted for his careful observations of the irregulrities in the motion of Uranus and his hypothesis of the existence of an eighth planet in the solar system.

George Biddell Airy
science
Sir George Biddell Airy (July 27, 1801–January 2, 1892) was an English mathematician and astronomer, Astronomer Royal from 1835 to 1881. His many achievements include work on planetary orbits, measuring the mean density of the Earth, a method of solution of two-dimensional problems in solid mechanics and, in his role as Astronomer Royal, establishing Greenwich at the location of the prime meridian. His reputation has been tarnished by allegations that, through his inaction, Britain lost the opportunity of priority in the discovery of Neptune.

James Challis
science
James Challis (December 12, 1803 – December 3, 1882) was an English clergyman, physicist and astronomer. Plumian Professor and director of the Cambridge Observatory, he investigated a wide range of physical phenomena though made few lasting contributions outside astronomy. He is best remembered for his missed opportunity to discover the planet Neptune in 1846.

Heinrich Louis d'Arrest
science
Heinrich Louis d'Arrest (July 13, 1822 – June 14, 1875) was a Prussian astronomer, born in Berlin. His name is sometimes given as Heinrich Ludwig d'Arrest.

Olin J. Eggen
science
Olin Jeuck Eggen (July 9, 1919 – October 2, 1998) was an American astronomer. Some sources incorrectly give his name as Olin Jenck Eggen.

John Herschel
science
Sir John Frederick William Herschel, 1st Baronet (March 7, 1792–May 11, 1871)
was an English mathematician, astronomer, chemist, and experimental photographer/inventor. He was the son of astronomer Sir William Herschel and the father of 12 children.

Ragıp Zarakolu
media
Ragıp Zarakolu (born 1948) is a Turkish publisher who has long faced legal problems for publishing books on controversial things in Turkey, especially on minority and human rights in Turkey.
Biography.
Ragıp Zarakolu was born in 1948 on the island of Büyükada close to Istanbul. At that time his father, Remzi Zarakolu, was the district governor on that island. Ragıp Zarakolu grew up with members of the Greek and Armenian minority in Turkey. In 1968 he began writing for "Ant" and "Yeni Ufuklar" magazines.
In 1971 a military junta assumed power in Turkey. Ragıp Zarakolu was tried on charges of secret relations to Amnesty International. He spent five months in prison, before the charges were dropped. In 1972 Ragıp Zarakolu was sentenced to 2 years in prison for his paragraph in the journal "Ant" (Oath) on "Ho Chi Minh and the Vietnam War". He stayed in Selimiye Prison (in Istanbul) and was set free in 1974 after a general amnesty. On his release Zarakolu refused to abandon his work for freedom of thought, working hard for an "attitude of respect for different thoughts and cultures to become widespread in Turkey".
The Belge Publishing House, established in Istanbul in 1977 by Zarakolu and his wife Ayşenur, has been a focus for Turkish censorship laws ever since. Charges brought against the couple resulted in imprisonment and the confiscation and destruction of books and the pressing of heavy fines.
In 1979 Ragıp Zarakolu was one of the founders of the daily newspaper "Demokrat" and took responsibility for the news desk on foreign affairs. The paper was banned with the military coup of 12 September 1980 and Ragıp Zarakolu was shortly imprisoned in 1982 in connection with this position in "Demokrat". He was banned from leaving the country between 1971 and 1991. In 1986 he became one of 98 starters of the Human Rights Association in Turkey (HRA or in Turkish IHD). For some time Ragıp Zarakolu chaired the Writers in Prison Committee of International PEN in Turkey. Currently (beginning of 2007) he chairs the Committee for Freedom of Publication in the Union of Publishers.
Until the military coup of 12 September 1980 "Belge" Publishing House mostly published academic and theoretical books. Afterwards "Belge" started to publish a series of books written by political prisoners. The series of 35 books consisted of poems, shorts stories, novels. The list of publications (see a list of selected publications below) include more than 10 books (translations) of Greek literature, 10 books on the Armenian Question and five books related to the Jews in Turkey. There are also a number of books dealing with the Kurds in Turkey.
He also published several books on the Armenian Genocide — such as George Jerjian's book "History Will Free All of Us/Turkish-Armenian Conciliation" and Professor Dora Sakayan's "An Armenian Doctor in Turkey: Garabed Hatcherian: My Smyrna Ordeal of 1922" — which brought new criminal charges in 2005.
In 1995 the Belge Publishing House offices were firebombed by a far right group, forcing it to be housed in a cellar. Since his wife's death in 2002, Zarakolu continued to face further prosecutions.

Ara Gevorgyan
music
Ara Gevorgian (Gevorgyan) (born April 19, 1960, Yerevan) is an Armenian musician, composer and musical producer. In 2004 he was awarded by the "Honorary Artist of the Republic of Armenia" title by the President Robert Kocharyan.
Biography.
Gevorgian is the son of well-known Armenian folk-singer Valya Samvelyan. He studied at #31 school of Yerevan and at the A. Tigranyan musical school at the same time. During the two years he studied at Yerevan #8 college of Fine Arts. From 1983 to 1987 he studied at Armenian pedagogical institute after Khachatur Abovyan at the faculty of wood wide instruments and pop music department.
In 1987-1989 Gevorgian taught conducting at the same Institute, then he worked at Armenian Television ("3-Aliq" TV program).
In 1983 he founded the "Rally" Armenian pop-rock band, the participant of "Song - 85" festival.
He participated in the Opening Ceremony of the Cultural Year of Armenia in Russia hosted at the Moscow Kremlin Music Hall and honored by the presence of the presidents of Armenia and Russia Robert Kocharyan and Vladimir Putin respectively and the famous singer Charles Aznavour.
Ara Gevorgian co-operates with Jivan Gasparyan, Ian Gillan, Demis Roussos, Pedro Eustache, Daniel Decker and others. Among his most popular songs are "Adana", "Artsakh", "Ov Hayots Ashkharh" and "Ovkyanosits ayn koghm".

Franck Ribéry
sports
Franck Bilal Ribéry (born April 1 1983 in Boulogne-sur-Mer) is a French football player. His team is FC Bayern München of Germany.

Social Democrat Hunchakian Party
politics
The Social Democrat Hunchakian Party (SDHP) (), also known as Hentchak is one of the oldest political parties in Armenia and the first Socialist party in the Ottoman Empire and in Persia in the 1880s. It was founded in 1887 by Avetis Nazarbekian, Mariam Vardanian, Ruben Khan-Azat and others, who studied in Geneva, Switzerland, with the goal to gain Armenia's independence from the Ottoman Empire, which is part of Armenian national liberation movement. Its name, taken from its newspaper "Hunchak," means "Bell" in English, and is taken by party members to represent "awakening, enlightenment, and freedom."
History.
All of the 7 founders of Hunchakian party were Russian-Armenian Marxist students who had left Russia to continue their higher education in universities of Western Europe. They were young persons, in their twenties, and were from well‑to‑do bourgeois families who were financially supporting them. For the purpose of furthering revolutionary activity in Turkish Armenia, they formed the Hunchakian Revolutionary Party in August, 1887.
Hunchak party fought many battles against the Ottoman Empire, to free the Armenian people from Turkish rule. One of Armenia's famous national heroes Andranik Ozanian, at first, joined the Hunchak party, but disagreement with party policies led Andranik to leave the Hunchak ranks and join the Dashnak party.
Democratic Republic of Armenia.
The party also played role in establishment of Democratic Republic of Armenia, as party members took part in the Battle of Sardarapat, during the World War I at Caucasus Campaign, which defended the Armenian capital of Yerevan from Army of Islam of Ottoman Empire.
Activities in Lebanon.
In the 1950s, it clashed, sometimes violently, with the Dashnak Party, due to tensions that escalated when the ARF elected Bishop Zareh as Catholicos of Cilicia, a move that was rejected by the Hunchaks. In the midst of increasing sectarian strife in the late 1960s and early 1970s, however, Lebanon's Armenian community began to close ranks, and in 1972, the Hunchakian Party ran a joint ticket with the Dashnaks. In 2000, the Hunchakian Party joined forces with Rafik Hariri's Dignity party, which swept the city of Beirut.
Modern.
In the early 1990s, the party took part in the Nagorno Karabakh conflict. The party today forms part of the opposition "Justice" bloc.
This party is also active in Lebanon, where it competes for the six National Assembly seats reserved for ethnic Armenians. The party subscribes to a socialist ideology and advocates a planned economy for Lebanon.
Affiliate organizations.
The Hunchakian party has established affiliate organizations such as the AEBU which is an organization that helps with educational, health and social care, the Armenian Dkhrouhi Youth Association and HMM (Homenmen) which is a sporting organization (not to be confused with Homenetmen).

Karl Carstens
politics
Karl Carstens (December 14, 1914 - May 29, 1992) was a German politician. He served as the fifth Federal President of West Germany.
Biography.
Born in Bremen, Carstens studied law and political science at the universities of Frankfurt am Main, Dijon, Munich, Königsberg, and Hamburg from 1933 to 1936. In 1949 he received a Master of Laws (LL.M.) degree from Yale Law School.
Carstens joined the Nazi Party in 1940. This was when he was a law clerk. He said he had to join the oarty or he would not be treated fairly. But this does not explaijn why Carstens had joined the SA, another Nazi party group, in 1933.
In 1955 he joined the CDU.
In July 1960 Carstens started to work for the government. He was a secretary of state in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. In the same year he was also appointed as professor for public and international law at Cologne University. During the Grand coalition government (1966-1969), he was in the Ministry of Defence, and in 1968 he became Director of the Chancellor's Office.
In 1972 Carstens was elected into the Bundestag. He stayed a member until 1979. He often spoke against the left-wing ideas in German society and accused the governing SPD of being to soft on left-wing extremists. He also famously denounced the author Heinrich Böll as a supporter of the Baader-Meinhof Gang.
On 14 December 1976, the CDU/CSU became the largest group in parliament, and Carstens was elected president of the Bundestag.
On May 23, 1979 Carstens was elected as President of the Federal Republic of Germany. Carstens wass well known for hiking around Germany during his term in order to decrease the gulf between politics and the people.
In December 1982, the recently elected Chancellor Helmut Kohl deliberately lost a motion of confidence in order to hold new general elections. On January 7 1983, President Carstens dissolved the Bundestag and called for new elections. In February 1983 the Federal Constitutional Court said that deliberately losing the vote was allowed, so the general elections could take place.
In 1984 he decided not to seek a second term on account of his age and left office on 30 June, 1984.

Norbert Lammert
politics
Dr. Norbert Lammert (born November 16, 1948 in Bochum) is a German politician, and a member of the CDU party.
After military service Lammert studied political science, sociology, modern history and social economics at the university of Bochum and the University of Oxford (England) from 1969 to 1975. He graduated in 1972 but carried on studying to get a doctorate in social sciences in 1975.
Although he has worked as a lecturer, Lammert became a member of the Bochum City Council in 1975. He was elected to the Bundestag in 1980, and has been a member ever since.
Dr Lammert was a Vice-President of the Bundestag from October 2002 to 18 October 2005, when he became President.
In 2005, he was elected the President of the Bundestag, the German parliament. Even though the President of the Bundesrat acts as deputy for the Federal President, according to the German order of precedence, Dr Lammert, as President of the Bundestag, is Germany's highest ranking official after President Horst Köhler.
Literature.
Michael F. Feldkamp (ed.), "Der Bundestagspräsident. Amt - Funktion - Person." 16. Wahlperiode, München 2007, ISBN 978-3-7892-8201-0

Isaac Albéniz
music
Isaac Albéniz (pronounced EE-saac al-BAY-nith) (born Camprodón, Catalonia, Spain, 29 May 1860; died Cambô-les-Bains, Spain, 18 May 1909) was a Spanish composer and pianist. He wrote a lot of piano music. His best known work is the collection of 12 piano pieces called "Iberia" which have lots of exciting Spanish rhythms. These pieces are very difficult to play. He also wrote several zarzuelas (light-hearted Spanish operas) and he tried to make the zarzuela more serious, but the public did not want that. He helped to make Spanish music more popular in other countries.
His Life.
Albéniz started to learn the piano when he was three. His elder sister taught him. He was a child prodigy who first performed at the age of four. When he was seven he passed the entrance examination for piano at the Paris Conservatoire, but he was not given a place because they thought he was too young. A year later his father lost his job, so he took his two children on tour so that they could give concerts and earn some money. In 1869 the family moved to Madrid, but Albéniz had an unsettled childhood. He twice ran away from home, giving concerts in various places and even escaping as a stowaway to South America where he visited Argentina, Uruguay, Brazil, Cuba, Puerto Rico and then the USA. He returned to Spain in 1873. By the age of fifteen, he had already given concerts all over the world. After a short stay at the Leipzig Conservatory, in 1876 he went to study in Brussels. In 1880, he went to Budapest wanting to study with Franz Liszt, but Liszt was not there.
In 1874 his sister wanted to become a singer at the Teatro de la Zarzuela. When she did not get a place there she committed suicide.
Albéniz continued to travel all over the world. In 1883, he met the teacher and composer Felipe Pedrell, who inspired him to write Spanish music such as the "Suite Española", Op. 47. The fifth movement of that suite, called "Asturias" (Leyenda), was later arranged for guitar. It is probably the most famous piece for classical guitar. The composer Francisco Tárrega made guitar arrangements of many other piano works by Albéniz. Albéniz once said that he preferred Tárrega’s guitar arrangements to his own original piano versions.
During the 1890s Albéniz lived in London and Paris and wrote mainly theatrical works. In 1900 he started to suffer from Bright's disease and started to write more piano music. Between 1905 and 1909 he composed his most famous work, "Iberia" (1908), a suite of twelve piano "impressions".
His orchestral works include "Spanish Rhapsody" (1887) and "Catalonia" (1899).
In 1883, the composer married his student Rosina Jordana. They had three children, Blanca (who died in 1886), Laura (a painter), and Alfonso (who played for Real Madrid in the early 1900s before becoming a diplomat).
Albéniz died on 18th May 1909 at the age of 48 in Cambô-les-Bains and is buried in Barcelona.
Reputation.
Although he became world famous as a composer and pianist he was not properly appreciated in his own country. The Spaniards were jealous of his international reputation and thought he was a Spaniard who had deserted his country. He spent his last years in Paris where he had many friends including Gabriel Fauré, Vincent d’Indy, Paul Dukas and Claude Debussy.
There are no recordings of his piano playing but he had a very individual style. He was able to put a lot of colour and life into his playing. He had learned a lot from Liszt.
Most of his works are for piano. The "Suite Iberia" is his best work. A lot of the music is based on Spanish folksong.

James Hetfield
music
James Alan Hetfield (August 3, 1963) is an American singer, songwriter and guitarist. He is a member of the thrash metal band Metallica.

François Fillon
politics
Francois Fillon, born 4 March 1954 in Le Mans, France is the current Prime Minister of France. He was given the job in May 2007.

Kobukuro
music
Kobukuro is a Japanese male pop band.
The name.
The name is a mix of the two members' family names, Kentaro Kobuchi and Shunsuke Kuroda.
Origins.
In 1998, the two met each other in Sakai and formed Kobukuro.
Albums.
Kobukuro received moderately successful ratings for their first three indie albums - ' (July 1999), "Root of My Mind" (March 2001), and 'ANSWER' (December 2000). Kobukuro signed with Warner Music Japan in 2001, and made their debut with the hit single, "Yell" which reached #4 on the Oricon Charts. Their newest album is called "5296" (December 2007).

Misato Watanabe
music
(born 12 July 1966, Tokyo, Japan) is a female Japanese popular music artist.

Bonnie Pink
music
Bonnie Pink (born April 16, 1973 in Kyoto,Japan) is a Japanese singer. She debuted in 1995. She writes and composes all her songs, and plays guitar and piano. Her most famous song is "A Perfect Sky".

Aya Matsuura
music
Aya Matsuura (松浦亜弥"Matsuura Aya", born June 25, 1986) is a female Japanese singer, idol, actress, TV performer. She belong to "Hello!Project" and U"P-FRONT AGENCY Co". She was born and raised in Himeji Hyogo, group type B blood. Her nickname is "Ayaya".
Singles.
Theme song of "Hamtaro the Movie 4" (2004-11-26)

Steve Allen
music
Stephen Valentine Patrick William Allen (born 1920 - died 2000), best known as Steve Allen, was an American comedian, musician, and talk show host.
Allen introduced many new celebrities and performers on his shows, including Jerry Lee Lewis and Jack Kerouac. He also recorded an album with Kerouac, with Kerouac reading poetry and Allen playing piano with a jazz combo.
He was the first host of "The Tonight Show", who was replaced by Johnny Carson and later Jay Leno. Allen played himself in an all-star comedy movie, "Amazon Women on the Moon".

Antonio de Cabezón
music
Antonio de Cabezón (born Castrillo de Matajudios, near Burgos, Spain, 1510; died Madrid, 26 March, 1566) was a Spanish composer and organist of the Renaissance. He was blind from early childhood. He is best known for the music he composed for the organ.
Life.
His parents came from noble families and owned a lot of land. He probably had his first organ lessons at the local church. Then he had more music lessons in Palencia. He probably had organ lessons from the cathedral organist. He never had an official job at the cathedral, but he must have been an excellent student, and his teachers, who had a lot of influence, recommended him to the royal family. In 1526 he became organist to Queen Isabella and played at the Spanish chamber concerts of King Charles V of Spain.
About 1538 he married the daughter of a rich family and he went to live in Avila where his wife came from. They had five children who had important positions at the royal court when they grew up.
After Queen Isabella died he spent all his time working for Prince Philip, who became Philip II. King Philip thought he was the world’s greatest artist except for the painter Titian. He often travelled with the king to countries such as Italy, Germany, Luxembourg and the Netherlands. He influenced many European composers that he met, and they influenced him. When the king moved to Madrid and made it the capital of Spain, Cabezón went there too. He stayed there until his death.
His music.
Cabezón was one of the greatest composers of his time. He was good at writing music which sounded just right for the organ and the clavichord. He used the techniques of other composers of his time, but added some very special effects. Instead of just putting in a lot of ornamentation to make the music interesting, he enjoyed creating tension between harmony and melody.
He wrote "diferencias" (sets of variations) which use Spanish tunes which were often dances such as the folia, pavan and galliard. Many of his organ compositions are called " glosas ". Each one has something very special to say.

Chara (singer)
music
Chara (born as Miwa Satō, on January 13, 1968) is a Japanese singer, songwriter, musician and actress. She began performing in 1991. "Swallowtail Butterfly - あいのうた" is one of her popular songs.

Enrique Granados
music
Enrique Granados (born Lérida, Spain, 27 July 1867; died in the English Channel, 24 March 1916) was a Spanish composer and pianist. He lived most of his life in Barcelona. His favourite painter was Goya and his best work, the piano pieces called "Goyescas", are inspired by Goya’s paintings.
Early career.
Granados started having piano lessons in Barcelona and then went to Paris where he studied privately with Charles de Bériot. He returned to Barcelona in 1889 and the following year gave his first piano recital. He wrote a zarzuela (light opera) called "Maria del Carmen". The king liked it very much and gave him an award.
During the following years he composed a lot and performed with famous musicians such as Jacques Thibaud, Pau Casals and Camille Saint-Saëns. His piano suite "Goyescas" was first performed in Barcelona in 1911 and then in Paris in 1914 where it soon became extremely popular.
"Goyescas" and the fateful voyage.
He was persuaded to make "Goyescas" into an opera. The opera was going to be performed at the Paris Opéra but, because of World War I it was performed in New York instead. Granados was invited to go to New York to watch the first performance of his opera. He was very frightened of the sea, but eventually was persuaded to go. The opera was a great success when it was performed on 26 January 1916. Granados felt that he was at the beginning of a successful career. President Wilson invited him to play the piano at the White House. Because of this invitation he missed the ship that would have taken him back to Spain. He took a ship to England instead. In Liverpool he got off the ship and got onto another one which would take him to Dieppe in France. The ship was called the "Sussex". When the "Sussex" was in the middle of the English Channel it was torpedoed by a German submarine. Granados managed to get onto a lifeboat, but then he saw his wife in the sea and he jumped in to try to save her, but they both drowned.
His music.
Granados wrote mainly piano works and songs. He was influenced by Romantic composers such as Grieg, Schumann and Liszt, but he was starting to make his music sound very Spanish. His songs include some of the best written by a Spanish composer. His piano works include "Ten Spanish Dances", which are not too difficult to play, and the suite "Goyescas" which is mostly quite difficult to play. The most popular piece in this suite is called "Lament, or The Maiden and the Nightingale". It has a very romantic tune which is repeated several times.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music & Musicians ed. Stanley Sadie, 1980

Manuel de Falla
music
Manuel de Falla (born Cádiz, Spain, 23 November 1876; died Alta Gracia, Argentina, 14 November 1946 was a Spanish composer. Falla (pronounce: “FA-ya”), together with Albéniz and Granados, helped to make Spanish music important again after three centuries during which there had been no important Spanish composers.
Early years.
Falla had his first music lessons in Cádiz. At first he did not know whether he wanted to take music or literature as a career. When he was ten he started to go to music evenings where he heard chamber music being played. Then he started to go to the opera, and he heard church music and orchestral music. He liked the music of Grieg and decided that he wanted to do something similar with Spanish music. He went to Madrid where he studied very hard and won prizes. His first compositions were played in Cádiz. He studied with Pedrell who had also taught Albéniz and Granados.
He wrote a song called "Tus ojillos negros" which became very popular, and he won a prize for a piano composition, but it was his opera "La vida breve" (1904-1905) which really showed his genius, although it was not performed at the time. No one in Spain wanted to perform his zarzuelas, so he went to Paris in 1907. He soon made friends with Dukas, Debussy and Ravel. He made changes to "La vida breve" and it was performed in Paris in 1913. His piano works and songs were also performed in Paris, and in Madrid.
Mid career.
In 1915 he wrote "El amor brujo". It was a work with dances, songs and spoken passages. He soon turned it into a ballet. The music uses the songs of Andalusia and the rhythms of Spanish folkmusic. He wrote a work for solo piano and orchestra called "Noches en los jardines de España" ("Nights in the gardens of Spain"). Later he changed it to a ballet for Diaghilev, calling it "El sombrero". It was performed in London in 1919 with designs by Picasso. The music is very lively and often sounds like a guitar. He wrote a piano piece called "Fantasia bética" (1919) which is the most important Spanish piano work after Albéniz’s "Iberia".
Falla had many friends, including Lorca. They liked small theatre pieces and Falla wrote "El retablo" and set it as a puppet opera. He liked the music of the past centuries, and wrote a concerto for harpsichord and five other instruments.
Final years.
During his final years Falla was composing a very large work called "Atlántida". It was a long oratorio for soloists, chorus and orchestra. The words were in Catalan. Falla did not live long enough to finish the work. He became very depressed because of World War II. In the end he was invited to Argentina where he settled. He continued to work at "Atlántida", but he had not finished it when he died. A man called Ernesto Halffter spent many years trying to finish it and prepare it for a performance. It was performed on stage at La Scala, Milan, in 1962, but it does not work well as an opera. Occasionally it is performed as a concert piece.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music & Musicians ed. Stanley Sadie, 1980

Joaquín Turina
music
Joaquín Turina (born in Seville on 9 December 1882; died in Madrid on 14 January 1949) was a Spanish composer.
Turina was brought up in Seville, and the music of this town always had a big influence on his music. His father was a painter. As a small boy Turina’s favourite toy was a small toy accordion. He started to study medicine, but he wanted to be a musician, so his father let him study music instead. He had piano lessons with Enrique Rodriguez and studied harmony with Garcia Torres, who was in charge of music at the cathedral in Seville.
Soon Turina started to compose. He met Falla and the two musicians became lifelong friends. He moved to Paris in 1905 where he studied with Moskowski and d’Indy. One of the his first works to be performed was piano quintet. The style was similar to César Franck. Albéniz heard it and advised the young composer to make his music sound Spanish.
Turina’s music started to be performed widely. In 1914 both Turina and Falla returned to live in Spain. They were two of the most important Spanish composers. He was choirmaster at the Teatro Real and he had an opera "Jardin de oriente" performed there. He became director of the Madrid Conservatory and received many honours. He died after a long illness.
Turina’s music always sounds very Spanish, although he used the forms of main European composers. He wrote many short piano pieces which often describe a person. He wrote songs and guitar music.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music & Musicians ed. Stanley Sadie

Oakland Raiders
sports
The Oakland Raiders are a professional American football team in the National Football League. They are located in Oakland, California and play at McAfee Coliseum. They were created in 1960 as a new American Football League team. They play in the Western Division of the American Football Conference. Division rivals are Denver Broncos, Kansas City Chiefs, and San Diego Chargers.
American Football League years (1960-1969).
Few moths after AFL's first draft in 1959, owners of the Minneapolis new team (later known as the Minnesota Vikings) accepted the invitation to join the established National Football League. Needed a replacement, the AFL tried to find one quickly. Oakland was a unlikely city to have a professional American football team. The AFL owners selected Oakland after Los Angeles Chargers owner Barron Hilton threatened to lose his team unless a second team was placed on the West Coast. So, the city of Oakland was awarded the eighth AFL team on January 30, 1960, and the team took over the Minneapolis club's draft picks. In the early years, the Raiders struggled. When Al Davis came in as head coach and general manager, the Raiders improved. Davis hired John Rauch and went to the their first AFL Championship against the Houston Oilers and won it 40-7. After winning their first AFL championship they earned a shot at Super Bowl II and lost to Green Bay Packers 33-14. The next two years, the Raiders again won Western Division titles, only to lose the AFL Championship to the eventual Super Bowl winners—the New York Jets (1968) and Kansas City Chiefs (1969).
National Football League years (1970-present).
After the 1969 season, the AFL decided to merge with the NFL. The Raiders join the American Football Conference as a Western Division member. John Madden was hired as head coach. Madden took the Raiders to their first Super Bowl win against Minnesota Vikings 32-14 in Super Bowl XI. Later, Madden left for a commentary career. The Raiders hire Tom Flores, the first Hispanic head coach in NFL history. Flores took the Raiders for their second Super Bowl win against Philadelphia Eagles 27 10 in Super Bowl XV. The Raiders became the first wild card team to win a Super Bowl.
Los Angeles Raiders (1982-1995).
Al Davis signed a note to make the Raiders move to Los Angeles. The Raiders won their third Super Bowl against the Washington Redskins.
Oakland Raiders (1995-present).
The Raiders move back to Oakland. Currently, the Raiders have struggle since 2003 season.
Season-by-season records.
"Note: W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties"
+ = Due to a strike-shortened season in 1982, all teams were ranked by conference instead of division.

Magglio Ordóñez
sports
Magglio Jose "Maggs" Ordóñez (b. January 28, 1974) is a Venezuelan Major League Baseball player. He is a right fielder and right-handed batter. Ordóñez was born in Coro, Venezuela. He played for the Chicago White Sox from 1997 to 2004. He has played for the Detroit Tigers since 2005.

Johan Santana
sports
Johan Santana (born March 13, 1979) is a Venezuelan Major League Baseball player. He is a left-handed pitcher for the New York Mets. Santana has previously played for the Minnesota Twins.

New Orleans Hornets
sports
New Orleans Hornets are a American professional basketball team. They play in New Orleans, Louisiana. The Hornets are a part of the National Basketball Association (NBA). The team started playing in the NBA in 1998 as the Charlotte Hornets playing in Charlotte, North Carolina. The moved to New Orleans in 2002. During the 2005 - 2006 and 2006 - 2007 seasons, the team was moved to Oklahoma City, Oklahoma because of the damage caused in New Orleans by Hurricane Katrina. During this time they were called the New Orleans / Oklahoma City Hornets. The team returned to New Orleans for the 2007-2008 season.

Ian Beale
politics
Ian Beale is a fictional character in "EastEnders". He is played by Adam Woodyatt.
Ian is the son of Pete and Kathy Beale.

Alison Krauss
music
Alison Krauss (born July 23, 1971) is an American bluegrass-country singer and fiddle player. She is famous for being the leader of the band "Alison Krauss & Union Station", and has produced albums for artists like Nickel Creek, Reba McEntire, and Alan Jackson. She has 21 Grammy Awards, more than any other female artist in history.

Lyle Lovett
music
Lyle Pearce Lovett (born November 1, 1957) is an American singer-songwriter and actor.

Dolly Parton
music
Dolly Rebecca Parton (born January 19, 1946) is an American, Grammy Award-winning country music singer/songwriter, composer, author, and actress. She has become one of the most successful female country artists in history, with 25 number-one singles (a record for a female country artist) and 41 top-10 country albums (a record for any country artist).
Her 1967 song "Dumb Blonde" was heard by country singer Porter Wagoner, and he asked Parton to be a part of his television show. Her single "Jolene" reached number one in 1974, becoming a solo artist, though still performed and recorded with Wagoner.
In the fifty-four years since her debut, Parton has become one of the most famous country artists in the world.

Vince Gill
music
Vincent Grant "Vince" Gill (born April 12, 1957) is an American country music singer-songwriter and multi-instrumentalist.

Glen Phillips
music
Glen Phillips (born December 29, 1970) is an American songwriter, singer and guitarist. He is best known as the singer and songwriter of 1990s alternative rock group Toad the Wet Sprocket.

Jon Brion
music
Jon Brion (born December 11, 1963) is an American rock and pop multi-instrumentalist, singer, songwriter, composer and record producer. Jon Brion was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. His mother was a jazz singer, his father a band director at Yale, and his brother is a composer/arranger and sister a violinist.

Bruce Molsky
music
Bruce Molsky (b. Manhattan, New York, 1955) is an American fiddler, banjo player, guitarist, and singer.

Béla Fleck
music
Béla Fleck (born July 10, 1958 in New York City, New York) is an American banjo player. He is best known for his work with the band Béla Fleck and the Flecktones.
As part of a musical group.
Tasty Licks
The New Grass Revival
Béla Fleck and the Flecktones
As a guest musician.
Sam Bush
Dave Matthews Band
Eddie From Ohio
Jimmy Sturr & His Orchestra
Jorma Kaukonen
Nitty Gritty Dirt Band
Charlie Peacock
Keller Williams

Tift Merritt
music
Tift Merritt (born January 8, 1975) is an American singer and songwriter. Born in Houston, Texas, Merritt moved to North Carolina at a young age.

Elliott Smith
music
Steven Paul "Elliott" Smith (August 6, 1969 – October 21, 2003) was an American singer-songwriter and musician.

David Ben-Gurion
politics
David Ben-Gurion, born David Grün on 16 October 1886, died 1 December 1973) was the first Prime Minister of Israel. After leading Israel to victory in the 1948 Arab-Israeli War, Ben-Gurion helped build the state institutions. He retired from political life in 1970 and moved to Sde Boker, where he lived until his death.
After he died, Ben-Gurion was named one of "Time Magazine's" 100 Most Important People of the Century.

Mariano José de Larra
media
Mariano José de Larra (24 March 1809 - 13 February 1837) was a Spanish romanticist writer noted for satire and perhaps the best prose writer of 19th-century Spain.
He was born in Madrid; his father served as a regimental doctor in the French army, and, as an "afrancesado", was compelled to leave the Peninsula with his family in 1812. In 1817 Larra returned to Spain, knowing less Spanish than French. His nature was disorderly, his education was imperfect, and, after futile attempts to obtain a degree in medicine or law, he made an imprudent marriage at the age of twenty, broke with his relatives and became a journalist.
On the 27th of April 1831 he produced his first play, "No más mostrador", based on two pieces by Scribe and Dieulafoy. Though wanting in originality, it is brilliantly written, and held the stage for many years. On the 24th of September 1834 he produced "Macías", a play based on his own historical novel, "El doncel de don Enrique el Doliente" (1834).
The drama and novel are interesting as experiments, but Larra was essentially a journalist, and the increased liberty of the press after the death of Ferdinand VII gave his caustic talent an ampler field. He was already famous under the pseudonyms of "Juan Pérez de Munguía" and "Fígaro" which he used in "El Pobrecito Hablador" and "La Revista Española" respectively. Madrid laughed at his grim humour; ministers feared his vitriolic pen and courted him assiduously; he defended Liberalism against the Carlist rebellion; he was elected as deputy for Ávila, and a great career seemed to lie before him. But the era of military pronunciamientos ruined his personal prospects and patriotic plans. His writing took on a more sombre tinge; domestic troubles increased his pessimism, and, in consequence of a disastrous love-affair, he committed suicide in February 1837.
Larra lived long enough to prove himself the greatest prose-writer that Spain can boast during the 19th century. He wrote at great speed with the constant fear of the censor before his eyes, but no sign of haste is discernible in his work, and the dexterity with which he aims his venomous shafts is amazing. His political instinct, his abundance of ideas and his forcible, mordant style would have given him a foremost position at any time and in any country; in Spain, and in his own period, they placed him beyond all rivalry.

Julius Streicher
politics
He published "Der Stürmer" newspaper, became a part of the Nazi propaganda machine. His publishing firm released three anti-Semitic books for children, including the 1938 "Der Giftpilz" ("The Poison Mushroom"), one of the most widespread pieces of propaganda. The book said that Jews were dangerous, just like an attractive yet deadly mushroom. After the war, he was convicted at the Nuremberg Trials of crimes against humanity and executed.
Early life.
Streicher was born in Fleinhausen, Bavaria. He was an elementary school teacher until joining the German Army in 1914. Streicher won the Iron Cross and was a lieutenant by the time the Armistice was signed in 1918. In 1913 Streicher married Kunigunde Roth, a baker's daughter, in Nürnberg. They had two sons, Lothar (born 1915) and Elmar (born 1918).
National Socialism.
In 1919 Streicher was active in the "Schutz- und Trutz-Bund", an anti-Semitic organization. In 1920 he turned to the newly formed German Socialist Party ("Deutschsozialistische Partei"). This party had nearly the same ideas as the Nazi Party. Streicher wanted to make it more anti-Semitic. Most members of the German Socialist Party did not want this, so Streicher and his followers moved to the "German Working Community" () in 1921. This community wanted to unite the various anti-Semitic movements. In 1922, Streicher joined his followers with those of Adolf Hitler, almost doubling the membership of the Nazi Party, and earning Hitler's lifelong gratitude. Streicher took part in the Munich Beer Hall Putsch in 1923. Later he had the privilege of marching at the front of the annual reenactment of the putsch after the Nazi takeover of power in 1933.
In 1923 Streicher founded the racist newspaper, "Der Stürmer". He was also the editor. Streicher used the newspaper to stir up a deep hatred of everything and everyone Jewish. Eventually the newspaper reached a peak circulation of 480,000 in 1935.
Streicher argued in the newspaper that the Jews had contributed to the depression, unemployment, and inflation in Germany which afflicted the country during the 1920's. He claimed that Jews were white-slavers and were responsible for over 90 percent of the prostitutes in the country.
After the refounding of the Nazi party, Streicher became Gauleiter (district leader) of Franconia. After 1933, he practically ruled the city of Nuremberg and was nicknamed "King of Nuremberg" and the "Beast of Franconia." In 1940, he was stripped of all party offices after being involved in major financial scandals involving Jewish property seized after the anti-Semitic outburst of Kristallnacht in November 1938, and also for spreading untrue stories about Hermann Göring, several attacks on other Gauleiters and unconcealed adultery. Streicher, however, remained on good terms with German dictator Adolf Hitler until the latter committed suicide on April 30, 1945. On May 23, two weeks after Germany's surrender, Streicher was captured by the Americans.
Streicher's wife, Kunigunde Streicher, died in 1943 after 30 years of marriage. Streicher was married to his former secretary, Adele Tappe, just days before his arrest.
Trial and execution.
Julius Streicher was found guilty of crimes against humanity at the Nuremberg War Crimes Trial and sentenced to death on October 1, 1946.
Streicher was not a member of the military and was not part of planning the Holocaust, the invasion of Poland, or the Soviet invasion. But because he encouraged so much support for the hatred and extermination of Jews the prosecutors' decided to include him in the indictment.
His last words on October 16, 1946, were "Heil Hitler," and, "The Bolsheviks will hang you one day!". He is also reported to have cried out "Purim Fest 1946!" - i.e., Streicher thought that Jews would start a new Holiday on the date of the hanging of himself and his fellow Nazis, just as they had started Purim to mark the execution of Haman.
The hanging of Julius Streicher was not as planned. Most eyewitnesses say that he died by slow strangulation rather than by the quick death from breaking the neck. Streicher was not the only Nazi this happened to. It was because of the type of hanging used at Nuremberg. It is thought that the executioner had to intervene under the gallows to silence and finish Streicher, who was still groaning and swinging on the rope some time after the release of the trap-door

Frank Iero
music
Frank Anthony Iero (born October 31, 1981) is the youngest member of the band My Chemical Romance. He was born in Belleville, New Jersey and attended Queen of Peace High School in North Arlington. Iero's parents divorced when he was young. He then attended Rutgers University on scholarship but then dropped out for the band after he felt they were beginning to get somewhere. Iero is a rhythm guitarist and is one of the two backup vocalists for the alternative rock band My Chemical Romance.

National Democratic Party of Germany
politics
The National Democratic Party () is a right wing political party in Germany. It is usually just called the NPD.
It started after the Deutsche Reichspartei dissolved in 1964.
It is not the same as the old Hessian Nationaldemokratischen Partei. That was one of the parties which joined to form the Deutsche Reichspartei in 1949.
The German government tried to get the NPD banned in 2003, but the Bundesverfassungsgericht threw the case out when some of the leaders of the party turned out to be agents or informers of German security services, including the Bundesamt für Verfassungsschutz, the "Federal Office for the Protection of the Constitution", which still lists the NPD as a dangerous organisation because its policies are a threat to the peace and stability of Germany and the constitution. The NPD is also referred to as being Neo-Nazi, as it openly opposes Turks, blacks, gays and Jews.

Benny Goodman
music
Benny Goodman, born Benjamin David Goodman, (May 30, 1909 – June 13, 1986) was an American jazz musician who played the clarinet. He was called as "King of Swing", "Patriarch of the Clarinet", "The Professor", and "Swing's Senior Statesman".
Early life.
Goodman was born the son of poor Jewish immigrants in Chicago, Illinois. They lived in Chicago's Maxwell Street neighborhood. He learned to play clarinet in a boy's band run by a charity. He became a strong player at an early age and began playing professionally in bands while still 'in short pants'.
Early influences.
His early influences were New Orleans jazz clarinet players in Chicago, notably Johnny Dodds, Leon Ropollo, and Jimmy Noone.
First band.
Goodman joined one of Chicago's top bands, the Ben Pollack Orchestra, at the age of 16, He made his first recordings with them in 1926. He started making records under his own name 2 years later.
Later life.
Goodman left for New York City. He became a good session musician during the late 1920s and early 1930s. He was known as a solid player because he was prepared and reliable. He played with the nationally known bands of Red Nichols, Isham Jones, and Ted Lewis. Then he formed his own band in 1932.
In 1934 he auditioned for the "Let's Dance" radio program. Since he needed new charts every week for the show, his friend John Hammond suggested that he purchase some Jazz charts from Fletcher Henderson, who had New York's most popular African-American band in the 1920s and early 1930s. The combination of the Henderson charts, his solid clarinet playing, and his well rehearsed band made him a rising star in the mid-30s.
Fame.
He performed at the Palomar Ballroom in Los Angeles on August 21, 1935. Due to this show, he became a nationally known star. His radio broadcasts from New York had been too late to attract a large audience on the East Coast, but had an avid following in California, and a wildly enthusiastic crowd for the first time greeted Goodman. This received national publicity and turned the Goodman Band into an overnight sensation. Some writers have declared this date to be the start of the Swing Era.
Loss of fame.
Goodman continued his meteoric rise throughout the late 1930s with his big band, his trio and quartet, and a sextet. On January 16, 1938, his band made a famous appearance at Carnegie Hall. By the mid-1940s, big bands lost a lot of their popularity. Reasons include: talented musicians were entering the service, or getting better-paying factory jobs, gasoline and rubber rationing during WWII, two long musician recording strikes, the rise of popular singers like Frank Sinatra.
Death.
Goodman continued to play on records and in small groups. Periodically he would organize a new band and play a Jazz festival or go on an international tour. He continued to play the clarinet until his death in 1986 in in New York, New York.
Other projects.
Goodman also helped racial integration in America. In the early 1930s, black and white jazz musicians could not play together in most clubs or concerts. In the Southern states, racial segregation was enforced by law. Benny Goodman broke with tradition by hiring Teddy Wilson to play with him and drummer Gene Krupa in the Benny Goodman Trio. In 1936, he added Lionel Hampton on vibes to form the Benny Goodman Quartet. Goodman's fame was great enough that his band had no financial need to tour in the southern states, where his lineup would have been subject to arrest.

Artie Shaw
music
Artie Shaw (May 23, 1910 – December 30, 2004) is considered to be one of the best jazz musicians of his time. He was a Jazz clarinet player, composer, and bandleader. He also wrote both fiction and non-fiction writings.
Life.
He was born Arthur Jacob Arshawsky in New York, New York. He began learning the saxophone when he was 15. By age 16 he began to tour with a band. He returned to New York City and became a session musician. During the Swing Era, his big band was very popular with hits like "Begin the Beguine".
During the War.
During World War II he joined the U.S. Navy. He served in the Pacific theater as the leader of a service band (similar to Glenn Miller's wartime band in Europe).
Marriage.
Shaw was married eight times: Jane Cairns (1932); Margaret Allen (1934-37); Lana Turner (1940); Betty Kern (1941-43), daughter of songwriter Jerome Kern; Ava Gardner (1945-46); "Forever Amber" author Kathleen Winsor (1946-48); Doris Dowling (1952-56) and Evelyn Keyes (1957-85). He had two sons by Kern and Dowling.
Political problems.
In 1953, Shaw was brought up before the House Un-American Activities Committee for his leftist activities. The committee was investigating a peace activist organization, the World Peace Congress, which it considered a communist front.
Writing career.
Throughout his musical career, Shaw would take time off. He would quit the music business and pursue his writing career. In 1955, Shaw stopped playing the clarinet. After that, he focused on writing, especially semi-biographical fiction.
Bands.
In 1981, he organized a new Artie Shaw Band with clarinetist Dick Johnson as bandleader and soloist. Shaw himself would guest conduct from time to time, ending his self-imposed retirement.
In 1991, Artie Shaw's band library and manuscript collection was donated to the University of Arizona. In 2004, he was presented with a Grammy Lifetime Achievement Award.
Death.
In his later years, Shaw lived and wrote in the Newbury Park section of Thousand Oaks, California. Shaw had adult onset diabetes. In December 2004, he died due to the disease at age 94.

AnnaSophia Robb
music
AnnaSophia Robb (b. December 8, 1993) is an American actress and singer. She was born in Denver, Colorado.

Benazir Bhutto
politics
Benazir Bhutto (21 June 1953 - 27 December 2007) was a Pakistani politician. Bhutto was the first woman elected to lead a Muslim state. She was elected Prime Minister of Pakistan two times. She was sworn in for the first time in 1988 but removed from office 20 months later under orders of then-president Ghulam Ishaq Khan on grounds of alleged corruption. In 1993 Bhutto was re-elected but was again removed in 1996 on similar charges, this time by President Farooq Leghari.
Assassination.
On December 27, 2007, Benazir Bhutto was killed while getting into a vehicle to leave a political meeting for the Pakistan Peoples Party in Rawalpindi, Pakistan. An assassin shot her in the neck and chest before detonating an explosive vest. This killed about 30 people and wounded many others. She is called Shaheed-e-Jaumhuriat (Martyr of Democracy) by her fans.

Boris Becker
sports
Boris Franz Becker (born November 22, 1967) is a former German tennis player. He is born in Leimen, Germany. At the age of 17, he became the youngest ever winner at Wimbledon in 1985. He won the contest while being unseeded, that is, they did not think he was good enough to be assigned within an order of the better players at the start of the tournament.
He became a very successful player, winning the Wimbledon title again in 1986. Becker also helped West Germany win its first Davis Cup in 1988. In 1989, he won the Wimbledon, the US Open and another Davis Cup.
In 1991 he reached the World No 1 ranking by winning the Australian Open. Becker defeated Jim Courier in straight sets to win the 1992 Association of Tennis Professionals Tour World title. His final Grand Slam title was in 1996, where he beat Michael Chang for another Australian Open title in four sets.
Throughout his career, Becker won 49 singles titles and 15 doubles titles. He is famous for his rivalry with certain players, like Ivan Lendl, Stefan Edberg and Michael Stich.

Thomas de Maizière
politics
Thomas de Maizière (born 21 January 1954 in Bonn) is the Minister for Special Affairs in the German government. He is also Head of the Federal Chancellery.
His father was Ulrich de Maizière, who was Inspector General of the Bundeswehr. The senior officer in all German Armed Forces. In the UK, he would be Chief of the Defence Staff and in the US, Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff,
Thomas' cousin Lothar de Maizière was the only democratically elected Prime Minister of the German Democratic Republic.

Aurora (aircraft)
science
The Aurora (supposedly called the SR-91 Aurora) is a possible surveillance aircraft. No one knows if it ever existed. Supposedly, it was meant for trying out hypersonic flight, or speeds above 5 times the speed of sound. The name "Aurora" was used for the aircraft because in 1985, it appeared on an American military funding list. It might have been to replace the SR-71 Blackbird.
Aurora sightings.
In 1989, a man named Chris Gibson was working on an oil rig when he saw a KC-135 Stratotanker, two F-111 Aardvarks, and a triangle-shaped craft refueling. He did not know what it was. During 1991 in Southern California, there were a lot of sonic booms being heard. There was also a pulse coming out of the engine. The most recent sighting was in 2006.

Revolver (album)
music
"Revolver" is a 1966 album by British rock band The Beatles. Its front cover is a collage, designed by Klaus Voormann, a artist friend of the Beatles from Germany.
The album was recorded at Abbey Road Studios in London, England. While most of the Beatles's records were made in Studio Two, it was being used for another project, so much of "Revolver" was made in Studio Three, which was much smaller and meant for use by soloists. Space was cramped, and the sound of the record was different from their earlier ones.
The album also got a different reception from earlier Beatles albums. The band felt free to "branch out" into new themes and ideas, that nobody had tried in a pop music recording before. "Taxman" commented on the tax system in England. "Eleanor Rigby" was about loneliness. "Yellow Submarine" became a hit with children. "Good Day Sunshine" and "Got to Get You Into My Life" were covered by other bands.
A few of the songs made references to drugs, particularly John Lennon's songs. "She Said She Said" was about a party in Los Angeles the Beatles had gone to, and had taken LSD. "Doctor Robert" was about a New York doctor (Charles Roberts) who overprescribed sedatives and "feel-good" drugs for his patients. "Tomorrow Never Knows" came from Lennon's reading "The Psychedelic Experience", which adapted the "Tibetan Book of the Dead" as a drug-user's guide.
Beatles lead guitarist George Harrison was pleased to have three of his own songs included on "Revolver", "Taxman", "Love You To", and "I Want to Tell You". Most Beatles albums only had one or two Harrison songs. "Love You To" did not feature guitars, but Harrison instead played a sitar. World-famous sitarist Ravi Shankar heard the song, but did not like it, and offered to teach Harrison to play sitar properly. Shankar and Harrison went on to become lifelong friends.
Three songs from the album were "borrowed" by Capitol Records in the United States, and used on a compilation album, "Yesterday... and Today", which came out before "Revolver". The songs were "I'm Only Sleeping", "Doctor Robert", and "And Your Bird Can Sing". Capitol Records then released "Revolver" in a shortened version. The compact disc edition for sale today follows the original British version.
"Revolver" came out while the Beatles were on a concert tour. Bands normally perform songs from their latest album as a routine part of a concert. Strangely, the Beatles did not perform any "Revolver" songs on tour, but instead played the same music as on earlier tours. This got them criticism from some listeners. The tour also turned out to be the band's last. They played their final public concert in San Francisco, California on August 29, 1966.
Songs.
Songs with an asterisk (*) were not included in the American release, by Capitol Records.

Joaquín Rodrigo
music
Joaquín Rodrigo (born Sagunto, Valencia, 22 November 1901; died Madrid, 6 July 1999) was a Spanish composer of classical music and a virtuoso pianist. Although he was blind from an early age, he became one of the most important Spanish composers of the 20th century. He wrote a lot of music for guitar, which helped classical guitar music worldwide to become more popular. His most famous work is a guitar concerto called "Concierto de Aranjuez".
Early life.
Rodrigo became blind at the age of three after becoming ill with diphtheria. When he was eight he began to learn piano and violin. He also learned the guitar, but never became very good at it, although he was to compose some wonderful music for the instrument.
After studying music in Valencia he went to Paris where he studied with Paul Dukas in Paris. After a short time back in Spain he returned to Paris to study musicology, first under Maurice Emmanuel and then under André Pirro. In 1925 he received Spain's National Prize for Orchestra for his pieces "Cinco piezas infantiles" (Five Children's Pieces). In 1947 Rodrigo became a professor of music history in Madrid, a job that was made especially for him.
His famous concertos.
Rodrigo’s most famous work, "de Aranjuez", was composed in 1939 in Paris. It is a concerto for solo classical guitar and orchestra. There are three movements. The middle movement is a slow movement with a tune which is played on the cor anglais. It has become one of classical music’s best-loved tunes.
After the success of this piece several other musicians asked him to write concertos for them, e.g the flautist James Galway, the cellist Julian Lloyd Webber and the guitarist Andrés Segovia, for whom he composed "Fantasía para un gentilhombre" in 1954. Another of his works is called "Concierto Andaluz," for four guitars and orchestra.
Honours.
In 1991, Rodrigo was raised to the nobility by King Juan Carlos; he was given the title "Marqués de los Jardines de Aranjuez" (Marquis of the Gardens of Aranjuez). He was given the Prince of Asturias Award in 1996, the highest honour a Spanish civilian can get. He was made Commander of the Order of Arts and Letters by the French government in 1998.
Personal life.
He married Victoria Kamhi, a Turkish-born pianist, in 1933. They had a daughter called Cecilia. Rodrigo died in 1999 in Madrid at the age of 97. Joaquín Rodrigo and his wife Victoria are buried at the cemetery at Aranjuez.
His music.
Rodrigo composed about 170 works. These include 11 concertos, lots of pieces for choir, songs, piano music and guitar music. Like Manuel de Falla in the early 20th century, Rodrigo became the leading figure in Spanish music in the later part of the century. His music is not like most of the music that was being written in Europe at the time. At first his music was influenced by that of Stravinsky, Ravel and Granados, but later his personality gave it a special Spanish character. He had a lot of knowledge and wrote articles about lots of different arts subjects.

Karl Arnold
politics
Karl Arnold (* 21. March 1901 in Herrlishöfen; + 29. June 1958 in Düsseldorf) was a German politician. He was Minister President of North Rhine-Westphalia from 1947 to 1956.
Life and profession.
After 1920 Arnold worked full-time basis for the Christian trade union movement. He became Secretary of the Düsseldorf District of the Christian trade union in 1924.
In 1928 Arnold married Arnold Liesl Joeres. Their son Gottfried was born in 1933 and was a member of the German Bundestag between 1961 and 1983.
Arnold was partner in a business in Düsseldorf in 1933. During the Third Reich the Gestapo watched and followed him. He was arrested after Count von Stauffenberg tried to assassinate (murder) Hitler on 20 July 1944.
Arnold helped to found the industrial unions, today's DGB, with Hans Böckler in the Rhineland in 1945.
He got permission from the American Army to publish the Rheinische Post (Rhenish Post) daily newspaper. His family still own part of the paper today.
He died of a heart attack on 29 June 1958, during the Landtag (state parliament) election campaign.
Karl Arnold was buried in Düsseldorf's South Cemetery.
Political party.
Arnold joined the Centre party in 1920.
After the World War II Arnold founded the of Düsseldorf Christian democratic party in 1945. Later this became a part of CDU. Arnold was the CDU's deputy federal chairman from 1956 until his death.
Public offices.
1925 to 1933 he was a member of the city council of Düsseldorf and acting chairman the of the Centre Party group.
He was a member of the Landtag of North Rhine-Westphalia from 1946 until his death. Between 1947 and 1949 he was alao a member of the parliament of the Bizone (which was the British and American occupation zones).
In 1957 Arnold was elected to the Bundestag with 72.6% of the votes in the Gelsenkirchen-Erkelenz Jülich constituency. He was deputy chairman of the CDU/CSU parliamentary group.
On 29 January 1946 Arnold was appointed mayor of Düsseldorf by the American Military Government. He was elected mayor in the first free elections on 26 October 1946.
From December 1946 until 1956 he was Minister President of North Rhine Westphalia.
From 7 September 1949 to 6 September 1950 he was the first President of the Bundesrat.
This also mean that between 7 and 13 September he was Acting President of Germany, until Theodor Heuss was elected Federal President.
Arnold lost a constructive vote of 'no confidence' on 20 February 1956. His successor (person who followed) as Minister President was Fritz Steinhoff.
Arnold died one week before the next state elections, in 1958. He was only 57 years old.

Mélodie
music
Mélodie is the French word for “melody”. The word is used in music to mean songs written by French composers of classical music from the mid 19th century to the present. The Mélodie in French music is similar to the Lied in German music. “Mélodié" is not the same as "chanson" (the French word for “song”). The word “chanson” is used for folksongs or popular songs.
History.
In Germany composers of classical music had been writing great songs from about 1800, but in France the mélodie became important about 50 years later. While some German Lieder were based on folksong, the texts of the mélodies were usually poems by serious poets.
Hector Berlioz was the first composer to call some of his compositions melodies. His "Les Nuits d'Été" (1841) is one of the greatest of all song cycles. Charles Gounod wrote about 200 mélodies. He used texts by famous poets such as Hugo.
Gabriel Fauré wrote some of the greatest of all French song composers. He wrote more than 100 mélodies, many based on poems by Verlaine.
Henri Duparc wrote 13 very famous mélodies, although he wrote nothing else of any importance.
Claude Debussy and Maurice Ravel were very famous composers who wrote a lot of music, including mélodies that are often sung today. Ravel’s melodies are unusual because they are often based on folksong. Other composers of mélodie at the time include Albert Roussel, Reynaldo Hahn and André Caplet.
Mélodies continue to be composed today, though perhaps the last really popular composer of them was Francis Poulenc, who died in 1963.
Performing Mélodies.
In the French mélodie the poet’s feelings are often suggested or hinted at rather than stated in an obvious way. There is a very close relationship between the text (words) and the melody. To sing mélodie really well a singer must know the French language very well and understand a lot about French poetry. The rules about singing in the French language can be quite complicated. It is important to know when to let the last sound of a word run into the next word (elision). Several books have been written about this.
Although many famous singers are well-known for singing French mélodie, the most famous singer from the past was Pierre Bernac. He gave many song recitals with the composer Francis Poulenc who accompanied him on the piano. He wrote a book on how to sing mélodies.

Calvin Harris
music
Calvin Harris (born January 17 1984), is a Scottish singer, songwriter and record producer. He was born and grew up in Dumfries, Scotland, UK.
History.
Calvin Harris signed record contracts with EMI (publishing) and Sony BMG (recording) in 2006, after his music had been found on the social networking website, MySpace.
First album.
His first album "I Created Disco" was released on 18 June 2007. The album contained uptempo electronic sounding songs that were influenced by music from the 1980s. To promote "I Created Disco", Harris left to go on a tour of the UK, supporting Faithless and Groove Armada.
First single.
The first single release from the album, 'I created Disco' was called "Vegas". It was released on limited edition vinyl. His second single from his album was called "Acceptable in the 80s", a tribute to the style and culture of the decade. The song reached the top ten on the UK singles chart, remaining on the chart for fifteen weeks. "The Girls" was the album's second charted single. The fourth release from the album was "Merrymaking at My Place" however it only reached #43 in the UK chart.
Trivia.
In 2007, Harris also recorded with Kylie Minogue. He had caught Minogue's attention after his recordings had been passed on to her by another record producer. Harris says that working with Kylie was "surreal, but fun" although revealed to mixmag in 2007 to "needing a few drinks before meeting her."
It has been confirmed that Harris has co-written and produced two songs on the forthcoming Kylie album, 'In My Arms' and 'Heart Beat Rock'.
He has recently been given the credit as being the producer in a remixed version of The Mitchell Brothers song "Michael Jackson".
Today.
He is currently working with British pop-star Sophie Ellis-Bextor, co-writing a new single for her forthcoming greatest hits album.

Sam Simon
sports
Sam Simon (born c. 1955) is an American television producer and writer, most notable as one of the original developers of "The Simpsons", along with Matt Groening, James L. Brooks, and Richard C. Harner. He is perhaps best known for his creation of many "Simpsons" characters.

Kate Nash
music
Kate Marie Nash (born 6 July 1987) is an Irish singer and songwriter from Dublin. She was born in Dublin but she grew up in Harrow, which is situated in West London. She first became interested in music during her childhood when she learned how to play the piano.
A side.
Nash's début single was a double-A side single (recorded in Iceland), was released through independent record label Moshi Moshi Records in February 2007. Only 1000 copies were released, and it was on available on 7" vinyl. Because the single was so popular, 1000 additional copies of the single were made and sold out extremely fast. The A-side was called "Caroline's a Victim", is an electronic sounding song about Kate Nash's friend Caroline. A video for the song was released and received a lotof airplay on the music television channel, MTV2. The video was directed by Kinga Burza and it featured Kate Nash playing different instruments at the same time that her friend "Caroline" sits in her room playing music, taking photographs, trying on different clothes, listening to David Bowie, putting on makeup and sitting at her computer checking a website.
B side.
The B-side to the single was "Birds", it is an acoustic song that tells the story of a boy's clumsy attempts to try and explain to his girlfriend how he feels about her, all the while the girl doesn't know what her boyfriend is talking about.
During the promotion for "Caroline's a Victim/Birds", Nash supported an English singer who goes by the name of Get Cape. Wear Cape. Fly on his national tour before leaving to go on her own headlining tour around the UK.
Early career.
In March 2007, Nash was signed to Fiction Records.
In April 2007, Nash and other up-coming London acts were mocked through a nasty imitation of Nash's song, "Caroline's a Victim" entitled "LDN Is A Victim." The song mocked Kate Nash and Lily Allen, among others, for singing in a Cockney accent, despite their privileged backgrounds.
Kate nash released a second song, but through a different recored label called Fiction Records, her second single that was named "Foundations", was released on June 25 2007 and reached number two in the official UK Singles Chart.
Later career.
Following the fast, and unpredicted, success of "Foundations", Fiction Records announced plans to release Nash's album earlier than expected, to August 6, 2007. The album, which was named: "Made of Bricks", included many of the tracks which Kate Nash had been performing on her two nationwide tours, on her tours Kate Nash was supported by a British duet, called Peggy Sue & The Pirates.
The album received mixed reviews, The Independent describing it as being in "pole position for worst album of the year.".Kate Nash's album, "Made of Bricks" reached the UK Number 1.
In June 2007 Nash performed at many summer music festvals, for example, O2 Wireless Festival, the Bestival, Electric Gardens, Glastonbury Festival and the Latitude Festival, she also played at the Reading and Leeds Festivals, Oxegen and T in the Park, as well as other festivals. Kate Nash made her first official Television performance on "Later with Jools Holland", also appearing on other TV shows, for example: "Popworld", "The Friday Night Project", GMTV and "This Morning" during 2007.
Recognitions.
Nash was featured on the Top of the Pops Christmas special on December 25th, 2007. She performed her smash-hit single, Foundations.
Nash features on rapper, Kano's album which is called "London Town", in a song titled "Me & My Microphone".
She is also featured in the song "Look What You've Done" from Lethal Bizzle's latest albumwhich is named, "Back To Bizznizz".
Book.
Nash stated in an interview with NME that she is writing a series of short stories influenced by Roald Dahl, including one based around a seven-foot transvestite named Roy, and would like to release a collection. Kate Nash will probably release her books under a false name.

Real Sociedad
sports
The Real Sociedad de Fútbol SAD is a Spanish football team. The team is located in Donostia-San Sebastián in the Spanish provice of Guipuzcoa. It was created in 1909. In the 2006-2007 season, the team was in Primera División. After 40 years in this division, in the season 2007-2008 Real Sociedad plays in Segunda División. The colors of the team are blue and white.
Anoeta.
Anoeta Stadium is the stadium of Real Sociedad. Anoeta has a capacity of 32 000. Anoeta Stadium was opened in 1993.

VLC media player
sports
VLC media player is a free software media player by the VideoLAN project,also called "VLC", or "VideoLAN Client".
It is a highly portable multimedia player, encoder, and streamer that support many kind of audio and video. Vlc can repair and play,corrupt files,damaged or unfinished.
It is one of the most platform-independent players available, for BeOS, BSD, Linux, Mac OS X, Microsoft Windows, Solaris and Windows CE, and has over 50 million downloads for version 0.8.6.
VLC uses a large number of free decoding and encoding libraries. Many of its codecs are provided by the libavcodec codec library from the FFmpeg project, but it uses mainly its own muxer and demuxers.VLC gained honor as the first player to support playback of encrypted DVDs on Linux by using the libdvdcss DVD library.
History.
VLC was initially the client for the VideoLAN project,and it It was originally maked by students at the École Centrale Paris, and was released under the GPL license on the 1 February 2001.Now has supporters and contributors in everlyplace in the worldwide.
The icon of VLC is a traffic cones collected by Ecole Centrale's Networking Students' Association.
Design principles.
VLC has a very design, which makes it easier to include modules for new file formats, codecs or streaming methods.There are more than 300 modules in VLC.VLC also supports highly personalizable skins through the skins2 interface, Winamp 2 and XMMS skins and can play high definition recordings of D-VHS tapes duplicated to a computer using CapDVHS.exe

Russell Brand
music
Russell Edward Brand (born June 4, 1975) is an English comedian, actor, and Newspaper columnist. Many people notice his odd fashion sense - his choice of clothing is not the same as for most people.
He wrote a book about his life in 2007, which he called "My Booky Wook".

Chester Bennington
music
Chester Charles Bennington (born March 20, 1976 in Phoenix, Arizona) is Linkin Park's vocalist.
Early years.
Bennington was born in Phoenix, Arizona. He was interested in music since he was young and he liked mostly Depeche Mode and Stone Temple Pilots. His parents separated in the late 1980s, while he was still a child. Later he had problems with drugs. Before starting his musical career, he worked at a Burger King restaurant.
Professional music career.
At the beginning he was a vocalist in a grunge band called Grey Daze. He left Grey Daze in 1998. After that, the vice president of A&R at Zomba Music in Los Angeles, offered Bennington an audition with Linkin Park. Bennington went to California and joined the band. Their name was “Hybrid Theory”. The other vocalist was Mike Shinoda. After some rejections, Jeff Blue operated to help the band sign with Warner Bros. Records.
In spite of the success in the early 2000s, Bennington has had personal problems outside of the public interest.
Personal life.
On October 31, 1996 Bennington got married with Samantha, his first wife. They had one child, called Draven Sebastian, who was born on April 19, 2002. After divorcing, Bennington married Talinda Bentley, a former "Playboy" model.

Giaches de Wert
music
Giaches de Wert (pronounce: JYA-kes de VERT) (born Flanders, 1535; died Mantua, 6 May 1596) was a Flemish composer who lived and worked in Italy. He was one of the most important composers of madrigals in the Renaissance period.
Life.
We know very little about his childhood. Even some of the things about his adult life we are not sure about. He was born in Flanders, possibly in Ghent. When he was a boy he was taken to Italy and he stayed there for the rest of his life.
As a boy he was a singer in the household of Maria di Cardona, Marchesa of Padulla, near Naples. As a young man he lived in Novellara. He married there, and he had at least six children.
Later he went to live in Milan where he had the job of maestro di capella (music director). He stayed there until 1565. Some letters he wrote during that time have survived. They describe life at the court where he worked.
In 1565 he went to work for the Gonzaga in Mantua and became choir master at the ducal chapel of S. Barbara where he stayed until 1592. A lot of people were jealous of his good job, especially a man called Bonvicino who made life difficult for him. It was then found that Bonvicino was having a love affair with de Wert’s wife, so she had to go back to live in Novellara.
De Wert was becoming a very well known composer. He was offered a job at the emperor’s palace in Prague, but he did not take it. He travelled to work in various places such as Parma and Novellara. In Novellara his wife was found to have been plotting against the Gonzaga of Novellara. She was put in prison where she later died. There were long arguments in the law court about who should have her property. In the end, de Wert was given a third of her possessions, and he was given the right to let his children inherit the money.
He worked in Ferrara where he had a love affair with a lady who was of aristocratic birth. Since he was only a musician he was only a servant, so the lady was sent away from the court.
In his later years he worked for the court at Mantua where the music had become very good because the new ruler, Vincenzo Gonzaga, was very interested in music. De Wert composed music for the theatre. His health became poor. He suffered from malaria during the early 1580s. He died in Mantua and was buried in the crypt at S Barbara.
Music and influence.
De Wert wrote over 230 madrigals and other secular works. These were later published in 16 volumes. He also wrote over 150 sacred pieces (motets, hymns etc.) which showed how well he could write counterpoint.
His madrigals were very modern for their time. The music was very daring in the way it described the words. He sometimes used small groups of singers to contrast with one another like a musical conversation. He was a great influence on later madrigal composers such as Monteverdi and Gesualdo.

Adrian Willaert
music
Adrian Willaert (pronounce: AH-dree-ahn VIL-art), (born Flanders about 1490; died Venice, 7 December 1562) was a Flemish composer in the Renaissance period. He was one of the most important composers of his time. He went to Italy when he was young and spent the rest of his life there. He belonged to the group of composers who lived and worked in Venice at the time, and who were known as the “Venetian School”.
Life.
He may have been born in Bruges which is now in Belgium, although we are not sure. One of his students, Gioseffo Zarlino, who became a well-known music theorist, said that Willaert went to Paris first to study law, but then decided to study music. In Paris he met Jean Mouton, the main composer of the French royal chapel, and studied with him. Mouton taught him to write music in the style of Josquin, whose music was very polyphonic with the voices imitating one another a lot.
Sometime around 1515 Willaert first went to Rome. There is a story, which is probably true, that Willaert was surprised to find the Pope’s choir singing something he had composed. The choir thought it had been composed by Josquin, who was very famous by then. When the young Willaert told them that he himself was the composer, the choir did not believe the young man, and refused to sing it again.
In July 1515, Willaert worked for the Cardinal Ippolito I d'Este of Ferrara. Ippolito liked to travel, and he often took Willaert and other musicians with him to places such as Hungary, where he probably spent two years, from 1517 to 1519. When Ippolito died in 1520, Willaert worked for Duke Alfonso d'Este of Ferrara. In 1522 Willaert had a job at the court chapel of Duke Alfonso; he stayed there until 1525.
Willaert then got the most important musical job in the whole of Europe at that time: he became maestro di cappella (director of music) at the church of St. Mark's at Venice. The director who had been there before had not been very good, so Willaert made the music in that church really great again. He stayed in that job until his death. He was very famous and young composers came from all over Europe to study with him and learn how to be a composer.
Musical style and influence.
Willaert was one of the greatest composers of the Renaissance and the most important composer in Europe between the death of Josquin and the time of Palestrina.
He wrote music in lots of forms, especially church music and madrigals.

Billy Ray Cyrus
music
Billy Ray Cyrus (born 25 August 1961) is a Grammy nominated American country singer and actor. He is is best known for his popular single "Achy Breaky Heart" (1992). From 2001 to 2004, he starred in the television series "Doc". It was a series about a rural doctor who moves from a ranch to a large city. As of 2006, he is in the Disney Channel television series, "Hannah Montana", which stars his daughter, Miley Cyrus.
Achy Breaky Heart.
"Achy Breaky Heart" is Billy Ray's first single and his biggest hit. It is a country song written by Don Von Tress in 1989. Originally the lyrics were "achin' breakin' heart" but were changed to "achy breaky heart" by Billy Ray Cyrus on his 1992 album "Some Gave All".

How to Grow a Woman from the Ground
music
"How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" is a 2006 album by Chris Thile, who made the album with the How to Grow a Band, credited to Chris Thile. It was released on September 12, 2006. The album is named after a song on the album; a cover of a song by American singer Tom Brosseau.
The album got mostly good reviews from important music critics, with some critics saying that the album was “fantastic, eclectic”, and “genius”. The album got Thile a Grammy Award-nomination in 2007.
Early planning and creation.
For a side project away from his band Nickel Creek, Chris Thile knew he wanted to form a five-piece string band that featured mandolin, violin, banjo, acoustic guitar, and double bass. Thile also wanted the band to feature his friend and fiddle player Gabe Witcher, but didn’t know what kind of band he wanted it to be. At the Telluride Bluegrass Festival in Colorado, Thile met banjo player Noam Pikelny and later said that “every note he played was something I wish I’d played”. At that time, Thile decided that he wanted “put [his] stamp” on the normal bluegrass band. Thile wanted to find five people to make the five-piece band he planned. He had already found fiddle, banjo, and mandolin players, so he just had to find double bass and acoustic guitar players. The bass player Thile was looking for turned out to be Greg Garrison, a friend of Noam Pikelny. Before this, Pikelny had played with Garrison in the band Leftover Salmon. The guitar player Thile needed became Chris Eldridge, famous as a member of the Infamous Stringdusters. The five people met up in Nashville on one day in 2005 and decided to “do something musical together”. A few days later, the group met again “to drop a ton of money, drink too much wine, eat steaks, and [talk] about our failed relationships”. That night, they formed a bluegrass band.
A few months later, the group decided to record an album. The album was recorded in two days at "Sear Sound Recording Studios" in New York City. The album was not made digitally, but in the old-fashioned way: on tape. In an interview with the United States magazine "Guitar Player", Chris Thile talked about how "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" was recorded: "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" was produced by Thile, and the only musicians on the album was the band that Thile chose. The band was later named the "How to Grow a Band".
Musical style.
"How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" takes influence from several musical genres, “drawing equally from traditional bluegrass, progressive acoustic, and singer-songwriter traditions”. Bluegrass mandolin player Ronnie McCoury became the album’s official “bluegrass guru” to make sure that there was “someone who could make sure we didn’t do anything clichéd or trite”. When discussing the album’s musical style, Chris Thile said that “All in all, "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" is a bluegrass record. There are definitely some musical things that are out of the ordinary, but it sounds like a bluegrass record to me.”

Urho Kekkonen
politics
Urho Kaleva Kekkonen (September 3 1900 -- August 31 1986) was the President of Finland between 1956 and 1982. He was also Prime Minister of Finland before that.
Kekkonen was born in Pielavesi. He took part of the Finnish Civil War. He studied law and then worked in the Finnish secret police. He opposed the Communists and later fascists.
Kekkonen became the Interior Minister in 1937, and he then tried to ban the fascist party IKL.
After Second World War, in the year 1950 Kekkonen became the first time Prime Minister of Finland. He tried to keep good relations with the Soviet Union like president Juho Kusti Paasikivi.
Kekkonen was elected the President of Finland in 1956, after president Paasikivi. He tried to keep Finland neutral country, which means it was not part of any military alliance like NATO or Warsaw Pact in Cold War.
Urho Kekkonen led the underwriting of the Helsinki Accords of the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe between European countries, United States and Soviet Union in 1975.
Kekkonen became sick in 1981 and gave up presidency.

Albert Hofmann
science
Albert Hofmann (born January 11 1906 in Baden, Switzerland - died April 29 2008 in Burg im Leimental, Switzerland) was a Swiss scientist best known for having invented Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD). Hofmann wrote more than 100 scientific articles and a number of books, including "LSD: My Problem Child" (1979).
Life.
Hofmann studied chemistry at the University of Zürich. His main interest was the chemistry of plants and animals, and he studied about the chemical structure of the common animal substance chitin. Hofmann worked at the pharmaceutical-chemical department of Sandoz Laboratories in Basel.
Five years after its first synthesis, he discovered by accident the psychedelic effects of LSD, after absorbing some through his fingertips on April 16 1943. Three days later, he deliberately consumed 250 micrograms of LSD, and experienced far more intense effects. This was followed by a series of self-experiments. He first wrote about these experiments on April 22 of the same year.
He became director of the natural products department at Sandoz and went on studying hallucinogenic substances found in Mexican mushrooms and other plants used by the aboriginal people. This led to the synthesis of psilocybin, the active agent of many magic mushrooms.
Hofmann called LSD "medicine for the soul".
He suffered a heart attack in his home on April 29, 2008, and died at the age of 102.

Ky Ebright
sports
Carroll M. Ebright (March 20, 1894 - November 1979), sometimes known as Ky Ebright was a coach for the University of California, Berkeley crew team. He is the only man to coach three Olympic gold medal winning eight oared boats. Ky Ebright died in Berkeley, California at the age of 85.

Ishman Bracey
music
Ishman Bracey (January 9, 1901 - February 12, 1970), was a blues singer and guitarist from Mississippi.
Early Life.
Bracey was born in Byram, Mississippi. He started playing at local dances and parties in about 1917. He also worked as a waterboy on the Illinois Central Railroad. His first recorded song was in Memphis in 1928. He played as lead guitar with Charlie McCoy on rhythm guitar.
Songs performed.
In the 1920s, Bracey hadn't yet started playing delta blues and each of his songs were different. However, he was one of the only Mississippi blues musicians to sing with a nasal voice. He often sang about skin creams and powders which would lighten dark skin.
Later life.
When he recorded in 1930, his voice had become deeper. This meant that he couldn't sing high enough for some of his songs and the songs had to be changed. He recorded after in 1931 for Paramount Records with a group called "The New Orleans Nehi Boys", which had a guitarist called Charles Taylor.
Songs.
Bracey has recorded 16 songs in all, the original copies of his 78-rpm records are some of the most valuable things in blues collecting history. "Trouble Hearted Blues" and "Left Alone Blues" are his best known songs.

Willie Brown (musician)
music
Willie Brown (August 6, 1900 - December 30, 1952) was an American guitarist and singer. He played with Charley Patton, Son House, and Robert Johnson
Birth.
Brown was born in Clarksdale, Mississippi.
Music.
He was known to be shy and only wanting to accompany other musicians rather than play lead guitar. Robert Johnson called him "my friend boy Willie Brown".
Brown is heard playing on the Paramount label sessions of 1930. He played "M & O Blues" and "Future Blues". He also played songs with Son House and Charlie Patton. There are also rumours that he played with Luke Thomson and Thomas "Clubfoot" Coles. At least four other songs he recorded for Paramount have never been found.
Brown also played a song during the Great Depression for the Library of Congress called "Make Me a Pallet on the Floor".
Possible songs.
A song called "Rowdy blues" was thought to have Brown playing on rhythm guitar since he played another song ("Future Blues") on the same album ("Son House & The Great Delta Blues Singers").
Death.
He died in Tunica, Mississippi at the age of 52.

Sid Wilson
music
Sidney George "Sid" Wilson is an American musician and member of Slipknot. In Slipknot he is known as #0. He is known as the craziest member of Slipknot because he fights with other members. He also performs as DJ Starscream.
His injuries include breaking both of his ankles. He likes the TV show Transformers and takes his DJ name "Starscream" from one of it's characters. He also has tatoos of the characters. In Slipknot he wears a metallic style mask with lighting up eyes and moving eyebrows, mouth and antennas.

Sam Chatmon
music
Sam Chatmon (January 10 1897 - February 2 1983), was a guitarist and singer.
Life and career.
Chatmon was born in Bolton, Mississippi.
Early life.
Chatmon had a very musical family, all of them lived in Mississippi. Two of Sam's brothers, fiddler Lonnie Chatmon and guitarist Bo Carter, performed with guitarist Walter Vinson as the Mississippi Sheiks. Chatmon himself was a member of the family's string band when he was young. He performed all the time for white audiences in the 1900s.
Instruments played.
Chatmon played the banjo, mandolin, harmonica and the guitar. He played at parties and on street corners in Mississippi for money and tips. In the 1930s he recorded songs with his brothers.
Later life.
Chatmon moved to Hollandale, Mississippi in the early 1940s and worked on plantations in Hollandale. He started playing again in 1960, playing mostly blues music. In the same year, he recorded songs for Arhoolie Records. He went on tours in the 1960s and 1970s and played for many festivals such as the Festival of American Folklife in Washington, D.C. in 1972, the Mariposa Fest in Toronto in 1974, and the New Orleans Jazz and Heritage Festival in 1976.

Joey Jordison
music
Nathan Jonas "Joey" Jordison (b. April 26, 1975) is an American musician. He is the drummer for the band Slipknot. In Slipknot, he is known as #1. He is also the guitarist for Murderdolls.

Cipriano de Rore
music
Cipriano de Rore (born in Ronse, Flanders, 1515 or 1516; died Parma, September 1565) was a composer who lived in the Renaissance period. He was Flemish, but spent all his adult life in Italy. The name de Rore is a proper Flemish name, not a name that has been changed to look Italian. He was one of the most important composer of madrigals in the 16th century.
Life.
There is very little known about Rore's early life. He was born in a small town called Ronse (Renaix) in what is now Belgium. It is possible that he had music lessons in Antwerp. We think that he was taken to Italy by Margaret of Parma in 1533 as one of her servants. Margaret, who was an illegitimate daughter of Charles V, was very wealthy and she married into the Medici family. Rore probably continued to learn about music in Italy.
In his music publications de Rore is called a “disciple” of Adrian Willaert. We do not know whether this means that he had lessons from Willaert, or just that he learned to compose by studying Willaert’s music. His first book of madrigals was published in 1542, and then two books of motets were published.
In 1546 Rore went to Ferrara, where he was "maestro di cappella" (choirmaster) He wrote a great deal of music in Ferrara. He worked for the Duke Ercole II d'Este. He composed masses, motets, chansons, and lots of madrigals, some of which were about things that happened in the court at Ferrara. The duke awarded him an important honour. Rore also wrote music for Albrecht V of Bavaria who lived in Munich.
He left his job in Ferrara and went back to Flanders where he found his home town Ronse had been destroyed in a war. He went back to Ferrara, but could not get his old job back. After another visit to Flanders he returned to Italy and got a job in Parma, but the music in that town was not very good. For a short time he had a very important job of
"maestro di cappella" at St. Mark's. Adrian Willaert had just died. However, Rore only kept this job for a year, returning to Parma in 1564 and dying there the next year.
Works and influence.
Rore is best known for his Italian madrigals, but he also wrote a lot of church music, including masses and motets. He learned from studying the music of Josquin. His madrigals are based on the style of Willaert. He enjoyed writing thick counterpoint and making the voices imitate one another a lot. Most of the words he set were serious words, not lighthearted and amusing. He often used chromaticism. He developed his musical style a lot during his lifetime. His music was very important in the development of the Italian madrigal, and it led the way to the madrigals of Monteverdi.

James Cotton
sports
James "Jimmy" Cotton (born July 1, 1935 in Tunica, Mississippi), is an American blues harmonica player, singer, and songwriter. He was an orphan.
Career.
Cotton first became interested in playing music when he heard Sonny Boy Williamson on the radio. He left his home to find Sonny Boy Williamson, and when he found him (in West Helena, Arkansas), Williamson took him in and raised him.
First band.
Cotton first began playing the blues harp in Williamson's band, called Howlin Wolf's. After one gig, Sonny Boy quit the band to live with his wife in Milwaukee. He left the band in Cotton's hands. Cotton said, "He just gave it to me. But I couldn't hold it together 'cause I was too young and crazy in those days an' everybody in the band was grown men, so much older than me."
Later career.
Cotton started working with the Muddy Waters Band in 1955. He performed songs like "I Got My Mojo Working" and "She's Nineteen Years Old". After leaving Muddy's band in 1966, Cotton toured with Janis Joplin. Alone, Cotton wrote classic songs like "Cotton Crop Blues", "Rocket 88" and "Hold Me In Your Arms". He formed the James Cotton Blues Band in 1967. They performed all of Cotton's classics and more.
Awards.
Cotton played harmonica on Muddy Water's Grammy Award winning 1977 album "Hard Again". James Cotton's band would also get nominated for two Grammy Awards. The first one was for his 1984 release, "Live From Chicago: Mr. Superharp Himself!". His second for "Take Me Back".

Laura Marling
music
Laura Marling (born 1990) is a folk-pop singer-songwriter from Reading, Berkshire, England.
Laura Marling has toured with a number of well-known indie artists in the UK including Jamie T, who personally invited her on tour with him last year after he attended her second-ever gig.
She performed at this summer's 02 Wireless Festival
and also performed at the first Underage Music Festival in August 2007 at Victoria Park, East London. She has also perfromed at Electric Gardens Music festival in Kent.
Her debut single came out on WayOutWest Records, with a new single coming out soon on Virgin Records.
She recently appeared on Later with Jools Holland where she performed the song "New Romantic". Marling's debut album "Alas I Cannot Swim" will be released on February 4, 2008. And new single Ghosts is out on January 15, 2008.

Josquin des Prez
music
Josquin des Prez (born near St Quentin some time between 1450 and 1455; died St Condé-sur-l’Escaut, 27 August 1521) was a French composer. He was one of the greatest composers of the Renaissance. He changed music from the sound of medieval compositions and developed the style which led to the great compositions of the 16th century Renaissance composers such as Ockeghem, Palestrina, Lassus and Byrd.
Early years.
Josquin was born yn 1440 and then had died in 1521.
The name Josquin was a common name in Northern France and Flanders at that time. It was the name of a Breton saint who had lived in that area in the 7th century. The name Des Prez started off as a nickname in the family, and gradually it became the family name. The name Josquin des Prez is spelt in several different ways in old documents. He is often simply called “Josquin”.
We know very little about his life. We know very little about what people thought about him during his life, although after his death many people admired his music. Even his birthplace is uncertain. We do not know where he got his musical training. He was described as a “pupil of Ockeghem”, but that may just mean that he studied Ockeghem’s music.
We know that he became a singer in the chapel of Aix-en-Provence, the chapel of the Duke of Anjou. After the duke’s death in 1480 he worked for King Louis XI of France until he, too, died in 1483. We do not know where he worked after that, but he had some music published, including six chansons. He probably worked for some time in Milan.
Italy.
In 1489 Josquin went to Rome and worked in the pope’s chapel. He stayed there at least until 1495, possibly later. There he wrote music for the chapel, including some motets. His music was becoming well-known in some parts of northern Italy. It was a time of war in Italy. Several times the king of France invaded parts of Italy. Josquin seems to have written several pieces for the French royal court, including some funeral music on the death of King Louis XII in 1515.
For a year (1503-1504) he was maestro di cappella in Ferrara. He may have left that job because of an outbreak of the plague. A few months after he left the famous composer Jacob Obrecht took over the job. Obrecht was only paid half the salary that Josquin had been given. Very soon afterwards, Obrecht died of the plague.
Later years in Northern France.
From 1504 until his death in 1521 Josquin was back in Northern France, where had the job of provost in Condé-sur-l’Escaut, which may possibly have been his birthplace. The church was a very important one, and it had an excellent choir.
Before he died Josquin paid a lot of tax to make sure that after his death his property did not go to the local lord of the manor but would be given to his church. After his death his house was sold, and the money was used for special church services to remember him. There was a statue of the Blessed Virgin Mary on the wall of his old house, and when church processions passed by they stopped in front of it and sang Josquin’s motets "Pater Noster" and "Ave Maria".
His Music.
His music is nearly all choir music. It consists mainly of church music: motets and masses, although he also wrote some secular (non-religious) music, including some chansons (French songs) and some instrumental music. One popular song is called "El Grillo ". It means “the cricket” and it describes the sound of a cricket singing in the grass.
Josquin was a master of polyphony. His name had become so famous that, after his death, many publishers printed music by other composers and pretended it was by Josquin so that more people would buy it. During recent years musicologists have studied many of these manuscripts very carefully and tried to decide which ones were really by Josquin.

Wayne Rooney
sports
Wayne Mark Rooney (born 24 October 1985 in Liverpool) is a football (soccer) player who plays for Manchester United and his country, England. He plays as a striker.
Everton.
Rooney grew up in Liverpool, where there are two big football clubs: Liverpool F.C. and Everton F.C. As a child, Wayne supported Everton and began playing football for them at the age of only 16, when he became the youngest Premiership scorer, scoring a winning goal against Arsenal F.C.. Rooney started playing fantastic football for Everton and was the top scorer at Euro 2004, a competition where he played for England. Soon, other clubs wanted to buy him. Newcastle United F.C. and Manchester United both made offers to Everton for him. It was Manchester United who signed him eventually, for £23m in the summer of 2004. Rooney was only 18 at the time, and the £23m paid for him is the highest amount ever paid for a teenager, in the world.
Manchester United.
Rooney has also won many personal awards, such as goal of the season and young player of the year. He has scored over 50 goals for Manchester United.
Personal.
Rooney's fiancee and girlfriend is Coleen McLoughlin. They live in Cheshire. Wayne likes listening to rappers Eminem and 50 Cent. He has said one of his heroes is boxer Mike Tyson. Wayne often appears in adverts for FIFA videogames and Coca-Cola.

Arthur Crudup
music
Arthur "Big Boy" Crudup (August 24, 1905 – March 28, 1976) was a delta blues singer and guitarist. He wrote songs that Elvis Presley later sang.
Early life.
Crudup was born in Forest, Mississippi and worked as a migrant worker until he and his family went back to Mississippi in 1926.
Early career.
Crudup sang gospel music and blues music. He played in a band called the Harmonizing Four in 1939. A record producer called Lester Melrose got him work with Bluebird label.
Later career.
Crudup stopped recording in the 1950s. His last Chicago recording was in 1951, he also recorded in 1952-54 for a radio station called WGST in Atlanta.. In the 1960s he started recording again with Fire Records and Delmark Records.
Later life.
In the mid 60s, Crudup went back to working as a farmer in Virginia, where he lived with his family: his three sons and several of his own siblings.
Death.
He died because of heart disease and diabetes. He died in the Nassawadox hospital in Northampton County, Virginia, also on the Eastern Shore in 1976.

Henry Sloan
music
Henry Sloan (born January 1870 - died ?) was an African American musician. He played the Delta Blues and is known for teaching Charlie Patton to play the blues, and moved to Chicago after World War I.
Early life.
David Evans says that Sloan was born in Mississippi in 1870. He moved to a Plantation near Indianola at between 1901 and 1904.
Career.
There is a rumour that Sloan was a hobo which was seen by musician W.C. Handy playing guitar at Tutwiler train station in 1903. Handy describes him as

Gustav Heinemann
politics
Dr. Dr. Gustav Walter Heinemann (* 23 July 1899 in Schwelm; † 7 July 1976 in Essen) was a German politician. He was Interior Minister under Chancellor Konrad Adenauer. He resigned when Adenauer started getting ready to set up the German Army. He later resigned from the CDU and joined the SPD. He also served as Justice Minister before he was elected Federal President in 1969. He served for one term, and left office in 1974.

JJ Lin
music
Wayne Lin, born on 27 March 1981, is more commonly known as JJ Lin. He is a Singaporean singer and songwriter of Chinese Fujian descent, and he came to musical prominence and success in the Greater China region and Taiwan, where he was awarded the "Best New Artist" award in the Taiwan Golden Melody Awards.
He has written songs for various artists, notably "Ji De (Remember)" for Taiwanese pop diva A-Mei and fellow labelmate A-do's "Fang Shou".
In Singapore, he was chosen to perform the remixed version of "Home", the theme song of the National Day Parade in 2004. His career and notability began to rise astronomically in Singapore particularly with the aid of his music being used in television shows produced by MediaCorp TV Channel 8, and his increased public appearances, such as being the guest performer in the finals of Channel U's Project SuperStar.
After winning the Gold award in the Best New Act category in the 2004 Singapore Hit Awards, he went on to sweep the 2005 edition with four awards to his name, including the Best Local Male Artiste, Best Composing Artiste, Best Male Vocalist and Best Local Music Composition awards, recognizing his talents both in the composition and performance aspects of his music. His latest album "Cao Cao" sold 2,000,000 copies in just 2 weeks.

Made of Bricks
music
"Made of Bricks" is the first album by the British singer-songwriter, Kate Nash. It was released on 6 August, 2007 on Fiction Records and reached number one in the UK album charts.
The album was released five weeks earlier than first planned due to the popularity of the single "Foundations". In its opening week of sales the album sold over 56,000 copies, and was certified gold.
The album has now been certified Platinum in the UK for sales of over 300,000. It has sold over 450,000 copies worldwide.

Matinée (album)
music
"Matinée" is the first album from British singer-'songwriter Jack Peñate. It was released on October 8 2007 on XL Recordings.

Miranda Cosgrove
music
Miranda Taylor Cosgrove (born 14 May 1993) is a American child actress and singer. She was born in Los Angeles, California. She first started her career in 1998. She is best known for her roles as Megan Parker in "Drake and Josh", Summer Hathaway in "School of Rock" and as Carly Shay in Nickelodeon's iCarly.

Johannes Ockeghem
music
Johannes Ockeghem (born Saint-Ghislain, near Mons, Belgium about 1410; died Tours, France, 6 February 1497), was the most famous composer of the Franco-Flemish School (from around the area which is now Belgium) in the last half of the 15th century, and is often thought of as the most important composer between Dufay and Josquin des Prez. He was an excellent choirmaster and teacher. He spent most of his life working for the French royal court.
Life.
The name Ockeghem is found with many different spellings in old documents. He was almost certainly born in the town of Saint-Ghislain. His native language was probably French.
Like many composers in this period, he started to learn about music by singing in a church choir, quite possibly in Saint-Ghislain and then in Mons.
His first important job was working for Charles I, Duke of Bourbon in Moulins, (France). Then in 1451 he went to work for King Charles VII of France. By this time he was well-known as a singer and composer. He worked for the royal court for more than 50 years and was rewarded with promotions and honours. Charles VII gave him important jobs. After Charles VII’s death Louis XI became king. He reigned for a long time and Ockeghem was in favour with the king. He often travelled with the king, visiting places such as Cambrai and even as far as Spain. He met famous people including the composers Dufay and Binchois. He also had other jobs in Paris.
Louis XI died in 1483. We do not kinow much about where Ockeghem went after that, but he probably died in Tours because that is where he left his will.
Music and influence.
Ockeghem was not a composer who wrote lots of music, but it is hard to tell as some of it might have got lost. There are 14 masses that survive and other vocal works. His "Missa pro Defunctis" is the earliest surviving polyphonic Requiem. Ockeghem based many of his masses on well-known tunes in a way that is called “cantus firmus technique”. Sometimes he put the borrowed tunes in the lowest part (he sang bass himself). This was rather unusual.
Ockeghem’s music influenced Josquin des Prez and other composers from Flanders and the Netherlands.
When Ockeghem died Josquin Des Prez composed a motet called "La déploration de la mort de Johannes Ockeghem" in his honour. The music theorist Johannes Tinctoris described him as a great musician and one of the best singers he knew. Many younger composers used some of Ockeghem’s melodies as a base for their own compositions. In the Renaissance this kind of borrowing from the music ofc another composer was thought to be a great honour.

Runaways (comics)
sports
Runaways is a Marvel Comics comic book series created by Brian K. Vaughan and Adrian Alphona. The series is about a group of teenagers who try to make up for the evil done by their supervillain parents by becoming superheroes. They are commonly called "the Pride's kids" or "those kids in L.A." by other characters in the Marvel Universe. This is because the team does not have an official name and the most of Marvel's characters are in in New York.
In 2006, the series won the Harvey Award for best continuing/limited series.
In February 2007, series creators Vaughan and Alphona stopped making "Runaways" at issue #24 of the second series. In April 2007, long-time "Runaways" fan Joss Whedon (of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer", "Angel" and "Firefly" fame) will take over the series for 6 issues. Marvel has said that Terry Moore, creator of "Strangers in Paradise" will take over after Whedon leaves, with Humberto Ramos on art.
Overview.
"Runaways" was started in 2002 as part of Marvel Comics' "Tsunami" imprint. After Marvel cancelled the Tsunami imprint in January 2003, the series moved to the "Marvel Age" imprint. Because of this, the individual story arcs for "Runaways" are collected in small, manga-sized trade paperbacks. The hardcover collections are in normal sized books. In September 2004, the series ended at issue #18. Marvel started the series again in February 2005 and it has been published ever since.
The series is not usual in that it does not use the ideas of superhero names, uniforms, and team names. All the characters in the first series (except Alex) chose codenames, but they are used less and less throughout of vol. 1. In vol. 2, the codenames are mentioned once but never actually used. Molly is the only character who makes a costume but it is made from old bedsheets and clothes. She never wears the costume again after vol. 1 issue #8. During battle, the runaways mainly fight in their street clothes and call each other by their given names or nicknames. Also, the children never call themselves "The Runaways". Their team simply goes without a name. Other Marvel characters usually call the team "the Pride's kids" or "those kids in L.A." Vaughan even makes fun of common superhero sayings such as "Hulk smash!" or "Avengers assemble!" when Nico tells Victor that the team's rallying call is "Try not to die."

Dagens Nyheter
media
The Dagens Nyheter is a Swedish-language newspaper. It is written every day in Stockholm.

Mark Ronson
music
Mark Daniel Ronson (born 4 September 1975) is a music producer from London, England. Ronson has released two albums. His first, released in 2003, was mainly hip hop music. His second, in 2007, featured British singers and musicians performing many different genres and styles.
Early life.
Ronson's mother, Ann, is a writer, and his father used to work in the music industry. He has two twin sisters, Charlotte and Samantha. Samantha is also a musical artist. Ronson's family are ethnically Jewish.
Ronson became interested in hip hop when he moved to New York City, aged 8. He went New York University, and became a popular DJ in New York during the 1990s.
Albums.
Ronson's first album was called "Here Comes the Fuzz", a hip hop album featuring artists such as Ghostface Killah. It was released in 2003. It reached #70 in the music charts.
His second album, "Version", was more successful. It sold more, and was nominated for a number of awards. It featured lead vocals by the likes of Amy Winehouse, Lily Allen, Robbie Williams, and others famous British singers too. The artists performed cover songs, (which means the songs were new 'versions' of old songs - the word "version" was originally used in this context by the Reggae scene) but what made this second album stand out was the return to the use of professional arrangers and a full brass section. At a time when other producers such as Timbaland had made a name for themselves by producing simple stripped down backing beats, the sound was a complete change of direction. The brass section that Ronson used was the Dap-Kings who usually performed with Sharon Jones. It reached #2 in the British charts.

John Dee
science
John Dee (July 13, 1527–1609) was a noted English mathematician, astronomer, astrologer, geographer, occultist, and consultant to Queen Elizabeth I. He also studied to alchemy, divination, and Hermetic philosophy.
Dee lived during a time when people were just learning the difference between science and magic. He was one of the most learned men of his time. He lectured to crowded halls at the University of Paris when still in his early twenties. Dee was an expert in mathematics, astronomy and navigation. He trained many of those who would go on voyages of discovery for England. In fact, he coined the term "British Empire".
At the same time, he was very interested in magic and Hermetic philosophy. He spent the last third of his life studying mostly these subjects. During his time, these subjects were not thought to be opposed to science. They were thought to be part of science.
He wrote "Monas Hieroglyphica" ("The Heiroglyphic Monad") in 1564 (about Kabbala and alchemy). He also wrote the preface to the first English translation of Euclid's works.
Early years.
Dee was born in London in a Welsh family. The last name Dee cames from the Welsh word "du", meaning "black". He graduated from St. John's College, Cambridge when he was eighteen. He was a founding fellow of Trinity College. He lectured briefly at Cambridge. Then he left England to study in continental Europe and lecture in Paris and Louvain. He returned to England in the 1540s.
In 1555, he was arrested and charged with practicing black magic for having cast horoscopes of Queen Mary and Princess Elizabeth; the charges were expanded to treason against Mary. Dee appeared in the Star Chamber and cleared himself. When he was released, he became a scientific advisor to Elizabeth I, even deciding on the best date for her to be crowned in 1558.
He traveled Europe with money from Elizabeth I. He was possibly acting as a spy for her. He became a close associate of many Elizabethan explorers and entrepreneurs such as Sir Humphrey Gilbert.
In 1564, Dee wrote the Hermetic work "Monas Hieroglyphica" ("The Hieroglyphic Monad") about a symbol of his own design which stood for the mystical unity of all creation. This work was highly valued by many people of Dee's time. However there was a secret about it which has been lost. This makes the book hard to understand today.
He published a "Mathematical Preface" to Henry Billingsley's English translation of Euclid's "Elements" in 1570. He wrote about how important mathematics was for the other arts and sciences. Because this book was written for the public, it was Dee's most popular work.
Later life.
Dee was not satisfied with his knowledge. In the early 1580s, he started to use supernatural ways to get more knowledge. He wanted to get knowledge from the angels.
He met Edward Kelly in 1582 and Kelly became his companion. Kelly was a convicted forger. Kelly helped Dee to get visions from angels using a crystal ball. The angels gave them a language called Enochian and dictated several books through Kelly. Dee's crystal ball ended up in the British Museum. It went unnoticed for many years in the mineral collection. Most of the still existing papers of Dee are also in the British Museum.
Final years.
In 1583, while Dee was away in Europe, his home and library at Mortlake were destroyed by a mob. Later, Dee came to believe that many of his books had been stolen by former friends and associates. He asked Queen Elizabeth for help. She made him Warden of Christ's College, Manchester, in 1592. He remained in this position until 1604.
When Elizabeth I died in 1603, so did Dee's influence: he was forced to retire to his home at Mortlake where he died in poverty.
Publication of Enochian writings.
About ten years after his death, the antiquarian Robert Cotton found some of Dee writings, mostly records of Dee's communications with angels. Cotton's son gave these writings to the scholar Méric Casaubon, who published them in 1659 as "A True & Faithful Relation of What passed for many Yeers between Dr. John Dee (A Mathematician of Great Fame in Q. Eliz. and King James their Reignes) and some spirits."
This was the public had heard about Dee's spiritual conferences. The book was extremely popular and sold quickly. Because Casaubon wrote in his introduction that Dee was really dealing with evil spirits when he believed he was communicating with angels, Dee was thought of as deluded for some time.
Personal life.
Dee was married three times and had eight children. His eldest son was Arthur Dee. He was also an alchemist and Hermetic writer.

Roy Keane
sports
Roy Maurice Keane (born 10 August 1971 in Mayfield, Cork City, Ireland) was an Irish footballer. He is the manager of English Premier League club Sunderland now.

Léon Theremin
sports
Léon Theremin (born Lev Sergeyevich Termen,) (August 15 1896 – November 3 1993) was a Russian inventor. He is most famous for his invention of the theremin, one of the first electronic musical instruments.
Léon Theremin was born in Saint Petersburg - renamed Leningrad from 1924 until 1991 - and his family had French ancestry.
Early inventions.
He invented the theremin (also called the "thereminvox") in 1919, when his country was in the midst of the Russian Civil War. Theremin also invented the first electronic burglar alarm, which he called a "radio watchman".
Move to the United States.
Theremin moved to the United States, arriving December 30, 1927 with his first wife, Katia Constantinova. He performed the theremin with the New York Philharmonic in 1928. He patented his invention in the United States in 1928 and subsequently granted commercial production rights to RCA. Theremin set up a laboratory in New York in the 1930s, where he developed the theremin and experimented with other electronic musical instruments and other inventions.
Theremin was interested in a role for the theremin in dance music. He developed performance locations that could automatically react to dancers' movements with varied patterns of sound and light. He worked with the American Negro Ballet. After the Soviet consulate had apparently demanded he divorce Katia, the inventor fell in love with and married the young prima ballerina Lavinia Williams. His marriage to the African-American dancer caused shock and disapproval in his social circles, but the couple remained together.
Return to the Soviet Union.
Theremin abruptly returned to the Soviet Union in 1938. At the time, the reasons for his return were not clear. Some claimed that he was simply homesick, while others believed that he had been kidnapped by Soviet officials. Beryl Campbell, one of Theremin's dancers, said his wife Lavinia "called to say that he had been kidnapped from his studio" and that "some Russians had come in" and that she felt that he was going to be spirited out of the country.
Theremin was put to work in a secret research and development laboratories in the Soviet Gulag labor camp system. Theremin created the "Buran" eavesdropping system which recorded conversations in French and American embassies by measuring the window glass vibrations using a low power infrared beam from a distance. Lavrentiy Beria, head of the KGB then used Buran to spy on US, British and French embassies.
In 1945 Theremin invented the first covert listening device (or "bug") for spying. Theremin's device was embedded in a carved wooden plaque of the Great Seal of the United States. On August 4, 1945, Soviet school children presented the bugged carving to U.S. Ambassador Averell Harriman, as a "gesture of friendship" to the USSR's World War II ally. It hung in the ambassador’s Moscow office until 1952, when the bug was discovered by a British radio operator who heard conversations on an open radio channel. The CIA found the device in the Great Seal carving. Peter Wright, a scientist and former MI5 counterintelligence officer, eventually figured out how it worked.
Later life.
After his release from the labor camp in 1947, Theremin volunteered to remain working with the KGB until 1966. By 1947 Theremin had remarried, to Maria, and they had two children: Lena and Natalia.
After working for the KGB, Theremin worked at the Moscow Conservatory of Music for 10 years where he taught and built Theremins, electronic cellos and some Terpsitones. There he was discovered by a visiting New York Times correspondent, but when an article by Christopher Walker appeared, according to Lydia, the Vice President of the conservatory said "The people don't need electronic music. Electricity is for killing traitors in the electric chair", fired Theremin, closed his laboratory and had his instruments destroyed.
In the 1970s, Léon Theremin began training his nine-year-old niece Lydia Kavina on the theremin. Kavina was to be Theremin's last protégé. Today, Kavina is considered one of the most advanced and famous thereminists in the world.
After 51 years in the Soviet Union Léon Theremin started travelling, first visiting France in June 1989 and then the United States in 1991, each time accompanied by his daughter Natalia, where he was reunited with Clara Rockmore who performed a number of concerts at this time. He also made a demonstration concert at the Royal Conservatory of The Hague in early 1993 before dying in Moscow in 1993 at the age of 97.
Documentary film.
Léon Theremin is the subject of the documentary film, ', written, directed, and produced by Steven M. Martin. The documentary was a winner at the Sundance Film Festival in 1994. The film features legendary thereminists Clara Rockmore and Lydia Kavina as well as electronic instrument pioneer Robert Moog, Nicolas Slonimsky, The Beach Boys founder Brian Wilson, and Theremin himself.

Yulia Tymoshenko
politics
Yulia Volodymyrivna Tymoshenko () (born on November 27, 1960) is a Ukrainian politician and current Prime Minister of Ukraine. She is serving her second term. Her first term was from January 24 to September 8, 2005. She was relected on December 18, 2007. She is leader of the political party the Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc. When Viktor Yushchenko lost the 2004 Ukrainian presidential election and his followers argued that the election had been corrupted she was his main ally and one of the leaders of "The Orange Revolution". She leads a two party government with her own political party and the political party of Viktor Yushchenko (the current the President of Ukraine).
Tymoshenko's first name is sometimes spelled Yuliya, Yulia, Iulia, or Julia.

Der er et yndigt land
music
"Der er et yndigt land" ("There is a Lovely Country") is the national anthem of Denmark.

Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc
politics
The Yulia Tymoshenko Bloc () is a Ukrainian electoral alliance led by the politician Yulia Tymoshenko, current Prime Minister of Ukraine.
The alliance is especially popular in the west en center of Ukraine but is also the only "Orange party" (Yulia Tymoshenko was an important player in the Orange Revolution) winning votes in the east en south of Ukraine where the Orange Revolution wasn't popular.

Noam Chomsky
science
Avram Noam Chomsky (born December 7, 1928) is an American linguist, philosopher, political activist, author, and lecturer. He is an Institute Professor and professor emeritus of linguistics at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.
Chomsky created the theory of generative grammar. This is one of the most important contributions to the field of linguistics made in the 20th century. He also helped start the cognitive revolution in psychology through his review of B. F. Skinner's "Verbal Behavior". He challenged the behaviorist way of looking at behavior and language. This was the main approach used in the 1950s. His natural approach to the study of language also changed the philosophy of language and mind. He also invented the Chomsky hierarchy, a way of looking at formal languages in terms of their power to explain language.
According to the Arts and Humanities Citation Index in 1992, Chomsky was cited as a source more often than any other living scholar during the 1980–1992 time period. He was the eighth-most cited scholar in any time period.
In the 1960s he criticized the Vietnam War. Because of that, Chomsky became more widely known for his media criticism and politics. He is a key intellectual figure within the left wing of United States politics. Chomsky is widely known for his political activism, and for his criticism of the foreign policy of the United States and other governments.

Jacob Obrecht
music
Jacob Obrecht (born Ghent, 1457 or 1458; died late July, 1505) was a composer from the south Netherlands. He was one of the greatest composers of his time. He is best known for his church music, including many masses as well as motets and songs.
His life.
Obrecht’s father was a trumpeter. His mother died when he was about 2 years old and his father remarried. We know nothing about Obrecht’s musical education. He may have learned to play the trumpet like his father, who worked for the Burgundian court. Perhaps his father introduced him to people at the court, such as the famous composer Antoine Busnois. He certainly must have known Busnois’ music.
From 1480-1484 he was a choirmaster at Bergen-op-Zoom. Then he got a very good job as choirmaster at Cambrai Cathedral. However, a year later he took another job in Bruges. He wrote a lot of church music during his years in Bruges. He travelled to Italy and went to the town of Ferrara where a lot of famous musicians worked. He stayed there for several months. This may have been the reason why he then lost his job in Bruges. His next job was in Antwerp where he worked from 1492 to 1498. He then got his old job back in Bruges. From 1501 to 1503 he once again worked at Antwerp where he was choirmaster at the church of Our Lady. In 1504 he got the job of maestro di cappella at Ferrara, but the following year he died of the plague.
His reputation.
Obrecht composed extremely quickly. He is supposed to have written one of his masses in one night. This was different to Josquin des Prez who spent a long time composing his pieces and making changes to them before he let anyone have copies. Obrecht was influenced by the music of Busnois and Ockeghem. Obrecht himself was a big influence on Josquin, even though Josquin was older than Obrecht.
In recent years musicologists have studied Obrecht’s music a lot and made many discoveries, including the correct dates for many of his works.

Antoine Busnois
music
Antoine Busnois (pronounce "AN-twun bew-NWAH") (also spelt Busnoys) (born about 1430; died 6 November 1492) was a French composer and poet of the early Renaissance Burgundian School. He wrote church music, such as motets, as well as secular (non-religious) chansons. He was the most important composer of the late Burgundian school after the death of Guillaume Dufay.
Life.
We do not know where Busnois was born. It might have been in the tiny village of Busnes in the Artois district. Maybe he took his name from the village.
Nothing is known about his musical education. We know that he got into trouble in 1461 because he was said to be in a group of people who beat up a priest on five occasions. At that time he was a chaplain in Tours cathedral. While the attack was being investigated he went to mass. This led to him being excommunicated, but later the pope pardoned him.
In 1465 he moved from the cathedral to the collegiate church of St. Martin, also in Tours, where he became a subdeacon. Johannes Ockeghem was treasurer there, and the two composers seem to have known each other well. Later in 1465 Busnois moved to Poitiers, where he not only became "maîtrise" (master of the choirboys), but managed to get lots of good singers from the region. By this time he was famous as a singing teacher and composer. However he left the job for some reason in 1466 and then moved to Burgundy.
By 1467 Busnois was a composer at the court of Burgundy. Soon Charles the Bold was on the throne. Charles fought many wars, and sometimes took Busnois and other musicians on his military journeys. In 1477 Charles was killed at the Battle of Nancy. Busnois continued to work for the Burgundian court until 1482. Nothing is known about what he did after that. He died in 1492.
His music.
He was very well known as a composer and his music was sung in many parts of Europe.
He was the probably the best-known musician in Europe between the time of Guillaume Dufay and Johannes Ockeghem.
Busnois wrote sacred and secular music. It is likely that a lot of his music is now lost. Two of his masses and eight motets have survived. The style of his music is somewhere between the simple homophonic music of Dufay and Binchois, and the more elaborate imitation of Josquin..
Busnois may have been the composer of the famous tune "L'homme armé", one of the most popular tunes of the Renaissance. The tune was often used as a cantus firmus for mass composition. He may have been the very first composer to write a mass based on "L'homme armé". This mass was a big influence on many composers.
Busnois is remembered today for many of his chansons (French secular songs). Some of the tunes were used by later composers in their masses.

Chanson
music
"Chanson" is the French word for "song". The word is often used in music to mean any song with French words, but it is more often used when talking about songs in which lyrics have been set to music by French classical composers.
Very often "chansons" refers to the French songs that were sung in the late Middle Ages and Renaissance. People who sang these chansons were called "chansonniers". They had various forms, including ballade, rondeau and virelai. Some composers at the time liked to set popular poetry to music. The earliest chansons were for two, three or four voices, many of them being for three voices. By the 16th century most were for four voices. Sometimes, the singers were accompanied by instruments.
Early chansons.
The first important composer of chansons was the medieval composer Guillaume de Machaut. In the Renaissance Guillaume Dufay and Gilles Binchois wrote many simple chansons. Later Johannes Ockeghem and Josquin des Prez composed chansons which had lots of imitation between the voices. Clément Janequin wrote more simple, homophonic chansons. He worked in the area around Paris. Later composers such as Orlando de Lassus were influenced by the Italian madrigal. The style of music started to be used in music for instruments.
The first book of sheet music printed from movable type was "Harmonice Musices Odhecaton", a collection of 96 chansons by many composers, published in Venice in 1501.
Later chansons.
During the 16th century French songs started to be composed with lute or keyboard accompaniment. In the 19th century many composers wrote songs with piano accompaniment. These chansons were often called mélodies.
Popular Chanson.
In France today "chanson" often refers to the work of more popular singers such as Georges Brassens, Jacques Brel, Édith Piaf, Camille, Olivia Ruiz.

Steve Reich
music
Steve Reich (Born October 3, 1936) is an American composer of music in the style of minimalism. He is known for his music made with tape recordings, and instrumental music with a steady beat (Such as Music for 18 Musicians).

Corbin Bleu
music
"Corbin Bleu" (born 1989) is an American actor and singer. He appears as Chad in High School Musical and High School Musical 2. He was a guest star as one of Miley's friends, Johnny Collins, in Hannah Montana and as Spencer in Ned's Declassified School Survival Guide. He also works in Disney Channel's original movie, "Jump in" working with Keke Palmer (Akeelah and the Bee).

Orlande de Lassus
music
Orlande de Lassus (whose name is also spelt Orlandus Lassus, Orlando di Lasso, Roland de Lassus, or Roland Delattre) (born Mons, Hainaut, probably in 1532; died Munich, 14 June, 1594) was a Franco-Flemish composer who lived in the last part of the Renaissance. Lassus and Palestrina are the most two most famous composers of that time who were writing church music in a polyphonic style.
Life.
He was born in Mons in the province of Hainaut in the Low Countries which is mostly what is today the south part of the Netherlands and Belgium. We know very little about his childhood. There is a story that, when he was a choirboy, he was abducted three times by another church who wanted him to sing in their choir because he had a beautiful voice. There is no proof that this story is true.. At the age of twelve he left his country and went to Mantua, Sicily, and later to Milan in Italy and then to Naples where he worked until the early 1550s. Next he moved to Rome, where he worked for the Grand Duke of Tuscany, who had a large household there. In 1553, he became "maestro di cappella" of the Basilica di San Giovanni in Laterano in Rome. This was an excellent job for a man who was only 21 years old. However, he only stayed there a year. Later, in 1555, Palestrina took that job. Lassus left Rome to go home to the Low Countries to see his parents who were ill, but by the time he got home they were both dead.
We are not sure what he did between then and 1554. He may have gone to France and England. In 1555 he returned to the Low Countries and had some of his first works published in Antwerp. In 1556 he joined the court of Duke Albert V of Bavaria who was very keen on music and was trying to make music in his country as good as the music in Italy. Lassus was one of several Netherlanders to work there, and by far the most famous. He seems to have been happy in Munich and he stayed there. In 1558 he married the daughter of a maid of honour of the Duchess; they had two sons who both became composers. By 1563 Lassus had been made "maestro di cappella". He stayed there for the rest of his life, although several other kings and aristocrats offered him jobs in other places. He had many honours, including being knighted by the Pope.
In 1590 his health started to be bad. In 1594 his employer decided it was costing him too much to employ Lassus, so he wrote a letter to him to say that he was dismissed (that he no longer had a job). Lassus never saw the letter, because that very same day he died.
His music.
Lassus composed a lot of church music. He had to compose masses for the morning and evening services. Many of these are parody masses, which means they were based on tunes from other compositions. Others were influenced by composers from Venice.
He wrote many motets which were probably sung at services as well. In some of these motets he shows a sense of humour. For example, one of his motets makes fun about bad singers: the music stops and starts and stutters. It was a kind of musical joke. Sometimes he had to write music for special occasions. He had visited Italy several times and learned the Italian way of writing polyphonic music.
Lassus also wrote many songs in French (chansons) as well as German (Lieder). He also wrote madrigals. He even wrote drinking songs.
He never wrote anything that was strictly instrumental music.

Guillaume Dufay
music
Guillaume Dufay (pronounce "GHEE-oam Doo-FYE", sometimes spelt Du Fay) (born Beersel? 5 August 1397?; died Cambrai, 27 November 1474) was a Franco-Flemish composer and music theorist of the early Renaissance. He was the most important composer of his time. He belonged to the group of composers known as the Burgundian School. He had more influence on music in Europe than any other composer of the 15th century.
Life.
From what it says in his will it seems likely that he was born in Beersel which is near Brussels in what, today, is Belgium. He was the illegitimate child of an unknown priest and a woman called Marie Du Fayt. When he was small, Dufay moved with his mother to Cambrai where they stayed with a relative who was a canon of the cathedral there. Dufay soon showed musical talent, and he was given a musical education at the cathedral. He sang in the choir there. When he was only 16 he was given a benefice as chaplain near Cambrai. He travelled to Konstanz for a meeting.
From November 1418 to 1420 he was a subdeacon at Cambrai Cathedral. In 1420 he left Cambrai again, and worked in Rimini in Italy at the house of a rich family. In 1424 he returned to Cambrai because the relative in whose house his mother was staying was ill. After the relative died he went back to Italy. He worked in Bologna for a Cardinal. He became a deacon and then a priest.
When the Cardinal was made to leave Bologna in 1428 Dufay went to Rome to work for the pope. He became a member of the Papal Choir. In 1434 he was made "maistre de chappelle" in Savoy. He seems to have left Rome when the papal choir had money problems. Yet in 1435 he was again in the service of the papal chapel, but this time it was in Florence. In 1436 Dufay composed the festive motet "Nuper rosarum flores", one of his most famous compositions, which was sung at the dedication of Brunelleschi's dome of the cathedral in Florence.
During this period Dufay also began his long association with the d'Este family in Ferrara, some of the most important musical patrons of the Renaissance. He may have got to know them during his first stay in Italy. Rimini was not far from Ferrara, and he spent time in both towns where he got financial support.
At this time the arguments between the Pope and the Council of Basel continued. Dufay thought he might find himself without a job, so he went back to Cambrai. In order to be a canon at Cambrai, he needed a law degree, which he got in 1437; he may have studied at Turin University in 1436. One of the first documents mentioning him in Cambrai is dated December 27, 1440, when he was given 36 lots of wine for the feast of St. John the Evangelist. We do not know how long he took to drink it.
Dufay stayed in Cambrai during the 1440s. At the same time he was also in the service of the Duke of Burgundy. While in Cambrai he worked with Nicolas Grenon on completely renewing the cathedral collection of music. This meant that he had to write a big collection of polyphonic music for services. He also worked in the administration of the cathedral. In 1444 his mother died, and was buried in the cathedral; and in 1445 Dufay moved into the house of the person who had been canon just before. He kept this home for the rest of his life, although he did spend six more years in Italy where he wrote many of his compositions. When he returned again to Cambrai he was made canon of the cathedral. He was the most famous composer in Europe by that time. He often composed music for the court of Burgundy, and he met many younger composers who were becoming famous, such as Busnois, Ockeghem, Tinctoris, and Loyset Compère. During this period Dufay probably wrote his mass based on the song "L'homme armé", as well as the chanson based on the same song. Maybe he wrote this when Philip the Good called for a new crusade against the Turks, who had recently captured Constantinople. He also wrote a Requiem mass around 1460, which is lost.
After an illness of several weeks, Dufay died on November 27, 1474. He had asked for his motet "Ave regina celorum" to be sung for him as he died, with pleas for mercy to be read between some of the movements, but there was not enough time for this to be arranged, so it was sung at his funeral instead. Dufay was buried in the chapel of St. Etienne in the cathedral of Cambrai; his portrait was carved onto his tombstone. In later years the cathedral was destroyed, and the tombstone was lost, but it was found in 1859 (it was being used to cover a well), and is now in a museum in Lille.
Music and influence.
Dufay’s music was performed all over Europe. People who wanted to perform his music had to write it out by hand. There was no music printing in those days.
Dufay wrote church music including masses, motets, Magnificats, hymns, simple chant settings and antiphons. His secular (non-religious) music includes rondeaux, ballades, virelais and a few other kinds of chanson. His style of composition laid the foundation for the next generations of Renaissance composers. Some of his techniques were old-fashioned. He used isorhythms in his motets, which had been popular in medieval music. He used a way of harmonizing chants which became known as fauxbourdon. He was popular because he was skilled at writing melodies which were beautiful to sing.

Earl Hooker
music
Earl Hooker (born January 15, 1929 in Clarksdale, Mississippi; died April 21, 1970 in Chicago, Illinois) was an American blues guitarist.
Early life.
Earl Hooker was born Earl Zebedee Hooker in Clarksdale, Mississippi. He taught himself to play guitar around the age of 10 and began going to the Lyon & Healy Music School in 1941 soon after.
Teen life.
While a teen, Hooker played on Chicago street corners, sometimes with Bo Diddley. He also became friends with slide guitarist Robert Nighthawk, which led to Hooker playing slide guitar and some performances with Nighthawk's group outside of Chicago.
First band.
In 1949, Hooker moved to Memphis, joined Ike Turner's band, and played in the South.
Hooker made his first recordings mainly 78 rpm and 45 rpm records in 1952 and 1953 for small labels Rockin', King, and Sun. Hooker spent most of the '60s playing in Chicago clubs with his band.
First album.
In 1969 he recorded an album, "Hooker 'n Steve", with organist Steve “Mr. Blues” Miller for Arhoolie Records. Hooker also played slide guitar on the 1962 Muddy Waters recording "You Shook Me". The 1970 album "Sweet Black Angel", co-producer Ike Turner contain songs "I Feel Good", "Drivin' Wheel", "Country and Western", "Boogie", Don't Blot! "Shuffle", "Catfish Blues", "Crosscut Saw", "Sweet Home Chicago", "Mood", and "Funky Blues".
Death.
Earl Hooker died at the age of 41 from tuberculosis. He is buried in the Restvale Cemetery in Alsip, Illinois. His story was told in a 2001 book by author Sebastian Danchin titled "Earl Hooker, Blues Master".

Joschka Fischer
politics
Joseph Martin "Joschka" Fischer (born April 12 1948) was German foreign minister and Vice Chancellor in the government of Gerhard Schröder from 1998 to 2005. He was a leading figure in the German Green Party and according to opinion polls, he was the most popular politician in Germany for most of the government's duration. He left office on 22 November, 2005.
Early life.
Fischer was born in Gerabronn in Baden-Württemberg. His parents were Germans from Hungary. His nickname Joschka is from "Jóska", which is the Hungarian nickname for Joseph (). Fischer dropped out of high school in 1965, and started working for a photographer which he quit in 1966.
In 1967 he became active in the German student movement and Left-wing politics. Working in a left-wing bookstore in Frankfurt was when he started going to leftist university events as a guest student. He studied the works of Marx, Mao and Hegel and became a member of the militant group "Revolutionary Combat" ().
Fischer took part in some street battles when the anarchist "Putzgruppe" attacked the police and hurt some officers a lot. (In German the word "Putz" can mean a cleaner, but in "Putz-group" it is an acronym. That means the letters stand for other words. "Proletarische Union für Terror und Z'"erstörung", i.e. "The Workers Union for Terror and Destruction"). Photos of one battle in March 1973 show Fischer clubbing policeman Rainer Marx.
In the German Autumn () of 1977, there were a lot of terrorist attacks by the Red Army Faction (RAF). Fischer says that these attacks, especially the kidnapping and murder of Hanns-Martin Schleyer, made him give up violence as a way to get political change.
Instead, he became involved in the new social movements and later in the newly-founded German Green Party, mainly in the state of Hesse.
In May 1981 the Minister of Economics of the state of Hesse, Heinz-Herbert Karry, was murdered. The gun that killed the minister was stolen from an American army base in 1973, and Fischer's car was used in the robbery.
As Foreign Minister, Fischer apologised for the violence of his "Putzgruppe" days,
Green politician.
From 1983 to 1985, Fischer was a member of the Bundestag for the Green party. In 1985, he became Minister for the Environment in Hesse in the first Social Democrat-Green coalition (1985-1987). Fischer caused a stir when he arrived to take his oath of office ceremony wearing trainers. These trainers are now on display in a museum in Bonn.
Fischer was again Environment Minister in Hessen from 1991 to 1994, and, later on, became co-chairman of the Greens parliamentary party in the Bundestag. During his years in opposition, Fischer was respected for his speeches. For a large part of the 1990s, with the SPD was not very popular, and Fischers friends often called him "real" Leader of the Opposition.
Foreign Minister.
In September 1998 the Social Democrats, led by Gerhard Schröder, beat the Christian Democrat government of Helmut Kohl. With the SPD's 42% and the Greens' 7%, a coalition government could be formed. After several weeks of talks between Social Democrats and Greens, the new government took power on 27 October 1998. Fischer became Minister of Foreign Affairs.
In 1999 Fischer supported German participation in the Kosovo War. This was very extremely controversial within the largely pacifist Green Party, because it meant that, for the first time since World War II, German soldiers would actively go into combat. He justified this war with allegations that Serbia was planning to commit genocide against the Kosovo Albanians.
Fischer was also in favour of stationing German troops in Afghanistan, but he advised Schröder not to join the war in Iraq. He is known as a good friend of Kofi Annan. By 2005 he was the second longest-serving foreign minister in German postwar history (after Hans-Dietrich Genscher).
In 2005 Fischer was accused by critics of carelessly relaxing controls on visa regulations for Ukraine, thus allowing many illegal immigrants to enter Germany with fake identities. A parliamentary committee was established to examine the case, and unlike in other such committee hearings, Fischer's statement (and that of other top officials) was shown live on public TV. Fischer's appearance before the committee took twelve hours. (See German Visa Affair 2005).
After the defeat of the coalition government in the 2005 election, Fischer announced that he would retire to the backbench. "After 20 years of power, now I want my freedom back", he was quoted as saying. On 13 October 2005, it was announced that Frank-Walter Steinmeier (SPD) would succeed Fischer as Foreign Minister.
Life after politics.
Since the beginning of September 2006 Joschka Fischer has been a senior fellow at the Liechtenstein Institute on Self-Determination at Princeton University, a visiting professor at Woodrow Wilson School of Public and International Affairs at Princeton University. He has also spoken at other American universities, notably Brandeis University, on various topic in foreign affairs and international relations.
Private life.
Fischer has often been the most popular German politician, even among supporters of other parties. T
Until 1996, Fischer had been an outspoken lover of good wines and food. He often bet cases of expensive wine with other politicians on the outcome of elections. Fischer had also been overweight. Within a short time he lose a lot of weight. Fischer said that this was due to his giving up alcohol completely and changing his diet. He had also been doing fitness training and even running marathons. He cashed in on his weight loss by writing the book "My long race towards myself" about his experience, which became an immediate bestseller. Recently he has been putting on weight again.
Fischer has been married five times: his first four marriages, to Edeltraud Fischer (1967-1984), Inge Vogel (1984-1987), Claudia Bohm (1987-1999), and Nicola Leske (1999-2003), all ended in divorce. In October 2005 he married (in Rome) Minu Barati, who was his common-law wife for 2 years. With Inge, his second wife, he has two children: David and Lara. In April 2005 Fischer became a grandfather for the first time.
Further reading.
The following sources reflect the views of U.S. adversaries of Fischer and his policies, especially Germany's decision not to participate in the 2003 U.S.-led invasion of Iraq.
Other websites.
Joschka Fischer writes a monthly commentary series, "The Rebel Realist", for Project Syndicate, a non-profit association of newspapers around the world.

Mike Dirnt
music
Mike Dirnt (born Michael Ryan Pritchard on May 4, 1972, in Rodeo, California) is the bass guitar player from the punk rock band Green Day, he also sings back up vocals.
Personal life.
Mike was adopted. His adoptive parents divorced when he was 7, and both are now remarried. Mike owns a restaurant in California called "Rudy's Can't Fail". Mike married his long time girlfriend Anastasia in 1996 and their daughter, Estella-Desiree was born in April 1997. Mike loves his daughter very much, and his nickname for her is "Hero". Today, Mike and Anastasia are separated, but still remain very good friends. He recently was remarried in 2004, however his wife left him because he spending too much time in the studio recording American Idiot. Mike is currently dating, and he resides in Oakland, California.

Suharto
politics
Suharto (February 20, 1921 - January 27, 2008) was an Indonesian military and political leader. He was a military officer in the Indonesian National Revolution. He is better known as the second President of Indonesia. He held the office for a long time, from 1967 to 1998.
Suharto seized power from his predecessor, the first president of Indonesia Sukarno. For this, he used some force, but also took some political maneuvers. At the time, there was instability and unrest inside and outside of Indonesia. This helped him come to power. He took three decades to change the regime to work along militarist lines, with a strong central government. His movement was known as "Orde Baru". As he took an anti-communist position which he could defend, several Western governments supported him both in economic and political matters. This was during an era that is known as Cold War. For most of his three-decade rule, Indonesia experienced significant economic growth and industrialization. His rule, however, led to political purges and the deaths of millions of suspected Indonesian communists and Chinese-Indonesians. He also made some laws against communist parties and ethnic Chinese.
His New Order administration's authoritarian and increasingly corrupt practices led to much discontent in the 1990s. Suharto's almost unquestioned authority over Indonesian affairs slipped dramatically when the Asian financial crisis lowered Indonesians' standard of living. People inside the military and other institutions no longer supported him. There were some problems inside the country during the early 1990s. Suharto became more and more isolated, in a political way. After mass demonstrations in 1998, Suharto was forced to resign. Suharto had been the face of Indonesia for over 30 years. After retiring, he lived in seclusion. There were people who wanted to try him for genocide. This failed however, because he had a very bad health. His legacy remains hotly debated and contested both in Indonesia and abroad.
Like many Javanese, Suharto has only one name. In contexts where his religion is being discussed he is sometimes called Haji or el-Haj Mohammed Suharto, but this Islamic title is not part of his formal name or generally used. The spelling "Suharto" has been official in Indonesia since 1947 but the older spelling Soeharto is still frequently used.

Mika Pohjola
music
Mika Pohjola (December 1, 1971 Helsinki, Finland –) is a jazz pianist and composer. He lives in New York City.
Biography.
Mika Pohjola lived in Vantaa, Finland, outside Helsinki until 1987. He started studying piano and music theory with his father, Heikki Pohjola in 1979. In 1982, he started singing in the Helsinki cathedral boy choir, Cantores Minores. He then studied classical piano, music theory and counterpoint at the Vantaa Music Institute. After completing his classical studies, Pohjola moved to Stockholm, Sweden to study jazz music. He met Alvaro Is Rojas while studying at the Södra Latin Gymnasium. Is Rojas taught him piano improvisation and jazz ear-training for five years. Pohjola received a Master's Degree in Jazz Education at the Royal Swedish College of Music in 1992.
Encouraged by Alvaro Is Rojas, Pohjola moved to Boston, Massachusetts to study at Berklee College of Music. His teachers included Herb Pomeroy, Gary Burton, Phil Wilson, Ed Bedner and Hal Crook. Pohjola also met many new music collaborators, such as Johanna Grüssner, Matt Penman, Roberto Dani, Fernando Huergo, Sophie Dunér and Yusuke Yamamoto. Pohjola graduated from Berklee with honors in 1994. That same year he recorded his first album, "Myths and Beliefs" (GM Recordings) produced by Gunther Schuller.
In 1995, Pohjola moved to New York City and became a part of the downtown jazz scene. He briefly studied with pianist Sal Mosca. Pohjola performed at New York clubs such as the Blue Note, Birdland, the Five Spot, Smalls, The Jazz Standard and Visiones. His many bands featured saxophonists Chris Cheek, Mark Turner and Miguel Zenón, guitarist Ben Monder, bassists Matt Penman, Johannes Weidenmüller and Fernando Huergo, drummers Roberto Dani, Marlon Browden, Darren Beckett, Matt Wilson and Mark Ferber. In the 1990s, Pohjola often toured Europe, and performed in his native Finland, Sweden, Denmark, The United Kingdom, Germany and Italy. Pohjola was also invited to play in Ukraine in 1999, 2001 and 2002. In 2002 to 2005 Pohjola spent much time in his own recording studio, documenting ambitious arrangements of Scandinavian traditional and popular music. He released the catalogue of the original Moomin music on "Moomin Voices" (2003 in Swedish; 2005 in Finnish). His main collaborators included vocalists Theo Bleckmann, Rigmor Gustafsson, Lisa Werlinder, Sanni Orasmaa and Eeppi Ursin; and instrumentalists Alan Ferber, David Ambrosio, Christof Knoche, Laura Arpiainen and Ayumi Takeshima. He also recorded Scandinavian Christmas music on "Scandinavian Yuletide Voices" (2005), and a tribute to the Finnish legendary tango composer, Toivo Kärki on the album, "Leivonen lumimyrskyssä (A Lark in a Snowstorm)" (2006).
Pohjola has since 1995 been a jazz piano principal at the Nilsiä Music Camp in Finland. Additionally, he has been a guest lecturer at many conservatories in Scandinavia. In 2006 Pohjola was invited as a lecturer to Berklee College of Music as a major visiting artist.
Pohjola plays chacarera and jazz compositions with Argentinean bassist and composer Fernando Huergo. Pohjola also leads several groups in Finland, such as the popular Moomin Voices (in Finnish Muumilauluja-bändi) which often performs at children's events and festivals.

Gilles Binchois
music
Gilles Binchois (probably born in Mons about 1400; died Soignies, 20 September,1460), was a Franco-Flemish composer. His name is spelt in various ways: “Binchoys”, “Binch” or “Binche” or “Gilles de Bins”. He is one of the earliest composers of the group known as the Burgundian School. His style of composition had a very important influence on music at the Burgundian court. Together with Guillaume Dufay and John Dunstaple he belongs to the greatest of 15th century composers.
Life.
He was probably born in Mons in what is now Belgium. His father, a councillor to Duke Guillaume IV of Hainault, had a job in a church in Mons. Nothing is known about Gilles until 1419, when he became organist at the church of Ste. Waudru in Mons. In 1423 went to live in Lille. He may have worked as a soldier.
Sometime near the end of the 1420s he joined the court chapel of Burgundy. He sang with the choir there. He spent many years working at the Burgundian court. He was not allowed much time to be away, so he did not travel much. We know that he went to Mons in 1449 on which occasion he met Guillaume Dufay. When he retired he went to live in Soignes. He had a good pension.
Music and influence.
Binchois wrote beautiful melodies which were much simpler than a lot of the music of the Middle Ages. They are easy to sing and remember. Many later composers used melodies by Binchois as a basis for their own masses. Most of his secular songs are rondeaux, which became the most common song form during the century. Binchois did not often write in strophic form. He preferred to write music which did not follow the rhyming rhythm of the verse.

John Dunstaple
music
John Dunstaple or Dunstable (born about 1390; died 24 December 1453) was an English composer who lived in the last part of the medieval era and the early part of the Renaissance. He was one of the most famous composers in the early 15th century. He had a lot of influence on music in England as well as on the continent. He helped to develop the style of the Burgundian School.
The spelling "Dunstaple" is more often used today because in documents from his time this is the spelling that is more common, although some documents spelt his name "Dunstable".
Life.
Dunstaple was probably born in Dunstable, Bedfordshire around 1390. We know very little about his life. He was well educated and he worked for the Duke of Bedford who was the fourth son of Henry IV and brother of Henry V. He may have spent some time in France because the duke was Regent of France from 1423 to 1429, and then Governor of Normandy from 1429 to his death in 1435. Dunstaple owned property in Normandy, and also in Cambridgeshire, Essex and London, according to tax records of 1436. He also worked for the Duke of Gloucester.
Many composers at that time were priests, but Dunstaple was not, although he had connections with St Albans Abbey. He was probably married.
During his life he was not just known as a composer but also as an astronomer, astrologer, and mathematician.
He died on Christmas Eve 1453, and was buried in the church of St Stephen Walbrook in London which was later destroyed in the Great Fire of 1666.
Music and influence.
We hardly have any original manuscripts of Dunstaple’s music. England was a very musical country at the time, but almost all that music was destroyed between 1536 and 1540 during the Dissolution of the Monasteries when Henry VIII was ruling. Most of Dunstaple’s works which survive were works which were found on the continent, mostly in north Italy. This shows that he must have been famous throughout Europe. He influenced Dufay and Binchois. The Flemish composer and music theorist Tinctoris wrote in 1476 that he was the most important musician of new music which had started in England.
Dunstaple was one of the first to compose masses using one melody as "cantus firmus." He wrote many carols, but we do not know which ones are by him because he did not sign his name to them. He wrote secular music, but it has been lost.

John Maynard Keynes
politics
John Maynard Keynes, 1st Baron Keynes, CB (5 June 1883–21 April 1946) was a British economist whose ideas, called Keynesian economics, had a big impact on modern economic and political theory as well as on many governments' tax and economic policies. He said governments should use tax and banking measures to stop the effects of economic recessions, depressions and booms. He is one of the fathers of modern theoretical macroeconomics.
Personal and marital life.
Born at 7 Melville Road, Cambridge, John Maynard Keynes was the son of John Neville Keynes, an economics lecturer at Cambridge University, and Florence Ada Brown, a successful author and a social reformer. His younger brother Geoffrey Keynes (1887–1982) was a surgeon and bibliophile and his younger sister Margaret (1890–1974) married the Nobel-prize-winning physiologist Archibald Hill.
Keynes' early romantic and sexual relationships were almost all with men. One of his great loves was the artist Duncan Grant, whom he met in 1908, and he was also involved with the writer Lytton Strachey. Keynes appeared to turn away from homosexual relationships around the time of the first World War. In 1918, he met Lydia Lopokova, a well-known Russian ballerina, and they married in 1925.
Keynes was a successful investor, building up a big fortune. He nearly lost all of his money after the Stock Market Crash of 1929, but he soon got back his fortune. He enjoyed collecting books: for example, he collected and protected many of Isaac Newton's papers.
Bertrand Russell said Keynes was the most intelligent person he had ever known, commenting, "Every time I argued with Keynes, I felt that I took my life in my hands, and I seldom emerged without feeling something of a fool."
Keynes went to King’s College, Cambridge, in 1902, to study mathematics, but moved to economics, which he studied at Cambridge under A.C. Pigou and Alfred Marshall. Marshall is believed to have prompted Keynes's shift in interest from mathematics and classics to economics. Keynes received his B.A. in 1905 and his M.A. in 1908
Career.
Keynes accepted a lectureship at Cambridge in economics funded personally by Alfred Marshall. Soon he was appointed to the Royal Commission on Indian Currency and Finance, where he was able to put economic theory into practice.
During World War I he worked for the Adviser to the Chancellor of the Exchequer and to the Treasury on Financial and Economic Questions.
Keynes also attended the Conference on the Versailles Treaty to end World War I. He wrote "The Economic Consequences of the Peace" in 1919, and "A Revision of the Treaty" in 1922. In his books he said that the reparations which Germany was being made to pay would ruin the German economy and would lead to further fighting in Europe. These predictions were shown to be true when the German economy suffered in the hyperinflation of 1923. Only a fraction of reparations were ever paid.
Keynes's "magnum opus" (latin for "Great Work", meaning his most famous book) was the "General Theory of Employment, Interest and Money", was published in 1936. The ideas in that book were very different from classical economics.
Historians agree that Keynes influenced U.S. president Roosevelt's New Deal, but disagree as to what extent. Spending more the government earned in taxes (called "deficit spending") was used in the New Deal from 1938. But the idea had been agreed to by President Herbert Hoover. Few senior economists in the U.S. agreed with Keynes in the 1930s. With time, however, his ideas became more widely accepted.
In 1942, Keynes was raised to the House of Lords as Baron Keynes, of Tilton in the County of Sussex, where he sat as a Liberal member.
During World War II, Keynes argued in "How to Pay for the War" that the war effort should be largely financed by higher taxation, rather than deficit spending, in order to avoid inflation.
Death.
Keynes died of myocardial infarction (heart attack) at his holiday home in Tilton, East Sussex. His heart problems were made worse by the strain of working on post-war international financial problems. He died soon after he arranged a guarantee of an Anglo-American loan to Great Britain. Keynes' father, John Neville Keynes (1852–1949) outlived his son by three years. Keynes's brother Sir Geoffrey Keynes (1887–1982) was a distinguished surgeon, scholar and bibliophile. His nephews include Richard Keynes (born 1919) a physiologist; and Quentin Keynes (1921–2003) an adventurer and bibliophile.

Charles-Marie Widor
music
Charles-Marie Widor (born Lyons, 21 February, 1844; died Paris, 12 March, 1937) was a French organist and composer. He was one of the greatest organists of his time and he had many pupils who learned a lot from him and became famous. Widor is best known for his organ works which he called “symphonies”. The "Toccata" from his "Symphony no 5" is one of the best known of all organ pieces, often played at the end of wedding ceremonies.

Marcel Dupré
music
Marcel Dupré (born Rouen, Normandy, 3 May 1886; died Meudon, Paris, 30 May 1971), was a French organist, composer, and teacher. He became famous all over the world for his organ playing, and he composed a lot of organ music, most of which is very difficult indeed to play.
Biography.
Marcel Dupré was born in Rouen (Normandy, France). His family were musical. His father Albert Dupré was organist at the gothic abbey of St Ouen in Rouen. The young Marcel was a child prodigy. He entered the Paris Conservatoire in 1904, where he studied the piano and organ. His organ teachers were the most famous organists in France: Alexandre Guilmant and Louis Vierne, and also Charles-Marie Widor who taught him how to compose. In 1914, Dupré won the Grand Prix de Rome for his cantata, "Psyché". However, he did not have to spend time in Rome because he had already composed so much music. In 1926, he became professor of organ performance and improvisation at the Paris Conservatoire, and stayed in that job until 1954.
Dupré became famous for performing more than 2,000 organ recitals in Europe, the United States, Canada and Australia. In 1920 he gave a series of concerts in the Paris Conservatoire in which he played all the organ works by Johann Sebastian Bach from memory. He soon became world famous.
In 1934 Charles-Marie Widor retired as organist at St. Sulpice in Paris, and Dupré took over the job, which he kept until his death in 1971.
From 1947-1954, he was director of the American Conservatory, which was in the Louis XV wing of the Château de Fontainebleau near Paris. In 1954, Dupré took over from Claude Delvincourt as director of the Paris Conservatoire, where he stayed until 1956. He died in 1971 in Meudon (near Paris) at the age of 85.
His playing.
When Dupré gave organ recitals he often played his own compositions as well as those of other composers, especially Bach. Like Widor and Vierne he composed some long works in several movements which he called “Symphonies” (the French spelling of “symphony”). When he played in church services he played in a more serious style. He would start by playing composed music which was suitable for the time of year. Then he would improvise, playing complicated fugues, trio sonatas and chorale improvisations. He was so good at improvising that many people thought he had composed the music beforehand.
When playing in concerts he was often given a tune, and then he would immediately make up a whole “symphonie” from that tune. In 1906, when he was still a student, he played for a wedding and two services when the famous Widor was going to be absent. Dupré asked Widor what music he should play. Widor told him to improvise something. Dupré waited for Widor to go out of the church before he started practising, but Widor crept back in and listened to him. He realized that Dupré would manage very well.
His teaching.
Dupré was famous as an organ teacher. He taught two generations of well-known organists including Jehan Alain, Marie-Claire Alain, Pierre Cochereau, Jeanne Demessieux,Jean Guillou, Jean Langlais, and Olivier Messiaen.
His compositions.
Dupré composed a large amount of organ music. When he was a boy he got to know Aristide Cavaillé-Coll, the most famous organ builder in France. Cavaillé-Coll had built the organ that Dupré’s father played, so he was used to the sound of modern French organs. Most of Dupré's music for the organ is difficult to play. Some of his best-known organ music was written early in his life. These include the "Three Preludes and Fugues", Op. 7 (1914). Even the famous Widor thought that the Prelude of the third piece was impossible to play. However, Dupré could play it, and many organists after him learned to play it, too.
Some other very famous works of his include the "Symphonie-Passion", the "Esquisses" and "Évocation", and the "Cortège et Litanie".
As well as composing lots of music, Dupré prepared study editions of the organ works of Bach, Handel, Mozart, Liszt, Mendelssohn, Schumann, César Franck, and Alexander Glazunov. He also wrote music for people who were learning to play the organ, and books on how to improvise on the organ.
References.
“Marcel Dupré at Saint-Sulpice” – Gerard Brooks: Organist’s Review Aug 1986 p.161-166

Paul Hindemith
music
Paul Hindemith (pronounce: POWL HIN-de-mit), (born Hanau nr. Frankfurt am Main, 16 November 1895; died Frankfurt am Main, 28 December 1963) was a German composer, violist, teacher, music theorist and conductor. He was the most important and influential German composer during the years between the two World Wars. His style was influenced by Schoenberg and Expressionism, and gradually it became more neo-classical. He was also famous as a viola player and composed a concerto for viola and orchestra.

Louis Vierne
music
Louis Vierne (born Poitiers, 8 October 1870; died Paris, 2 June 1937) was a famous French organist and composer. He was blind from birth. He wrote a lot of organ music, including six large works called symphonies, "24 Fantasy Pieces" (which includes his famous "Carillon de Westminster"), and "24 Pieces In Free Style", which can be played on the organ or harmonium.

Jehan Alain
music
Jehan Alain (born Saint-Germain-en-Laye, Paris, 3 February, 1911; died near Saumur, 20 June 1940) was a French organist and composer. He learned to play the organ at home on an organ that his father had built. In his short life he composed many works. His most famous organ pieces are "Trois Danses" (Three Dances) and a brilliant piece called "Litanies".
Alain was killed fighting in the World War II.
His youngest sister, Marie-Claire Alain, is an internationally-famous organist and has made several complete recordings of her brother's organ works.

Herbert Howells
music
Herbert Howells (born Lydney, Gloucestershire, 17 October 1892; died London, 23 February 1983) was an English composer, organist, and teacher. He wrote a lot of church music for the Anglican church, including several Service settings of the Magnificat and Nunc dimittis. He taught for many years at the Royal College of Music.
One of his best known works is the "Hymnus Paradisi", a large, sacred work for choir. His organ works include 2 sets of 3 "Psalm-Preludes" and a piece called "Master Tallis’s Testament".
He received many honours including CBE and CH

Sigfrid Karg-Elert
music
Sigfrid Karg-Elert (born Oberndorf am Neckar, 21 November 1877; died Leipzig, 9 April 1933) was a German composer. He wrote in a late Romantic style. He is mainly remembered for his music for organ and harmonium, his favourite instrument. He wrote a set of 66 Chorale improvisations for organ, the best known of which is called "Nun danket alle Gott" ("Now thank we all our God").

Louis-Claude Daquin
music
Louis-Claude Daquin (born Paris, 4 July 1694; died Paris 15 June 1772) was a French composer of Jewish birth. He was writing in the last part of the Baroque period and the early part of the Classical music period. He was a virtuoso organist and harpsichordist. He wrote a lot of excellent music for organ and for harpsichord. His most popular piece is called "Le Coucou" ("The Cuckoo").

John Bull (composer)
music
John Bull (born 1562 or 1563; died March 15, 1628) was an English composer, musician, and organ builder. He was famous for playing the harpsichord and organ. Most of his compositions were written for keyboard instruments. He became a Gentleman, and then organist, at the Chapel Royal. He was also known for getting into trouble for adultery. He went to Europe and may have worked as a spy. He died in Antwerp.
Together with Sweelinck and William Byrd he was one of the great composers of keyboard music in the early 17th century. Many of his works are in the collection called the "Fitzwilliam Virginal Book".

Tom Brosseau
music
Thomas Anderson "Tom" Brosseau (born November 3, 1976) is an American singer-songwriter and guitarist.
Life.
He was born and grew up in Grand Forks, North Dakota. His song "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground" was covered by Chris Thile, who released a 2006 album of the same name.
Right now, Brosseau is touring the United States playing his new album, "Cavalier".

Lara Veronin
music
Lara Veronin is a Russian-Taiwanese-American singer born on 2 May 1988. She is famous for being the lead vocalist of the C-Pop band Nan Quan Mama. The band's first album "Treasure Map" and second album "Nan Quan Mama, Version 2" both peaked at #4 on the Taiwanese Album Charts. She has also appeared as a featured voicalist on Jay Chou's sixth album "November's Chopin" on the track "Coral Sea".
Biography.
Veronin was born and raised in Monterey Park, California, America and moved to Taiwan in her teens. Her father is a Russian American, and her mother a Taiwanese. She speaks fluent English and Mandarin as shown in her songs, but says she is unable to speak Russian.
Reportedly, Veronin's talent was discovered when she met C-pop singer Jay Chou at a restaurant where she was working. He was interested in her voice and recruited her for his band, Nan Quan Mama. Her role as the lead singer of Nan Quan Mama gave her instant fame.
She gained greater recognition as her songs "靠近一點點 Kao Jin Yi Dian Dian" and "Say You Love Me" were chosen to be theme songs for It Started With A Kiss, a Chinese romantic comedy television series in 2005.
In 2006, Veronin was cast in the television series "Engagement for Love", co-starring Alex To and Ambrose Hsu.
As of now, Veronin is studying in college in Taipei while continuing her music career.
Style.
Her musical style is often disputed (argued about). This is because most of her songs when she performes solo are in the alternative or pop-rock genre, but when she performs as a vocalist in the band Nan Quan Mama, she often sings blues- and soul-influenced dance music.

Mwai Kibaki
politics
Mwai Kibaki (born November 15, 1931) is currently the president of Kenya. He is the first President of Kenya to belong to a party other than KANU. Since he became President he has done many good things. Kenya has seen economic growth spurts of up 6%. He however has had many complaints from people who think the changes that were needed are slow to come. Many Kenyans living in diaspora have began to return to Kenya as the promise of the future has created a plenty of high paying jobs that are appealing to foreign educated Kenyans.
In 2007, several people got angry at him. They thought that he changed the election results so that he would win. They started to destroy houses and property.

Socialist International
politics
The Socialist International is a worldwide group of social democratic and the labour political parties.
History.
Its name is from the Second International, which was formed in 1889 and dissolved on the eve of World War I in 1914.
Some of the Second International's most famous actions were its 1889 declaration of 1 May as International Labour Day and its 1910 declaration of 8 March as International Women's Day. The Second International was split by the outbreak of World War I. A small part carried on as the International Socialist Commission. The International re-formed in 1923 (as the Labour and Socialist International), and was re organised again, in its present form, after World War II. Many social democratic and socialist parties had been suppressed in Nazi-occupied Europe).
Since World War II, the SI helped social democratic parties to re-start themselves when dictatorship gave way to democracy in Portugal (1974) and Spain (1975).
Until its 1976 Geneva Congress, the Socialist International had few members outside Europe and no formal involvement with Latin America. In the 1980s, most SI parties gave their backing to the Nicaraguan Sandinistas (FSLN), whose left-wing government had incited hatred from the United States. Since then, the SI has admitted as member-parties not only the FSLN but also the centre-left Puerto Rican Independence Party, as well as the ex-Communist parties such as the Italian Democrats of the Left (Democratici di Sinistra (DS)) and the Front for the Liberation of Mozambique (FRELIMO).
The Party of European Socialists, a European political party active in the European Parliament, is an associated organisation of the Socialist International.
Presidents.
In 2006, George Papandreou, leader of the Panhellenic Socialist Movement, became the president of the Socialist International.

Lothar Bisky
politics
Lothar Bisky (born August 17, 1941 in Rummelsburg, Germany, now Miastko, Poland) was the chairman of the Left Party.PDS, a socialist political party with its base in the east of Germany. In June 2007 he became of the leaders of The Left, formed by a merger of Left Party.PDS and Labour and Social Justice – The Electoral Alternative.
As a child he was very poor, so when he was 18 he moved from northern West Germany to GDR. He was allowed to join the Socialist Unity Party in 1963, but did not became a leader of the party until just after the fall of communism and the old "hardliners" were throwm out of the party.
He was rector of the University of Film and Television (Potsdam-Babelsberg) from 1986 to 1990. In 1991 he became a member of the board of directors of regional television channel ORB (now part of RBB.)
In 1990 he was a member of the Volkskammer and since 1990 he has been a member of the state parliament in Brandenburg.
He was chairman of the PDS from 1993 until his resignation in 2000. He was re-elected chairman in 2003. Bisky is seen to be on the moderate, social democratic wing of the party and he is a long-time close ally of the party's most prominent figure, Gregor Gysi.
The party returned strongly to the Bundestag in the 2005 election. Bisky, one of 54 Left MPs, was going to become one of the six vice presidents of the Bundestag. When the new Bundestag met on October 18, however, he failed three times to be elected. Some MPs explained this with allegations (denied by Bisky) that he was an informant of the Stasi. Later, he failed a fourth time, and gave up his bid to be elected.
Lothar Bisky is married and the father of three sons. The oldest son, Jens Bisky, is a journalist and writer and the second-oldest, Norbert Bisky, is a painter.

Louis-Nicolas Clérambault
music
Louis-Nicolas Clérambault (born Paris, 19 December 1676; died Paris, 26 October 1749) was a French organist and composer.
Clérambault (pronounce “CLAY-ram-bow”) came from a musical family. He learned to play the violin and harpsichord when he was young, and also learned the organ, composition and singing. He became the organist at the church of the Grands-Augustins and then at Saint-Sulpice. He worked for Madame de Maintenon who arranged concerts for King Louis XIV. He also had a job at the royal house of Saint-Cyr, which was a school for young girls from the poor nobility. He directed the music there, played the organ and trained the choir.
Clérambault was the first important French composer of cantatas. They were often about Greek and Roman myths. He also composed for the organ, harpsichord and violin. He was thought of as France’s greatest organist. Two of his sons took over jobs held by their father after his death.

Samuel Wesley
music
Samuel Wesley (born Bristol, 24 February 1766; died London, 11 October 1837) was an English organist and composer
Samuel Wesley was the son of Methodist hymn-writer Charles Wesley, the grandson of the poet Samuel Wesley and the nephew of John Wesley, the founder of the Methodist church. His illegitimate son Samuel Sebastian Wesley was the greatest English composer of church music of the 19th century.
Samuel played the violin as well as the organ, and worked as a conductor as well as a music lecturer. He lived at a time when most English composers were writing sentimental music which was not very important. Wesley was one of the best composers of his time.

Samuel Sebastian Wesley
music
Samuel Sebastian Wesley (born London, 14 August 1810; died 19 April 1876) was an English organist and composer. He was the greatest English composer of church music of his day.
He was born in London, the illegitimate son of the composer Samuel Wesley and his partner Sarah Suter. After singing in the choir of the Chapel Royal as a boy, he, become organist of Hereford Cathedral in 1832. He moved to Exeter Cathedral three years later, and then had jobs at Leeds Parish Church, Winchester Cathedral and Gloucester Cathedral.
His music was almost all composed for the Church of England. He wrote many anthems, including "Thou wilt keep him in perfect peace", "Blessed be the God and Father", "The Wilderness" and "Ascribe unto the Lord". They are verse anthems (anthem which contrast sections for the full choir with sections for a few soloists).
The popular short anthem "Lead me Lord" is part of "Praise the Lord, O my soul".

Chris Fehn
music
Christopher Michael Fehn (born February 24, 1972) is an American musician and Percussionist for the band Slipknot. In Slipknot he is known as #3. He is the joker in Slipknot. He wears a Fetish type mask with a long Pinocchio style nose. He is a big fan of sports and a good Golfer.

Courtney Love
music
Courtney Michelle Love (born Courtney Michelle Harrison on July 9, 1964) is an American rock musician and Golden Globe-nominated actress. Love is best known as lead singer, songwriter and lyricist for the now-defunct alternative rock band Hole and for her two-year marriage to late Nirvana front man Kurt Cobain. "Rolling Stone" has called Love "the most controversial woman in the history of rock".

Earth Angel
music
Earth Angel is the name of a 1950s love song by the Penguins. It reached number 1 on the billboard charts in 1954.

John Lee Hooker
music
John Lee Hooker (August 22, 1917 – June 21, 2001) was an American blues singer, guitarist, and songwriter born in Coahoma County near Clarksdale, Mississippi.
Early life.
Hooker was born on August 22, 1917 in Coahoma County near Clarksdale, Mississippi.
Later life.
All through the 1930s, Hooker lived in Memphis where he worked on Beale Street and sometimes performed at house parties. In 1948, he started working at Ford Motor Company.
Career.
Hooker's early solo songs were recorded by Bernie Besman. John Lee Hooker rarely played on a standard beat, changing tempos to fit the songs. This made it nearly impossible to add backing tracks.
Pop culture.
Hooker appeared and sang in the 1980 movie "The Blues Brothers". He recorded over 100 albums.
In 1989, he played with Keith Richards, Carlos Santana and Bonnie Raitt to record "The Healer" and won a Grammy Award. Hooker recorded lots of songs with Van Morrison, including "Never Get Out of These Blues Alive", "The Healing Game" and "I Cover the Waterfront".
Death.
He fell ill just before a tour of Europe in 2001 and died soon afterwards at the age of 83. The last song Hooker recorded before his death, is "Ali D'Oro".

Son House
music
Eddie James "Son" House, Jr. (March 21, 1902 – October 19, 1988) was an American blues singer and guitarist.
Notes.
See http://bluesnet.hub.org/son.house/interview.html for further information relating to House's age.

Jan Pieterszoon Sweelinck
music
Jan Pieterszoon Sweelinck (born Deventer, Netherlands in 1562; died 16 October 1621) was a Dutch composer and organist. Sweelinck (pronounce: SVAY-link) lived at the end of the Renaissance and beginning of the Baroque periods. He was one of the greatest organists and composers of his day. He was the organist at the Oude Kerk (“Old Church”) in Amsterdam for 44 years. Many musicians travelled a long way to Amsterdam to hear him improvise at the organ. He composed music for the organ and harpsichord as well as vocal music.

Animal Planet
media
"Animal Planet" is a television channel that is mainly about human and animal relationships.

Sufjan Stevens
music
Sufjan Stevens () (born July 1, 1975) is an American singer-songwriter and musician from Petoskey, Michigan.
Some people think he is part of the folk revival in indie pop, but he gets ideas from many things. His music is similar to electronica and the minimalism of Steve Reich. Stevens says that he has plans to make a concept album for each of the 50 U.S. states. He began with "Michigan" (2003) and "Illinois" (2005).
Stevens was born in Detroit, Michigan, and grew up in Petoskey. He went to Harbor Light Christian School as well as the Interlochen Arts Academy. He also learned at Hope College in Holland, Michigan.
Sufjan is an Arabic name that famously belonged to Abu Sufyan, a man from early Islamic history. The name was given to Stevens by the person who founded Subud, a spiritual community. Stevens said in an interview, "It sounds like a> kind of grew up in this strange kind of cultish environment, and I don't mean that word in a demeaning way. I think we probably come from similar backgrounds. There's a little bit of that in my history."
Stevens is a multi-instrumentalist, a person who can play many musical instruments. He is well known for his use of the banjo, but also plays guitar, piano, drums, and several other instruments, often playing all of these on his albums by using multitrack recording. When he was school, he learned the oboe and English horn, which he also plays on his albums. He is one of the few musicians in pop music to use these instruments. A lot of instruments are played in unison to give his songs a "symphony-like" sound. Strings and horns are used very often in many of his songs.
Stevens lives in the Brooklyn parth of New York City in the neighborhood Kensington where he makes up the Asthmatic Kitty Records staff of the Brooklyn office. His brother Marzuki Stevens is a marathon runner.

Pretty. Odd.
music
"Pretty. Odd." is the second music album from the rock band Panic at the Disco. It is to be released on March 25, 2008.
Production and marketing.
Panic at the Disco began to creating their new album after their first album, "A Fever You Can't Sweat Out". While on tour for about two years, with they had no new songs to perform. In January 2007 the band went into "hibernation" in a cabin (just outside the strip), as they began writing new songs for the next six months hoping for a second album to be released during fall 2007. On July 7, 2007 they played the song "It's True Love" live during their first performance since going into writing. Later that night howeve, the band decided that they didn't like the music had written and scrapped all the songs they had written (which was about 3/4 of an album, as they were almost done recording).
A month later Panic announced two newly written songs, the first named "Middle of Summer" (later changed to "When the Day Met the Night"), and "Nine in the Afternoon". In December, a part of "Nine in the Afternoon" was played on an episode of the television show "Heroes". Panic then began viral marketing, building puzzles on their official website. For about two weeks the puzzle gave snippets from an unknown song, along with the caption "YOU DONT HAVE TO WORRY...". On January 1, 2008, the snippets finally were revealed to be part of a new song entitled "We're So Starving". A rough version of this song was then released for listening on their official MySpace page, but was later pulled with the release of "Nine in the Afternoon". A review from NME magazine was published on the internet with descriptions of each song. These reviews show the big different direction that Panic have taken with their new album.
The band announced the title of the new album, "Pretty. Odd.", through their website on January 9, and dropped the "!" from their band name at the same time. The band explained by saying "We've just traded the exclamation point for a few periods." They announced the next day that they would be headlining the Honda Civic Tour in support of the album. The band then began a second puzzle on January 17, challenging fans to find puzzle pieces scattered throughout Panic-related websites, in order to reveal the album cover. The cover was officially revealed on January 22. Four days later, a new scavenger hunt was hidden on the official site, showing the tracklist of the album and offering a prize to the first three people who could find all 15 song titles for the new album. This was completed later that day.
On January 28 the winners were revealed. That very same day, the band posted the final version of "Nine in the Afternoon" on their MySpace page. The band also revealed on their official site they were releasing a Deluxe Edition of "Pretty. Odd." along with a version with a different artwork.
iTunes made the Deluxe Edition and Standard Edition of the album available for pre-order on January 29, 2008.

Nine in the Afternoon
music
"Nine in the Afternoon" is the first single from the second album by Panic at the Disco, "Pretty. Odd." The music video was filmed on December 20 and December 21. It was the first song written after the band decided to erase several worth of an album they had been planning on releasing in the fall of 2007. Panic at the Disco's first performance of "Nine in the Afternoon" was at Virgin Festival 2007.

A Fever You Can't Sweat Out
music
"A Fever You Can't Sweat Out" is the first album made by the rock band, Panic at the Disco. It was released on September 27 2005 by Fueled by Ramen.
The album is split in two, with tracks 1 through 7 being played by electronic instruments such as synthesizers and drum machines and tracks 9 through 13 using traditional instruments such as the accordion and organ. Track 8 (Intermission) acts as a link between the two parts, starting with techno-style dance beats before switching to the piano. On the vinyl record version of the album, side A holds songs 1-8 while side B holds songs 9-13, further showing the split in the album.
The album mostly deals with social problems that the band shows on through various songs. Topics such as sanctity of marriage, adultery, alcoholism, prostitution, and religion are seen throughout the album. Guitarist Ryan Ross also relates two of the songs to living with an alcoholic father. The album has sold more than 1.6 million copies in the U.S. alone.

Brendon Urie
music
Brendon Boyd Urie (b. April 12, 1987 in Las Vegas, Nevada) is the lead singer of the rock band Panic at the Disco. He also plays keyboard, accordion, piano, organ, bass, guitar, cello and drums.

Ryan Ross
music
George Ryan Ross III (b. August 30, 1986 in Summerlin, Nevada) is the lead guitarist, song writer, and back-up vocalist for the rock band Panic at the Disco.

Brent Wilson
sports
Brent Wilson is the former bassist for the rock band, Panic at the Disco. He was replaced by, Jon Walker on May 17, 2006.

Mario Gómez
sports
Mario Gomez (born July 2, 1985) is a German footballer. His team is the VfB Stuttgart. Since 2007 he has played in the German national football team, he has played 13 matches and scored six goals.

Tim Borowski
sports
Tim Borowski (born May 2, 1980 in Neubrandenburg, Mecklenburg-Vorpommern, Germany) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is FC Bayern Munich. Befor his change in 2008 he has played for SV Werder Bremen. A member of the German national football team since 2002, he has played 33 matches and scored 2 goals.

Marcell Jansen
sports
Marcell Jansen (born November 4, 1985 in Mönchengladbach) is a German footballer. He plays for the FC Bayern Munich. For the German national football team, he has played in 26 matches and scored 1 goal.

Arne Friedrich
sports
Arne Friedrich (born May 29, 1979) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is Hertha BSC Berlin. In the German national football team he made 60 matches and no goals.

Oliver Neuville
sports
Oliver Neuville (born May 1, 1973) is a German footballer. At the moment he playes for Borussia Mönchengladbach. For the German national football team he has played 69 matches and scored 10 goals.

Thomas Hitzlsperger
sports
Thomas Hitzlsberger (born April 5, 1982) is a German footballer from the VfB Stuttgart. For the German national football team he played 37 matches and scored 5 goals.

Mike Hanke
sports
Mike Hanke (born November 5, 1983) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is Hannover 96. In the German national football team he made 12 matches and 1 goal.

Gerald Asamoah
sports
Gerald Asamoah (born October 5, 1978) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is FC Schalke 04. While playing for the German national football team, he made 43 matches and 6 goals.

Clemens Fritz
sports
Clemens Fritz (born December 7, 1980) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is SV Werder Bremen. While playing for the German national football team, he played in 18 matches and scored 2 goals.

Simon Rolfes
sports
Simon Rolfes (born January 21, 1982) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is Bayer 04 Leverkusen. In the german national football team he made 12 matches and no goals.

Paul Freier
sports
Paul Freier (born July 26, 1979) is a German footballer. He plays for Bayer 04 Leverkusen at the moment. In the German national football team he played nineteen matches and scored one goal.

Jan Schlaudraff
sports
Jan Schlaudraff (born July 18, 1983) is a German footballer. His team at the moment is FC Bayern Munich. He has played 3 matches for the German national football team but scored no goals.
In July 2008 he has moved to Hannover 96.

Alizée
music
Alizée Jacotey (born August 21, 1984) is a French singer. Born in Ajaccio, Corsica, she goes by the stage name Alizée — the feminine form of "alizé" meaning "trade wind". She was discovered by Mylène Farmer, following her winning performance in the talent show, "Graines de Star", in 1999. While working with Mylène Farmer and Laurent Boutonnat, Alizée came up with two albums — both of which were hits inside and outside of France.

Jim Root
music
James "Jim" Root (born October 7, 1971) is an American musician. He is the guitarist for both Slipknot and Stone Sour. In Slipknot he is named #4. he is the tallest member of the band at 6 foot 6. Jim wears a court jester's mask with a zip-up mouth. Over time he has sweated, snotted and puked in it so much that it makes everywhere it goes smell bad. Jim enjoys Fishing and playing Video games.

Oriana Fallaci
politics
Oriana Fallaci (29 June 1929 - 15 September 2006) was an Italian journalist, author, and political interviewer. A young partisan during World War II, she had a long and successful journalistic career. Knows
She has interviewed many internationally known leaders and celebrities such as the Dalai Lama, Henry Kissinger, the Shah of Iran, Ayatollah Khomeini, Willy Brandt, Zulfikar Ali Bhutto, Walter Cronkite, Omar Khadafi, Federico Fellini, Sammy Davis Jr, Nguyen Cao Ky, Yasir Arafat, Indira Gandhi, Alexandros Panagoulis, Archbishop Makarios III, Golda Meir, Nguyen Van Thieu, Haile Selassie and Sean Connery.
After retirement, she returned to writing a series of articles and books critical of Islam and Arabs and for few people the articles were speaking about racism and Islamophobia. Oriana Fallaci hated Mexicans and Muslims, for their ideas and for the role of the muslim women in Islamic society.
Life and career.
Fallaci was born in Florence, Italy. During World War II, she joined the resistance in the democratic armed group "Giustizia e Libertà". Her father Edoardo Fallaci, was a famous antifascist political activist, in Florence.
Fallaci began her journalistic career in her teens, becoming a special correspondent for the Italian paper "Il mattino dell'Italia centrale" in 1946. Since 1967 she worked as a war correspondent, in Vietnam, for the Indo-Pakistani War, in the Middle East and in South America. For many years, Fallaci was a special correspondent for the political magazine "L'Europeo" and wrote for a number of leading newspapers and "Epoca" magazine. During the 1968 Tlatelolco massacre prior to the 1968 Summer Olympics, Fallaci was shot three times, dragged down stairs by her hair, and left for dead by Mexican forces. The demonstrations by immigrants in the United States these past few months "disgust" her, especially when protesters displayed the Mexican flag. "I don't love the Mexicans," Fallaci said, invoking her nasty treatment at the hands of Mexican police in 1968. "If you hold a gun and say, 'Choose who is worse between the Muslims and the Mexicans,' I have a moment of hesitation. Then I choose the Muslims, because they have broken my balls."
In the late 1970s, she had an affair with the subject of one of her interviews, Alexandros Panagoulis, who was a big rebel in the Greek resistance against the 1967 dictatorship, having been captured, heavily tortured and imprisoned for his (unsuccessful) assassination attempt against dictator and ex-Colonel Georgios Papadopoulos. In 1972 she interviewed Henry Kissinger.
Fallaci has twice received the St. Vincent Prize for journalism, as well as the Bancarella Prize (1971) for "Nothing, and So Be It"; Viareggio Prize (1979), for "Un uomo: Romanzo"; and Prix Antibes, 1993, for "Inshallah". She received a D.Litt. from Columbia College (Chicago). She has lectured at the University of Chicago, Yale University, Harvard University, and Columbia University. Fallaci’s writings have been translated into 21 languages including English, Spanish, French, Dutch, German, Greek, Swedish, Polish, Croatian and Slovenian.
Fallaci, smoked always during her life, died on September 15, 2006 where she was born, in Florence, from breast cancer.

Solange Knowles
music
Solange Piaget Knowles-Smith (born Solange Piaget Knowles, 1986) is an American actress and younger sister of Beyonce Knowles. She is famous for acting in her sister's music video for B'Day and in '.
Life.
She married a man called Daniel Smith at age 17, birthing his child at 18 and then divorced
him. She now lives with her son and family. Her hometown is Houston, Texas. She also had a musical career started at age 14 and has been acting since 2003. She is now an entreupreneur promoting "Baby Jamz". She is of African American (from her father) and Louisiana Creole (from her mother) descent.

Ella Koon
music
Ella Koon, real name Ianna Koon, is a Chinese singer, actress and model. She was born in Tahiti, French Polynesia, and was raised in Hong Kong, where she is currently based.
She speaks Cantonese, English, French and Mandarin languages.
Early career.
After finishing high school in Birmingham, England, she began her career as a model in 2000. She debuted into the film industry in the romance movie "I Do".
Later career.
In 2004, she started her singing career and released her debut "Original (album)". In early 2005, She participated in the TVB show "Hotel Situation". Her second album "Ellacadabra" was released in late 2005. In mid-2005, Koon starred in the TVB's series "Revolving Doors of Vengeance (酒店風雲)", making her a well-known actress as well. She also starred in "Survivor's Law II" in 2007.

Langston Hughes
media
Langston Hughes (1902 – May 22, 1967) was a famous American poet, novelist, playwright and short story writer. Hughes was one of the writers and artists whose work was called the Harlem Renaissance.
Hughes grew up as a poor boy from Missouri, the descendant of African people who had been taken to America as slaves. At that time, the term used for African-Americans was "Negro" which means a person with black skin. Most "Negroes" did not remember or think about their link with the people of Africa, even though it was a big influence on their culture and, in particular, their music. Hughes was unusual for his time, because he went back to West Africa to understand more about his own culture. Through his poetry, plays and stories, Hughes helped other black Americans to see themselves as part of a much bigger group of people, so that now the term "African-American" is used with pride.
Hughes became a famous writer, but all his life he remembered how he started out, and he helped and encouraged many other struggling writers.
Childhood.
Langston Hughes was born on February 1, 1902 in Joplin, Missouri. His parents were James Nathaniel Hughes and Carrie Langston Hughes who was a teacher. Langston's father, James Hughes, was so upset about the racism towards African-Americans that he left his family and moved to Mexico. Young Langston was cared for by his grandmother, in Lawrence, Kansas while his mother worked to support the family. Langston's Grandmother was a great story teller. She told stories that made him feel proud to be an African-American.
After his grandmother died Hughes went to live with some family friends for a time, and then, as a teenager went to live in Lincoln, Illinois, with his mother, who had remarrried. He was often left alone because his mom was at work. Even though his childhood was difficult and had lots of changes, he was able to use these things in the poetry that he started to write while he was at school. He never forgot the stories of his grandmother and tried to help other African-Americans when they were having problems. These were the people that he later wrote about in his own stories.
When Hughes went to school in Lincoln, there were only two African-American children in the class. The teacher talked to them about poetry. She said that what a poem needed most was rhythm. Langston later said that he had rhythm in his blood because, "as everyone knows", "all" African-Americans have rhythm. The children made him the "class poet".
At high school in Cleveland, Ohio, Langston learned to love reading. He loved the poetry of the American poets Paul Laurence Dunbar and Carl Sandburg. He wrote articles for the school newspaper, he edited the school yearbook and he wrote his first short stories and plays.
Hughes' father and Columbia University.
When Langston Hughes was 17 he went to spend some time with his father in Mexico. He was so unhappy while he was there that he thought about committing suicide. Hughes could not understand how his father felt. He said: "I had been thinking about my father and his strange dislike of his own people. I didn't understand it, because I was a Negro, and I liked Negroes very much!"
When he finished high school in Lincoln in 1920, he went back to Mexico, to ask his father to pay for him to go to university. Hughes' father was a lawyer and a wealthy landowner. He could afford to send his son to university but he made difficulties about it. He said that Hughes could only go to university if he went overseas and studied engineering. Hughes wanted to go to university in the US. After a time, they made an agreement that he should go to Columbia University but study engineering, not an arts degree. He went to Columbia in 1921 but left in 1922, partly because of the racism in the university.
Adult life.
Until 1926 Hughes did many different types of work. In 1923 he went as a crewman on the ship "S.S.Malone" and went to West Africa and Europe. He left the ship and stayed for a short time in Paris where he joined several other African-Americans who were living there. In November 1924, Hughes returned to the U.S. to live with his mother in Washington, D.C.. In 1925 he got a job as an assistant to Carter G. Woodson who worked with the "Association for the Study of African American Life and History". Hughes didn't enjoy his work because he didn't have enough time to write, so he left and got a job as a "busboy", wiping tables and washing dishes at a hotel. Hughes is sometimes called "The Busboy Poet". Meanwhile, some of his poems were published in magazines and were being collected together for his first book of poetry. While he was working at the hotel he met the poet Vachel Lindsay, who helped to make Hughes known as a new African-American poet.
In 1926 Hughes began studying at Lincoln University, Pennsylvania. He had help from patrons, Amy Spingarn, who gave him $300 and "Godmother" Charlotte Osgood Mason. Hughes graduated with a Bachelor of Arts in 1929 and became a Doctor of Letters in 1943. He was also given an honorary doctorate by Howard University. For the rest of his life, except when he travelled to the Caribbean or West Indies, Hughes lived in Harlem, New York.
Langston Hughes sometimes went out with women, but he never married. People who have studied his life and poetry are sure that he was homosexual. In the 1930s it was harder to be open about being gay than it is nowadays. His poetry has lots of symbols which are used by other homosexual writers. Hughes thought that men who had very dark skin were particularly beautiful. It seems from his poetry that he was in love with an African-American man. He also wrote a story which might tell of his own experience. "Blessed Assurance" is the story of a father's anger because his son is "queer" and acts like a girl.
Hughes' life and work were an important part of the Harlem Renaissance of the 1920s, alongside those Zora Neale Hurston, Wallace Thurman, Countee Cullen, Richard Bruce Nugent, and Aaron Douglas, who together started a magazine "Fire!! Devoted to Younger Negro Artists". Hughes and these friends did not always agree with the ideas of some of the other African-American writers who were also part of the "Harlem Renaissance" because they thought their ideas were Middle class and that they treated others who had darker skin, less education and less money with discrimination. All his life, Hughes never forgot the lessons that he learned about poor and uneducated African-Americans in the stories that his grandmother told.
In 1960, the "NAACP" awarded Hughes the "Spingarn Medal" for "distinguished achievements by an African American". Hughes became a member of the "National Institute of Arts and Letters" in 1961. In 1973, an award was named after him, the "Langston Hughes Medal", awarded by the City College of New York.
Hughes became a famous American poet, but he was always ready to help other people, particularly young black writers. He was worried that many young writers hated themselves, and expressed these feelings to the world. He tried to help people feel pride, and not worry about the prejudice of other people. He also tried to help young African-Americans not to express hatred and prejudice towards white Americans.
Death.
On May 22, 1967, Hughes died at the age of 65 after having surgery for cancer. His ashes are buried under the floor of the "Langston Hughes Auditorium" in the "Arthur Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture" in Harlem. Over his ashes is a circle with a beautiful African design called "Rivers". At the centre of the design are words from a poem by Hughes: "My soul has grown deep like the rivers".

Jennifer Hudson
music
Jennifer Kate Hudson (born September 12, 1981) is an Academy Award-winning American actress and singer.
She gained fame on "American Idol". She is the most successful American Idol contestant who did not win, as she only came to fame in 2006 yet already has won numerous awards. She went on to star as Effie White in the 2006 motion picture musical "Dreamgirls" and on awards including an Oscar, a Golden Globe, a BAFTA, and a SAG Award. She is native to Chicago, Illinois. She is often called the new generation Aretha Franklin due to her deep ranges in singing and maintaining those ranges for so long.

Heinrich Sutermeister
music
Heinrich Sutermeister (born Feuerthalen, 12 August, 1910 – died Vaux-sur-Morges, 16 March, 1995) was a Swiss composer.
When he was young he was a student at the main music school in Munich, Germany, where the famous German composer Carl Orff was his teacher. Orff strongly influenced his music. Later he returned to Switzerland, where he lived as a composer.
His most important works are "Romeo und Julia" and "Die Schwarze Witwe (The Black Widow)". "Romeo und Julia" has been played the first time in Dresden in 1940, under the famous conductor Karl Böhm. During the following years Sutermeister made operas for the radio and television.

Joseph Fourier
science
Jean Baptiste Joseph Fourier (March 21, 1768 - May 16, 1830) was a French mathematician and physicist who is best known for starting the investigation of Fourier series and their use to problems of heat flow. Fourier was born at Auxerre as the son of a tailor. He lost both his parents at the age of 9. He then went on to study at the convent of st. Mark.

New York Jets
sports
The New York Jets are an American football team. They are a part of the National Football League (NFL). Even though they are called the New York Jets they play in New Jersey. They hail from the same stadium as the New York Giants. They have many fans in New York and New Jersey. The New York Jets started playing in 1960. They have only won one championship.

Veronica Guerin
media
Veronica Guerin (July 5, 1958 - June 26, 1996) was an Irish journalist who was murdered in 1996 by Irish drug dealers. Her death made many Irish people angry, which brought down most drug dealers on the island. The criminal John Gilligan was later convicted of her murder and sentenced to 28 years in prison, though Gilligan said in High Court that it was his friend John Traynor who murdered Guerin.

Thomas Morley
music
Thomas Morley (born Norwich?, 1557 or 1558; died London, October 1602) was an English composer, music theorist and organist. He was the most important English composer of madrigals. He studied the madrigals by Italian composers and created the tradition of the English madrigal, a tradition that became extremely popular, but which only lasted about 30 years.
Life.
Morley’s father was a brewer who lived in Norwich, so it is likely that Morley was born there. He may have been a choirboy in Norwich Cathedral. We know that in 1583 he got the job of organist there. In a book he published later in his life he said that William Byrd was his master. If this means that he had lessons from Byrd he must have travelled away from Norwich. In 1588 he got a degree from Oxford, and soon afterwards he became an organist at St. Paul's Cathedral in London.
In 1588 Nicholas Yonge published a book called "Musica transalpina". It was a collection of Italian madrigals with words translated into English. Soon after this Morley started to publish his own madrigals. In 1592 he became a Gentleman of the Chapel Royal.
In London Morley lived near Shakespeare. We do not know whether the two men worked together, but Morley did set Shakespeare’s words "It was a lover and his lass" from "As You Like It". We do not know whether it was ever used in a performance of Shakespeare's play. It is quite possible, because Morley was well-known.
From 1593 onwards Morley published a great deal of music and also made a lot of money out of music publishing, both of his own and other composers’ music.
It is thought that Morley died in October 1602.
His music.
Morley wrote sacred music as well as madrigals. His church music is strongly influenced by William Byrd.
His madrigals are his most important works. They are often very lively and have tunes that are easy to sing. One of his best known madrigals is called "Now is the Month of Maying". He started by using the Italian style and changed it to make it sound English. The madrigals of Thomas Weelkes and John Wilbye are usually more serious.
As well as madrigals, Morley wrote music for instruments, including keyboard music. Some of his pieces are in the famous collection called "Fitzwilliam Virginal Book"). He also wrote music for the typically English combination of two viols, flute, lute, cittern and bandora.
Morley wrote a book about music theory called "Plaine and Easie Introduction to Practicall Musicke". It was published in 1597 and was read by many people for two centuries after his death. It tells us a lot about how music was performed in Morley’s time.

John Wilbye
music
John Wilbye (pronounce: “WIL-bee”), (born Diss, Norfolk, baptised 7 March 1574; died Colchester, between September and November 1638), was an English composer who was famous for his madrigals.
Wilbye was the son of a tanner. He was supported financially by a rich family called Kytson. The Kytsons were very musical and had lots of musical instruments and sheet music in their house. It is thought that he went with Elizabeth Cornwallis to Hengrave Hall near Bury St. Edmunds in around 1594 when she married Sir Thomas Kytson the Younger. When Elizabeth died, Wilbye moved to Colchester where he lived with Elizabeth’s youngest daughter with whom he had a long friendship. When Wilbye died he was quite rich.
His music.
A book of madrigals by him appeared in 1598 and a second in 1608. It is often called the finest book of English madrigals. There were a total of 64 madrigals in these two books.
Wilbye was influenced by Morley’s madrigals, and also learned directly from the madrigals of Italian composers such as Alfonso Ferrabosco. He wrote many madrigals which have become extremely popular, including "Weep, weep o mine eyes" and "Draw on, sweet night". He was very good at making his music match the meaning of the words. He often used a mixture of major and minor modes.

Thomas Weelkes
music
Thomas Weelkes (baptised in Elsted, Sussex, 25 October 1576; died London, buried 1 December 1623) was an English composer and organist. He is one of the greatest composers of madrigals of his time as well as great composer of church music.
Life.
Thomas Weelkes was baptised in the little village church of Elsted in Sussex on 25 October, 1576. His father may have been the rector at that church. We know nothing about Weelkes’s childhood.
We know that in 1597 he published his first volume of madrigals, and that he was a young man then. After working for a short time at the house of Edward Darcye, he got the job of organist at Winchester College. He was paid 13s 4d (almost 67p in modern money) per quarter (i.e. every three months), but was given food and somewhere to live. He stayed there for two or three years.
During his time in Winchester Weelkes composed two more volumes of madrigals, published in 1598 and 1600. He got his B. Mus. Degree from New College, Oxford in 1602, and moved to Chichester to take up the job of organist and choir master at the Cathedral.. He was also a lay clerk at the Cathedral, and was paid £15 2s 4d (£15.11 in modern money) in addition to having food and lodgings. The next year he married Elizabeth Sandham, who came from a rich family. They had three children.
Weelkes' fourth and final volume of madrigals, published in 1608, has a title page where he says that he was a Gentleman of the Chapel Royal. However, his name does not appear in the records at the Chapel Royal, so it is likely that he was only there for a short time until someone else was found for the job.
In later years Weelkes got into trouble with the Chichester Cathedral authorities because of his heavy drinking and bad behaviour. In 1609 he was in trouble because he was absent from work. In 1616 he was in trouble again for swearing. In the end he lost his job because he was drunk at the organ and used bad language during the service. However, he got his job back, but his behaviour was still bad.
Thomas Weelkes died in London in 1623, a year after his wife died. He was buried in St Bride’s Church, Fleet Street, London. In Chichester Cathedral there is a memorial stone to him.
Music.
Thomas Weelkes is best known for his vocal music, especially his madrigals and church music. Weelkes wrote more Anglican services than any other important composer of the time, mostly for evensong. Many of his anthems are verse anthems, which would have suited the small choir he was writing for at Chichester Cathedral.
Weelkes was friends with the madrigalist Thomas Morley. When Morley died in 1602, Weelkes wrote an anthem called "A Remembrance of my Friend Thomas Morley", (also known as "Death hath Deprived Me".) Weelkes’s madrigals are very chromatic and use counterpoint and unusual rhythms.

Vahakn Dadrian
science
Professor Vahakn N. Dadrian, currently the director of Genocide Research at "Zoryan Institute", is researcher and historian of the Armenian Genocide.
Biography.
Dadrian first studied mathematics at the University of Berlin, after which he decided to switch to a completely different field, and studied history at the University of Vienna, and later, international law at the University of Zürich. He completed his Ph.D. in sociology from the University of Chicago.
Dadrian is a Professor of Sociology, and an internationally renowned expert on the Armenian genocide.
The particularity of Dadrian's research is that by mastering many languages, including German, English, French, Turkish, Ottoman Turkish and Armenian.

Émile Zola
media
Émile Zola () (2 April, 1840 – 29 September, 1902) was a major French writer and the most important naturalist writer. He worked toward political liberalization of France.

Cristina Fernández de Kirchner
politics
Cristina Elisabet Fernández de Kirchner (February 19, 1953), also called Cristina Fernàndez or Cristina Kirchner, is the current President of Argentina. She was born in La Plata, Buenos Aires Province.She is a lawyer and she is married to the former argenitian president Néstor Kirchner.
She was elected President in October 2007

Reservoir Dogs
music
"Reservoir Dogs" is a 1992 movie. The movie was written and directed by Quentin Tarantino and starred Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth, Michael Madsen, Chris Penn, and Steve Buscemi. It is the first movie directed by Tarantino. The movie was released on October 23, 1992. The title, and promo shots associated with the movie, was a take on the violent Sam Peckinpah movie, Straw Dogs. Although Reservoir Dogs failed at the theatre it found new life after being released on VHS and DVD, quickly becoming a cult classic.

Steve Jablonsky
music
Steve Jablonsky (born on October 9, 1970) is an American music composer for movies, television and video games.
Jablonsky has composed the soundtracks to the movies "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" (2003), "Steamboy" (2004), "The Island" (2005), "Transformers" (2007) and "D-War" (2007). He also helped compose some of the music to the video game ', and composed the theme music for the BBC's "Seven Wonders of the Industrial World" in 2003. He continues to write music for the television series "Desperate Housewives" (2004-current) since the fourth episode.
Jablonsky works in Hans Zimmer's studio Remote Control Productions (formerly known as Media Ventures).

Islam Karimov
politics
Islam Abduganievitj Karimov born january 30, 1938 in Samarkand is the current president of Uzbekistan. He is considered a dictator and has many time violated human rights in hes country.

Sky News
media
Sky News is a news broadcasting station in the United Kingdom. It has won #1 News award of the year. This channel is only available to Sky TV.

Hybrid Theory
music
"Hybrid Theory" is the first studio album by Linkin Park. It was released on March 25, 2001.
Before release.
Before Linkin Park was known as "Linkin Park," they were known as Xero. After Mark Wakefield left Xero, Chester Bennington joined, and their name was changed to "Hybrid Theory." They produced a demo tape with nine songs and sent it to several record companies, but they all refused to sponsor Linkin Park. Eventually, they were signed by Warner Bros. Records in 2000.
About the songs.
Most of the songs on "Hybrid Theory" came from early versions of them that Xero recorded with Mark Wakefield.
The songs were mostly about Chester Bennington's problems as a child, such as child abuse, social isolation, the divorce of his parents, and drug abuse. Bennington and Mike Shinoda have said that the songs turned into songs about "everyday emotions that you talk about and think about."
In 2002, all of the songs were remixed for Linkin Park's second album, "Reanimation".
List of songs.
Four of the songs from "Hybrid Theory" were released as singles: "One Step Closer," "Crawling," "Papercut," and "In the End." They were all very popular and appeared on charts. "Runaway" was not a single, but it also appeared on charts.
Critics' opinions of "Hybrid Theory".
Critics had mixed opinions of "Hybrid Theory". The magazines "Rolling Stone", "PopMatters", "The Village Voice" and "Sputnikmusic" liked the album. Robert Christgau from "The Village Voice" enjoyed listening to "Papercut" and "Points of Authority."
However, "Allmusic" and "NME" did not like the album. They thought it was a generic rock and heavy metal album, and not very creative.

Compilation album
music
A compilation album is an album of songs, made by different recording artists, or by one group or artist at different times. Some compilations are "greatest hits" albums, that feature the biggest hit records of a given year, or a certain genre of music, or artists from the same era or location. Others are called "best-ofs" or "anthology" albums, and have the same kind of themes. Some compilations include only the biggest record chart hits, while others may include B-sides, hard-to-find songs, or songs that were unreleased earlier.

Freddy Cannon
music
Freddy "Boom Boom" Cannon (born December 4, 1940 in Massachusetts) is an American singer. He was most famous in the early 1960s. His hit records include "Abigail Beecher", "Tallahassee Lassie", and "Way Down Yonder In New Orleans".
One of Cannon's hits, "Palisades Park", was written by Chuck Barris, who later created "The Dating Game" and "The Gong Show". Cannon also appeared in the movies "Just for Fun" and "Village of the Giants".

Bret Michaels
music
Bret Michael Sychak, also known as Bret Michaels, (born March 15, 1963 in Butler, Pennsylvania), is the lead singer of the glam metal band Poison. He currently stars on VH1's reality television program Rock of Love2.

Jacques Arcadelt
music
Jacques Arcadelt (also called Jacob Arcadelt) (born probably in Liège, 1504 or 1505; died Paris, 14 October 1568) was a Franco-Flemish composer in the Renaissance period. He was an extremely popular composer of madrigals and chansons.
We know hardly anything about his early life, but we know he was living in Rome by 1539 whe was made a member of the Julian Chapel. Soon he joined the Sistine Chapel, where he had the job of "magister puerorum" (director of the boys choir), and later he became choirmaster. In the same year he published four of his total of six books of madrigals for four voices. Probably around 1553 he moved to France, where he spent the rest of his life. He wrote a very large number of chansons (French songs). He also wrote some masses.
Arcadelt's music became extremely popular because it was quite simple and easy to sing with beautiful melodies that people could remember. One very famous madrigal is called "Il bianco e dolce cigno" ("The white and gentle swan"). The style of Arcadelt’s music influenced the next generation of madrigal composers.

Luis Aragonés
sports
Luis Aragonés (born July 28,1938) was a Spanish football player and football coach since 1974. He played in Real Oviedo, Real Betis, and Atlético de Madrid. He also was the managed of Real Oviedo, Real Betis and Atlético de Madrid. Also was the coach of FC Barcelona, Valencia CF, Sevilla FC, RCD ESpanyol and RCD Mallorca. In the actuality is the Spain National football team.He is a coach of Fenerbahçe team any more

Ryan Tedder
music
Ryan Benjamin Tedder (born January 7, 1979) is an American singer, and Grammy nominated songwriter and record producer born in Tulsa, Oklahoma. He has written and produced for various musicians but, as of 2007, he is best known as the front man for the "MySpace US rock phenomenon", OneRepublic.

Brent Kutzle
music
Brent Kutzle (born 1985) is an American musician, born in Newport Beach, California. He has written and performed for various musicians both underground music (Vermeer, Augustine, This Allure, Vanessa Jourdan, Venus Infers, Jessica Dobson, and Torrent) and mainstream. Brent is best known for playing the bass guitar and cello for OneRepublic (Interscope Records). When he was 13, he attended McGarvin Intermediate School located in Westminster, California. He also attended La Quinta High School in Westminster, California, California Baptist University in Riverside and Vanguard University in Costa Mesa.

Dreaming Out Loud (OneRepublic album)
music
"Dreaming Out Loud" is the debut album by OneRepublic, produced by Greg Wells with two songs produced by Ryan Tedder. OneRepublic has been the number one band on MySpace for over a year, and has been in MySpace Music's Top Artists since early 2006, with over 24 million total song plays and counting. The album was released in the US on November 20, 2007, although the entire album had been leaked on to the internet months before.

Shock Value (Timbaland album)
music
"Shock Value" is the second studio album by record producer Timbaland.

Greg Wells
music
Greg Wells is a musician and Grammy-nominated record producer from Peterborough, Ontario, Canada, who now lives and works in Los Angeles.

Brandi Carlile
music
Brandi Carlile (b. June 1, 1981) is an American singer and songwriter. Carlile's music has been categorized in several genres, including pop, rock, country, indie and folk.

Bert Trautmann
sports
Bernhard "Bert" Carl Trautmann OBE (born October 22, 1923) is a former German football player. He played from 1949 to 1964 for Manchester City as the keeper. Trautmann is in Germany nearly unknown and had never played in the national team of his country. But in Manchester, he's until today one of the most popular player.
Bert Trautmann was born at October 22 in 1923. He began playing football at age 10, when he was 18 he had to go to do his military service for the German Nazi-Regime. The paratrooper was first imprisoned by the Sowiet, later by the British army. He did not left the island after his shank and became a profesional football player.
After some years he went to Manchester City. In the first time, the fans hate the "Nazi boy". But after the 1956 FA Cup final, the fans accept Trautmann as a good player for their team. At the 75th minute of this game, Trautmann was hit by a player from Birmingham. The crash broke his neck, but Trautmann finished the game. Today it's often called a medical miracle that Trautmann did not die at this day.
Just a few days after the game his five years old son died in a car crash. In 1950 he had married the first time, in 1990 again. In the year 2004 he was honored by Queen Elizabeth II.

Colbie Caillat
music
Colbie Caillat is an American pop music singer and songwriter. She was born in Newbury Park, California on May 28, 1985. She currently lives in Malibu, California.

Maurizio Giuliano
media
Maurizio Giuliano (born 1975) is a person from Italy and England, who travels a lot and wrote books and in newspapers. In 2004 he was in Guinness Book of World Records as youngest person who been to all countries in world. In 2006/2007 he worked for UN.
Education.
Maurizio Giuliano was born on 24 February 1975 in Milan, Italy, with a lawyer as a father and a housewife as a mother. He lived among other countries in Cuba, Chile, and Indonesia. As of 2004, he knew eight languages according to one source, while another source specified that he "spoke" five and had a "passion" for two more.
He went to school in Milan and Manchester, and then studied at the University of Oxford in 1996
and University of Cambridge in 1997,
At Oxford, he studied at University College
to know about Oxford's inter-disciplinary course in "Philosophy, Politics, and Economics" (PPE), especially Latin America and eastern Europe.
As of 1998, he was a research fellow at the Centre for Social Studies (CESOC) in Santiago, Chile.
Study on Cuba.
He wrote two books and some articles on Cuban politics, especially on the US embargo, which he thinks (in the book "La Transición Cubana y el "Bloqueo" Norteamericano" and other works) is not good.
In an article published in the British academic journal "Democratization" in 1998, he focused in particular on how the US embargo against Cuba helps create "empathy" by third parties towards Cuba, which is then domestically perceived as support towards Cuba's regime. He argued, hence, that the US Government - in addition to the embargo's direct influence on supporting Cuba's regime - indirectly inhibits potentially constructive pressures towards change, insofar as third countries, foreign non-governmental organizations and prominent individuals lend support to Cuba's resistance to the US embargo, and this offsets external pressures to democratize, thereby allowing the Cuban regime to convert such "empathy" into a source of legitimacy at home.
His scholarly work on internal Cuban politics, notably on the 1996 purge of Havana's Centre for American Studies (CEA) (contained in the book "El Caso CEA" published in 1998), has been the object of academic reviews, as it exposed the internal conflicts between Cuba's political apparatus and the country's intelligentsia, previously unknown.
According to some reviews, the book, a work of investigative journalism complemented by academic analysis, dealt a strong blow to hard-liners within the regime,
by exposing for the first time the internal conflicts between Cuba's apparatus and its intelligentsia.
In 2001, Cuban exiled scholars Alberto Álvarez and Gerardo González, who were among those purged from the CEA, wrote the book "¿ Intelectuales vs. Revolución ? El caso del Centro de Estudios sobre América", which strongly built upon Giuliano's book to offer further insights on relations between Cuba's political apparatus and the country's intellectuals.
Journalism.
Besides work on Cuba, other countries Giuliano covered in his journalistic work include East Timor and Myanmar (formerly known as Burma).
In 2000, he visited North Korea and published an essay about his visit, essentially describing his tour around the country as a "mise en scéne" by the North Korean authorities.
In his journalistic work, he reportedly ran into problems with the authorities of at least two countries. In 1998, he was denied entry to Myanmar after making contact with the National League for Democracy and taking photos of its leader Aung San Suu Kyi. While on 30 October 2002, he was reportedly detained and manhandled by Israeli authorities while crossing the Allenby Bridge.
Giuliano's writings have also included lighter topics. During his time in Kabul, for example, he wrote restaurant reviews for a local English-language magazine.
Political advocacy.
In the early 2000s, Giuliano was a consultant for the Italian Senate's Committee on Human Rights. At that time, at least some his writings were also intended to influence the positions of the Italian Government on certain human rights issues, as was the case with material that he wrote on North Korea.
Development career.
In 2004, Giuliano worked for the International Organization for Migration in the elections for Afghan refugees in Pakistan,
and in 2005 worked in Afghanistan for the United Nations Development Programme.
In both cases, he was working in the field of communications with the media.
Between 2006 and 2008, he served with the United Nations, again in the field of media relations, in Central African Republic,
and Cameroon following the refugee crisis caused by the battle of N'Djamena of February 2008.
Travel.
According to the Guinness Book, through his work, he had travelled to every single sovereign country in the world (which totalled 193 according to the Guinness Book) by 20 February 2004, aged 28 years and 361 days. He claimed that he had visited a total of up to 238 territories (including the 193 sovereign countries recognized by Guinness), and stated that the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (North Korea) had been the hardest country to get into, after numerous attempts and long waits to get a visa.
He started travelling at age 14, and believes that, as of 2004, he had travelled at least two million miles, including on the Trans-Siberian Railway and through 11 "round-the-world" air journeys. Some of his earliest journeys were to Albania and Sierra Leone in 1991, aged 16, and to Mongolia in 1992 on the occasion of the national festivities Naadam. Most of his later travels were related to his journalistic work.
On 20 February 2004, he visited Suriname, thereby completing his visit to all sovereign nations of the world. He held a press conference there on 24 February, where he stated that he had chosen Suriname to complete his record, as the country had always fascinated him due to its richness and variety in cultures and ethnicities.
He then travelled from Suriname to London, with 42 passports (of which 30 Italian and 12 British) filled with immigration stamps, in order to prove his record with Guinness World Records.
He claimed that most of his travels were unrelated to the record, and that only since 2001, on the suggestion of friends, he had the Guinness Record in mind when planning his travels. In explaining his record, however, he stated that he might have an "addiction to crossing borders".

Boston Celtics
sports
The Boston Celtics are a professional basketball club. They play in Boston, Massachusetts. They are a part of the National Basketball Association (NBA) and play in the Atlantic Division.
History.
The Celtics were one of the first NBA teams. Since their start in 1946, they have been one of the most successful teams, winning seventeen NBA Championships.
The Celtics play their home games in TD Banknorth Garden.

LeToya Luckett
music
LeToya Nicole Luckett (born March 11 1981), known professionally as LeToya, is an American R&B singer, actress and songwriter. She is a former member of the R&B female group, Destiny's Child with whom she won two Grammy Awards, but when the group was successfuly prompted in the world she was forced to leave.
When interviewed by MTV News, Luckett said that her and LaTavia Roberson created a new group called Anjel. Auditions were made, then Naty Quinones and Tiffany Beaudoin were selected as members. The group recorded demo songs. Their production company which handled the group fell through, and the members of Anjel went on to pursue solo projects.
In 2004, Capitol Records signed Luckett, then she started her solo career. Her solo debut album, "LeToya", topped the U.S. "Billboard" 200 albums chart in July 2006 and was certified platinum by the RIAA in December 2006, the album spawned five singles, two were released with promotional purpose, to see the audience reaction towards her, but "Torn" would be her most notable song, it achieved records on BET's top ten countdown show "106 & Park". She was also named "One of the Best New Artists of 2006" by AOL and the "Top Songwriter of 2006" by ASCAP. Luckett's second album, "Lady Love", is scheduled for a Spring 2008 release. She is now on road with the stage play tour "Rumors".

Evan Rachel Wood
music
Evan Rachel Wood (born September 7, 1987) is an American movie, television, theater actress and singer. She began acting in the late 1990s, appearing in several television roles, including "American Gothic" and "Once and Again". Wood's first role as a leading movie actress was in 2002's "Little Secrets", and she became well known after changing to a more adult-orientated Golden Globe-nominated role in the critically acclaimed "Thirteen" (2003).
Wood continued acting in mostly independent films, including "Pretty Persuasion" (2005), "Down in the Valley" (2006), and in the big studio production "Across the Universe" (2007). Critics have praised Wood's acting, such as "The Guardian" newspaper describing her as being "wise beyond her years" and as "one of the best actresses of her generation". Her personal relationship with singer Marilyn Manson has received media coverage.

Dana Fuchs
music
Dana Fuchs is an American singer, songwriter, actress and voice over talent.
The youngest of six musical children, Fuchs was born and raised in Wildwood, Florida, a small rural town, daughter of Sandy and Don Fuchs. At the age of twelve she joined the First Baptist Gospel Choir and began singing in public. At sixteen she became the lead singer of a popular local band at a roadside Holiday Inn. She moved to New York City at nineteen and began working with Jon Diamond, a guitarist who had toured with Joan Osborne and W.C. Handy Award winner Debbie Davies. They formed the Dana Fuchs Band. The band was a feature act at a number of clubs, performing with people like John Popper, James Cotton, and Taj Mahal.
Fuchs plays Sadie in the Julie Taymor film "Across the Universe". She also played the singing Janis Joplin in the Eric Nederlander production of Randall Myler's off Broadway musical "Love, Janis".

Martin Luther McCoy
music
Martin Luther McCoy is an American musician and actor. He worked with The Roots a lot and appears as one of the six lead characters in the 2007 Beatles musical "Across the Universe" in the role of "JoJo".
McCoy goes by the stage name of "Martin Luther" in his music career. For his acting work he is known under his full name.
Martin Luther released his first solo album The Calling in 1999 and followed it with an independent release of his second album Rebel Soul Music in 2004 on his own label Rebel Soul Records; his next release "Serial Thriller" is due for release in early 2008.

T. V. Carpio
music
Teresa Victoria Carpio, more commonly known as T. V. Carpio, is a Chinese / Filipina singer, songwriter and actress. She is the daughter of Asian singing star Teresa Carpio, with whom she has performed on stage as a backup singer.
Carpio played Prudence in the 2007 musical film "Across the Universe". She has also appeared on television, including a TV movie and episodes of "The Jury" and "Law & Order". She made her Broadway debut in "Rent" as Alexi Darling and others, appearing from December 2006 until April 2007.

Elliot Goldenthal
music
Elliot Goldenthal (born May 2 1954 in Brooklyn, New York City) is a well known American composer of modern classical music. He was a student of Aaron Copland and John Corigliano, and is best known for his ability to blend various musical styles and techniques in original and inventive ways.

All That We Needed
music
"All That We Needed" is the third album released by the band Plain White T's. The album was released January 25, 2005.

Max Wolf
science
Maximilian Franz Joseph Cornelius Wolf (June 21, 1863 – October 3, 1932) was a German astronomer. He was born in Heidelberg, Germany.

Trygve Lie
politics
Trygve Halvdan Lie () (July 16, 1896 – December 30, 1968) was a Norwegian politician. From 1946 to 1952 he was the first elected Secretary-General of the United Nations.
Lie was born in Oslo (then Kristiania) on 16 July 1896. He joined the Labour Party in 1911 and was named as the party's national secretary soon after getting his law degree from the University of Oslo in 1919. He married Hjørdis Jørgensen in 1921; the couple had three daughters, Sissel, Guri, and Mette.
Later he was elected to the Storting (Norway's Parliament). He was appointed Minister of Justice when a Labour Party government was formed by Johan Nygaardsvold in 1935. Lie was later named Minister of Trade and Industries and Minister of Supply and Shipping.
In 1940, when Norway was invaded by Germany, Lie ordered all Norwegian ships to sail to Allied ports. Lie was named as Foreign Minister of the Norwegian government-in-exile.
Lie led the Norwegian "delegation" (group) to the United Nations conference in San Francisco in 1946 and was a leader in drafting the rules to set up the United Nations Security Council. He was the leader of the Norwegian delegation to the United Nations general assembly in 1946. On February 1, 1946, he was elected as the first United Nations Secretary-General as a result of a compromise between the major powers, having only missed being elected President of the first General Assembly by a small margin. He gets much of the credit for securing the current site for the United Nations headquarters from John D. Rockefeller, Jr., and establishing the offices there.
As Secretary General, Lie supported the foundation of Israel and Indonesia. He worked for the withdrawal of Soviet forces in Iran and a stop to fighting in Kashmir. He attracted the anger of the Soviet Union when he helped gather support for the defence of South Korea after it was invaded in 1950 and later worked to end the Soviet boycott of UN meetings, though his involvement has only little to do with the eventual return of the Soviet Union to the UN. He was opposed to Spain's entry into the United Nations because of his opposition to the Franco government. He also sought to have the People's Republic of China recognized by the United Nations after the Nationalist government was exiled to Taiwan, arguing that the People's Republic was the only government which could fulfill the membership obligations in full. This did not happen until the 1970s.
He has been criticized for his failures to facilitate negotiation in the Berlin Blockade, as well as his failure to bring about a more swift end to the Korean War. His critics argue that he was under the influence of a select few in the UN Secretariat. He has also been criticized for his arrogance and stubbornness.
Over objections from the Soviet Union, his term of office was extended by the General Assembly 46 - 5 in 1950. This was the result of a Security Council impasse, in which the US refused to accept any candidate but Lie, and the Soviet Union's absolute refusal to accept him again, due to his involvement in the Korean War. The Soviet Union refused to acknowledge him as secretary general in his second term, and after having been accused by Joseph McCarthy of hiring "disloyal" Americans (an allegation which he attributed to the rapid hiring of civil servants necessary after the creation of the organization), Lie resigned on November 10, 1952.
Lie remained active in Norwegian politics after his resignation from the UN. He was the Governor of Oslo and Akershus, Chairman of the Board of Energy, Minister of the Interior, and Minister of Trade.
Lie died on December 30, 1968 of a heart attack. He was 72 years old.

John Mayer
music
John Clayton Mayer (surname pronunciation:) (born October 16, 1977) is an American guitarist and singer-songwriter. From Connecticut, he went to the Berklee College of Music, before moving to Atlanta, Georgia, in 1998. His first two albums, "Room for Squares" and "Heavier Things", were successful and were made multi-platinum by the RIAA. In 2003, he won a Grammy Award for his song "Your Body Is a Wonderland".

Camillo Berneri
media
Camillo Berneri (also known as Camillo da Lodi; 1877, Lodi—May 5 1937, Barcelona) was an Italian professor of philosophy, anarchist militant, propagandist and theorist.
Berneri, a World War I veteran, University of Florence professor of humanities, and a member of the Unione Anarchica Italiana, fought always Fascists, and he started to fight fascism until1926, when he was forced to escape from Italy and he went in France, then Switzerland, Germany, Belgium, Luxembourg, and finally the Netherlands. In all these countries, Berneri was frequently placed under arrest, and then often expelled, because he was an anarchist. When he was in these countries he wrote lot of anti-clerical and anti-fascist articles.
With Carlo Rosselli, Berneri organized the first troop (column) of Italian volunteers to fight in the Spanish Civil War against Francisco Franco.After months he became highly critical of the involvement of Confederación Nacional del Trabajo (CNT) members in the Popular Front government, and he sent a letter to Federica Montseny (Anarchist minister for Healt in the government against fascism).
During the Barcelona May Days, as troop of Communist Party of Spain members (apparently under orders from Joseph Stalin) searched and than murdered him. His body, riddled with bullets, was found during the night, near the headquarters of the Generalitat de Catalunya.
He was married to Giovanna Berneri, and was father of Marie-Louise Berneri and Giliane Berneri, the childrens were anarchists as the father Camillo.

Songs for Polarbears
music
"Songs for Polarbears" is the debut album by the alternative rock group Snow Patrol. It was released on August 31 1998. Gary Lightbody wrote all of the lyrics, and helped Mark McClelland and Jonny Quinn write the music. The name of the album is a reference to how Snow Patrol was once called 'Polar Bear', but changed their name.
"Songs for Polarbears" was re-released in 2006.

Starfighter Pilot
music
"Starfighter Pilot" was the debut, or first, EP from the alternative rock band Snow Patrol, and was finished in 1997. It was released on the Electric Honey record label. The song "Starfighter Pilot" was also put on the band's first full-length album, "Songs for Polarbears".

Final Straw
music
"Final Straw" is the third full-length album by the alternative rock band Snow Patrol. It was released in the United Kingdom in 2003 and in the United States in 2004, under Polydor Records. Gary Lightbody wrote all of the lyrics, and wrote the music with Nathan Connolly, Mark McClelland and Jonny Quinn. The album was the first by Snow Patrol to become popular outside Northern Ireland and Scotland. "Final Straw" was re-released in the UK in 2004 with two extra tracks, and then was able to be bought in the U.S. without the bonus tracks.

Eyes Open
music
"Eyes Open" is the fourth full-length album by the alternative rock band Snow Patrol. It was released May 1, 2006 internationally, and May 92006 in the United States. The "Special Edition" of the album has a bonus DVD with music videos of "You're All I Have". "Eyes Open was the best-selling album in the UK in 2006, and sold more than one and a half million copies.
History.
The album reached #1 in its 11th week on the New Zealand chart and reached 2x Platinum there for shipping over 30,000 units. In the UK, the album became 5x Platinum by the British Phonographic Industry. It has also reached #1 in the ARIA Albums Chart, and became 3x Platinum on January 8, 2007 (210,000+ units shipped). On November 26, 2006, it became the best-selling album of the year in the UK.
Track listing.
The untitled track is a recording of background noise and one of Jacknife Lee's young children talking.

David Rawlings
music
David Todd Rawlings is a United States guitarist. He is best known as the musical partner of bluegrass singer-songwriter Gillian Welch. Rawlings has also been a record producer, producing albums such as those by Welch and other artists like Old Crow Medicine Show.

Mae Jemison
science
Astronaut Mae Carol Jemison MD (born 17 October 1956) became the first African-American woman to enter space when she served on the crew of the Space Shuttle Endeavor in September 1992. Jemison graduated high school at the age of 16. She studied at Stanford University on a scholarship where she got a B.S. degree in chemical engineering. After graduating from medical school (Cornell University, 1981), Jemison joined the Peace Corps. She served as its area medical officer from 1983 to 1985 in the West African countries of Sierra Leone and Liberia. After serving in NASA from 1987 to 1993, Jemison founded The Jemison Group, Inc., which developed ALAFIYA, a satellite-based telecommunications systems. This system was to be used to improve healthcare delivery in developing nations. She also was a professor in the Environmental Studies Program at Dartmouth College, where she directed the Jemison Institute for Advancing Technology in Developing Countries.

Mike Shinoda
music
Michael Kenji Shinoda is a Japanese American musician, record producer, and artist from Agoura Hills, California. He is famous for being the rapper, keyboard and piano player, vocalist and rhythm guitarist of Linkin Park, and his side project, Fort Minor. He also gives artwork, production and mixing for both groups.

David C. Jewitt
science
David C. Jewitt is a Professor of astronomy at the University of Hawaii Institute for Astronomy. He was born in 1958 in England, and graduated from the University of London in 1979.

Bo Pelini
sports
Mark "Bo" Pelini (born December 13, 1967) is the head football coach at the University of Nebraska–Lincoln. Before that, he was the defensive coordinator for the LSU Tigers. On December 2, 2007, one day after coaching in the 2007 SEC Championship Game, Pelini was named as head coach at Nebraska by athletic director Tom Osborne.

Ernst Haeckel
science
Ernst Heinrich Philipp August Haeckel (February 16, 1834 — August 9, 1919),
also written von Haeckel, was an important German biologist, naturalist, philosopher, physician, professor and artist.
Ernst Haeckel discovered, described and named thousands of new species.
Haeckel promoted Charles Darwin's work in Germany.

Max Weber
science
Maximilian Carl Emil Weber (pronounced: maks ˈveːbɐ) (21 April 1864 – 14 June 1920) was a German political economist and sociologist who was considered one of the founders of the modern study of sociology and public administration. He began his career at the University of Berlin, and later worked at Freiburg University, University of Heidelberg, University of Vienna and University of Munich. He had influence on German politics of his time, because he was an advisor to Germany's negotiators at the Treaty of Versailles and to the commission that drafted the Weimar Constitution.
Weber is known for his work in the sociology of religion. His most famous work is his essay "The Protestant Ethic and the Spirit of Capitalism".

Edgar Meyer
music
Edgar Meyer is an American Grammy Award-winning double bassist. Over the years, he has worked with classical and bluegrass artists such as Joshua Bell, Yo-Yo Ma, Béla Fleck, Sam Bush, James Taylor, Jerry Douglas, Mike Marshall, Mark O'Connor, Alison Krauss, the members of Nickel Creek, and Mary Chapin Carpenter.

Jerry Douglas
music
Jerry Douglas is an American Grammy Award-winning dobro player. Over the years, he has worked with various artists such as Ray Charles, Peter Rowan, Béla Fleck, Emmylou Harris, Phish, Chris Thile, Dolly Parton, Paul Simon, Ricky Skaggs, Bill Frisell, John Fogerty, Nanci Griffith, Tony Rice and James Taylor.

Noam Pikelny
music
Noam Pikelny is a United States banjo player and singer-songwriter, famous as a member of Leftover Salmon and Punch Brothers.

Gabe Witcher
music
Gabe Witcher is a United States fiddle player and singer-songwriter, famous as a member of Punch Brothers. Witcher has also toured with artists such as Jerry Douglas.

Bryan Sutton
music
Bryan Sutton is a United States guitarist. He has performed or recorded with artists such as Ricky Skaggs, Dixie Chicks, Jerry Douglas, Sam Bush, Béla Fleck, Hot Rize, Chris Thile, Tony Rice.

Michael Bloomberg
politics
Michael Bloomberg (born February 14, 1942) is an American businessman and politician. He is the current mayor of New York City.

Gackt
music
Gackt M.S. Camui (real name 神威 楽斗 Kamui Gakuto) is a Japanese musician, songwriter and actor. The "M.S." stands for Mobile Suite, a reference to "Gundam". Usually referred to by his stage name Gackt, he is best known for his work with Malice Mizer and his following career as a solo artist. Besides Japanese language, he has performed in English, Korean, Cantonese and Mandarin.
Early life.
Gackt was born in Okinawa, Japan on 4 July. Although he claims to be born in the year 1540, there has been speculation that he was born in 1973. As the second of three children, with an older sister and a younger brother. His father and mother were music teachers who played various instruments with his father primarily playing the trumpet. According to his autobiography, he was a mischievous child and enjoyed taking risks; at age seven he nearly drowned while swimming off the coast of Okinawa. After this near-death experience, he claimed to have the ability to see and speak with the deceased, a notion which was dismissed by his parents. At the age of ten, Gackt was hospitalized with a gastrointestinal tract and had to remain at the hospital for a prolonged time. He made the acquaintance of several terminally ill children, some of whom died during his stay.
Gackt's musical education began at age three, when his parents initiated his classical piano education, of which he grew tired four years later. It would take another four years until his parents allowed him to quit. Competition with a friend lead to Gackt taking back up the piano, and he was later encouraged to learn other various instruments, especially those used in a rock band, throughout the rest of his time in school.
Malice Mizer.
In 1995, Gackt joined Malice Mizer as the group's vocalist, lyricist and pianist. Fan base and record sales grew substantially over the following years. Malice Mizer released two albums with Gackt ("Voyage ~Sans Retour~" and "Merveilles") along with seven singles. According to Gackt, when he began taking on more roles in the band, he was asked to leave the group. However, the other members of the band say that this is not true and that Gackt simply "disappeared" after waiting for him once their break was over.
Solo career.
Gackt began his solo career on 12 May 1999 with the release "Mizerable". Several albums, singles and videos have since followed. He has also done voice acting and motion capturing and co-wrote and co-starred in the 2003 movie "Moon Child", which also stars Hyde (vocalist of L'Arc~en~Ciel) and Wang Lee Hom (Taiwanese-American actor-singer). Also in 2003, Gackt published his autobiography titled "Jihaku" and for Caparison Guitars, he has designed two guitars, named "Marcury" and "Venus".
Since 7 January 2007, Gackt has been playing the warlord Uesugi Kenshin in the TV drama "Fūrinkazan" Gackt's most recent solo release is the single "Returner ~Yami no Shuuen~", released on June 20, 2007, which was the first in the artist's career (both solo and in a band) to reach the number one spot on the Japanese Oricon charts.. Gackt was also the voice actor for Malthazar in the Japanese release of the film "Arthur and the Minimoys".
On 19 December, Gackt released an album titled "0079-0088" containing 8 tracks, which had either previously been used on the soundtracks of the "Mobile Suit Zeta Gundam" movies or were covers of earlier songs from the "Gundam" franchise. It was created as a tribute to the creator of "Gundam", Yoshiyuki Tomino, for his birthday.
Skin.
On 25 May 2007, the formation of the supergroup Skin was announced, which also consists of Miyavi, Sugizo and Yoshiki. The group gave its debut performance at the Anime Expo convention in Long Beach, California on 29 June 2007 and plans to release an album. According to a recent blog post by Miyavi, the band has already started recording.

Tom DeLonge
music
Thomas Matthew DeLonge, Jr. (born December 13, 1975) is an American musician. He was the guitarist of Pop-punk band Blink-182, until their break up in 2005. He also took a part in a project called Box Car Racer. He is currently playing in Angels & Airwaves, his new band.

Johann Palisa
science
Johann Palisa (December 6 1848–May 2 1925) was an Austrian astronomer, born in Troppau in Austrian Silesia (now in the Czech Republic).
He was a good finder of asteroids, finding 122 in all, from 136 Austria in 1874 to 1073 Gellivara in 1923. Some of the notable asteroids he found include 153 Hilda, 216 Kleopatra, 243 Ida, 253 Mathilde, 324 Bamberga, and the Amor asteroid 719 Albert.
The asteroid 914 Palisana and the Palisa crater on the Moon were named in his honour.
Early work.
From 1866 to 1870, Palisa studied mathematics and astronomy at the University of Vienna; however, he did not graduate until 1884. Despite this, by 1870 he was an assistant at the University's observatory, and a year later gained a position at the observatory in Geneva. A few years later, in 1872, at the age of 24, Palisa became the leader of the Austrian Naval Observatory in Pola. While at Pola, he found his first asteroid, 136 Austria, on March 18, 1874. Along with this, he found twenty-seven minor planets and one comet. During his stay in Pola he used a small six-inch refractor telescope to aid in his research.

Jimmy Page
music
James Patrick "Jimmy" Page, OBE (born 9 January 1944) is an English guitarist, composer and record producer, most famous for his work in the rock band Led Zeppelin.

John Paul Jones (musician)
music
John Paul Jones (born John Baldwin on January 3, 1946 in Sidcup, Kent) is an English musician and record producer, and was known for being the bassist, the keyboardist and the mandolin player for rock band Led Zeppelin.

Robert Plant
sports
Robert Anthony Plant (born August 20, 1948, West Bromwich, West Midlands, England), is an English rock singer and musician, and was known for being the bassist, the lead vocalist for rock band Led Zeppelin. In 2007, he recorded an album with bluegrass fiddler Alison Krauss, and will tour with her in 2008.

Alicia Keys
music
Alicia Keys (born Alicia Augello Cook on January 25 1981) is an American pop, R&B, soul, and neo soul singer-songwriter, pianist, record producer, actress, music video director, philanthropist, and author who has sold over forty-one million albums and singles worldwide as of 2007, and has won numerous awards, including eleven Grammy Awards, eleven Billboard Music Awards, three American Music Awards, and fourteen NAACP Image Awards.

Alison Moyet
music
Alison Moyet (born Genevieve Alison Jane Moyet on 18 June 1961), is an English pop singer-songwriter noted for her bluesy voice.
Early life and career.
Alison Moyet was born in Billericay, Essex, England. Her father was French, and her mother was English. She grew up in Basildon, where she attended school. She left school age 16 and trained as a piano tuner. She was involved in a number of punk rock, pub rock and blues bands in the South East Essex area during the late 1970s and early 1980s, including The Vandals and the Screamin' Ab Dabs, The Vicars and The Little Roosters.
Yazoo.
Moyet's pop career began in 1981 when she formed the electropop group Yazoo with former Depeche Mode member Vince Clarke. Yazoo had several hits, including "Only You", "Don't Go", "Situation" and "Nobody's Diary", and recorded two albums, 'Upstairs at Eric's' and 'You and Me Both'.
In 1983 Moyet and Clarke decided to quit Yazoo. Clarke formed The Assembly and later Erasure, and Moyet started a solo career. Moyet will be reuniting with Clarke as Yazoo for of live tour during 2008.

Roger Penrose
science
Sir Roger Penrose, OM, FRS (born 8 August 1931) is an English mathematical physicist and Emeritus Rouse Ball Professor of Mathematics at the Mathematical Institute, University of Oxford and Emeritus Fellow of Wadham College. He is renowned for his work in mathematical physics, in particular his contributions to general relativity and cosmology. He is also a recreational mathematician and philosopher. Roger Penrose is the son of scientist Lionel S. Penrose and Margaret Leathes, and the brother of mathematician Oliver Penrose and correspondence chess grandmaster Jonathan Penrose. He was born in Colchester, Essex, England.

The Best Damn Thing (song)
music
"The Best Damn Thing" is the fourth single off the album The Best Damn Thing by Avril Lavigne. The video clip has been released in April 2008, but the song has not yet been released.

Jacques Offenbach
music
Jacques Offenbach (20 June 1819, in Cologne – 5 October 1880, in Paris) was a French composer and cellist of the Romantic era. He is seen as one of the originators of the operetta form. Of German-Jewish descent, he was one of the most influential composers of popular music in Europe in the 19th century. Many of his works are still played today.
Offenbach's many operettas, such as "Orpheus in the Underworld", and "La belle Hélène", were extremely popular both in France and elsewhere in the 1850s and 1860s. They combined political and cultural satire with witty grand opera parodies. His popularity in France declined in the 1870s after the fall of the Second Empire. He fled France, but during the last years of his life, his popularity came back. Several of his operettas are still performed. While his name remains most closely associated with the French operetta and the Second Empire, it is Offenbach's one fully operatic masterpiece, "Les contes d'Hoffmann" ("The Tales of Hoffmann"), composed at the end of his career, that has become the most familiar of Offenbach's works in major opera houses.

Scott S. Sheppard
science
Scott S. Sheppard is an astronomer in the Department of Terrestrial Magnetism at the Carnegie Institution of Washington. He graduated from the Institute for Astronomy at the University of Hawaii.
He discovered many small moons of Jupiter, Saturn, Uranus and Neptune, the second known Neptune Trojan, 2004 UP10 as well as several Kuiper Belt Objects, Centaurs, and Near Earth Asteroids.

Erich Ludendorff
politics
Erich Friedrich Wilhelm Ludendorff (sometimes given as von Ludendorff) (April 9, 1865 – December 20, 1937) was a German Army officer, "Generalquartiermeister" during World War I, victor of Liège, and, with Paul von Hindenburg, one of the victors of the battle of Tannenberg. After the war, he briefly supported Adolf Hitler and the Nazi Party. He was was not found guilty for his role in the Nazis' unsuccessful Beer Hall Putsch. He became disillusioned with politics and retired from public life that year.

Hipparchus
science
Hipparchus (Greek; ca. 190 BC – ca. 120 BC) was a Greek astronomer, geographer, and mathematician. He lived in the Hellenistic period.
Hipparchus was born in Nicaea (now Iznik, Turkey), and probably died on the island of Rhodes. He worked as an astronomer at least from 147 BC to 127 BC. Hipparchus is considered the greatest ancient astronomical observer. Some people see him as the greatest overall astronomer of antiquity. He was the first Greek whose quantitative and accurate models for the motion of the Sun and Moon survive. To get to these models, he certainly made use of the observations and perhaps the mathematical techniques accumulated over centuries by the Chaldeans from Babylonia. He had a trigonometric table. It looks like he solved some problems of spherical trigonometry with the table. With his solar and lunar theories and his trigonometry, he was perhaps the first to develop a reliable method to predict solar eclipses. His other well-known achievements include the discovery of precession, the compilation of the first comprehensive star catalog of the western world, and possibly the invention of the astrolabe. He might also have invented the armillary sphere which first appeared during his century and was used by him during the creation of much of the star catalogue. It would be three centuries before Claudius Ptolemaeus' synthesis of astronomy would make the work of Hipparchus obsolete; it is heavily dependent on it in many areas.

DJ BoBo
music
Peter René Baumann (born January 5, 1968) better known as DJ BoBo, is a Swiss singer, songwriter, dancer and music producer. He mixed a song called "Chihuahua" in 2005. It was a remix from a Spanish single in 2002. DJ BoBo is also famous for his entry in the Eurovision Song Contest of 2007.

Carlo Gesualdo
music
Carlo Gesualdo, known as Gesualdo da Venosa (born probably 8 March 1566; died 8 September 1613), Prince of Venosa and Count of Conza, was an Italian music composer, lutenist and murderer. He lived in the late part of the Renaissance period. He is famous for his beautifully expressive madrigals which are written in a very chromatic style (using lots of sharps and flats). He is also remembered for committing a horrible murder.
Life.
Gesualdo came from an aristocratic family. He was probably born at Venosa, but we know hardly anything about his early life. We know that he was extremely interested in music when he was small and showed very little interest in anything else. He played the lute, harpsichord and guitar.
The murders.
In 1586 Gesualdo married his first cousin, Donna Maria d'Avalos, the daughter of the Marquis of Pescara. Two years later she began to have a love affair with Fabrizio Carafa, the Duke of Andria. For two years her husband knew nothing about her love affair. Then one day he returned unexpectedly to his palace (he may have suspected that something was happening) and found them making love. He murdered them both in their bed. He then left their bodies in front of the palace for everyone to see. In those days in Italy a nobleman could not be arrested and punished. However, someone might have wanted to kill him in revenge, so he ran away to the town of Gesualdo where he had a castle.
A lot of people heard about the murders. Famous poets such as Tasso wrote poems about it. Nothing was done to arrest Gesualdo, however. Some people at the time said that he also murdered one of Maria’s babies because he thought he might not have been the father. Other people even said that he murdered his father-in-law when he came wanting to kill him in revenge, but we do not know whether this was true.
Ferrara years.
In 1594 Gesualdo went to the town of Ferrara which was famous for music which was being composed by modern composers experimenting with new ideas. He spent two years there and composed his first book of madrigals. There he married another woman who was a niece of Duke Alfonso II d’Este. The couple moved back to Gesualdo in 1597.
Return to Gesualdo, and final years.
After returning to his castle at Gesualdo from Ferrara in 1595, he tried to make the town famous for music. He invited some of Italy’s most famous musicians to come and work for him. Since he was very rich he could afford to do this. However, the music making only took place in his castle. Gesualdo spent the last years of his life doing nothing except music. He hardly ever left his castle.
Gesualdo’s new marriage was not a happy one. His wife said he was cruel and she tried to divorce him. She spent a lot of time away from the castle and wrote him angry letters.
Late in life he suffered from depression and madness. We do not know whether this was because he felt bad about being a murderer, but he probably did feel guilty. He often made his servants hit him. He also wrote very strange letters to a cardinal asking him to send him some of his dead uncle’s skeleton because he thought these remains would make him better.
Gesualdo died alone at his castle. The chapel where he was buried was destroyed by an earthquake in 1688. There is still a burial plaque in the rebuilt church.
His music.
We think it is likely that Gesualdo felt terribly guilt all his life about the murders he had committed, and these guilty feelings can be heard in his music. The words of his madrigals are often very emotional: they are about "love", "pain", "death", "ecstasy", "agony". Of course, other madrigal composers used such words, but Gesualdo’s music is really extreme. It is often wildly chromatic. Other composers did not copy his style.
He wrote both sacred (religious) and secular (non-religious) songs, and some music for instruments. His most famous compositions are his six published books of madrigals (between 1594 and 1611), as well as his "Tenebrae Responsories", which are very much like madrigals, except that they use texts from the Passion story about Christ’s death on the cross.

O. J. Simpson
sports
Orenthal James "O. J." Simpson (born July 9, 1947), also known by his nickname, The Juice, is a retired American football player. He became famous because he was tried for the murder of his ex-wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friend Ronald Goldman in 1994. He originally attained stardom as a running back at the collegiate and professional levels, and was the first NFL player to rush for more than 2,000 yards in a season. He later worked as an actor, spokesman and broadcaster.
The criminal court found that Simpson was not guilty of those murders, in 1995. The criminal case was a long one. In 1997, Simpson was found liable for their wrongful deaths in civil court, but to date he has paid little of the $33.5 million judgment. He gained further notoriety in late 2006 when he wrote a book titled "If I Did It". The book, which purports to be a first-person fictional account of the murder had he actually committed it, was withdrawn by the publisher just before its release. The book was later released by the Goldman family and the title of the book was expanded to "If I Did It: Confessions of the Killer" (ISBN 978-0825305887).
In September 2007, Simpson faced more lawsuits, as he was arrested and subsequently charged with numerous felonies, including but not limited to robbery, burglary, assault, first-degree kidnapping with use of a deadly weapon (which carries possible life sentence), coercion with use of a deadly weapon, conspiracy to commit robbery, conspiracy to commit kidnapping, and conspiracy to commit a crime.

Woody Guthrie
sports
Woodrow Wilson Guthrie, better known as Woody Guthrie (July 14, 1912 – October 3, 1967), was an American folk musician and songwriter, of the 20th century.
Guthrie was said to have written over a thousand songs during his career. His more famous songs include "This Land Is Your Land", "Mail Myself To You", "This Train", "Bound For Glory", and "Hobo's Lullaby". One of his most famous albums was titled "Dust Bowl Ballads". He sang about the Great Depression, and the problems faced by farmers at the time of the Dust Bowl, when erosion and drought ruined millions of acres of farmland.
Guthrie recorded a series of songs for the United States government, about sexually transmitted diseases, that served as warnings to the public. Much of the time he appeared opposed to governments as he saw them, and also politics. Guthrie identified strongly with the Industrial Workers of the World, called the "Wobblies", and also the Communist Party, but he never joined either one. His songs, and his interpretations of older songs, spoke to people of many different beliefs. Many of his songs used old tunes, that he gave new words.
The composer names of most folk songs are lost to history, or their songs have been adapted so many times that they completely change form. Even though Guthrie and his songs were well-known, they came to be accepted as genuine folk songs. They appeared in songbooks, and were performed and recorded by many different artists, and also sung by amateurs and families at home. Guthrie worked with or influenced many later musicians. "Ramblin' Jack" Elliott was a protegé of his, who later went off on his own.
Guthie's career was cut short by a disease called Huntington's Chorea, which over time left him in a wheelchair, then finally unable to get out of bed, or even hold a guitar. He spent many years in a hospital, visited by his family and friends. Fellow folk musician Pete Seeger was a regular visitor.
One day the young Bob Dylan came to visit Guthrie. He had hitchhiked his way from Minnesota to New York, to meet Guthrie and try to become a professional musician. He played Guthrie "A Song to Woody", which he'd written as a tribute. Guthrie liked Dylan, and invited him back. Dylan stayed with the Guthrie family, and became friends with thirteen-year-old Arlo Guthrie, who also became a musician.
Guthrie died in 1967, from the effects of Huntington's Chorea. There have been many tributes made to Guthrie and his music through the years. Actor David Carradine played him in the movie "Bound for Glory". Guthrie's songs are still sung today, and are a symbol of American life.

Gerhard Ertl
science
Professor Gerhard Ertl is a German physicist in the Department of Physical Chemistry of the Fritz Haber Institute of the MPG. He was born on October 10th 1936 in Stuttgart, Germany. Professor Ertl won the Nobel prize for Chemistry in 2007.
Personal life.
Ertl and his wife Barbara have two children and several grandchildren. His hobbies include playing the piano and also playing with his cats.
Publications.
Professor Ertl is an editor of the
Education.
Professor Ertl studied physics at the Technical University of Stuttgart from 1955 to 1957. He studied at the University of Paris from 1957 to 1958 and then at Ludwig Maximillians University in Munich from 1958 to 1959. He returned to the Technical University of Stuttgart where he got a diplom of physics in 1961. Then he studied at the Technical University of Munich and got a PhD in 1965.
Work.
After getting his PhD, he stayed in Munich as an assistant and a lecturer between 1965 and 1968. Then, he moved to the Technical University of Hannover where he worked as Professor and Director from 1968 to 1973. In 1973, Professor Ertl returned to the Ludwig Maiximillians University of Munich to work as a professor at the Institute of Physical Chemistry. He worked there until 1986 and during this time was a regular visitor to the California Institute of Technology, the University of Wisconsin-Milwaukee and the University of California, in Berkeley where he worked as a visiting professor. In 1986, he became professor at the Free University of Berlin and the Technical University of Berlin. He was director at the Fritz Haber Institute of the MPG from 1986 and was also a professor at the Humboldt University of Berlin from 1996. Professor Ertl retired in 2004.
Studies.
Professor Ertl studied the molecules of ammonia, iron, carbon monoxide and palladium to help make modern catalytic converters. He studied platinum to learn about its atoms.
Professor Ertl helped to develop new ways of using microscopes. One was called low-energy electron diffraction (LEED) used at the beginning of his career and later he worked on ultraviolet photoelectron spectroscopy (UPS) and scanning tunneling microscope (STM).
Awards.
Professor Ertl and Gabor A. Somorjai won the Wolf Prize for Chemistry in 1998 for outstanding results in surface science and for discovering how crystals react to experiments.
Professor Ertl was awarded the Nobel prize for chemistry in 2007 for more studies of surface science.

Leonid Hurwicz
science
Professor Leonid "Leo" Hurwicz was an American economist and mathematician. He was born in Moscow, city in Russia on August 21, 1917. He invented the economic sciences of incentive compatibility and mechanism design. International economy and trade is studied using the ideas Professor Hurwicz had.
Hurwicz works as Regents Professor of Economics (head teacher of economics) at the University of Minnesota. Professor Hurwicz believes that game theory is very important. Hurwicz shared the 2007 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences with Eric Maskin and Roger Myerson for their work on ways mechanism design.
Personal life.
Professor Hurwicz was born in Moscow, Russia to a Jewish family a few months before the October Revolution. His family is Polish and had lived in Congress Kingdom (the part of Poland then in the Russian Empire) but they moved to Russia to escape World War I. Soon after Professor Hurwicz was born, the family returned to Warsaw, in Poland. Hurwicz and his family were treated very badly by the Bolsheviks and Nazis because they were Jewish. He became a refugee again when Hitler invaded Poland in 1939. His parents and brother ran away to Warsaw where they were arrested by the Soviets and sent to labor camps. Hurwicz was forced to move to Switzerland, then to Portugal and finally in 1940 he moved to the United States. His family joined him there after some time.
Hurwicz hired Evelyn Jensen to help him teach during the 1940s. She grew up on a Wisconsin farm and was studying economics at the University of Chicago. Leonid and Evelyn got married in 1944 and later, lived on the Mississippi River parkway in Minneapolis, Minnesota. They have four children called Sarah, Michael, Ruth and Maxim.
He has interests in linguistics, archaeology, biochemistry and music. He has researched for meteorology and is a member of the National Science Foundation department for trying to control the weather. When Eugene McCarthy ran for president of the United States (1968), Hurwicz was a Minnesota delegate to the Democratic Party Convention and a member of the Democratic Party Platform Committee.
Education and early work.
Professor Hurwiczs father wanted him to study law and he did. In 1938 Hurwicz got a degree from Warsaw University. He enjoyed studying in economics class and went to the London School of Economics with Nicholas Kaldor and Friedrich Hayek. In 1939 he moved to Geneva where he studied at the Graduate Institute of International Studies and studied Ludwig von Mises teaching. After moving to the United States he studied more economics at Harvard University and the University of Chicago. Professor Hurwicz does not have a degree in economics but he won the Nobel prize for economics in 2007. He said, "Whatever economics I learned, I learned by listening and learning."
In 1941 Hurwicz was helping Paul Samuelson to teach at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and helping Oskar Lange to teach at the University of Chicago. At Illinois Institute of Technology during the war, Hurwicz taught electronics to the U.S. Army Signal Corps. Then from 1942 to 1944, at the University of Chicago, he was a member of the faculty of the Institute of Meteorology and taught statistics in the Department of Economics. His advisors in 1942 were Jacob Marschak and Tjalling Koopmans of the University of Chicago, who now work for the Cowles Foundation at Yale University.
Teaching and studies.
Hurwicz received a Guggenheim Fellowship for 1945–1946. In 1946 he became a professor of economics at Iowa State College. From January 1942 until June 1946, he was a researcher for the Cowles Commission. He worked full time for the Cowles Commission until October 1950 until January 1951, he was a visiting professor, teaching at classes that were taught before by Professor Koopman in the Department of Economics, and he was a very important professor there. He was also a research professor of economics and statistics at the University of Illinois, a consultant to the RAND Corporation for the University of Chicago and a consultant to the U.S. government. Hurwicz continued to be a consultant to the Cowles Commission until about 1961.
Hurwicz was given a job by Walter Heller at the University of Minnesota in 1951, where he became a professor of economics and mathematics in the School of Business Administration. Most of his work for the rest of his life was in Minnesota, but he studied and was a teacher elsewhere in the United States and Asia. In 1955 and again in 1958 Hurwicz was a visiting professor, and a fellow on the second visit, at Stanford University and there in 1959 he published "Optimality and Informational Efficiency in Resource Allocation Processes" on making rules for buyers and sellers and governments share wealth. He taught at Bangalore University in 1965 and, during the 1980s, at Tokyo University, People's University (now Renmin University of China) and the University of Indonesia. In the United States he was a visiting professor at Harvard in 1969, at the University of California, Berkeley in 1976, at Northwestern University twice in 1988 and 1989, at the University of California, Santa Barbara in 1998, the California Institute of Technology in 1999 and the University of Michigan in 2002. He was a visiting Distinguished Professor at the University of Illinois in 2001.
In the University of Minnesota in 1961, Hurwicz became chairman of the Statistics Department, Regents Professor of Economics in 1969, and Curtis L. Carlson Regents Professor of Economics in 1989. He taught subjects ranging from theory to welfare economics, public economics, rules for large companies and mathematical economics. Although he retired from full time teaching in 1988, Hurwicz taught graduate school as Professor Emeritus in the autumn of 2006. In 2007 his ongoing research was described by the University of Minnesota as "comparison and analysis of systems and techniques of economic organization, welfare economics, game-theoretic implementation of social choice goals, and modeling economic institutions." Professor Hurwiczs published works in these fields date back to 1944. Professor Hurwicz is known internationally for his good work researching economic theory, specially with rules for big businesses and governments using mathematical economics. In the 1950s, he worked with Kenneth Arrow on non-linear programming. Kenneth Arrow became the youngest person to receive the Nobel Economics prize in 1972. Hurwicz helped Daniel McFadden, who won a Nobel prize in 2000.
Hurwiczs work was important to help show how large economic systems should be studied. Some of these systems are capitalism and socialism. Professor Hurwiczs ideas of how to share wealth are also very important. The theory of incentive compatibility that Hurwicz developed changed the way many economists think about sharing in the future, explaining why centrally planned economies may fail and how rewards for certain people make a difference when making decisions.
Hurwicz is part of teams who edit several journals. He co-edited and contributed to two collections for Cambridge University Press: "Studies in Resource Allocation Processes" (1978, with Kenneth Arrow) and "Social Goals and Social Organization" (1987, with David Schmeidler and Hugo Sonnenschein). His recent journals include "Economic Theory" (2003, with Thomas Marschak), "Review of Economic Design" (2001, with Stanley Reiter) and "Advances in Mathematical Economics" (2003, with Marcel K. Richter). Hurwicz has taught works by Fisher-Schultz (1963), Richard T. Ely (1972), David Kinley (1989) and Colin Clark (1997).
Memberships and honorary degrees.
Hurwicz was voted to be a fellow of the Econometric Society in 1947 and in 1969 was the Econometric Societys president. Hurwicz was made part of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1965. In 1974 he was made a part of the National Academy of Sciences and in 1977 was made a Distinguished Fellow of the American Economic Association. Hurwicz was given a National Medal of Science in 1990 by by President of the United States George H. W. Bush, for studying Behavorial and Social Science, given to him for his new work on the theories of how to share wealth in modern decentralization.
He served on the United Nations Economic Commission in 1948 and the United States National Research Council in 1954. In 1964 he was a member of the National Science Foundation Commission on Weather Modification. He is a member of the American Academy of Independent Scholars (1979) and a Distinguished Scholar of the California Institute of Technology (1984).
Hurwicz has received six honorary doctorates (PhD), from Northwestern University (1980), the University of Chicago (1993), Universitat Autònoma de Barcelona (1989), Keio University (1993), Warsaw School of Economics (1994) and Universität Bielefeld (2004). He is an honorary visiting professor of the Huazhong University of Science and Technology School of Economics (1984).
Using Hurwiczs name.
Some important things have been given Professor Hurwiczs name such as the "Hurwicz criterion", an idea that Professor Hurwicz had in 1950, and is thought of as very important for economics. The Hurwicz Criterion is also called "under uncertainty". Hurwicz had the idea of putting Abraham Walds work together with work done by Pierre-Simon Laplace in 1812. Hurwiczs Criterion tells people to think very carefully of what is good and what is bad before making decisions. Different types of Hurwiczs Criterion have been thought of. Leonard Jimmie Savage made some changes to the first Hurwiczs criterion in 1954. The four peoples work — Laplace, Wald, Hurwicz and Savage — that the Hurwicz Critereon has been based on was studied, corrected and used for over fifty years by many different people including John Milnor, G. L. S. Shackle, Daniel Ellsberg, R. Duncan Luce and Howard Raiffa, but some people say the work was started by Jacob Bernoulli.
The "Leonid Hurwicz Distinguished Lecture" is given to the Minnesota Economic Association. John Ledyard (2007), Robert Lucas, Roger Myerson, Edward C. Prescott, James Quirk, Nancy Stokey and Neil Wallace are some of the people who have given the lecture since it was thought to be important in 1992.
Nobel Economics Prize.
In October 2007, Hurwicz shared "The Sveriges Riksbank Prize in Economic Sciences in Memory of Alfred Nobel" with Eric Maskin of the Institute for Advanced Study and Roger Myerson of the University of Chicago "for having laid the foundations of mechanism design theory." During a telephone interview, a member of the Nobel Foundation told Hurwicz and his wife that Hurwicz is the oldest person ever to win the Nobel Prize. Hurwicz said, "I hope that others who deserve it also got it." When he was asked what the most important part of mechanism design is, he said welfare economics. The three Nobel prize winners used game theory work by mathematician John Forbes Nash, to discover the best way to reach a good outcome, without forgetting individual people. Mechanism design has been used as a guide for talks and taxation, voting and elections, to design auctions such as those for communications bandwidth, elections and labor talks and for pricing business stocks.
Professor Hurwicz was not able to attend the Nobel Prize ceremony in Stockholm because of his age, Hurwicz received the prize in Minneapolis. Accompanied by Evelyn, his wife for sixty years, and his family, he was the most important guest at a meeting in the University of Minnesota with the university president Robert Bruininks. After watching the Nobel Prize awards ceremony on television, Jonas Hafstrom, the Swedish ambassador to the United States, awarded the Economics Prize to Professor Hurwicz.

Cleo Lemon
sports
Cleotha Lemon, Jr. (born August 16, 1979 in Greenwood, Mississippi) is an American football quarterback. He currently plays for the Jacksonville Jaguars of the National Football League (NFL). He started playing in the NFL for the Baltimore Ravens in 2002. Lemon played for the San Diego Chargers from 2003 to 2005. He then played for the Miami Dolphins until the 2007 season. He played college football at Arkansas State.

Norbert Brainin
music
Norbert Brainin, (March 12, 1923 – April 10 2005), was the first violinist of the Amadeus Quartet, one of the world's most highly regarded string quartets.
Because of Brainin's Jewish origin, he was driven out of Vienna after Hitler's Anschluss of 1938, as were the violinist Siegmund Nissel and violist Peter Schidlof. Brainin and Schidlof met in a British internment camp, many Jewish refugees having had the misfortune of being confined by the British as "enemy aliens" upon seeking refuge in the UK
Brainin was released after a few months, but Schidlof remained in the camp, where he met Nissel. Finally Schidlof and Nissel were released, and the three of them were able to study with violin pedagogue Max Rostal, who taught them free of charge. It was through Rostal that they met cellist Martin Lovett, and in 1947 they formed the Brainin Quartet, which was renamed the Amadeus Quartet in 1948.
The quartet disbanded in 1987 upon the death of Schidlof, who was regarded as irreplaceable by other members. Norbert Brainin continued to perform as a soloist, often performing with pianist Günter Ludwig.
His instruments included the "Rode" Guarnerius del Gesu of 1734, the "Chaconne" Stradivarius of 1725 and the "Gibson" Stradivarius of 1713.

Valeri Brainin
music
Valeri Brainin, Russian/German musicologist, music manager, composer, and poet. Born 27th of January 1948 in Nizhni Tagil, Russia, in the family of Austrian poet and translator, political emigre Boris Brainin (Sepp Österreicher), who belonged to the well-known Viennese Brainin family. He lives at the moment both in Hanover, Germany, and in Moscow.
Positions.
President (from 2004) of the Russian Federation Society for Music Education (RussSME) – National Affiliate of the International Society for Music Education (ISME), a member of UNESCO.
Head of the Laboratory of New Technologies in Music Education, Moscow State Pedagogical University.
Art Director of Classica Nova International Music Competition.
Art Director of the net of Brainin Music Schools (Brainin-Musikschulen), Germany.
He has directed seminars/master courses at conservatoires and universities in Austria, Columbia, Germany, Italy, Russia, USA, etc. In addition he offered weekly music talks on Radio Liberty from Munich and Prague, and has literary, critical and scientific musical publications in Russian, German, English, and Italian.
Music activities.
Brainin is a full Member of the International Teacher's Training Academy of Science (Moscow), and of other scientific/pedagogical societies, he studied mathematics, linguistics, musical pedagogics, music theory and composition. He has had works performed in the Bolshoi Theatre, Moscow, and taught at Moscow's Gnessin Music School for specially gifted children. The Brainin Teaching Method for ‘development of musical intelligence in children’ became a standard part of the curriculum. He is also a noted piano teacher for children. Among his former students there are some prize-winers of national and international competitions.
Literary activities.
Russian poet (also known as Valeri (Willi) Brainin-Passek), a pupil of Arseny Tarkovsky, a member (1985-1990) of Moscow Club „Poezia“ () together with Yury Arabov, Jewgenij Bunimovitch, Mikhail Epstein, Alexandr Eremenko, Sergej Gandlevskij, Nina Iskrenko, Timur Kibirov, Alexei Parshchikov, Dmitri Prigov, Lev Rubinstein, a. o.
literary magazines "Znamya" (Moscow), "Novy Mir" (Moscow), "Arion" (Moscow), "Ogonyok" (Moscow), "Grani" (Frankfurt-am-Main), "Dvadtsat dva" (Jerusalem), "Kreshchatik" (Kiev), anthologies "Verses of the Century" (Moscow, compiled by Yevgeny Yevtushenko) and "Verses of the Century-2" (Moscow).
literary magazine "Partisan Review" (Boston).

Tony Hibbert
sports
Tony Hibbert (born 20 February 1981 in Liverpool) in an English footballer. He plays for Everton F.C. in the FA Premier League.
He is a defender who plays on the right side. He is well known at Everton for his tackling but his passing and crossing has let him down on more than one occasion. He made his debut for Everton against West Ham United F.C.. In this game he won a penalty for Everton. Hibbert has been at Everton for all of his career.

Leighton Baines
sports
Leighton Baines is an English footballer who plays for Everton in the FA Premier League and moved there from Wigan Athletic in 2007. He is a defender who plays on the left side but has not played many games because of injuries. He wears the number 3 on his Everton shirt and has also played for England in special matches for players under 21 years of age only. He has scored only one goal while playing for England and scored four times while at Wigan. He is yet to score for Everton.

Joseph Yobo
sports
Joseph Yobo (born 6 September, 1980) is a Nigerian footballer who plays for Everton in the FA Premier League.
He is a defender who normally plays in the centre, but can play on the right of defence or in midfield.
He signed from French side Olympique Marseille in 2001 and has become a favourite at Everton ever since.
He is the Everton vice-captain and first captained Everton against Larissa in a 3-1 victory in the UEFA Cup, replacing the injured Phil Neville.
Yobo is also captain of the national Nigerian side.
When he first joined Everton he wore the number 20 on his shirt, but this changed to 4 when Alan Stubbs left for Sunderland F.C.

Joleon Lescott
sports
Joleon Lescott is an English footballer who plays for Everton in the FA Premier League.
He is a defender who can play on the left or in the centre.
He signed for Everton in 2006 from Wolverhampton Wanderers. Since then he has become a firm favourite with the Everton fans and was called up to the England squad in 2007 by manager Steve McLaren.
When he joined Everton in 2006, Lescott wore the number 16 on his shirt, but after David Weir left for Glasgow Rangers this has changed to 5.

Mikel Arteta
sports
Mikel Arteta is a Spanish footballer who plays for Everton F.C. in the FA Premier League. He plays soccer as a midfielder.
He first signed for Everton on loan from Spanish side Real Sociedad in 2005, but after many good performances manager David Moyes made this move permanent.
Despite being rated one of the best midfielders in English football, Arteta has never played for Spain.

Democratic-Republican Party
politics
The Democratic-Republican Party was founded by Thomas Jefferson and James Madison in 1792. It became the dominant political party until the 1820s, when it split into competing factions, one of which became the modern-day Democratic Party. Its members spoke of the party as the Republicans, Jeffersonians, Democrats, or combinations of these (Jeffersonian republicans, etc.).
Jefferson and Madison created the party in order to oppose the economic and foreign policies of the Federalists, a party created a year or so earlier by Treasury Secretary Alexander Hamilton. Foreign policy issues were central; the party opposed the Jay Treaty of 1794 with Britain (then at war with France) and supported good relations with France before 1801. The party was against many of Hamilton's proposals concerning the Constitution.

Federalist Party
politics
The Federalist Party (or Federal Party) was an American political party in the period 1792 to 1816. The Federalists controlled the federal government until 1801. The party was formed by Alexander Hamilton, who, during George Washington's first term, built a network of supporters, largely urban, to support his finacial policies. These supporters grew into the Federalist Party, which wanted a fiscally sound and strong nationalistic government and was opposed by the Democratic-Republicans.
With the start of the new government under the Constitution, President George Washington appointed his former chief of staff, Alexander Hamilton, to the office of Secretary of the Treasury. Hamilton wanted a strong national government with financial credibility.
By 1790 Hamilton started building a nationwide coalition. He his network of treasury agents to link together friends of the government, especially merchants and bankers, in the new nation's dozen major cities. His attempts to manage politics in the national capital to get his plans through Congress, then, "brought strong responses across the country. In the process, what began as a capital faction soon assumed status as a national faction and then, finally, as the new Federalist party."

That's What You Get
music
That's What You Get is a 2008 song by Paramore. It is off the album "RIOT!". Its music video was released on March 24, 2008.
It's the music video about which hayley said "You will really get to see who they are. We had a load of family and friends surround us for the video and it just felt so natural"
Also, in the video, the band plays in a room, as well as hayley outside singing to an audience and using body language

Infinity on High
music
"Infinity on High" is a 2007 album by Fall Out Boy. Five singles have been released from it. They are This Ain't a Scene, It's an Arms Race, The Carpal Tunnel of Love, Thnks fr th Mmrs, "The Take Over, the Breaks Over" and I'm Like a Lawyer with the Way I'm Always Trying to Get You off (Me & You).
Track listing.
All songs written by Fall Out Boy, except when noted.

Donald Tusk
politics
Donald Tusk (, born 22 April 1957, Gdańsk) is the Prime Minister of Poland (from 2007). He is also the leader of the biggest Polish political party, Platforma Obywatelska (Civic Platform).

What Will the Neighbours Say?
music
"What Will The Neighbours Say?" was a 2004 album by Girls Aloud. It was their second album.

Tangled Up
music
"Tangled Up" was a 2007 album by Girls Aloud. It was their fifth album.

Ken Hitchcock
sports
Ken Hitchcock (born December 17, 1951 in Edmonton, Alberta) is a NHL ice hockey coach. He coaches the Columbus Blue Jackets. He has also coached the Dallas Stars and the Philadelphia Flyers in the past. Ken has won one Stanley Cup with the Dallas Stars in the 1998-99 NHL season.

The Beatles (album)
music
"The Beatles" is a 1968 album by the band of the same name, The Beatles. Its cover included no photographs, but was a simple white jacket, with the band's name die-stamped onto the paper. Early copies also included a serial number. The plain white cover led fans and listeners to call the record the "White Album". In time, even the band and their company, Apple Corps, began to use this name.
"The Beatles" was the band's twelfth album of new recordings, and was released in November 1968. While most albums of the time included ten to fourteen songs, "The Beatles" included thirty-four songs, and was sold as a two-disc set.
Origins.
The Beatles began writing songs for the album while they were in India, taking a teaching course in Transcendental Meditation taught by the Maharishi Mahesh Yogi in Rishikesh. They planned to become gurus, or spiritual teachers, and use their music to spread Transcendental Meditation to a wide audience. Their helpers back in England looked after their business matters, so the Beatles could have time to study, and to think about what they learned. They released a new single, "Lady Madonna", just before they left for India, so they would not be missed by their fans while they were away.
Between classes and meditation sessions, the Beatles had plenty of free time. They brought some instruments with them, including acoustic guitars, and began to write new songs. "We wrote "tons" of songs in India," John Lennon later told "Playboy" magazine. Their wives and girlfriends also came along to India. Lennon and his wife Cynthia did not spend much time together. He would leave alone in the morning, to pick up the mail. It turned out he was receiving letters and postcards from Yoko Ono, a Japanese artist friend, and did not want Cynthia to know. He said later that while he was in India, he began to think about Ono "as a woman, not just an intellectual woman", and that he might want a romantic relationship with her.
In the end, none of the Beatles finished the course, and returned home to England. Ringo Starr did not like the spicy food served at the ashram where the Maharishi lived and taught, and it made him ill. He also missed his children. Paul McCartney became tired of the long sessions, and wanted to return home. Lennon and George Harrison heard stories that the Maharishi had flirted with Mia Farrow (an American actress who also took the course), and other women at the ashram. They did not think this was right for a "holy man" to do. They confronted the Maharishi, and later left with their wives to go home, deciding the Maharishi was a fraud.
Apple Corps.
The Beatles had formed their own company, Apple Corps, before they went to India. When they returned, they went to work full-time to make Apple Corps, and especially its record label, Apple Records, a success. To raise money, the Beatles had signed a new recording contract with EMI, the company who owned Parlophone Records, which made and sold their records. They also made an agreement with EMI for them to market Apple Records.
The Beatles needed to record seventy new songs within nine years, between 1967 and 1976, to complete their contract. They believed that once they delivered those seventy recordings, they would be free to go to another record company. Between all the songs they wrote in India, and their backlog of older songs, they knew they could finish the job. They recorded demoes of many of the songs at George Harrison's house, using his four-track tape recorder, then began work on the album at Abbey Road Studios in London.
The Beatles's record producer, George Martin, thought they should take the best of the India songs, and make one especially good album. The Beatles instead decided to make a double album, with as many songs on it as possible, to help finish their contract quickly.
Personal changes.
The lives of the individual Beatles changed greatly during 1968, and the making of the "White Album". Paul McCartney was engaged to actress Jane Asher, but she came home early one day and found him with another woman, Francine Schwartz, an American who worked for Apple Corps. She and McCartney fought, then made up, but decided to break up later. McCartney also began to use cocaine. The drug made him hard to get along with. Later in the year he met another woman, Linda Eastman, an American photographer who had a daughter. McCartney loved children and wanted to start a family, while Jane Asher wanted to put her acting career first. Linda boasted that she would be proud to have McCartney's children. She and McCartney became very close, very quickly.
John Lennon invited Yoko Ono to his house, while Cynthia was away on a vacation with friends, one weekend in May. The two spent a night together in Lennon's attic studio, listening to his avant-garde recordings and finally making one of their own. Lennon discovered Ono was "as barmy (crazy) as I was", and that they connected personally in a way he and Cynthia never had. They finished the recording, and had intercourse as the sun rose that morning. They woke up late the next day, in love with each other, and decided to stay together from then on, even though they were both married to other people. Lennon's wife Cynthia and Ono's husband Anthony Cox both took the news very hard, with their children (Lennon's son Julian by Cynthia, and Ono's daughter Kyoko by Cox) caught in the middle.
George Harrison had grown as a musician and songwriter, and as a celebrity. He was the youngest member of the Beatles, and always felt "under the thumb" of Lennon and McCartney. They and George Martin limited how many of Harrison's songs the Beatles recorded, and turned down many of his songs that other bands would be happy to record. This frustrated Harrison. Almost nobody outside the Beatles knew about the situation. Friends like Ravi Shankar, who was Harrison's first real music teacher, and Eric Clapton, a phenomenal guitarist himself, treated him differently. Most of the public saw Harrison as an equal with Lennon and McCartney. Harrison began to think about making his own music, away from the Beatles.
Back at Abbey Road, Ringo Starr felt out of place during the recording sessions, and that he was not needed. Paul McCartney had not liked Starr's drumming on a song, and re-recorded the part himself when Starr was not there. This hurt Starr's feelings, and he decided to leave the band. He stayed home for a week, playing with his children and deciding what he should do next with his life. The other Beatles missed him, and invited him back. When Starr returned, McCartney and Harrison had covered his drums with flowers and welcome-back messages. Starr felt loved by his bandmates, and stayed.
The changes in the band's personal lives showed in their new recordings. Instead of sounding like a band working together, the songs sounded like solo artists working with a backing group. They also began to have problems getting along. Lennon brought Ono to the studio whenever he came, breaking a rule they had never to bring wives or girlfriends to sessions. Ono, who was also a musician, spoke her mind about how the music sounded, and it took everyone else by surprise. Harrison also began to speak up more for himself, when the band played together.
Outside the studio, people who worked for the Beatles, and the Beatles's fans in England, did not like Ono's influence on Lennon, and let the couple know often, and sometimes loudly. When they attended a play based on Lennon's writings, the audience harassed the pair, asking "Where's your wife, John?" Some members of the public made racist comments about Ono, or called her ugly.
Ono's new presence in Lennon's life even drove a wedge between him and McCartney. When the couple stayed at McCartney's house, McCartney left Lennon a note that insulted Ono greatly. He admitted later it had only been a joke, but Lennon felt like he no longer even knew McCartney, if he could make such an insult.
Neither Lennon nor Ono could believe the way they were treated by the public, by people who worked for the Beatles, and even by Lennon's friends. They felt hurt and hated. A friend suggested they try heroin, to relieve the pain they felt. Before long, the two were addicted to the drug. It caused problems with their health, and with how they acted in public.
"Hey Jude" and "Revolution".
Recording the "White Album" took much longer than the Beatles normally spent on an album. Their label, Apple Records, was expected to make a big debut over the summer, while the album would not be ready until at least that fall. In the meantime, they recorded songs for a single, as their part of the debut. Paul McCartney visited Cynthia and Julian, at their new home. He knew they were hurt by Lennon's leaving Cynthia for Yoko Ono, and he made up a song for Julian on the way, to cheer him up. Its words went "Hey Jules, it's not so bad. Take a sad song, and make it better." This turned into "Hey Jude", which became the Beatles's biggest hit single ever, and one of the first pop songs to last longer than three minutes.
The B-side of "Hey Jude" was "Revolution", a song by Lennon in reaction to the Soviet Union's crackdown on student protests in Czechoslovakia, the ongoing war in Vietnam, and calls around the world for a revolution against the status quo. He hoped the band's first recording of the song would become their next single, but it was rejected as too slow and too long. He re-recorded the song, faster this time, lying on the studio floor to give the vocals more "punch". "Hey Jude" was seen as a bigger potential hit though, so "Revolution" became the B-side. The Beatles performed both songs live for an audience, and the performances appeared on "The David Frost Show" in England, and "The Smothers Brothers Comedy Hour" in America.
Album songs.
The songs appearing on the "White Album" included "Back In The USSR", McCartney's parody of songs by The Beach Boys and Chuck Berry. (Mike Love of the Beach Boys attended the Maharishi's course in India, at the same time as the Beatles.) McCartney normally played bass guitar, and Lennon rhythm guitar, on Beatles recordings, but this time McCartney played piano, with Lennon switching to bass guitar for the song.
"Dear Prudence" was about Mia Farrow's sister Prudence, who was also at the ashram in India. She spent long stretches of time meditating, and almost never came outside. Lennon wrote the song hoping to bring her out, to spend time with everyone. The guitar style he used on the song (and many songs afterwards) was the "clawhammer", a fingerpicking technique he learned from Donovan, another musician who went to India with them.
"Glass Onion" referenced recent songs and events in the Beatles's lives, and gave a false clue: "The Walrus was Paul". Lennon said later he'd given the line as a joke, and as a way to "say hi to Paul" McCartney. "The Continuing Story of Bungalow Bill" was about another of the Maharishi's students, who left the ashram to hunt tigers, then returned to meditate. "Julia" was about Lennon's mother, who had died ten years earlier, with images of Yoko Ono, whose name means "Ocean Child" in English.
"Sexy Sadie" was about Lennon's disappointment with the Maharishi: "You made a fool of everyone." He changed "Maharishi" to "Sexy Sadie", in case the Maharishi really could use some kind of spiritual or cosmic power (or start a lawsuit) against him, but later confessed to "Rolling Stone" magazine who the song was about.
"Ob-La-Di, Ob-La-Da" was a retro song by McCartney. His songs on the album varied from old-fashioned to hard rock, such as "Helter Skelter", which was about a fairground ride. He also used fingerpicking styles on acoustic guitar, and his songs "Blackbird" and "Mother Nature's Son" included nature themes.
"While My Guitar Gently Weeps" showed Harrison's growth as a songwriter, and featured a guitar solo by Eric Clapton. It was the first time a guitar solo was played by a non-Beatle on a Beatles record. "Long Long Long" was about Harrison's rediscovery of God and spirituality as he became older. "Savoy Truffle" was about a box of Good News chocolate candies, which Clapton loved, but were harming his teeth.
Ringo Starr had tinkered with writing songs, but most were just variations on songs written by other people. "Don't Pass Me By" was one of his first efforts, from years earlier, and one of his first to sound original. He went on to write many other songs, in the years after the Beatles. Most were written with a partner, Vini Poncia.
The strangest recording included on the album was "Revolution 9", an avant-garde "picture of a revolution as it happens", as Lennon described later. George Harrison helped with ideas and narration. McCartney and George Martin did not want the track included on the album, but Lennon insisted it be used.
Release and reception.
When the recordings were ready to be mastered, Lennon and McCartney spent forty-eight hours at Abbey Road Studios, working out the running order for the songs on the album. They took stimulant drugs to help them get through the marathon session. The band had done photo sessions during the year, but could not agree on any photos to use for the cover. They decided to go with a plain white cover, which had never been done before. They and their helpers made a collage of different photos, which was included as a poster with the album. Portrait photos of each member were also taken. Black-and-white prints appeared next to the song titles on the inner jacket, and colour prints were included with the poster. They did not appear together in the pictures, and this was taken later as a sign that the band was growing apart.
The album was completed, and scheduled to be released during November 1968. Coming out at nearly the same time were two "solo albums" by Lennon and Harrison, and this caused some problems. Harrison's was "Wonderwall Music", a soundtrack album to the movie "Wonderwall" by director Joe Massot. Harrison had recorded parts of the album in India, and parts in England. The only other Beatle involved with the album was Ringo Starr, who played drums on a few songs, and attended the movie's premiere with Harrison.
Lennon's album with Ono was "Two Virgins", edited down from the recording he made with Yoko Ono the first night they were together. The cover was a pair of nude photos of the couple, and it caused a lot of controversy. EMI was willing to master and press the album, but refused to print the cover or distribute any copies. Apple Records arranged for Track Records, a label owned by The Who, to issue "Two Virgins". The album was sold in a "plain brown wrapper" like pornography, and was not a hit. Only a few copies were pressed in Britain, and more copies were impounded in America than were sold. Many people thought Lennon was trying to destroy his own public image, releasing such an album. In a way they were right. He felt that the album was an honest statement of who he "really was", appearing naked with the woman he loved.
Problems aside, "The Beatles" sold well, and was another hit for the band. The Beatles held a release party, and gave early copies of the album to people who attended. (Peter Shotton, an old friend of Lennon's who worked for Apple, was given the eighth copy pressed, as he remembered later in his memoir.) Older people liked McCartney's traditional-sounding songs. Younger listeners liked the rock and acoustic songs on the album. Many people noticed Harrison and Starr's growth as songwriters, and that Harrison's voice sounded freer, smoother, and more confident than on earlier records.
Charles Manson, an American would-be musician with a small group of followers, heard the album in California, and thought the songs "Blackbird" and "Helter Skelter" were calls for a racial war, between African-American (black) and Caucasian (white) people. His beliefs resulted in a series of murders in Los Angeles during 1969, as he ordered members of his "Manson Family" to try to spark such a war, by committing hate crimes. Later during his trial, his lawyers tried to get John Lennon (staying in California at the time) or George Harrison to testify, but this never happened. Manson and four Family members were convicted of multiple murder. They were sentenced to be executed, but when the US Supreme Court overturned the death penalty, their sentences were changed to life imprisonment. None have ever been paroled.
During 1969, Allen Klein began to work for the Beatles, and for Apple Corps. He re-read the Beatles's recording contract, and pointed out that even after the band turned in their seventy new recordings to EMI, they were still under contract with them until 1976, and could not go to any other record company until then. The fact that they were so close to meeting the requirement, though, made it possible for him to re-negotiate their contract, and get them higher royalty payments.
The personal problems that had begun to show while the Beatles were making the "White Album" continued over the next year, as did problems with Apple Corps. McCartney stopped using cocaine, while Lennon and Ono tried to stop using heroin, but this did not help mend feelings between the Beatles. They finished two more albums, "Let it Be" and "Abbey Road", but the band broke apart soon afterwards, with Paul McCartney announcing in 1970 that he was starting a solo career.
In time, budget cutbacks resulted in the album's cover no longer being die-stamped (the title was printed instead) or numbered, but when it was re-issued on compact disc, early copies were again given serial numbers.

Albert Fert
science
Professor Albert Fert is a French physicist who was born on March 7 1938. He discovered giant magnetoresistance which was used to make gigabyte hard disks much easier to build. He is a professor at Université Paris-Sud in Orsay and scientific director of a laboratory called Unité mixte de recherche. The laboratory is part of the Centre national de la recherche scientifique (National Scientific Research Centre) and Thales Group. He was awarded the 2007 Nobel Prize in Physics together with Peter Grünberg.
Studies.
Professor Fert graduated in 1962 from the École Normale Supérieure in Paris. He received his master's degree in 1963 at the University of Paris, and earned his PhD in 1970 at the Université Paris-Sud.
In 1988 Fert discovered Giant magnetoresistance (GMR) in iron and chromium which began spintronics; GMR was also discovered by Peter Grünberg from the Jülich Research Centre but Peter Grünberg did not work with Professor Fert. Since 1988, Albert Fert has helped to improve spintronics.

Peter Grünberg
science
Professor Peter Andreas Grünberg is a German physicist who was born on May 18, 1939. Professor Grünberg won the 2007 Nobel Prize in Physics for his discovery of giant magnetoresistance which made gigabyte hard disk drives easier to produce. Half the prize was given to Albert Fert who discovered giant magnetoresistance at the same time but Fert and Grünberg did not work together.
Early life.
Grünberg was born in Pilsen, Bohemia, which was controlled by the Nazis. They called the country the Protectorate of Bohemia and Moravia and it is known now as the Czech Republic. Grünbergs father was called Fjodor Grinberg but he changed his name to Fjodor Grünberg in 1941.
The rest of the Grünberg family stayed for some time in the Petermann house in Untersekerschan, but after World War II anyone living in Pilsen who spoke German, were made to leave the country by the Czech government. This was called the Beneš decrees. He moved with his mother (who died in 2002 aged 100) and sister to Lauterbach, Hesse. He studied at a gymnasium (second level school) there.
Grünberg received a diploma in 1962 from the Johann Wolfgang Goethe University. Then he studied at the Darmstadt University of Technology in Germany, where he received his diploma in physics in 1966 and his Ph.D. in 1969. From 1969-1972, he did studied at Carleton University in Ottawa, Canada. Later he joined the Institute for Solid State Physics at the Jülich Research Centre, where he became a leading researcher of magnetism until he retired in 2004.
Important work.
Professor Grünberg made important discoveries with ferrite (iron) and magnetism such as the Giant magnetoresistive effect (GMR) in 1988. GMR has been used in many modern hard drives. Another use of the GMR effect is in magnetic random access memory.
Apart from the Nobel Prize, Professor Grünberg has been awarded with shared prizes in the APS International Prize for New Materials, the International Union of Pure and Applied Physics Magnetism Award, the Hewlett-Packard Europhysics Prize, the Wolf Prize in Physics in and the 2007 Japan Prize. He won the German Future Prize for Technology and Innovation in 1998 and was named European Inventor of the Year in the category "Universities and research institutions" by the European Patent Office and European Commission in 2006.

England national football team
sports
The England national football team are a team who play association football for England. They play their matches in England at Wembley Stadium. They won the football World Cup in 1966 when they beat West Germany by 4 goals to 2 at the old Wembley Stadium.
They missed out on qualification for the 2008 European Championships. They are currently managed by Fabio Capello, an Italian who has had primary football success in Spain and Italy. Capello is the second foreigner to be the England manager (the first was Sven-Göran Eriksson)
Most recent squad.
These players were in the squad for the friendly against Germany on 19 November 2008.

Sheffield United F.C.
sports
Sheffield United F.C. is an English association football club who play in Sheffield, Yorkshire, England. They play their home games at a stadium called Bramall Lane and have the nickname "Blades".

Enoch Powell
politics
Enoch Powell (June 16, 1912 – February 8, 1998) was a British politician in the Conservative Party. He was a government minister in the 1950s and early 1960s. He made a speech in 1968 in which he said that if the United Kingdom let too many black people to come and live there, there would be fighting. In 1974 he left the Conservative Party and became an MP in Northern Ireland.

Stoke City F.C.
sports
Stoke City F.C. is an English association football club based in Stoke-on-Trent. They started in 1863 which makes them the second oldest Football League club in the world. Stoke City play their home games at a stadium called the Britannia Stadium.
One of Stoke City's most famous players was Stanley Matthews.

Stanley Matthews
sports
Stanley Matthews (1 February 1915 - 23 February 2000) was a famous English footballer. He was born in Stoke-on-Trent. Matthews played football for Stoke City F.C. and Blackpool F.C.. He was knighted in 1965 and he died in 2000.

Sheffield Wednesday F.C.
sports
Sheffield Wednesday F.C. is an English association football club. They are based in Sheffield, South Yorkshire. They play their home matches at a stadium called Hillsborough Stadium.
The club plays in the English Football League Championship.

Wolverhampton Wanderers F.C.
sports
Wolverhampton Wanderers are an English association football club. They are based in Wolverhampton, West Midlands. The club started in 1877 and play their home games at a stadium called Molineux Stadium. They have won the FA Cup four times.

Jamie Redknapp
sports
Jamie Redknapp is an English footballer. He was born in 1973 and played for Liverpool F.C., Tottenham Hotspur F.C., A.F.C. Bournemouth and Southampton F.C.. His father, Harry Redknapp, is the manager of Portsmouth F.C.

Roger D. Kornberg
science
Professor Roger David Kornberg is an American biochemist who was born on. He is a professor of structural biology at Stanford University School of Medicine.
Kornberg was awarded the Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 2006 for studying eukaryotic transcription which is something that DNA does. His father, Arthur Kornberg, who was a professor at Stanford University, was awarded the Nobel Prize in Medicine in 1959.
He was also awarded a Ph.D. from Umeå University in Sweden.
Early life.
Kornberg was born in St. Louis, Missouri to a Jewish family. He was the first of three children born to Arthur Kornberg and his wife, Sylvy. These parents worked together as biochemists.
Roger Kornberg earned his bachelor's degree from Harvard University in 1967 and his Ph.D. from Stanford University in 1972. He then became a fellow at the Laboratory of Molecular Biology in Cambridge, England.
Important studies.
All creatures are in some part controlled by their genes. For the creature to make use of the information in the genes, a copy of part of the gene must be made and sent to edge of a cell. The copying is called transcription. Transcription makes an RNA copy of part of the DNA. The RNA is moved out of the cell nucleus, where it does its work. This is called messenger RNA and gives instructions for protein production, called translation. Normally the genes give the instructions for what the proteins will do. The RNA with the instructions for proteins is called RNA polymerase II. Professor Kornberg has worked in eukaryotes to understand all this. This study involves the evolution of all plants and creatures, i.e., everything from yeast to humans.
After Professor Kornberg was awarded his Ph.D. he worked with Aaron Klug and Francis Crick at the MRC in the 1970s. He discovered the nucleosome as a very important protein in DNA. Within the nucleosome, Kornberg found that roughly 200 bp of DNA are wrapped around an octamer of histone proteins.
Kornberg's research group at Stanford were able to make cells that are a part of everything from yeast to humans.
Using his system, Kornberg made the discovery that signals to the RNA are made by another protein that they called "Mediator". The Nobel Prize committee said, "the great complexity of eukaryotic organisms is actually enabled by the fine interplay between tissue-specific substances, enhancers in the DNA and Mediator. The discovery of Mediator is therefore a true milestone in the understanding of the transcription process."
At the same as Kornberg was studying biochemistry, he used two decades trying to make microscopes that could take pictures of RNA and the proteins. Kornberg was an expert at studying lipid membranes. Lipid membranes are flat crystals and they can be pictured with an electron microscope in low-quality. After a lot of study, Kornberg was able to use X-ray crystallography to take 3D pictures of RNA atoms (see atom). Professor Kornbergs pictures of RNA are the best pictures of protein ever. He has made good pictures of other proteins. With these studies, Kornberg has created a picture of how DNA works. The Nobel Prize committee said, "the truly revolutionary aspect of the picture Kornberg has created is that it captures the process of transcription in full flow. What we see is an RNA-strand being constructed, and hence the exact positions of the DNA, polymerase and RNA during this process."
In 1959, Roger Kornbergs father, Arthur Kornberg, received the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine for studies of how genetic information moves from one DNA molecule to another. This is called DNA replication. Arthur Kornberg found the first enzyme that could make DNA. This was the first known enzyme to take its instructions from a DNA copy. Roger Kornbergs younger brother, Thomas Bill Kornberg, discovered DNA polymerases II and III in 1970 and is now a geneticist at the University of California, San Francisco. All three Kornbergs have worked to understand how genetic information is used in cells. Roger and Arthur Kornberg are the sixth father and son to win Nobel Prizes.

All We Know Is Falling
music
"All We Know Is Falling" is the debut album the band Paramore. It was recorded in just three weeks. In April 2006, the CD was released in the UK. In 2005, a Japanese version was released, with the bonus track "O, Star".
Music videos.
Paramore released three videos from their debut album. The first was for the single "All We Know", followed by "Pressure", and "Emergency".

Harry Redknapp
sports
Harry Redknapp is an English association football manager. He is currently in charge of English club Tottenham Hotspur Before he became a manager he used to play football, mainly for West Ham United F.C. His son is Jamie Redknapp who was also a footballer.

Bobby Charlton
sports
Bobby Charlton (born 11 October, 1937) used to be an English footballer who played for the England national football team. He was born in 1937 and played over 600 times for Manchester United F.C. He also played for England over 100 times and scored more goals than any other player. He played for England when they beat Germany in the World Cup final in 1966.

Gary Lineker
sports
Gary Lineker used to play association football. He was born in 1960 and he played for Leicester City F.C. and Tottenham Hotspur F.C.. He also scored 48 goals for the England national football team. He is now on television on the BBC on Match of the Day.

Geoff Hurst
sports
Geoff Hurst used to be a professional footballer. He was born in 1941 and played association football for West Ham United F.C. over 400 times. He also played for the England national football team and scored a hat trick (three goals) in the 1966 World Cup final which England won 4–2.

Alf Ramsey
sports
Alf Ramsey was an English footballer and football manager. He was born in 1920 and played for Southampton F.C. and Tottenham Hotspur F.C. He also played for the England national football team 32 times and scored three goals. Alf Ramsey was in charge of Ipswich Town F.C. for nearly ten years, Ipswich are the only team to win the First Division title in their first season in the top division. Ramsey then became manager of the England team. He was manager when England beat Germany 4–2 in the World Cup final at Wembley Stadium. He is the only England manager to win a World Cup.
In tribute to Ramsey, Ipswich Town F.C. commissioned a life-size statue of him which is positioned directly in front of Portman Road (home ground of Ipswich Town F.C.).

Alex Ferguson
sports
Sir Alex Ferguson is a Scottish association football manager. He is in charge of Manchester United F.C. and has managed Aberdeen F.C. and St Mirren F.C. before. He was born in 1941 and has won more trophies than anyone else in the history of English football.

Alex McLeish
sports
Alex McLeish is a Scottish association football manager. He was born in 1959 and is currently manager of Birmingham City F.C.. He also managed Rangers F.C. and the Scotland national football team.

Óscar Arias
politics
Oscar Arias, born on 13 September 1940 in the city of Heredia, is the current President of Costa Rica. He was also president from 1986-1990. He received the Nobel Peace Prize in 1987 for his efforts to end civil wars which were happening in several Central American countries.
Arias started on his political career in the 1970's.
In January of 2005 Arias was selected as the candidate for the National Liberation party, and he is reelected for president of Costa Rica from 2006-2010. There was a lot of polemic and criticism for his support towards the TLC process in Costa Rica, but because of his political background and determination, most Costa Ricans still trust and respect Arias and his decisions for the well-being of the country.
He is also a recipient of the Albert Schweitzer Prize for Humanitarianism and a trustee of the Economists for Peace and Security.

Max Born
science
Max Born (December 11, 1882 – January 5, 1970) was a German physicist and mathematician who was important for the development of quantum mechanics. He also made contributions to solid-state physics and optics and supervised the work of a number of important physicists in the 1920s and 30s. Born won the 1954 Nobel Prize in Physics.

Brian Clough
sports
Brian Clough was an English association football manager. During his career he was in charge of Nottingham Forest F.C. and Derby County F.C. He won a lot of trophies, including the European Cup twice in 1979 and 1980.

WWE Intercontinental Championship
sports
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Intercontinental Championship is a professional wrestling championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It is the first secondary title of WWE. Currently, it is the second highest ranked championship on the Raw brand.
History.
The WWE Intercontinental Championship was first known as the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) Intercontinental Championship, until the WWE/WWF 2002 Lawsuit. Following the title's introduction in 1979, Pat Patterson became the inaugural champion on September 15. The title's creation came as a result of Patterson defeating Ted DiBiase to win the WWF North American Championship and defending the title in a fictional tournament held in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil to be unified with a South American Championship.
In March 2001, the World Wrestling Federation bought World Championship Wrestling. Soon after, "The Invasion" took place in which the ECW Alliance was ultimately dismantled. At Survivor Series 2001, the title was unified with the WCW United States Championship. The United States Champion, Edge, won against the Intercontinental Champion, Test, and became the new Intercontinental Champion while the United States Championship became inactive.
After the WWE name change in 2002, the championship became known as the WWE Intercontinental Championship'". It was then unified with the European Championship in a ladder match on July 22, and later the Hardcore Championship on August 26. The Intercontinental Champion, Rob Van Dam, won against the European Champion, Jeff Hardy, and the Hardcore Champion, Tommy Dreamer. As a result, Rob Van Dam was named the last European and Hardcore Champion. Then at No Mercy 2002, it was unified with the World Heavyweight Championship. The World Heavyweight Champion, Triple H, won against the Intercontinental Champion, Kane, and countinued to be the World Heavyweight Champion while the Intercontinental Championship became inactive. In May 2003, after fan protests of the retirement of the Intercontinental Title, the title was reactivated by RAW Co-General Manager, Stone Cold Steve Austin, and was recommissioned to be the secondary championship for the RAW brand. Shortly after, the WCW United States Championship was reactivated as the WWE United States Championship by the SmackDown! brand, making the Intercontinental Championship its equal counterpart for the RAW brand.
Current champion.
The Current Champion is William Regal] who beat Santino Marella for the title on "Raw" on November 10, 2008 in Manchester, England.

Louise Goodman
media
Louise Goodman is one of two pitlane reporters for ITV's Formula One coverage. Before this she worked in marketing for the Jordan team. She started television broadcast in 1997.
She is said to be the first woman of Formula One live coverage. Louise Goodman has been ITV's roving pitlane reporter since ITV took the broadcast in 1997. She usually does driver interviews, while Ted Kravitz brings news from the teams about technical or tactical matters. She is taller than many F1 drivers, and is known for wearing much jewellery on her arm.
Goodman became the first female to be part of a pit stop when she removed the left rear tire in a Midland pit stop for Tiago Monteiro in 2006 British Grand Prix.
During Q3 in Hungaroring 2006 she interviewed David Coulthard. Coulthard had been knocked out in Q2. She asked him how the cold weather was affecting him? He answered," Ummm...well, it’s a lot nicer to look at you in your tight t-shirts first out." Goodman sounded startled when she replied, " Thank you so much DC. I'll have a word with you later." They then went back to the main commentary team who also sounded rather flustered.
In 2007, she became the presenter of ITV's coverage of the British Touring Car Championship. Her co-presenter was Ted Kravitz.

How Pop Can You Get?
music
How Pop Can You Get? was the first and only album by American band The Bats.
Track listing.
All music and lyrics by The Bats (Jon Brion, Bill Murphy, Don Fertman)

Kurt Warner
sports
Kurtis Eugene "Kurt" Warner (born June 22, 1971, in Burlington, Iowa) is the quarterback for the Arizona Cardinals. After playing in college at Northern Iowa, he was signed by the Green Bay Packers as an undrafted free agent. He was not able to play there, so he went to the Arena Football League, and then later the NFL Europa.
In 1998, Warner was signed by the St. Louis Rams. After the Rams’ main quarterback Trent Green went out with an injury, Warner became the main quarterback. He later went on to win NFL MVP awards in 1999 and 2001, as well as the Super Bowl MVP award in 2000.
Early life.
Kurt Warner was born on June 22, 1971. His parents got divorced when he was 6 years old. His father, Gene Warner, married Mimi Warner a year later. Kurt is the brother to two people named Matt, a full-brother to Matt Warner and a step-brother named Matt Post. The three boys had a close relationship. In 1990, Kurt graduated from Regis High School in Cedar Rapids, Iowa. While there, he played quarterback of the school's Class 3A football team.
College days and marriage.
After Warner graduated from high school, he went to the University of Northern Iowa (UNI). At UNI, Warner was third on the Panthers' depth chart until his senior year. In his final year there, he was able to start and was named the Gateway Conference's Offensive Player of the Year.
While at college, his Warner met future wife, the former Brenda Carney Meoni. They got married on October 11, 1997. Before this, Brenda had served in the Marines. She was divorced with two children when they met each other. Warner adopted Brenda's two children, son Zachary and daughter Jesse, after their marriage. Zachary is blind from the head injuries he got when he was accidentally dropped by his birth-father as a baby. Warner agreed to help Brenda raise the children. The Warners now also have five children of their own: sons Elijah and Kade, daughter Jada, and twin girls Sierra Rose and Sienna Rae.
After being let go from the Green Bay Packers training camp in 1994, he got a job working the night shift at a local Hy-Vee grocery store. He was also assistant-coaching at Northern Iowa. Warner still wanted to play in the NFL, but with that not seeming it was going to happen, and the long hours at the Hy-Vee for minimum wage creating financial trouble for him, Warner began playing in the Arena Football League. In 1996 and almost a year before Kurt and Brenda's marriage, Brenda's parents, Larry and Jenny Carney, were killed when their Arkansas home was destroyed by a tornado.
Christianity.
Both Kurt and his wife are active born again Christians. Warner once said about his faith, "Whether I'm a Super Bowl Champion or a regular guy stocking groceries at the Hy-Vee, sharing my faith and glorifying Jesus is the central focus of my time on this earth." The Warners started the "First Things First Foundation", a organization that believes in Christian values.
Embryonic stem cell advertisement.
On October 24, 2006, Warner was in a political advertisement against a proposed law in Missouri. That new law would allow embryonic stem cell research to be done in Missouri. Warner was in the advertisement with James Caviezel, Patricia Heaton, Jeff Suppan, and Mike Sweeney. The advertisement, which was played during Game 4 of the 2006 World Series, said that Amendment 2 would allow human cloning. The advertisement came after a pro-embryonic research advertisement that had Michael J. Fox, who has Parkinson's disease, in it.
Arena Football and NFL Europe.
Warner went to the Green Bay Packers training camp in 1994, but was released before the regular season began. He returned to Northern Iowa and worked as a graduate assistant coach with the football team but he still wanted to get a tryout with an NFL team. When no NFL team would give him a tryout, Warner began playing for the Arena Football League. In 1995, he signed with the Iowa Barnstormers. Warner was named to the AFL's All-Arena first team in both 1996 and 1997. He led the Barnstormers to the Arena Bowl in both 1996 and 1997. Some people consider Warner one of the greatest Arena Football player of all-time.
In 1997, Warner was offered an NFL tryout by the Chicago Bears, but he could not attend the tryout. In 1998, he was signed by the St. Louis Rams, but he only played for NFL Europe's Amsterdam Admirals.
1999 season.
Warner was the backup quarterback for the St. Louis Rams during the 1998 regular season and the 1999 preseason. When their main quarterback Trent Green was injured in a preseason game, Warner became the starter. He had one of the best seasons by a quarterback in NFL history by throwing for 4,353 yards with 41 touchdown passes and a completion rate of 65.1%. The Rams' very good offense was nicknamed "The Greatest Show on Turf." In the first three games that he was the main quarterback who plays, he threw three touchdown passes in each game. He is the only NFL quarterback in history to do that, and only the second, behind Dan Marino, to do it in his first two NFL starts.
Because not many people knew who Warner was, "Sports Illustrated" put him on their October 18, 1999 cover with the caption "Who IS this guy?" He was named the 1999 NFL MVP at the end of the season. In the NFL playoffs, he led the Rams to a Super Bowl XXXIV win against the Tennessee Titans. He threw for two touchdowns and a Super Bowl record 414 passing yards. He also set a Super Bowl record by throwing 45 passes without an interception.
Right after the Rams' Super Bowl win, an interviewer asked Warner, "Kurt, first things first--tell me about the final touchdown pass to Isaac." He responded, "Well, first things first, I've got to thank my Lord and Savior up above--thank You, Jesus!" He was awarded the Super Bowl MVP. That made him one of only six players to win both the league MVP and Super Bowl MVP awards in the same year. The others are Bart Starr in 1966, Terry Bradshaw in 1978, Joe Montana in 1989, Emmitt Smith in 1993, and Steve Young in 1994.
2000 season.
Warner also played well in the 2000 season. Warner and Trent Green both played quarterback that season, and they both played well. But the Rams lost in the wild card round of the playoffs to the New Orleans Saints, mostly because their defense was not very good, even though Warner and the rest of their offense was still very good. Nine of the Rams' eleven defensive starters were cut in the offseason, and Green was traded to the Kansas City Chiefs.
2001 season.
Warner played good in the 2001 season also. He had a league-high 36 touchdown passes and 4,830 passing yards. But he did throw a career-high 22 interceptions, even though he had a career-high completion rate of 68.7% of his passes. He led the Rams to an NFL-best 14–2 record and they went to the Super Bowl XXXVI, but they lost to the New England Patriots. He was named the NFL MVP for the second time at the end of the season.
2002 and 2003 seasons.
Warner began the season 0–3 as a starter, throwing seven interceptions with only one touchdown. In their fourth game against the Dallas Cowboys, he broke a finger on his throwing hand. Even thought he tried to come back later in the season, his injury caused him to be able to play two more games, and he lost them both. In contrast to his 103.4 career passer rating before that season, he had only 67.4 rating in 2002. He was replaced as the Rams' main quarterback after he fumbling six times in the opener of the 2003 season against the New York Giants. His replacement as the Rams quarterback, Marc Bulger, has been named to two Pro Bowls.
New York Giants.
The Rams released Warner on June 1, 2004. Just two days later, he signed a two-year deal with the New York Giants. He began the 2004 season as the main quarterback. He won five of his first seven games, but after not playing well in a two-game losing streak, rookie quarterback Eli Manning was made the main quarterback. Giants coach Tom Coughlin later said that he never should have made Warner play, and should have played Manning from the beginning to give Manning the experience he needs to build his confidence. The Giants had a 5–4 win-loss record at the time that Manning began playing, and they finished at 6–10 overall (going only 1–6 under Manning).
2005 season.
In early 2005, Warner signed a one-year, $4-million contract with the Arizona Cardinals. He was soon named the main quarterback by coach Dennis Green. He played bad in three games before injuring his groin. He was then replaced by former starter Josh McCown. McCown played well enough in two games during Warner's injury to get coach Green named McCown the starter for the rest of the season.
As Warner was the backup quarterback, many people thought that he was never to be the main quarterback again. But because McCown played bad in two straight games, coach Green made Warner the main quarterback. He played well in the next three weeks, but his season ended in Week 15 when he partly tore his MCL.
2006 season.
Warner signed a new three-year deal with the Cardinals on February 14, 2006. The deal had a base salary of $18 million, but if he played well, he could get as much as $22 million in the three years.
In Week 3 of the 2006 season, Warner passed the 20,000-yards passing milestone in his 76th game. That was one game more than record holder Dan Marino, but Warner did it in his 9th year while Marino did it in his 5th. After Matt Leinart played poorly in the three games of Weeks 2-4, Warner replaced the rookie Leinart in the fourth quarter of Week 4. In Week 16, Leinart had a shoulder injury against the San Francisco 49ers, so Warner was able to play for the first time since Week 4. He did well that game, and the Cardinals won the game.
2007 season.
In the third game of the 2007 season against the Baltimore Ravens, Warner came off the bench because Leinart was again not playing well. He led a comeback, completing 15 passes out of 20 attempts for 258 yards and 2 touchdowns. This brought them to a tie game (23–23), but after the Ravens made a last second field goal, Arizona lost the game 26–23. On September 30, 2007, during the Week 4 game against the Pittsburgh Steelers, he went in for Leinart because he was not playing well again. Leinart was later placed on Injured reserve, so Warner was named the starter for the rest of the 2007 season.
Warner got 27 passing touchdowns in the 2007 season, just one short of the Cardinals franchise record. Because he played well, he was given a $1 million bonus for the year. His 3,417 passing yards, 27 touchdown passes, and 89.8 passer rating were all his best since the 2001 season.

Trey Lewis
sports
Trey Lewis (born May 23, 1985 in Topeka, Kansas) is an NFL football player. He plays defensive tackle for the Atlanta Falcons. Lewis began playing for the Falcons in 2007.

Beggars Banquet
music
"Beggars Banquet" is an album by British band The Rolling Stones.

José Figueres Ferrer
politics
José Figueres Ferrer (September 25, 1906 - June 8, 1990 was president of Costa Rica three times.
Early years.
Also known as Don Pepe, José Figueres Ferrer was born in San Ramón, Alajuela, Costa Rica. His parents were from Cataluña, Spain: Mariano Rodríguez Borges and Francisca Ferrer Mendiola. Figueres entered the Primary Boys School in San Ramón of Alajuela in 1913. He got in Costa Rica’s Lyceum finishing his Secondary studies in 1920. He went to Boston, United States to travel and study. He returned to Costa Rica in 1928 and bought a coffee farm.
Civil war.
In 1942, Figueres made a speech on Latin America Radio. In this speach, he objected to the situation in Costa Rica under president Rafael Ángel Calderón. Because of this speach, he was arrested and forced to leave the country. Figueres return to Costa Rica in 1944. He started a political party, the Democratic Party. A main goal of the party was to go against Calderon's party, the National Republican Party. In 1948, supporters of Calderón caused problems with an election for president in which Calderón lost to Otilio Ulate. Because of this, the results of the election were not used. This led to the start of the civil war in 1948. In March 11, 1948, Don Pepe began a war to support the peoples decision at the previous election. Figueres and his troops won.
President of Costa Rica.
In the same year, José Figueres Ferrer became president of the Second Republic Founder Assembly. He became president of Costa Rica for the first time and eliminated the Costa Rica army. He became President of Costa Rica for the second time in 1953 winning the election with 65% of the votes. In 1970, he became Costa Rica’s President for the third time. Figueres died June 8, 1990. Five months later he was declared Benemérito de la Patria.

Beatles for Sale
music
"Beatles for Sale" is The Beatles' fourth album. It was released in late 1964. Many of its songs went into an American release, "Beatles '65", from Capitol Records.

Rubber Soul
music
"Rubber Soul" is the sixth album by The Beatles. It was first released in December 1965.

Abbey Road
music
"Abbey Road" is the twelfth official album recorded by The Beatles. It was released in 1969.

Magical Mystery Tour
music
"Magical Mystery Tour" is a 1967 television movie made by The Beatles. It is also the movie's title song, and the name of its soundtrack recording.
Show.
Paul McCartney had the original idea for "Magical Mystery Tour", coming back from the Monterey Pop Festival in California, during the summer of 1967. He drew a clock face on a paper plate, and filled it with parts of the show he imagined. McCartney based the idea on Ken Kesey's Merry Pranksters, who travelled the United States in a bus, and also "mystery tours", which were low-budget weekend vacation trips taken in England.
The other Beatles liked the idea for the show, and made plans to produce and direct it themselves. After they stopped giving concerts in 1966, they had started making their own promotional films (called "promos"), much like today's music videos. They had success with promos, and wanted to try making a whole programme, to appear on television during the Christmas holidays.
Beatles manager Brian Epstein helped set up the production, and the Beatles asked friends, members of their staff, and some professional actors to ride with them in a rented bus over a holiday weekend, and film whatever happened, with magical elements to be added later. Making the movie was one of the first jobs of the Beatles's new company, Apple Corps.
Epstein unfortunately died before filming began. Without him to look over business details, things ran into trouble. By the time things were set up, John Lennon and George Harrison had changed their minds about performing, and spent much of the bus trip asleep. There also was not much for scenery along the roads, or entertainment among the passengers.
What turned into a bigger event than filming "Magical Mystery Tour" was the entourage that began to surround the bus, wondering what the "tour" was all about. People followed the bus for miles, and caused traffic jams. People who saw the bus go by expected a "happening" of some kind, but none had been planned. In trying to be spontaneous, nobody had worked out a destination for the bus, or the trip. Most of the commotion ended after Lennon personally removed the MAGICAL MYSTERY TOUR lettering from the sides of the bus. Later a Beatles assistant said the traffic jams should have also been filmed.
Spots for songs and performances were included in "Magical Mystery Tour", and so was a storyline explaining what the trip was about. The songs featured in the show included "The Fool on the Hill", "I Am The Walrus", "Blue Jay Way", an instrumental song, "Flying", and "Your Mother Should Know", with a choreographed dance sequence. Another band, the Bonzo Dog Doo-Dah Band, played live during a striptease performance.
"Magical Mystery Tour" appeared on British television on Boxing Day in 1967, and was a surprising flop. Part of the reason for its failure was because it was shown in black-and-white, while colour was an important feature. Another part was because most of the viewers did not understand what was supposed to be happening. Another part was that not much had happened on camera, for long parts of the programme, and it showed.
Ringo Starr made a personal appeal to the BBC to show "Magical Mystery Tour" again, in full colour. The BBC gave it a second broadcast, but it did not change opinions. ABC in the United States cancelled plans to show "Magical Mystery Tour" in America. (It later appeared as a "midnight movie", shown in small cinemas and on college campuses.)
Soundtrack.
Even though "Magical Mystery Tour" was not a television success, its soundtrack still sold well. The show's songs were released as a double EP in England, with a storybook and pictures from the show. In America, Capitol Records added songs from recent Beatles singles to the show songs, and released a whole album. The American version outsold the EP in England, and in 1977 Parlophone Records released a British version of the album.
Songs.
+ "appeared in the show Magical Mystery Tour "
All songs were written by John Lennon and Paul McCartney, except "Flying" (by Lennon, McCartney, Harrison and Starr) and "Blue Jay Way" (by George Harrison).

Brian May
music
Brian May (born July 19, 1947) is a guitar player and songwriter. He plays in the English band Queen.

John Deacon
music
John Richard Deacon (born August 19, 1951, in Leicester) is a retired English musician. He is best known as the bass guitarist for the rock band Queen. He also was part of the controversial mix up that was he "supposedly " had hidden satanic messages in the ever famous song "Another One Bites The Dust". No comment was made by the bass guitarist who was accused of including the messages when writing the song.

Paul Rodgers
music
Paul Rodgers, (born December 17, 1949) is an English rock singer and songwriter. He is best known for being a member of Free and Bad Company. He has recently toured and recorded with Queen.

Queen (album)
music
"Queen" is the self-titled first album from the English rock band Queen, released in 1973.

Queen II
music
"Queen II" is the second album by English rock band Queen, originally released in 1974.

Sheer Heart Attack
music
"Sheer Heart Attack" is a Queen album from 1974.

Sertab Erener
music
Sertab Erener (born December 4, 1964) is a Turkish pop music singer. She is one of the most successful female Turkish pop singers in Turkey. Erener is said to be one of the divas of Turkish pop music. In Europe, she is best known for winning the Eurovision Song Contest 2003 with her hit song "Every Way That I Can".

John C. Mather
science
Professor John Cromwell Mather Virginia is an American astrophysicist and cosmologist who was born on August 7, 1946, Roanoke. He was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics in 2006 for his work on COBE satellite with George Smoot. The COBE satellite measures black holes and cosmic radiation.
This work supported the big-bang theory of the universe beginning and made cosmology much more accurate. The Nobel Prize committee said: "the COBE-project can also be regarded as the starting point for cosmology
Mather is a Senior Astrophysicist at the NASA Goddard Space Flight Center in Maryland and he is a professor of physics at the University of Maryland, College Park. In 2007, Mather was listed in "Time" magazine's 100 Most Influential People in The World.
Work with COBE.
After being awarded his Ph.D. Professor Mather went to work at the Goddard Institute for Space Studies at Columbia University, he started the work on COBE (1974-1976). More than 1,000 researchers, engineers and other workers made the COBE satellite. John Mather was in control of them all and created the technology for measuring the cosmic radiation. George Smoot had the job of measuring small changes in the temperature of the radiation.
Professor Mather and John Boslough wrote all about the COBE teams work in a book called "The Very First Light".

Surfer Rosa
music
"Surfer Rosa" is the first music album by the Pixies. It was released by a record label called 4AD in March 1988.

Neolithic Revolution
science
The Neolithic Revolution was the first agricultural revolution—the transition from nomadic hunting and gathering communities and bands to agriculture and settlement. It occurred in different prehistoric human societies at different times. Most societies changed 12–10 thousand years ago.
Needed changes.
The term refers to both the general time period over which these developments took place and the following changes to Neolithic human societies which are associated with, the adoption of early farming techniques, crop cultivation, and the domestication of animals.
The Neolithic Revolution is important for developments in social organization and technology. The changes most often associated with the Neolithic Revolution include an increased tendency to live in permanent or semi-permanent settlements. Because of this fewer people led a nomadic lifestyle. To be able to know who the crops grown belonged to, the concept of land ownership needed to be developed. Modifications to the natural environment, the ability to sustain higher population densities, an increased reliance on vegetable and cereal foods in the total diet, the development of hierarchy in society and of "trading economies" that use surplus production from increasing crop yields are other changes often cited.
General process.
When humans started to domesticate crops, and certain animals such as dogs, goats, sheep, and cattle, human society changed. Because people now grew crops and raised livestock they no longer needed to move around that much. They could build better settlements. Their diet also changed. It included more cereals and vegetables. People also started to keep and manage some foods - it was not advisable to eat all grain seeds, because then there would be no seeds left to plant the next year. Also, as there were surpluses in some years, these could be traded for other goods with other people.
These changes happened in several places of the world, independently. They did not happen in the same order though. The earliest farming societies in the Near East did not use pottery.It is still unclear, to what extent plants were domesticated in Britain, or if permanently settled communities existed at all. Early Japanese societies used pottery "before" developing agriculture.
In the Paleolithic there were many different human species. According to current research, only the modern human reached the Neolithic though.
Vere Gordon Childe gave the name "Neolithic Revolution" to this process in the 1920s. He thought that it was as important as the Industrial Revolution (which happened in the 18th and 19th century).

Superunknown
music
"Superunknown" is the fourth studio album by the American rock band Soundgarden. The album was released in 1994. The album is well known thanks to singles like "Black Hole Sun", "Spoonman" and "Fell on Black Days".

Badmotorfinger
music
Badmotorfinger is the third studio album by the American rock band Soundgarden. It is one of Soundgardens best-selling albums. The album was released October 8, 1991.
"Satanoscillatemymetallicsonatas".
"Satanoscillatemymetallicsonatas" was a bonus CD included with some editions of "Badmotorfinger" (like how "Songs from the Superunknown" was included with "Superunknown". The title is a palindrome ("Satan, oscillate my metallic sonatas.")

Talcott Parsons
science
Talcott Parsons (December 13, 1902 - May 8, 1979) was a American who created an idea called structural functionalism. This is a type of sociology.

Detroit Pistons
sports
The Detroit Pistons are a team of the National Basketball Association, and are located in Detroit, Michigan. The team's home arena is The Palace of Auburn Hills. In 1948, the team was located in Fort Wayne, Indiana, but that was before moving to Detroit in 1957. The team has won NBA championships in 1989, 1990, and 2004. Their head coach is Flip Saunders, they are owned by William Davidson, and their General Manager Joe Dumars.

A Night at the Opera (Queen album)
music
"A Night at the Opera" is a Queen album from 1975.

A Day at the Races (album)
music
"A Day at the Races" is a Queen album from 1976.

Robert H. Grubbs
science
Robert H. Grubbs (born 27 February 1942 in Possum Trot, Kentucky) is an American chemist. He won Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 2005.
Birth and education.
In his he says, "In some places, my birthplace is listed as Calvert City, Kentucky and in others Possum Trot (both in Marshall County). I was actually born between the two, so either one really is correct." He spent his early childhood in Marshall County and attended public school at McKinley Elementary, Franklin Junior High and Paducah Tilghman High School in Paducah, Kentucky. Grubbs studied chemistry at the University of Florida where he was awarded a B.S. and an M.S.. He worked with Merle Battiste in Florida University, and Columbia University, where he obtained his Ph.D. in 1968. He was taught by Ronald Breslow in Columbia.
He next spent a year with James Collman at Stanford University. He was then made part of the faculty at Michigan State University. In 1978 he moved to California Institute of Technology where he still works as the Victor and Elizabeth Atkins Professor of Chemistry.
His main interest is for organometallic chemistry and organic chemistry. These interests are for catalysts, such as Grubbs' catalyst for olefin metathesis and ring-opening metathesis polymerization and norbornene. He also produced some important work on "living polymerization".
Awards.
Grubbs received the 2005 Nobel Prize in Chemistry, along with Richard R. Schrock and Yves Chauvin, for his work in the field of olefin metathesis.

Hot Space
music
"Hot Space" is an album by English rock band Queen, released in 1982.

The Works (Queen album)
music
"The Works" is a 1984 pop/rock album by English band Queen. It was the band's eleventh studio album.

A Kind of Magic
music
"A Kind of Magic" is a 1986 album by English rock band Queen. It was the band's twelfth studio album, and is based on the soundtrack to the film "Highlander".

The Miracle (album)
music
"The Miracle" is a 1989 album by English rock band Queen. It was the band's thirteenth studio album.

Innuendo (album)
music
"Innuendo" is a 1991 album by English rock band Queen. It is the band's fourteenth studio album and the last to be composed entirely of new material. It is also the final studio album to be released while lead singer Freddie Mercury was still alive.

Made in Heaven
music
"Made in Heaven" is Queen's fifteenth studio album, released in November 1995. After Freddie Mercury's death in 1991, the remaining band members John Deacon, Roger Taylor and Brian May worked with vocals that Mercury had previously recorded, along with newly recorded lyrics by the remaining band members. "Made In Heaven" would be the final studio album performed by all four original band members.

Gerolamo Cardano
science
Gerolamo Cardano or Girolamo Cardano (English Jerome Cardan, Latin Hieronymus Cardanus; September 24, 1501 - September 21 1576) was a celebrated Italian Renaissance mathematician, physician, astrologer and gambler.
As he was an illegitimate child, he could not enter the college of physicians. Despite this he was a relatively successful physician. The first description of Typhoid fever is attributed to him.
Today he is mainly known as a mathematician. He made some discoveries in algebra. He proposed ways to solve cubic and quartic equations. Niccolò Fontana Tartaglia told him about the solution of one particular cubic equation, "formula_1". This caused a long fight. His student Lodovico Ferrari solved the quartic equations. Cardano also speaks about imaginary numbers in the same book, "Ars Magna". He did not completely understand what they were like though.
Cardano was often short of money. He gambled. A book of his, called "Liber de ludo aleae" (aproximately translates to as "Book on the game of chances") contains the first systematic treatment of probability, as well as a section on how to cheat. He wrote it in the 1560s, but it was only published after his death, in 1663.
He invented various things. He also thought that perpetual motion was impossible, except for stars.

Michelle Branch
music
Michelle Jacquet Branch-Landau (born July 2, 1983) is an American singer, songwriter and guitarist. She made her first appearance in 2000, and released the platinum-selling albums "The Spirit Room" and "Hotel Paper" in August 2001 and June 2003 respectively. During this period, she collaborated with Santana on the single "The Game of Love", which won a Grammy Award. In 2004, she formed the musical duo The Wreckers with fellow musician Jessica Harp.

N. T. Rama Rao
politics
Nandamuri Taraka Rama Rao (Telugu:నందమూరి తారక రామా రావు)(28 May 1923–18 January 1996), more commonly known as N.T. Rama Rao, NTR by his fans, or Anna garu, was an Indian movie actor, director, producer, and politician. He founded the Telugu Desam Party and served three times as Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh. His movies included mythological, social, and folk themes. He was awarded the Padma Shri by the Government of India in the 1960s for his work in Telugu cinema. After acting, Rao became a political activist and party leader.

Bo Diddley
music
Bo Diddley (born Ellas Bates, December 30 1928 in McComb, Mississippi, died June 2, 2008 in Archer, Florida) was an American singer, guitarist and songwriter. He was one of the original rock and roll musicians; he, along with others, created rock music.
In 1955, he recorded and released his first songs. He is most famous for the rhythm which he has made popular in many of his recordings. The rhythm has become known as the Bo Diddley beat. Some of the most popular songs which feature the Bo Diddley beat include "Not Fade Away" and "I Want Candy", George Michael's song "Faith" and U2's song "Desire". Bo Diddley is also famous for the unusual shapes of many of his guitars, for his exciting stage shows and for his use of female musicians.
Bo Diddley made many appearances on radio, television and in the movies. In 1956, he co-wrote the popular song "Love Is Strange" for the singing duo Mickey and Sylvia.
Some of his most popular songs are: "I'm A Man" (1955), "Pretty Thing" (1955), "Bring It To Jerome" (1955), "Diddy Wah Diddy" (1955), "Who Do You Love" (1956), "Mona (I Need You Baby)" (1957), "Before You Accuse Me" (1957), "Crackin' Up" (1959), "Say Man" (1959), "Say Man, Back Again" (1959), "Road Runner" (1960), "Pills" (1961), "You Can't Judge A Book By The Cover" (1962) and "I Can Tell" (1962).
Bo Diddley often sang simple or amusing songs about himself. Some of these songs are "Bo Diddley" (1955), "Diddley Daddy" (1955), "Hey Bo Diddley" (1957), "Bo Meets The Monster" (1958), "Bo Diddley's A Gunslinger" (1960), "Just Like Bo Diddley" (1989), "Bo Diddley Is Crazy" (1996) and "Oops! Bo Diddley" (1996).
His songs have been recorded by many other popular recording artists, including Aerosmith, The Animals, Eric Clapton, Creedence Clearwater Revival, Dr. Feelgood, The Doors, Buddy Holly, Chris Isaak, New York Dolls, Quicksilver Messenger Service, Rolling Stones, Bob Seger, George Thorogood and The Destroyers, The Who and The Yardbirds.
In 2003, U.S. Representative John Conyers paid tribute to Bo Diddley in the United States House of Representatives when he described him as "one of the true pioneers of rock and roll, who has influenced generations".
In 2005, Bo Diddley celebrated his 50th anniversary in music with successful tours of Australia and Europe and with coast-to-coast shows across North America.

FutureSex/LoveSounds
music
"FutureSex/LoveSounds" is the second solo studio album by American rhythm and blues singer Justin Timberlake. It was released on September 12, 2006 through Jive Records and Zomba Records. Timberlake started the LoveShow tour in support of the album in January 2007. He worked with several notable producers including: Danja, Rick Rubin, Timbaland and will.i.am. The album sold slightly more than his first solo album, "Justified", with worldwide sales in excess of 9 million, 4 million of which have been sold in the United States alone.

An Inconvenient Truth
music
"An Inconvenient Truth" is an controversial American Academy Award-winning documentary movie about global warming. The movie stars former United States Vice President Al Gore and directed by Davis Guggenheim. The movie was first shown at the 2006 Sundance Film Festival and opened in New York and Los Angeles on May 24 2006. It was released on DVD by Paramount Home Entertainment on November 21 2006.
Controversy.
On April 18, 2008, ABC News reported that one of the shots of the Antarctic glaciers in the movie was made by computer and used in the 2004 movie The Day After Tomorrow. In "An Inconvenient Truth", the audience is shown the glacier scene while "Al Gore" was saying, "And if you were flying over it in a helicopter, you'd see it's 700 feet tall. They are so majestic." The movie has received much criticism from some who feel Mr. Gore's voice-over indicates the computer shot used was a real one.

Diane Abbott
politics
Diane Julie Abbott (born September 27, 1953) is an English politician and the Member of Parliament for the Hackney North and Stoke Newington constituency in the United Kingdom. She was the first black woman to be elected to the House of Commons when she was elected in the 1987 General Election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Hywel Francis
politics
Dr Hywel Francis (born 1946) is a Welsh politician and the Member of Parliament for the Aberavon constituency in the United Kingdom. He was elected in the 2001 General Election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Anne Begg
politics
Anne Begg (born December 6, 1955) is a Scottish politician and the Member of Parliament for the Aberdeen South constituency in the United Kingdom. She was elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Megawati Sukarnoputri
politics
Diah Permata Megawati Setiawati Soekarnoputri (born January 23, 1947), was President of Indonesia from July 2001 to October 20, 2004. She was the country's first female President, and the first Indonesian leader born after independence. On September 20 she lost her campaign for re-election in the 2004 Indonesian presidential election. She is the daughter of Indonesia's first president, Sukarno.

Des Browne
politics
Desmond Henry Browne (born March 22, 1952) is a Scottish politician and the current Secretary of State for Defence and Secretary of State for Scotland. He is the Member of Parliament for the Kilmarnock and Loudoun constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Alan Johnson
politics
Alan Arthur Johnson (born May 17, 1950) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Health. He is the Member of Parliament for the Hull West and Hessle constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1997 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Harriet Harman
politics
Harriet Ruth Harman (born July 30, 1950) is an English politician and the current Leader of the House of Commons and Minister for Women and Equality. She is the Member of Parliament for the Camberwell and Peckham constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1982 general election for Peckham.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Ed Balls
politics
Edward Michael Balls (born February 25, 1967) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Children, Schools and Families. He is the Member of Parliament for the Normanton constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Andy Burnham
politics
Andrew Murray Burnham (born January 7, 1970) is an English politician and the current Secretary of State for Culture, Media and Sport. He is the Member of Parliament for the Leigh constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2001 general election.
He is a member of the Labour Party.

Yvette Cooper
politics
Yvette Cooper (born March 20, 1969) is an English politician and the current Chief Secretary to the Treasury. She is the Member of Parliament for the Pontefract and Castleford constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1997 general election.
She is a member of the Labour Party.

Mark Lawrenson
sports
Mark Thomas Lawrenson (born Preston, Lancashire, June 2, 1957) is a former professional football player, a defender in the Liverpool and Irishfootball teams of the 1980s; he has since become a radio, television and internet pundit for the BBC.
Despite being born in England, UK, he played for the Republic of Ireland national football team due to his Irish ancestry.

Tammy Wynette
music
Virginia Wynette Pugh (usually known as Tammy Wynette), was born in Mississippi, United States in 1942. She died 55 years later, in 1998.
She was a singer who was most famous for country music. The best known of her songs may be "Stand by Your Man". She had 17 number one hits during her career.
Wynette was married 5 times. Her third husband was George Jones, also a well known singer of country music.

Adam Sandler
music
Adam Sandler (born September 9, 1966) is an American comedian, actor, musician, screenwriter, and film producer. he is best known for his comedic roles, such as in the films "Billy Madison", "Happy Gilmore", and "Big Daddy".

Calixa Lavallée
music
Calixa Lavallée, (December 28, 1842 – January 21, 1891), born Calixte Paquet, was a French-Canadian-American musician who composed the music for the Canadian national anthem "O Canada".

Cheryl Gillan
politics
Cheryl Elise Kendall Gillan (born April 21, 1952) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Wales.. She is the Member of Parliament for the Chesham and Amersham constituency in the United Kingdom. She was first elected in the 1992 general election.
She is a member of the Conservative Party.

Alan Duncan
politics
Alan James Carter Duncan (born March 31, 1957) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Business, Enterprise and Regulatory Reform. He is the Member of Parliament for the Rutland and Melton constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Nick Herbert
politics
Nicholas Le Quesne Herbert (born April 7, 1963) is an English politician and the current Shadow Justice Secretary. He is the Member of Parliament for the Arundel and South Downs constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Michael Gove
media
Michael Andrew Gove (born August 26, 1967) is an English politician and the current Shadow Secretary of State for Children, Schools and Families. He is the Member of Parliament for the Surrey Heath constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 2005 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Liam Fox
politics
Liam Fox (born September 22, 1961) is an English politician and the current Shadow Defence Secretary. He is the Member of Parliament for the Woodspring constituency in the United Kingdom. He was first elected in the 1992 general election.
He is a member of the Conservative Party.

Magnús Eiríksson
science
Magnús Eiríksson (born 22 June, 1806 in Skinnalón, Iceland; died 3 July, 1881 in Copenhagen, Denmark) was an Icelandic theologian. He lived in Copenhagen at the same time as Søren Kierkegaard (1813-1855) and Hans Lassen Martensen (1808-1884) and viewed their opinions on religion and Christianity with a critical eye.

John Wark
sports
John Wark (born Glasgow, 4 August 1957) is a former Scottish footballer. He used to play football for Ipswich Town F.C. and Liverpool F.C..

Dwyane Wade
sports
Dwyane Tyrone Wade (born January 17, 1982) is an American basketball player. was born in Chicago, Illinois. He attended college at Marquette University on a scholarship. He was on scholarship for basketball but he did not play his first year because of academic problems. The next year he started on Marquette and led them to a pretty good season. The year after that he lead the "Marquette Golden Eagles" to the Final Four in the NCAA tournament. After that he went on to the NBA and was selected as the 5th pick overall in the NBA draft by the Miami Heat. From there he had a average rookie season in the NBA averaging 15 PPG (points per game) and 6 APG (assists per game). After only a few years he emerged into a superstar leading the Miami Heat to a national championship.

Cecil Rhodes
politics
Cecil John Rhodes (July 5 1853 - March 26 1902) was an English economist. He was the starter of Rhodesia. He was also a politician.

John von Neumann
science
He is generally regarded as one of the most important mathematicians of the 20th century.

Iwan Roberts
sports
Iwan Wyn Roberts (born 26 June, 1968 in Bangor, Wales) is a tall Welsh man who played football for the Welsh national team and several English club sides, including Norwich City F.C. and Wolverhampton Wanderers F.C..
At Norwich, Roberts twice won the "player of the year" trophy.
As a player, Roberts was a striker.

Ryan Giggs
sports
Ryan Joseph Giggs (born Ryan Joseph Wilson on November 29, 1973 in Ely, Cardiff, Wales, United Kingdom) is a Welsh footballer.
As well as the Wales national football team, he also plays for Manchester United F.C., where he has spent his whole career until now. His playing position is as a left winger.

Ian Rush
sports
Ian Rush is a former Welsh international footballer, who notably played for Liverpool F.C. and Juventus.
He was a very successful striker, who set many goal-scoring records for Liverpool in particular.
When he retired from playing, he managed teams including Tranmere Rovers F.C..

Liberal Democrats
politics
The Liberal Democrats, often shortened to Lib Dems, are a liberal political party in the United Kingdom. It was started in 1988 by joining the Liberal Party and the Social Democratic Party. The two parties had already been working together for seven years. The party's leader is Nick Clegg.
The Liberal Democrats are the third-largest party in the British Parliament, behind Labour and the Conservatives.

Albert Schweitzer
science
Albert Schweitzer, M.D., O.M., (January 14, 1875 – September 4, 1965) was a theologian, musician, philosopher and physician. He was born in Alsace, at the time a part of the German Empire.
He wrote books about music and religion. He started a famous hospital in Lambarene, Africa. He received the 1952 Nobel Peace Prize.
Earlier Life.
Albert Schweitzer was born in the Alsace, Germany on January 14, 1875. He lived in the village of Gunsbach, where his father was a local pastor. His father taught him how to play music. In 1893, Schweitzer passed his Baccalaureat.
After this, Schweitzer went to Paris to learn philosophy and music, before returning to his birthplace to study theology. He spent nine years studying medicine and surgery. He would dedicate his life to helping people and curing diseases.
Music.
Schweitzer was a famous organist and was extremely interested in the music of Johann Sebastian Bach. He developed a simple style of performance, which he thought to be closer to what Bach had meant. In 1908, he completed the final version of his book "Johann Sebastian Bach". In the book, he argued for the new style, which has had great influence on the way Bach’s music is now treated.
When Schweitzer was in Lambarene, his main recreation was to play Bach’s music. He also gave musical performances to raise money for medical supplies in Gabon.
Recordings of Schweitzer playing the music of Bach are available on CD. Between 1934 and 1935, he had a trial recording for HMV on the organ of the old Queen's Hall in London. In mid-December 1935, he began to record for Columbia Records on the organ of All-Hallows-by-the-Tower, Barking, London.
Theology and Philosophy.
Schweitzer became well-known for his books on Jesus and Christianity. He was not so much interested in the historical study of Jesus, as in the Christian idea of the end of the world, which can be found in the Bible and the teachings of Jesus. Schweitzer also served as a minister for Saint Nicholas Church in Strassburg.
In the philosophy of Albert Schweitzer, the most important idea is the respect for life. In his book "The Philosophy of Civilization", he wrote that "true philosophy" begins with the idea that: "I am a life that wants to live, in the midst of life that wants to live."
Albert Schweitzer’s ethical principles meant that he tried to have a personal and spiritual relationship with the universe. It also meant that he was vegetarian.
Schweitzer in Africa.
Albert Schweitzer spent most of his life in Lambarene, Africa. In 1904, he was inspired to help sick people in the world, so he studied medicine. After his medical studies in 1913, he went to Lambarene with his wife to establish a hospital that would serve thousands of Africans.
During World War I, the French made Schweitzer and his wife, both Germans, leave Africa. In 1924, he returned to Lambarene and managed to rebuild the destroyed hospital, where he served as a physician.
Later Life.
From 1939-1948, he stayed in Lambarene since he could not go to Europe during the war. Three years later he resumed his medical practices. But he was no longer just a medical doctor and whenever possible he went to Europe to lecture at universities. Slowly his ideas become known, not only in Europe but worldwide.
In 1952 Dr Albert Schweitzer was awarded The Nobel Peace Prize. He gave a famous speech "The Problem of Peace". He died on September 4, 1965 at his hospital in Lambarene.

Brett Favre
sports
Brett Lorenzo Favre (born October 10, 1969, in Gulfport, Mississippi, USA) is an American football player and starting quarterback for the New York Jets of the National Football League (NFL).
History.
Favre started at the quarterback position for The University of Southern Mississippi for four years until being chosen in the second round of the 1991 NFL Draft by the Atlanta Falcons. On February 10, 1992, after a season with the Falcons, he was traded to the Green Bay Packers on for the 19th pick in the 1992 NFL Draft. He became the Packers' starting quarterback in the fourth game of the 1992 NFL season, he started every game after the 1992 season until the end of the 2007 season with the Packers. In 2008 he was traded to the hii'm bobert.

Troy Aikman
sports
Troy Kenneth Aikman (born November 21, 1966 in West Covina, California) is a former American football quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys of the National Football League, and is now a television sportscaster for the Fox televison network. He is also a shared owner of the NASCAR Nextel Cup racing team, Hall of Fame Racing, along with fellow former Cowboys quarterback, Roger Staubach. He is considered among the best NFL quarterbacks of all time, and was chosen for the Pro Football Hall of Fame in 2006.

Johnny Unitas
sports
John Constantine "Johnny" Unitas (May 7, 1933 – September 11, 2002), was a professional American football player in the 1950s through the 1970s. He was a record-setting quarterback and the National Football League's most valuable player in 1959, 1964 and 1967. His record of throwing a touchdown pass in 47 consecutive games (between 1956-1960) is unrivaled. Unitas is commonly considered the greatest quarterback of all-time.

Dick Butkus
sports
Richard Marvin "Dick" Butkus (born December 9, 1942) is a former American football player, commonly considered as the greatest linebacker of his time and one of the best football players ever.
In college Butkus played for the University of Illinois and in the National Football League the Chicago Bears. He became a member of the Pro Football Hall of Fame in 1979.

Mike Ditka
sports
Michael Keller Ditka, Jr. (born October 18, 1939, in Carnegie, Pennsylvania), is a former NFL player, television commentator, and coach. Ditka coached the Chicago Bears for 11 years and New Orleans Saints for 3 years. Ditka and Tom Flores are the only two people to win Super Bowls as a player, an assistant coach and a head coach. Ditka was the only person to take part in the last two Chicago Bears' championships, as a player in 1963 and as head coach in 1985.

John Elway
sports
John Albert Elway, Jr. (born June 28, 1960 in Port Angeles, Washington) is a retired Hall of Fame American football quarterback. He played his college football at Stanford and his whole professional career for the Denver Broncos football team.

Detroit Lions
sports
The Detroit Lions are a team in the National Football League and National Football Conference. They are based in Detroit, Michigan.

Michael Irvin
sports
Michael Jerome Irvin (born March 5, 1966) is a former American football player for the Dallas Cowboys. He is also a former broadcaster for ESPN's "NFL Countdown". He is commonly known as one of the most successful wide receivers in the history of the National Football League.

Howie Long
sports
Howard Michael Long (born January 6, 1960 in Somerville, Massachusetts) is a former American football player who played as a defensive end, and was chosen for the Hall of Fame in 2000.

San Diego Chargers
sports
The San Diego Chargers are a professional American football team based in San Diego, California. They are currently part of the Western Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). They were first called the Los Angeles Chargers, the team was started in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League. The club spent its first season in Los Angeles, California before moving to San Diego in 1961.

Ronnie O'Sullivan
sports
Ronnie O'Sullivan (born December 5, 1975), is an English professional snooker player who has been World Champion on three occasions.

Rain (entertainer)
music
Rain (Korean: Jeong Ji-hoon 정지훈, born on 25 June 1982 in Seoul) is a Korean singer, actor, dancer and model. He is one of the most famous Korean entertainers in Asia as well as over the world. He has released 4 albums in his career.

Tennessee Titans
sports
The Tennessee Titans are a professional American football team located in Nashville, Tennessee. They are currently part of the South Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). They used to be known as the Houston Oilers, and played in Houston, Texas, team was started in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League. The Oilers won two AFL championships before joining the NFL as part of the AFL-NFL Merger.
The team moved to the state of Tennessee in 1997, and played in Memphis for one season before moving to Nashville. For two seasons, the team was known as the Tennessee Oilers before changing its name to the Titans in 1999.

Kansas City Chiefs
sports
The Kansas City Chiefs are a professional American football team located in Kansas City, Missouri. The team is a part of the Western Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL).
Originally called the Dallas Texans, the club was founded by Lamar Hunt in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League. The team moved to Kansas City and became the Chiefs in 1963 after then-Kansas City mayor H. Roe Bartle promised the team they would have more ticket sales. The Chiefs then joined the NFL as part of the AFL-NFL Merger.
The Chiefs hold the distinction of being the second AFL team (after the New York Jets) to beat an NFL club in an AFL-NFL World Championship Game when they beat the Minnesota Vikings in Super Bowl IV.

Jacksonville Jaguars
sports
The Jacksonville Jaguars are a professional American football team located in Jacksonville, Florida. They are currently members of the Southern Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Jaguars, and the Carolina Panthers, became part of the NFL as expansion teams in 1995.

Houston Texans
sports
The Houston Texans is a professional American National Football League team located in Houston, Texas. They are part of the American Football Conference (AFC). The Texans joined the NFL in 2002 as an expansion team.

Cleveland Browns
sports
The Cleveland Browns are a professional American football team located in Cleveland, Ohio. The team plays in the AFC North division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Cleveland Browns started playing in 1946 as a charter member of the All-America Football Conference and joined the NFL in 1950 after the AAFC folded. The team has also won four NFL Championships.

Cincinnati Bengals
sports
The Cincinnati Bengals are a professional American football team located in Cincinnati, Ohio. They are currently members of the North Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). Their first season, 1968, was as an American Football League franchise, but they joined the NFL as part of the 1970 AFL-NFL Merger.
The Bengals currently have summer training camp at Georgetown College in Georgetown, Kentucky and play home games at Paul Brown Stadium.

Baltimore Ravens
sports
The Baltimore Ravens are a professional American football team located in Baltimore, Maryland. They play in the AFC North Division of the National Football League (NFL). The Ravens have won one Super Bowl title, Super Bowl XXXV, in the 2000 football season against the New York Giants.

Buffalo Bills
sports
The Buffalo Bills are a professional American football team located in Buffalo, New York. They are members of the Eastern Division of the American Football Conference (AFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Bills began started playing in 1960 as a charter member of the American Football League and joined the NFL as part of the AFL-NFL merger.
The Bills won two American Football League titles in 1964 and 1965, but the team has not won a league championship since the merger. Buffalo is also the only team to win four American Football Conference Championships one right after the other, though they did not win any of the four games.

Washington Redskins
sports
The Washington Redskins are a professional American football team based in the Washington, D.C. area. The team plays at FedExField in Landover, Maryland. The team's head office and training area are at Redskin Park in Ashburn, Virginia. They are part of the Eastern Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL).

Minnesota Vikings
sports
The Minnesota Vikings are a professional American football team located in Minneapolis, Minnesota. The Vikings play in the National Football Conference of the National Football League (NFL). They have been part of the North Division. The Vikings have won their division 16 times, which is the third most among teams that are playing in the NFL now.

Geert Wilders
politics
Geert Wilders (born 6 September 1963) is a Dutch (The Netherlands) politician. He is a member of the Dutch Parliament at first for the People's Party for Freedom and Democracy and from 2006 for Party for Freedom which he created himself and of which he is the leader.
Politics.
He began as assistant of Frits Bolkestein in 1990. In September 2004, he left People's Party for Freedom and Democracy (VVD in Dutch, the language spoken in the Netherlands). After that he made his own party named Groep Wilders later he changed the name to Partij voor de Vrijheid (Party for the freedom or PVV)
Fitna.
Fitna is a short movie made by Wilders and was released on the internet on March 27 2008.

Armand David
science
Father Armand David (September 27, 1826 near Bayonne –November 10, 1900 in Paris) was a Lazarist missionary Catholic priest as well as a zoologist and a botanist. He discovered many new species in China. The best-known of the animals he discovered are the Giant Panda and the Père David's Deer.

USA Today
media
"USA Today" is a daily newspaper. It has the most readers of any daily newspaper in the United States. About 2.25 million copies are sold on a weekday. It comes second worldwide. The Times of India sells about 2.6 million copies on a weekday.
The paper was founded in 1982. It has a much more colorful markup than other national newspapers, like the New York Times or the Wall Street Journal.
The paper became known for making national polls before elections.

T.N.T. (album)
music
"T.N.T." is the second studio album by Australian hard rock band DC, released in Australia December 1975.

Dizzy Gillespie
music
John Birks "Dizzy" Gillespie (born October 21, 1917 in Cheraw, South Carolina) was an American jazz trumpeter, bandleader, singer, and composer of the 20th century.
As an instrumentalist, bandleader, singer, and composer, Gilliespie was the youngest of nine children. His father was a local bandleader, so instruments were made available to him at am early age. He started to play the piano at the age of 9.
Nicknamed Dizzy because of how he acts during performances, Gillespie set new standards for trumpet players with his innovative rhythmic and harmonic explorations. This definitive change moved American jazz from swing to 'bebop'. Together with Charlie Parker, he was a major figure in the development of modern jazz.
Gillespie died on January 6, 1993 at age 75. At the time of his death. Gillespie had two funerals. One was a Bahá´í funeral at his request, at which his closest friends and colleagues attended. The second was at the Cathedral of St. John the Divine in New York open to the public where everyone can attend.

John Dowland
music
John Dowland (born 1563; buried 20 February 1626) was an English composer and lutenist. He is best known for some beautiful songs which express his unhappiness such as "Come, heavy sleep", "Come Again, Sweet Love" and "Flow my tears". His instrumental music became very popular again in the 20th century.
Life.
We hardly know anything about Dowland's early life. He was probably born in London. He went to Paris in 1580 where he worked for the ambassador to the French court. He became a Roman Catholic at this time.
In 1594 the job of royal lutenist to Queen Elizabeth I became available. Dowland did not get the job. He said later that it was because he was a Catholic, but there were other Catholic musicians at the English court, so that cannot have been the real reason.
Dowland continued to work in Europe instead. He worked for the Duke of Brunswick-Lüneburg in Wolfenbüttel. He went to Italy where he wanted to study with Luca Marenzio in Rome. He went to Venice and Florence but never got as far as Rome. He published a book of lute music in 1597 which made him the most important English composer for the lute. However, he still did not get a job at the English court so he went to Denmark where he worked for King Christian IV of Denmark who paid him very well.
Dowland seems to have been married and he had children, although we do not know how many. His wife and family always stayed in England.
Dowland returned to England in 1606 and in 1612 got the job as one of James I's lutenists. Strangely, he does not seem to have composed anything between that time and his death in London in 1626. We do not know the date he died, but we do know the date when he was buried.
His Music.
Most of Dowland's music is for his own instrument, the lute. It includes several books of music for solo lute, songs for one voice and lute, part-songs with lute accompaniment, and several pieces for viol consort with lute.
Many of his best-known songs are full of sadness. One lute song is called "Flow My Tears". A very well-known instrumental work is "Lachrimae" (the Latin word for "tears"), a set of seven songs for five viols and lute, each based on the tune of his song "Flow My Tears." It became one of the best known pieces of consort music in his own time. His pavane "Lachrymae antiquae" was also one of the big hits of the seventeenth century.
Dowland's music often shows the melancholia that was so fashionable in music at that time. He wrote a consort piece called "Semper Dowland, semper dolens" (always Dowland, always unhappy).
Many later musicians have been inspired by Dowland's music, including Benjamin Britten and the pop musician Sting.

Heinrich Schliemann
science
Heinrich Schliemann (January 6 1822 in Neubukowin, Germany - December 26 1890 in Naples) was a treasure hunter. He was interestet in archaeology and is famous for his work in Troy.
Life.
Heinrich Schliemann was born in Neubukowin, Germany. His father, Ernst Schliemann, was a minister. His mother, Luise Therese Sophie Schliemann, died in 1831 when Heinrich was 9 years old.
When his mother died, Heinrich lived with his uncle in Neustrelitz. He went to a grammar school in the town for about a year. His father paid the school fees.
Heinrich was very interested in history and was encouraged by his father to read history books. After he left school, he worked in a shop in Fürstenberg for about five years. He worked hard as an apprentice, but he continued to read in his spare time.
He was not able to work as an archaeologist at this time, so he moved to a company which imported and exported products. In this job, he visited many different countries around the world, and learnt to speak English, French, Dutch, Spanish, Portuguese, Swedish, Italian, Greek, Latin, Russian, Arabic, and Turkish. His ability to speak these languages was very important in his job, because he had to speak to other countries.
In 1950, Heinrich's brother, Ludwig Schliemann, died. He moved to Sacramento, where he opened a bank, just like his brother. The new bank bought gold dust and sold it on to make money. In six months, the bank bought and sold millions of dollars of the gold dust.
Heinrich married his wife, Ekaterina, in 1852, but the marriage was troubled. Ekaterina kept encouraging her husband to make more money, but Heinrich felt that they were rich enough.
His work.
Nobody knows how Heinrich became an archaeologist, but he continued to travel to see famous historical icons around the world. He even disguised himself as a tribesman to get into Mecca, the holy Muslim city.
He became very interested in Troy, which was involved in a big dispute at the time. He was inspired by many people in the city, especially Ferdinand Fouqué and Frank Calvert, who he met in 1868.
Many reports have been found which talk about Heinrich burying his 'treasure' he found in Troy, dubbed Priams gold

Theodor Schwann
science
Theodore Schwann (December 7, 1810 – January 11, 1882) was a German scientist who isolated and named the enzyme pepsin. He was also responsible for founding modern biology, and the idea of the cell being the foundation of living organisms. To him cells were very important because they made up all living things.

LeBron James
sports
LeBron James (born December 30 1984) is an American professional basketball player who currently plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers of the National Basketball Association.

This Love (The Veronicas song)
music
This Love is a 2008 song by the Australian band The Veronicas. It has got to number 15 on the music charts in Australia.

I Decided
music
"I Decided" is the first single released by Solange Knowles from her album Sol-Angel and the Hadley St. Dreams. The single was released as a digital download to both iTunes and Amazon.com on April 22, 2008.

Sam Allardyce
sports
Sam Allardyce (born: 19 October 1954) is an English football manager. He has managed Blackpool F.C., Notts County F.C., Bolton Wanderers F.C. and Newcastle United F.C.. He used to play football, and played for Bolton Wanderers F.C., Sunderland A.F.C., Millwall F.C., Tampa Bay Rowdies, Coventry City F.C., Huddersfield Town A.F.C., Preston North End F.C. and West Bromwich Albion F.C..

James Horner
music
James Honer is a music director. He scored the music for the 1997 movie "Titanic".

Kølig Kaj
music
Kølig Kaj was a Danish rapper who gained national fame in 1997 by winning the Danish Melodi Grand Prix with his song "Stemmen I Mit Liv". His real name is "Thomas Lægaard".
At the Eurovision Song Contest in 1997, he ended up 16th, with only 25 points. Following that, Kølig Kaj slowly went away, and has never really gained much success. "Kølig Kaj" literally means "Cool Kaj" (pronounced Kai, rhymes with "high"). He released an album called "Solgt Ud!"

Tobey Maguire
sports
Tobey Maguire is an American actor most notable for being in all three Spider-Man movies.

George Beverly Shea
music
George Beverly "Bev" Shea (born February 1, 1909) is a famous singer and songwriter of gospel music, and has wrote several hymns. He has worked with Billy Graham for a long time.

QuickTime
sports
QuickTime is a software made by Apple Inc. It can handle different types of digital video, media clips, sound, text, animation, music, and several types of interactive panoramic images.

Bill Kaulitz
music
Bill Kaulitz (born September 1, 1989 in Leipzig, Germany) is the lead singer of Tokio Hotel. He is an identical brother of Tom Kaulitz. Bill is ten minutes younger then Tom. They are originally from Magdeburg, Germany. Before Tokio Hotel, the band was called Devlish. Bill was on the German star search even though he lost in 2001. By Bill doing the German star search he gained attention from Peter Hoffman. Tokio Hotel soon got a contract with Sony but in 2005 Sony terminated their contract. After the first European tour, Bill lost his voice and found out he had cyst on his vocal cords. Soon he had surgery and was in rehab for three weeks, then went back to having concerts with the band.

A. J. McLean
music
Alexander James McLean (born January 9, 1978) is an American musician and member of the singing group Backstreet Boys.
In December 2003, McLean and his mother appeared on the Oprah Winfrey Show to talk about his recovery from clinical depression, alcoholism, and drug use.
In 2008 AJ McLean performed two solo shows at the Anaheim House of Blues and The Roxy in Los Angeles. The show consisted of his solo material and a solo version of the Backstreet Boys hit, 'Incomplete'.

Brian Littrell
music
Brian Thomas Littrell (born February 20, 1975) is an American singer. He is best known as a member of the Backstreet Boys. He is also a contemporary Christian recordingartist, and released a solo album, "Welcome Home (You)", in 2006.
In the summer of 2005, Littrell solo single "In Christ Alone" went to #1 on the Christian Charts on July 4th. Littrell was the winner of the 2006 GMA Music Award for Inspirational Recorded Song of the Year, "In Christ Alone," which won both the 1993 award in this category (when recorded by Michael English) and the 1994 Song of the Year at the GMA Music Awards. Brian's first solo album, "Welcome Home (You)" was released on May 2, 2006. As with the Backstreet Boys albums, is a Sony BMG release.
Brian is father of a 6 years old boy called Baylee Thomas Wylee Littrell, his son with your wife, Leighanne Wallace Littrell.

Dennis Rodman
sports
Dennis Rodman (born May 13, 1961) played basketball in the NBA from 1986 to 2000. He was very good at playing defense and getting rebounds. He won two championships with the Detroit Pistons and three more with the Chicago Bulls.
Rodman was famous for dying his hair different colors and having many tattoos and body piercings. He has been in a few movies and television programs.

Niagara IceDogs
sports
The Niagara IceDogs are a junior ice hockey team in the Ontario Hockey League based in St. Catharines, Ontario, Canada.

Marco van Basten
sports
Marcel "Marco" van Basten (October 31, 1964 in Oog in Al, Utrecht) is a former Dutch football player. He is now manager of the Dutch national football team. Before that, he was a player of Ajax Amsterdam and A.C. Milan in the 1980s and early 1990s. People see him as one of the best strikers of all time. He scored 277 goals in a short career. He had to quit playing football because of an injury. From season 2008/2009 he will be the new coach of Ajax.
Awards.
Van Basten was known for his strength on the ball, his tactical awareness and spectacular strikes and volleys. He was named "European Footballer of the Year" three times (1988, '89 and '92) and "FIFA World Player of the Year" in 1992. In a French magazine named "France Football" he was voted as one of the eight best Football Players of the Century

Napoleon (Animal Farm)
politics
Napoleon is a character in the book Animal Farm. Together with Snowball, he is a boar that Mr. Jones is breeding for sale at the market. Napoleon is the only Berkshire boar on Manor Farm. He is fierce-looking, large, and very stubborn, wanting things to be done his own way. Napoleon is very selfish and only cares about his own good.
Symbolism.
Napoleon is based on Stalin of the Russian revolution, who harshly ruled the entire Russia. Napoleon's name is derived from the 17th-18th century French conquerer. "Napoleon the fatty who is always right," says Boxer.He just never listens. Snowball is the skinny nice one.

Squealer (Animal Farm)
politics
Squealer is a porker on Manor Farm in the book "Animal Farm". Squealer is a very fat little piglet, with round cheecks, twinkling eyes, nimble movements, coupled together with a shrill voice. While arguing a difficult point, he skipped from side to side and whisk his tail around in a persuasive manner, allowing him to lie with ease.
Squeler is based on the Russia media of Stalin's time, and all the advertisement of Stalin.

Beetlejuice
music
Beetlejuice is a television show about a teenage girl named Lydia who does not like her school peers and from nowhere a ghost name Beetlejuice appears. The show premeried on Nickelodeon until 1995 and then aired on Nick again in October 1999 and December, 1999.

Andy Abraham
music
Andy Abraham (born 17 July 1964, London) is an English singer-songwriter. He is best known for finishing second in the 2005 series of "The X-Factor" in the United Kingdom.
Abraham will also be the representative for the United Kingdom in the Eurovision Song Contest 2008 with the song "Even If".

Will Rogers
media
William Penn Adair “Will” Rogers (November 4 1879 – August 15 1935) was a Cherokee-American cowboy, comedian, humorist, social commentator, vaudeville performer and actor.
Known as Oklahoma's favorite son, Rogers was born to a well off Indian Territory family and learned to ride horses and use a lariat so well that he was listed in the Guinness Book of World Records for throwing three ropes at once—one around the neck of a horse, another around the horse's rider, and a third around all four legs of the horse. During his life he traveled around the world three times, made 71 movies (50 silent films and 21 "talkies"), wrote more than 4,000 nationally-syndicated newspaper columns, making him a world-famous figure.
By the mid-1930s, Rogers was loved by the American people, and was the highest-paid movie star in Hollywood at the time. During an around-the-world trip with piolt Wiley Post, Rogers died when their small airplane crashed near Barrow, Alaska Territory in 1935.

Afrodisiac
music
"Afrodisiac" is the fourth studio album by American R&B/pop singer Brandy, released by Atlantic Records on June 28, 2004 outside North America and on June 29, 2004 (see 2004 in music) in Canada and the United States. It was mostly produced by Timbaland, with more production from Warryn Campbell, Organized Noise, Walter Millsap, Ron Feemster, Big Chuck, and Kanye West. A lot of critics liked the album, but it did not sell a lot of copies. It has sold less copies than any other album she has made so far.

Bernard Haitink
music
Bernard Haitink (b. March 4, 1929, Amsterdam) is a famous Dutch conductor.
Haitink studied music at the conservatoire in Amsterdam, the town where he was born. He started his career playing the violin in orchestras. Then he learned to conduct.
He became second conductor of the Netherlands Radio Union Orchestra in 1955. He then became chief conductor of the Netherlands Radio Philharmonic in 1957. On 7 November 1956 the famous conductor Carlo Maria Giulini was not able to conduct a concert of the Concertgebouw Orchestra so the young Bernard Haitink conducted instead. This helped him to become famous. Three years later he became a conductor of the Amsterdam Concertgebouw Orchestra and he stayed with them for a quarter of a century. In 1963 he became the main conductor of that orchestra, and in 1999 they gave him the title of honorary conductor.
Haitink has also had jobs outside the Netherlands. He was principal conductor of the London Philharmonic Orchestra from 1967 to 1979, music director at Glyndebourne Opera from 1978 to 1988 and at the Royal Opera House, Covent Garden from 1987 to 2002. He also held posts with the Dresden Staatskapelle and Boston Symphony Orchestra, and conducted many other great orchestras of the world.
In 1977, he was given an honorary knighthood in the Order of the British Empire
Haitink has conducted music by many composers from different periods. He has recorded many great works for Phillips, Decca and EMI. In 2004 his recording of Janáček’s opera "Jenufa" was given the Grammy Award for the best opera recording.
Haitink has five children from his first marriage. He lives in Switzerland with his fourth wife, who used to be a viola player in the orchestra of the Royal Opera House.

Libération
media
"Libération" (also called as "Libé") is a French daily newspaper founded in Paris in 1973 by Jean-Paul Sartre.

George Winston
music
George Winston is a pianist from the U.S. State of Michigan. He was born there in 1949 but moved to Montana as a child. Most of his music is about the four seasons and landscapes in the USA.

William Herschel
music
Frederick William Herschel (November 15 1738 - August 25 1822) was a British astronomer. He was born in Germany, but moved to England in 1755. He is best known for discovering the planet Uranus in 1781. He lived in England most of his life.
When he discovered Uranus, Herschel was not looking for a planet but a comet; it was an accidental discovery.
William Herschel used to work with his sister Caroline Herschel. She was a dutiful sister who used to wrote up all his observations as he had no time to write them himself.
On 25 August 1822, Herschel died at Observatory House, Windsor Road, Slough, and is buried at nearby St Laurence's Church, Upton. Ironically, he died in his 84th year, which is the same number of years which Uranus takes to orbit the Sun.

Atlanta Falcons
sports
The Atlanta Falcons are an American football team in Atlanta, Georgia. They are a member of the NFC South of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The Falcons joined the NFL as a 1966 expansion team. In their 42 years in the NFL, the Falcons have a record of 262-386-6 with division championships in 1980, 1998 and 2004, and appeared in Super Bowl XXXIII in Miami, Florida.

New Orleans Saints
sports
The New Orleans Saints are a professional American football team in New Orleans, Louisiana. The Saints play in the Southern Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL).

St. Louis Rams
sports
The St. Louis Rams are a professional American football team in St. Louis, Missouri. They are currently in the Western Division of the National Football Conference (NFC) in the National Football League (NFL). The team has won two NFL Championships and one Super Bowl.

Gary Lightbody
music
Gary Lightbody was born on June 15, 1976 in Northern Ireland. He is the lead singer of the alternative rock band Snow Patrol. He first started Snow Patrol under the name "Polar Bears" while at the University of Dundee, Scotland, in 1994.

Cincinnati Cyclones
sports
The Cincinnati Cyclones are a premier "AA" hockey team in the ECHL league. The 2007-2008 season is the first to mark the Cyclones to it to the Kelly Cup championship. For the first time in 18 years the cyclones they won a championship game in Cincinnati, Ohio.

Wilt Chamberlain
sports
Wilton Norman "Wilt" Chamberlain (August 21 1936 – October 12 1999) was an American basketball player. Chamberlain played in the NBA during the 1960s, and many people think he is one of the best players in basketball history. He was one of the tallest players of that time, and he was one of the most famous people in the game for many years. He is the first and only basketball player to score 100 points in an NBA game.
He won two NBA championships: the first in 1967, with the Philadelphia 76ers, and the second in 1972, with the Los Angeles Lakers. In 1999, he died from a heart attack.

Henry A. Wallace
politics
Henry Agard Wallace (October 7, 1888 – November 18, 1965) was the 33rd Vice President of the United States (1941–45). He was also the eleventh Secretary of Agriculture (1933–40). In addition, he was the tenth Secretary of Commerce (1945–46).

Siegmund Nissel
music
Siegmund Nissel (January 3, 1922 - May 21, 2008) was an Austrian-born British violinist who played second violin in the famous Amadeus Quartet.
Siegmund (Sigi) Nissel was born in Munich to a Jewish family from Vienna. He began playing the violin at the age of 6. His mother died when he was 9. He was taken by his father to Vienna, where his teachers included Max Weissgärber. Soon the political situation became dangerous for Jews in Austria and so, in 1938, the young Nissel was sent from Vienna to Great Britain.
When World War II started Nissel was interned on the Isle of Man. There he met the violinist Peter Schidlof and later Norbert Brainin. They played a lot of music together. Then they were set free because they were talented musicians. They studied with the famous violin teacher Max Rostal. There they met the British cellist, Martin Lovett whose wife was a pupil of Rostal. The four men played string quartets together, with Peter Schidlof now playing viola. At first they called themselves the Brainin Quartet, but then Nissel had the idea of the name Amadeus Quartet (Amadeus being one of Mozart's names).
The Amadeus Quartet (which their friends often called the Wolf Gang), gave its first concert in the Wigmore Hall, London in 1948. The hall was full and hundreds of people were turned away. After this concert they were invited to perform all over the world. They became the most famous string quartet group of their time. They made about 200 recordings. They were especially known for playing quartets by the great classical composersMozart, Beethoven, Schubert and Brahms, but they also played works by 20th-century composers such as Bartók and Benjamin Britten (who wrote his third quartet for them).
Nissel was the one who organized all the business side for the group.
When Schidlof died from a heart attack in 1987, the Amadeus Quartet no longer existed. Nissel became a well-known teacher of young quartets at the Royal Academy of Music.
Although he had an operation for a brain tumour in 1960 and also a heart bypass he lived to the age of 86. He was a family man who had a wife, son, daughter and three grandchildren. He had many honours including an OBE (1970), and honorary doctorates from York University and the Royal Academy of Music.
References.
Siegmund Nissel - Obituary: The Independent, 26 May 2008

Dong Xian
politics
Dong Xian (董賢) (23 BC(?) – 1 BC) was a Han Dynasty politician who quickly rose from obscurity as a minor official to being the most powerful official in the imperial administration of Emperor Ai within a span of a few years.

Peter Schidlof
music
Peter Schidlof (July 9, 1922 - 1987) was an Austrian-British [violist. He played the viola in the Amadeus Quartet.
Schidlof was born in Vienna, but had to leave Austria when the Nazis came. He went to Great Britain. Because he was musically talented he won a scholarship to Blundell's School in Devon, but when World War II broke out he was interned. It was in the internment camp that met Norbert Brainin and Siegmund Nissel. They often played music together. When they were freed they became pupils of Max Rostal who persuaded Schidlof to play the viola instead of the violin. Together with Martin Lovett the four men formed a string quartet which at first they called the Brainin Quartet, but they soon changed the name to Amadeus Quartet. The Amadeus Quartet gave their first concert at the Wigmore Hall in 1948. Soon they became world famous, playing in concerts and festivals in many countries.
Schidlof was a calm man who listened very carefully to everything that was going on. The others called him "Eagle ears". The four men played together for nearly 40 years until Schidlof's death.

Christopher Wren
science
Sir Christopher Wren (October 20, 1632 – February 25, 1723) was a 17th century English designer, astronomer and geometer (a mathematician who studies Geometry). He was one of the greatest English architects of his time. Wren designed 53 churches in London, including St. Paul's Cathedral.

Regis Philbin
music
Regis Philbin is an American television personality. He is known as the host of the American version of the popular game show, "Who Wants to Be a Millionaire?". He currently stars in the daytime talk show "Live with Regis and Kelly".
He was born on August 25, 1931.
He is often called "the hardest working man in show business" and holds the world record for the most time spent in front of a television camera.

Before I Self Destruct
music
"Before I Self Destruct" is 50 Cent's fourth album. It will be released during 2008.
On the track "The End of My Career", on one of 50 Cent's mixtapes, he said that he has already recorded 12 tracks for the album.

Antonio Pappano
music
Antonio Pappano (born December 30, 1959 in Epping) is a British conductor and pianist of Italian origin. He is the conductor of the orchestra of the Royal Opera House, Covent Garden in London, and l'Orchestra dell'Accademia Nazionale di Santa Cecilia in Rome.
Pappano was born in England, but his family had come from Italy. When he was 13 years old, he moved with his family to Connecticut, in the United States. There he had his musical training, learning to play the piano as well as composition and conducting. He became a rehearsal accompanist at the New York City Opera.
Pappano is the youngest conductor to lead the Orchestra of the Royal Opera House in London, accompanying both the Royal Opera and Royal Ballet. He is also an excellent piano accompanist.

Jackie Robinson
sports
Jack Roosevelt "Jackie" Robinson (January 31, 1919 – October 24, 1972) was the first African-American major league baseball player.
References.
He served in the military in 1945 but never saw action

Reggie White
sports
Reginald Howard "Reggie" White (December 19, 1961 – December 26, 2004) was a American football who is now in the Pro Football Hall of Fame. He is well-known for being a Evangelical Christian minister. This led to his nickname, "the Minister of Defense."

Jerry Rice
sports
Jerry Lee Rice (born October 13, 1962 in Crawford, Mississippi) is a former football wide receiver in the NFL.

Barry Sanders
sports
Barry David Sanders (born) is a Hall of Fame and Heisman Trophy winning American football running back. He spent all of his professional career with the Detroit Lions in the NFL.

Florence Foster Jenkins
music
Florence Foster Jenkins (born Pennsylvania, U.S., 19 July 1868; died 26 November, 1944) was an American soprano who became famous because she was such a bad singer. She sang out of tune, had a very poor sense of rhythm and she was very unmusical.
Life.
She was born Florence Foster in Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania. She had music lessons when she was a child. She wanted to go and study music abroad. Her father was very rich, but he refused to pay for her to travel, so she ran away with a man called Frank Thornton Jenkins who was a doctor. They married, although they divorced in 1902. Her husband did not want her to be a singer either.
In 1909 her father died so she inherited some money which she used to have singing lessons. Soon she started to give recitals. Her mother died in 1928 and this gave her even more freedom and money to sing.
From her recordings we can hear that Jenkins sang very out of tune and out of time. She even wobbled a lot on one note. Her piano accompanist can be heard trying to change the speed to fit in with her mistakes. Her words were unclear, especially when singing in a foreign language. However, she became tremendously popular in her unusual way. Her audiences seemed to love her in spite of her unmusicality. She always thought she was a good singer and compared herself to the great sopranos. She knew the critics wrote bad things about her, but she said: "People may say I can't sing, but no one can ever say I didn't sing."
Jenkins sang music from famous operas as well as classical songs (Lieder). She wore fancy costumes which she designed herself. She threw flowers into the audience and was always fanning herself.
In 1943 she was in a taxi that crashed. After the crash she found she could sing "a higher F than ever before." Instead of a lawsuit against the taxicab company, she sent the driver a box of expensive cigars.
In 1944, when she was 76, Jenkins performed at Carnegie Hall. Many people had wanted her to perform there. Tickets sold out weeks before the concert. Jenkins died a month later. She always seemed to have been quite certain that she was a great singer.

Pachacuti
politics
Pachacuti Inca Yupanqui (or Pachacutec; Quechua "Pachakutiq", whose name means "He who remakes the world" was the ninth Sapa Inca (1438-1471/1472) of the Kingdom of Cuzco, which he transformed into an empire, Tawantinsuyu. He began the era of conquest that, within three generations, expanded the Inca dominion from the valley of Cuzco to nearly the whole of civilized South America. He was the fourth of the Hanan dynasty, and his wife's name is given as Mama Anawarkhi or Coya Anahurque. Their son was Tupac Inca Yupanqui.
Pachacuti reorganized the new empire, the "Tahuantinsuyu" or "the united four provinces." Under his system, there were four "apos" that each controlled one of four provinces ("suyu").
Despite Pachacuti's political and military talents, he did not improve upon the system of choosing the next Inca. His son became the next Inca without any known dispute, but in future generations the next Inca had to gain control of the empire by winning enough support from the apos, priesthood, and military to either win a civil war or intimidate anyone else from trying to get control of the empire.
Machu Picchu is believed to date to the time of Pachacuti.

Martin Brodeur
sports
Martin Pierre Brodeur (born May 6, 1972, in Montreal, Quebec) is a professional ice hockey goaltender who has played his entire National Hockey League career with the New Jersey Devils. In his 15-year career, he was the goaltender for three Stanley Cup championships and been in the playoffs every year but one with the team. He holds more than thirty Devils team records.

Miikka Kiprusoff
sports
Miikka Sakari Kiprusoff (pronounced "MEE-kah KIHP-roo-sawf") (born October 26, 1976) is a professional hockey goaltender playing for the Calgary Flames in the National Hockey League (NHL). He captured the 2006 Vezina Trophy as the NHL's best goaltender.

Evgeni Nabokov
sports
Evgeni Viktorovich Nabokov () (born July 25, 1975 in Ust-Kamenogorsk, U.S.S.R., now Kazakhstan), is a professional ice hockey goaltender for the San Jose Sharks of the National Hockey League.

Henrik Lundqvist
sports
Henrik Lundqvist (born March 2, 1982, in Åre, Sweden) is a Swedish ice hockey goaltender for the New York Rangers of the National Hockey League (NHL). He has been nominated for the Vezina Trophy three times. He finished third all three times. His play during his first season resulted in the New York media and Rangers fans giving him the nickname "King Henrik". During the 2006 Winter Olympics in Torino, Italy, he played on the Swedish team when they won their second Olympic Gold Medal.

Dominik Hašek
sports
Dominik Hašek, (born January 29, 1965) is a professional ice hockey goaltender for the Detroit Red Wings of the National Hockey League. He has also played for the Chicago Blackhawks, Buffalo Sabres, and the Ottawa Senators. When he was in Buffalo, he became one of the league's best goaltenders. He was nicknamed "The Dominator." His strong play has been said to have establish European goaltenders in a league dominated by North Americans.
Hašek has been one of the league's most successful goaltenders of the 1990s and early 2000s. From 1993 to 2001, he won six Vezina Trophies, and in 1998 he became the first goaltender to win consecutive Hart Trophies.
During the 1998 Winter Olympics in Nagano, Japan, he led the Czech national ice hockey team to its first and only Olympic gold medal. The feat made him a popular figure in his home country and prompted hockey legend Wayne Gretzky to call him "the best player in the game."
While with the Red Wings in 2002, Hašek became the first European starting goaltender to win the Stanley Cup.
Doing that, he set a record for shutouts in a postseason year. He came in second in votes for the Conn Smythe Trophy for the playoff's Most Valuable Player.
Hašek is considered an unorthodox goaltender, with a specail style that has labeled him a "flopper." He is best known for his concentration, foot speed, flexibility, and unconventional saves, such as covering the puck with his blocker rather than his trapper.
Hašek is seen as a future Hall of Famer by those in the hockey world. He is right now the oldest goalie in the NHL at 43, and also, the second oldest player in the league after Red Wings teammate Chris Chelios, who is 46.

Bernie Parent
sports
Bernard Marcel Parent (born April 3, 1945 in Montreal, Quebec), better known as Bernie Parent, is a retired Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender.

Tony Esposito
sports
Anthony James "Tony O" Esposito (born April 23, 1943 in Sault Ste. Marie, Ontario) is a retired professional ice hockey goaltender, who played in the National Hockey League, most notably for the Chicago Black Hawks. He is considered one of the pioneers of the now popular butterfly style.

Billy Sunday
sports
William Ashley Sunday (November 19 1862 – November 6 1935) was an American athlete and religious person. He was an outfielder in baseball's National League during the 1880s. After that he became an influential American evangelist at the start of the 20th century.

Fanny Crosby
music
Frances Jane Crosby (or just Fanny Crosby) (March 24 1820 – February 12 1915) was an American musician who wrote Protestant Christian hymns. She was a lifelong Methodist. She was one of the most famous hymn writers in history. He wrote over 8,000 hymns in her life, even though she was blind from shortly after her birth. She was also known for her preaching and speaking.

Philip Bliss
music
Philip Paul Bliss (9 July 1838 – 29 December 1876) was an American writer of hymns. He was also a Gospel music singer. He wrote many well-known hymns in his lifetime. He also wrote the tune for Horatio Spafford's "It Is Well with My Soul".

William Wilberforce
politics
William Wilberforce was a man who helped to abolish the abhorrent business of slavery in the USA
William Wilberforce (August 24 1759 – July 29 1833) was a British politician and philanthropist. He was a leader of the movement to abolish the slave trade.

Georges Vézina
sports
Georges Vézina (pronounced:), nicknamed "The Chicoutimi Cucumber" (January 21, 1887 – March 27, 1926) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played five seasons in the National Hockey League and seven in the National Hockey Association for the Montreal Canadiens.

John Edward Gray
science
John Edward Gray (February 12, 1800 – March 7, 1875) was a English zoologist. He studied medicine in London, and became head of the Zoological collection in 1840. During his life he wrote over 500 academic papers, mostly on new species.
Gray was also interested in postage stamps; on 1 May 1840, the day the Penny Black first went on sale, he bought some to keep, thus making him the world's first known stamp collector.

Skip James
music
Nehemiah Curtis "Skip" James (June 21, 1902 – October 3, 1969) was an American Delta blues singer, guitarist, pianist and songwriter.
Early years.
James was born near Bentonia, Mississippi. He worked on road construction in the early 1920s, and wrote what his earliest song, "Illinois Blues", about his experience as a worker. He began playing guitar in open D-minor tuning with three fingers.
1920s and '30s.
Skip James traveled to Grafton, Wisconsin to record for Paramount. James recorded blues and spirituals and cover versions of other songs.
The Great Depression happened just as James' records were put on the market. Not many people bought them because of this and James had to give up Blues music and worked in a church with his father.
After the depression.
For the next thirty years, James didn't record any songs. In July 1964, James started playing again and he recorded for the Takoma, Melodeon, and Vanguard labels and played until his death in 1969.

Olaf Kölzig
sports
Olaf Kölzig (born April 6, 1970) is a German professional ice hockey goaltender, playing for the Washington Capitals of the National Hockey League. Kölzig was born in South Africa, but he grew up in several cities across Canada and his family moved to Union Bay, British Columbia, Canada, when he was a teenager. Kölzig never applied for Canadian citizenship, which, combined with his German parentage and German passport, allows him to represent Germany internationally. In May 2008 Kolzig announced that he would not return to the Capitals.

Jim Carey (ice hockey)
sports
Jim Carey (born May 31, 1974 in Dorchester, Massachusetts) is a retired American ice hockey goaltender.

Jacques Plante
sports
Joseph Jacques Omer "Jake the Snake" Plante (January 17, 1929 – February 27, 1986) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender. He grew up in Shawinigan Falls, Quebec, and began to play hockey in 1932. Plante started to play organized hockey at age 12, and his first professional game was at age 18. He played for the Montreal Canadiens from 1953 to 1963; during this time, the team won the Stanley Cup six times, including five wins in a row.
Plante first retired in 1965, but he was asked to come back to the NHL to play for a new team, the St. Louis Blues, in 1968. Plante was traded to the Toronto Maple Leafs in 1970, and then to the Boston Bruins in 1973. He joined the World Hockey Association, first as coach and general manager for the Quebec Nordiques in 1973–74. After his time with Quebec was not successful, Plante played goal for the Edmonton Oilers in 1974–75. Plante retired for the last time during training camp in the 1975-76 season.
Plante is considered one of the most important inventors in ice hockey. Most importantly, Plante was the first NHL goaltender to always wear mask when playing. With the help of other experts, he made and tested many versions of the goalie mask, including a version of today's mask/helmet combination. Plante was the first goaltender to regularly play the puck outside his crease in support of his team's defencemen, and often instructed his teammates from behind the play, as the goaltender usually has the best view of the game.
Plante was inducted into the Hockey Hall of Fame in 1978. He was chosen as the goaltender of the Canadiens' "dream team" in 1985. He was inducted into the Quebec Sports Pantheon in 1994. Lastly, the Montreal Canadiens retired Plante's sweater, #1, in 1995.
Plante was the eldest of 11 children. In 1949, he married Jacqueline Gagné; they had two sons, Michel and Richard. In 1970, Plante met his second wife, Raymonde Udrisard, with whom he eventually moved to Switzerland. He died in Geneva, on February 27, 1986, shortly after he had been diagnosed with untreatable stomach cancer. He was buried in Sierre.

Bill Durnan
sports
William Ronald (Bill) Durnan (born January 22, 1916 in Toronto, Ontario - October 31, 1972) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the Montreal Canadiens in the National Hockey League (NHL). He was also the last goaltender to be a captain in the National Hockey League, and one of only four ever with Chuck Gardiner, George Hainsworth and John Ross Roach.
Awards.
First All-Star Team goalie in 1944, 1945, 1946, 1947, 1949, 1950.
Won the Vezina Trophy in 1944, 1945, 1946, 1947, 1949, 1950.
Played in NHL All-Star Game in 1947, 1948, 1949

Roy Worters
sports
Roy "Shrimp" Worters (October 19, 1900 in Toronto, Ontario, Canada – November 7, 1957) was a Canadian professional ice hockey Hall of Fame goaltender who played twelve seasons in the National Hockey League for the Pittsburgh Pirates, Montreal Canadiens and New York Americans, and was notable for having 66 shutouts in his career and being, at 5'3" tall, the shortest player ever to play in the NHL.

Al Rollins
sports
Elwin "Al" Ira Rollins (October 9, 1926 – July 27 1996) was a professional Canadian ice hockey goaltender.
Born in Vanguard, Saskatchewan, Rollins played in the NHL for the Toronto Maple Leafs, Chicago Black Hawks and New York Rangers. He played a big role in the Leafs 1951 Stanley Cup victory. Rollins also won the 1951 Vezina Trophy and the 1954 Hart Memorial Trophy.
Rollins retired in 1962 and decided to become a coach. After retiring, Rollins coached the University of Calgary ice hockey team as well as clubs in Spokane, Salt Lake City, Houston, Tulsa and Phoenix. As a coach, he had alot of success, including an Allan Cup win with the Spokane Jets in 1970.
His son Jerry Rollins played in the WHA which no longer is in operation.

Chuck Rayner
sports
Claude Earl "Chuck" Rayner (born - August 11, 1920 in Kenora, Ontario, died - October 6, 2002) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played nine seasons in the National Hockey League for the New York Americans and New York Rangers. He is an member of the Hockey Hall of Fame.

New York Americans
sports
The New York Americans were a professional ice hockey team, the third expansion team in the history of the National Hockey League (NHL) and the second to play in the United States.
Season-by-season record.
"Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties, Pts = Points, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against, PIM = Penalties in minutes"

Jesse James (Lucky Luke)
music
Jesse James is a Lucky Luke comic written by Goscinny and illustrated by Morris. The first of these French comics was printed in 1969 by Dargaud.

George Hainsworth
sports
George Hainsworth (June 26, 1895 in Toronto, Ontario - October 9, 1950) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the Montreal Canadiens and Toronto Maple Leafs in the National Hockey League (NHL).

Tiny Thompson
sports
Cecil Ralph "Tiny" Thompson (May 31, 1903 – February 9, 1981) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender. He played 12 seasons in the National Hockey League (NHL). He played 10 seasons with the Boston Bruins and two seasons with the Detroit Red Wings. He won the Vezina Trophy, given to the NHL's best goaltender, four times. He was added to the Hockey Hall of Fame in 1959. He won the Stanley Cup once, in 1929 with Boston. At the start of the 1938–39 season, after ten entire seasons with Boston, he was traded to the Detroit Red Wings, where he played the rest of the season, and played another full one before stopping. During his time in the NHL, Thompson made 81 shutouts. This is the sixth-most of any goaltender. After stopping playing, he coached some lower-league teams before becoming a famous professional scout. Thompson helped to make common the technique of catching the puck as a method of making a save. He was good at using his stick to play the puck. He was the first goaltender in the NHL to record an assist by passing the puck with his stick to a player on his team.
Early life.
Thompson was born in Sandon, British Columbia, on May 31, 1903. He grew up in Calgary, Alberta. In 1906, his brother Paul was born in Calgary. Paul would also become a professional ice hockey player. When Cecil was a child, he enjoyed playing baseball and ice hockey. At first, Cecil was not a goaltender. He became a goaltender so that the other children would allow him to play with them. When he became a teenager, other persons on his team began to call him "Tiny" since he was the tallest player. He would be known as "Tiny" for the rest of career.
Thompson began playing junior hockey when he was 16 with the Calgary Monarchs. In his first season, he competed for the Memorial Cup. The Memorial Cup is given to the best junior ice hockey team in Canada. In the two games in which he competed for the Memorial Cup, he gave up 11 goals, which was an average amount of goals to give up in that period of ice hockey.
In the 1920–21 season, Thompson played for Calgary Alberta Grain. In the next three seasons, he played for a team in Bellevue, Alberta. In the 1924–25 season, he joined the Duluth Hornets. He played 40 games for the Hornets. In those 45 games, he had 11 shutouts.
In the next season, Thompson joined the Minneapolis Millers of the American Hockey Association (AHA). He played for the Millers for three seasons. During that time, he appeared in 118 games, making 33 shutouts. He had a 1.37 goals-against average, which is an average of goals surrendered in a span of sixty minutes).
Boston Bruins.
Thompson started playing in the National Hockey League (NHL) in the 1928–29 season. He joined the Boston Bruins since Boston manager Art Ross bought his contract from Minnesota. He did so because he had heard that Thompson was a very good goaltender.
In his first-ever game, Thompson made a shutout. He is the only goaltender that is in the Hockey Hall of Fame that has made a shutout in his first game. I In his first season, Thompson played in all of Boston's 44 games. He made 12 shutouts and has a 1.15 goals-against average. In one full season, a goals-against average of 1.15 is the second-lowest ever in NHL history. George Hainsworth has a lower goals-against average of 0.98 that season, which is the lowest-ever goals-against average for a full season. The Boston Bruins were in first place in the American Division, and they made the playoffs. In the playoffs, they won all of their five games, as they won the Stanley Cup for their first time. In the five playoff games, Thompson made three shutouts, and gave up only three goals during the playoffs. In that season, two brothers, Cecil and Paul, played against each other for the first time in the NHL. Cecil and Paul also played against each other in the Stanley Cup Finals, which was also the first time when brothers played against each other.
In the next season, Cecil played in all of Boston's 44 games again. He made three shutouts and he had a 2.19 goals-against average. Thompson made much less shutouts and a much higher goals-against average because the rules were changed so that players were allowed to pass forward in the attacking area. That season, Boston won all but six games, finishing with a 38–5–1 record, which is the highest-ever winning percentage of any team in the NHL. In the playoffs, they lost two games in a row for the first time in that season. The lost the Stanley Cup finals against the Montreal Canadiens. Earlier in the playoffs, his streak of winning his first seven games was ended. It remains the longest winning streak to start a playoff career. Thompson won his first out of four Vezina Trophies that season.
In the 1930–31 season, he played all 44 games again, and was named to the Second All-Star team. In the next season, Boston lost the semi-finals of the playoffs to Montreal. In the second game of the series against Montreal, Thompson was removed from the net near the end of the game. That was so done so Boston would have six attacking players against Montreal's five. Having more attacking players gave Boston a bigger chance to score. Although Boston lost, their coach's idea was described as "amazing".
In the 1931–32 season, Boston did not play in the playoffs for the first time when Thompson played for them. He missed five games during that season, which was the only time that happened to him. In the 43 games he played, Thompson won only 13. The next season, Boston made the playoffs again, but they lost to the Toronto Maple Leafs.
The last game of the playoff series against the Maple Leafs was described as Thompson's best. In that game, Boston and Toronto were tied after three usual periods of 20 minutes. Since the game was tied, it proceeded to overtime. After five periods of 20 minutes, the game was tied. At end of the fifth overtime period, managers Conn Smythe of the Maple Leafs and Art Ross of the Bruins ask the president of the NHL, Frank Calder, to stop the game, and finish it later. Calder refused. Early in the sixth overtime period, a pass from Boston player Eddie Shore was intercepted. Ken Doraty of the Maple Leafs went for a breakaway, and scored on Thompson at 4:46 of the sixth overtime period. Even though he lost the game, he received a standing ovation from the the fans at Maple Leaf Gardens. This game was the second-longest ever played in the NHL. Even though Thompson lost more games than he won in the playoffs, he finished wit a 1.23 goals-against average.
Thompson got his second Vezina Trophy in the 1932–33 season, making 11 shutouts and getting a 1.76 goals-against average. The next season, Boston missed the playoffs. In the 1934–35 season, Boston placed first in the American Division. Thompson was chosen to the Second All-Star team for his second time. The Bruins won only one of their four playoff games. Their only win came when Thompson had a shutouts. He finished the playoffs with a 1.53 goals-against average.
In the 1935–36 season, Thompson made 10 shutouts, but Boston won only 22 out of 48 games. During that season, Thompson made an assist. At that time time, it was very rare for a goaltender to do that. At the end of the season, he was named to First All-Star team for his first time. He also won the Vezina Trophy for his third time. In that season's playoffs, Boston's series against the Toronto Maple Leafs was a series of contrasts. Boston lost the two-game, total-goal series eight goals to six. In one game, Boston won against Toronto 6–0, but they lost the other game 8–0.
In the 1937–38, Thompson played his last entire season with the Bruins. He won 30 out of the 48 games, but Boston lost to the Maple Leafs once again in the playoffs. At end of the season, he won his fourth and last Vezina Trophy, and was named to the First All-Star team for the second time.
Detroit Red Wings.
Thompson played only five games in the 1938–39 season, because the Bruins decided to replace him with Frank Brimsek. To make space for Brimsek, Thompson was traded to the Detroit Red Wings for Normie Smith and $15,000. Thompson also received $1000 from Boston. Art Ross, still the manager of the Bruins, predicted that Thompson would play five more years for Detroit; however, he only played two. Although Detroit lost more games than they won, they made the playoffs in both seasons, but they did not win the Stanley Cup. Overall, Thompson appeared in 85 regular season games for Detroit, recording a 32–41–12 record, seven shutouts, and a 2.54 goals-against average, and in 11 playoff games, posting a 5–6, with one shutout and a 2.41 goal-against average.
Post-NHL career.
After stopping being a professional player, Thompson became a coach. In the 1940–41 season, he started to coach the Buffalo Bisons of the American Hockey League (AHL). He coached the Bisons for 56 games in two seasons. They missed the playoffs both times. In the 1940–41 season, he played one game for the Bisons as an emergency goaltender.
During World War II, Thompson served in the Royal Canadian Air Force (RCAF). He was also the coach of the Calgary RCAF Mustangs of the Alberta Senior Hockey League. He led the Mustangs to the league championship series in 1942–43 against the Calgary Currie Army team. In March 1943, injuries to the Mustangs' goaltenders made him play again. With Thompson in goal, the Mustangs won against Currie Army, 8–4, to tie the best-of-five series at two wins each. He played the deciding game, but his team fell short of winning the Alberta title with a 3–1 loss.
After the war, Thompson became chief Western Canada scout for the Chicago Black Hawks. He was one of few scouts who tried to find a player's personality along with their playing skills, often talking with players as part of efforts to learn about the players he was watching.
Playing style.
Thompson was stand-up goaltender, which mean he rarely fell to both knees to try to stop the puck. He was one of the first goaltenders in the NHL to catch the puck in order to stop it. He was the best puck-catcher when he played. With gloves smaller than one of other players, Thompson did not have a lot of padding when he was in net.
He often used the same, or very similar method, to stop pucks. He dropped to one knee with the paddle of his goalstick covering the space between his legs, and extending his glove to cover the left side of the net. Although he caught the puck with his glove, he did so without gloves resembling the modern blocker and trapper gloves. Thompson was described by Johnny Bower, a former goaltender who was inducted into the Hockey Hall of Fame, as being able to play the puck well with his stick, and one of the best of his time at passing. In the 1935–36 season, Thompson became the first goaltender to get an assist by intentionally passing the puck with his stick to a fellow player.
Legacy.
Thompson's points percentage in a season of.875, recorded in the 1929–30 season, still remains a record. His 38 wins during that season was a Boston record that was beat only in the 1982–83 season, by Pete Peeters; since then, no Bruins goaltender has had more than 37 wins in a season. Thompson is the all-time Bruins leader for games, wins, shutouts and goals-against average. Throughout his entire NHL career career, Thompson made 81 shutouts, which is sixth all-time in NHL history, which was second to only George Hainsworth (who had 94) when Thompson stopped playing. He also made seven shutouts in the playoffs. He is fifth all-time in goals-against average, allowing on average only 2.08 goals in a 60-minute span. He led all goaltenders in regular season games played 10 times, and in regular season wins five times.
In 1959, Thompson was inducted into the Hockey Hall of Fame. He died in Calgary on February 9, 1981. He was survived by his wife, Edith, and his daughter, Sandra.

Terry Sawchuk
sports
Terence Gordon Sawchuk (December 28, 1929 in Winnipeg, Manitoba, Canada–May 31, 1970 in New York City, New York, United States) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played 21 seasons in the National Hockey League for the Detroit Red Wings, Boston Bruins, Toronto Maple Leafs, Los Angeles Kings, and New York Rangers.

Patrick Roy
sports
Patrick Jacques Roy, (born October 5, 1965, in Sainte-Foy, Quebec, Canada) is a retired ice hockey goaltender. Roy's professional career was with the Montreal Canadiens and Colorado Avalanche of the National Hockey League, winning two Stanley Cups with each team. In 2004, Roy was selected as the greatest goaltender in NHL history by a group of 41 writers, along with a fan poll. On November 13, 2006, Roy was inducted into the Hockey Hall of Fame. He is the only player in NHL history to have won the Conn Smythe Trophy, the award given to the most valuable player in the Stanley Cup playoffs, three times.
He is currently the co-owner, general manager, and head coach of the Québec Remparts of the Quebec Major Junior Hockey League.

Scarlett Johansson
music
Scarlett Johansson‏ (born November 22, 1984) is an American actress and singer, she is best known for her roles in the films Lost in Translation, Match Point and The Prestige.

Ken Dryden
sports
Ken Dryden is a retired NHL goaltender. Born in Hamilton, Ontario, on August 8, 1947, Dryden was originally drafted by the Boston Bruins in 1964. Rather than play in Boston, Dryden decided to pursue a Bachelor of Arts degree at Cornell University, where he also played hockey until his graduation in 1969.
At Cornell, Dryden led his team to the 1967 NCAA championship and three consecutive ECAC tournament championships. Ken Dryden made his NHL debut in 1970 for the Montreal Canadians, and became the backbone of six Stanley Cup winning teams in the 1970's. Dryden played from 1970-79 (excluding the 1973-74 season when he retired to pursue the requirements for his law degree) and was elected to the Hockey Hall of Fame in 1983. After retiring from hockey Dryden became an author and business man. His 1983 book "The Game" was a commercial and critical success being nominated for a Governor General's Award. He then became president of the Toronto Maple Leafs hockey club in 1997.

Charlie Gardiner (ice hockey)
sports
Charles Robert Gardiner (December 31, 1904 – June 13, 1934) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the Chicago Black Hawks in the National Hockey League.
Born in Edinburgh, Scotland, Gardiner moved to Winnipeg, Manitoba with his family at age seven. He played junior hockey with the Winnipeg Tigers from 1921 to 1924, and then joined the Selkirk Fishermen senior team for the 1924–25 season. The next year, Gardiner joined the Winnipeg Maroons of the Central Hockey League, which the following season became the American Hockey Association.
He joined the Chicago Black Hawks in 1927 and played there for seven years. Gardiner won the Vezina Trophy in 1932 and 1934. He was a First Team All-Star in 1931, 1932, and 1934. In 1933–34, as captain, he led the Black Hawks to their first Stanley Cup. Sadly, his greatest triumph was short lived, three weeks later he suffered a died in Winnipeg at age 29.
Gardiner was an original member of the Hockey Hall of Fame in 1945. In 1998, he was ranked number 76 on "The Hockey News list of the 100 Greatest Hockey Players.

Frank Brimsek
sports
Francis Charles "Mister Zero" Brimsek (September 26, 1913 – November 11, 1998) was an American professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the Boston Bruins and Chicago Black Hawks in the National Hockey League.
He remained with the Bruins until 1949, and played a final season with the Chicago Black Hawks. He was added into the Hockey Hall of Fame in 1966 (the first American to earn HHOF membership) and was inducted into the United States Hockey Hall of Fame in 1973. In 1998, shortly before his death, he was ranked number 67 on "The Hockey News list of the 100 Greatest Hockey Players.
An annual award given to the top high school goaltender in the state of Minnesota is given in Brimsek's honor.

Turk Broda
sports
Walter Edward "Turk" Broda (May 15, 1914 - October 17, 1972) was a former ice hockey goaltender for the Toronto Maple Leafs. He was born in Brandon, Manitoba on May 15, 1914 to a Polish-Canadian family. He joined the Maple Leafs in 1936.

Ed Belfour
sports
Edward John Belfour (born April 21, 1965) is a professional ice hockey goaltender who plays for Leksands IF in HockeyAllsvenskan, the second highest-level Swedish ice hockey league.
Belfour was born in Carman, Manitoba and grew up playing ice hockey. He played junior hockey for the Winkler Flyers before going to the University of North Dakota where he helped the school win the NCAA championship in the 1986-87 season. The following year, Belfour signed as a free agent with the Chicago Blackhawks (after not being picked in the draft) splitting his time between them and the Saginaw Hawks of the International Hockey League.

Johnny Bower
sports
John William "Johnny" Bower (born November 8, 1924), nicknamed "The China Wall", is a Hockey Hall of Fame goaltender.

Glenn Hall
sports
Glenn Henry "Mr. Goalie" Hall (born October 3, 1931, in Humboldt, Saskatchewan, Canada) is a former professional ice hockey goaltender. During his National Hockey League career with the Detroit Red Wings, Chicago Black Hawks, and St. Louis Blues, Hall rarely missed a game, winning the Vezina Trophy three times, and the Calder Memorial Trophy.

Tom Barrasso
sports
Tom Barrasso is a former National Hockey League goaltender. He played in the NHL for 18 seasons. Barrasso played for six teams: the Buffalo Sabres, Pittsburgh Penguins, Ottawa Senators, Carolina Hurricanes, Toronto Maple Leafs and the St. Louis Blues. During his first season, Barrasso won both the Calder Memorial Trophy, for best rookie, as well as the Vezina Trophy for best goaltender. Barrasso also won the Stanley Cup twice, both times with the Penguins, in 1991 and 1992. Barrasso retired in 2003.

Gump Worsley
sports
Lorne John "Gump" Worsley (May 14, 1929 in Montreal, Quebec – January 26, 2007 in Beloeil, Quebec) was a professional ice hockey goaltender. Born and raised in Montreal, he was given his nickname due to friends deciding he looked like comic-strip character Andy Gump.

Lorne Chabot
sports
Lorne Chabot (October 5, 1900 in Montreal, Quebec - October 10 1946) was a Canadian ice hockey goaltender. Lorne played in the National Hockey League from 1926 to 1937. During this time, he played for the New York Rangers, Toronto Maple Leafs, Montreal Canadiens, Chicago Black Hawks, Montreal Maroons, and New York Americans. Lorne won the 1935 Vezina Trophy for the being the league's best goaltender. He was the first hockey player to appear on the cover of Time Magazine.

Normie Smith
sports
Norman "Normie" Smith (March 18, 1908 in Toronto, Ontario, Canada – February 21988) was a Vezina-winning goaltender for the Detroit Red Wings. Smith did not let in a goal by the Montreal Maroons in the NHL's longest game, a 176-minute, 30-second game, on way to a Stanley Cup championship in 1936. After suffering an arm injury, his quality of play dropped in 1937–38 and the Red Wings finished last. During a game in 1939, he didn't show up, causing problems with Jack Adams. Normie Smith retired rather than report to the minor leagues. He returned to play briefly with the Detroit Red Wings when World War II left a vacuum of players in the NHL.

Dave Kerr
sports
David Alexander Kerr (January 11, 1910 Toronto, Ontario - May 11, 1978) was an NHL goaltender who played 427 games in toal, 327 of them with the New York Rangers.
Playing career.
He played amateur hockey before joining the NHL, winning the Allan Cup in 1930 with the Montreal AAA senior men's team. The next season was his first in the NHL, playing for the Montreal Maroons. The next season he played in the IHL and after that played two more for the Maroons.
On December 14, 1934, Kerr was acquired by the Rangers. It is with the Rangers where he is most notable for playing. He played six seasons for them, becoming the Rangers first regular goalie. He led New York to a Stanley Cup victory in 1940. That year, because of his 1.54 GAA and eight shutouts he was a First Team All-Star and won the Vezina Trophy. He also was a second team All-Star in 1938.

WWE United States Championship
sports
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) United States Championship is a professional wrestling championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It was originally a National Wrestling Alliance and World Championship Wrestling title. Currently, it is the second highest ranked championship on the SmackDown brand.
History.
The WWE United States Championship was originally known as the NWA United States Heavyweight Championship of Mid-Atlantic Championship Wrestling run by Jim Crockett Promotions. Following the title's introduction in 1975, Harley Race became the inaugural champion on January 1. The title became "Undisputed" in January 1981 when no other United States title was recognized in other promotions governed by the National Wrestling Alliance. In 1986, the title became a secondary championship in Mid-Atlantic Championship Wrestling when Jim Crockett Promotions gained control of the NWA World Heavyweight Championship. The title was renamed the World Championship Wrestling (WCW) United States Heavyweight Championship in 1991 when Jim Crockett Promotions became World Championship Wrestling.
In March 2001, the World Wrestling Federation purchased World Championship Wrestling from AOL Time Warner. Soon after, "The Invasion" took place in which the ECW Alliance was ultimately dismantled. During this time, the title was referred to as the WCW United States Championship. At Survivor Series 2001, the title was unified with the WWF Intercontinental Championship. The United States Champion, Edge, defeated the Intercontinental Champion, Test, becoming the new Intercontinental Champion while causing United States Championship to become inactive.
In July 2003, the title was reactivated as the WWE United States Championship by SmackDown General Manager, Stephanie McMahon, and was commissioned to be a secondary championship to the SmackDown brand. This was done shortly after the WWE Intercontinental Championship was recommissioned by the Raw brand, making the title its equal counterpart.
The United States Championship was drafted to ECW as part of the 2008 WWE Draft on June 23, 2008 when then champion Matt Hardy was drafted to ECW. It then followed Shelton Benjamin back to SmackDown the following Sunday at The Great American Bash.
Current champion.
The current champion is Shelton Benjamin, who is in his first reign. He defeated Matt Hardy at The Great American Bash in Uniondale, New York on July 20, 2008.

Johnny Mowers
sports
Johnny Mowers (October 29, 1916 in Niagara Falls, Ontario, Canada - December 71995) was an ice hockey goaltender who played for the Detroit Red Wings, winning the Vezina Trophy in 1943. Born in Niagara Falls, Ontario, Mowers played goal for the Red Wings on their way to the Stanley Cup in 1943, shutting out the Boston Bruins twice in the four games.

Denis DeJordy
sports
Denis DeJordy (born November 12, 1938, in Saint-Hyacinthe, Quebec, Canada), is a retired Canadian professional ice hockey player. He played goal for four NHL teams, most notably the Chicago Black Hawks.
Playing career.
Denis DeJordy was a goaltender with the Chicago Black Hawks, Los Angeles Kings, Montreal Canadiens and Detroit Red Wings over 12 seasons in the National Hockey League. He shared the Vezina Trophy with Glenn Hall in 1967. During the 1966 – 1967 season he played 44 games, posting a 2.46 Goals Against Average.

Jack Adams Award
sports
The Jack Adams Award is awarded annually to the National Hockey League coach "adjudged to have contributed the most to his team's success." It has been awarded 33 times to 28 different winners. The winner is selected by a poll of the National Hockey League Broadcasters Association at the end of the regular season. Many coaches have won the award numerous times. Pat Burns has won three times, the most of any coach.
Winners.
aTeams who had best overall record in regular season (President's Trophy awarded to team with best overall record since 1985-86)
bCoaches whose teams won the Stanley Cup
cCoaches whose teams lost the Stanley Cup final round

Luca Marenzio
music
Luca Marenzio (born Coccaglio, near Brescia, Italy, 18 October? 1553?; died Rome, 22 August 1599) was an Italian composer who lived in the late Renaissance. He was one of the best known composers of madrigals.
Life.
Marenzio may have been born in 1553. We think this because his father once wrote down his son’s age. The date may have been 18 October because that was his saint’s feast day.
He had his early education in Brescia possibly in Mantua. Then he moved to Rome, where he worked as a singer for Cardinal Cristoforo Madruzzo. After the cardinal's death he worked at the court of Cardinal Luigi d'Este. Here he started to become known as a composer. By 1581 his music had become extremely popular. His books of madrigals were often reprinted. His madrigals were often included in published collections.
In 1587 he moved to Florence where he worked for Ferdinando I de' Medici for two years; in 1589 he returned to Rome, where he spent most of his last years, except for a trip to Poland from 1596 to 1597, during which time he worked at the court of Sigismund III Vasa in Warsaw. It seems from what some people wrote that his trip to Poland ruined his health, and he died in Rome in 1599, shortly after returning from Poland.
Music.
Marenzio wrote some religious music: motets, and madrigals based on religious texts. However, most of his famous music consists of secular (not religious) madrigals. They were written during a period of twenty years, and they vary a lot in style.
Marenzio published at least fifteen collections of music, mostly madrigals but also "canzonette" and "villanelle". These were similar to madrigals but very light in character. Some of his later works are very chromatic: they use harmony that was unusual for the time. He often makes the music fit the meaning of the words. This is called word-painting. For example: the phrase "sinking in the sea" is sung to notes which go lower and lower.
Influence.
Marenzio’s music had a lot of influence on composers in Italy, as well as in the rest of Europe. There were several of his madrigals in "Musica transalpina", a collection of madrigals published in 1588 by Nicholas Yonge in England.

WWE Divas Championship
sports
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Divas Championship is a official championship in World Wrestling Entertainment competed for by divas. The title is exclusive to the SmackDown! brand.
History.
As a result of the WWE Brand Extension in 2002, the WWE Women's Championship was made exclusive to the Raw brand. Thereafter, only Divas on the Raw brand were able to compete for the WWE Women's Championship, while the Divas on the SmackDown brand were unable to compete for a women's-exclusive championship. The ruling was, however, ignored on rare occasions as Melina and Ashley have been the only divas who were on the SmackDown brand to challenge for the title. This led to the creation of the WWE Divas Championship, which was announced on June 6, 2008 during an episode of "SmackDown" by SmackDown General Manager Vickie Guerrero. In order to determine the competitors for the new title, two 'Golden Dreams matches', the object of which was to retrieve a star that was hanging on a pole above one corner of the ring, were held. The first Golden Dreams match was won by Natalya, and the second by Michelle McCool. The championship belt was officially unveiled on the July 4, 2008 episode of "SmackDown" prior to the second Golden Dreams match. Natalya and McCool competed against each other at The Great American Bash, which McCool won and became the inaugural champion.
Current champion.
The current champion is Maryse, who is in her first reign as champion. She defeated Michelle McCool on Smackdown with Maria as the Special Guest Referee.
List of individual reigns.
As of December 30, 2008.
List of combined reigns.
As of December 30, 2008.

Alain Vigneault
sports
Alain Vigneault (b. May 14, 1961) is the current coach of the Vancouver Canucks.

Lindy Ruff
sports
Lindy Ruff is the current head coach of the Buffalo Sabres. He is currently the longest-serving coach in the NHL, being Buffalo's coach since 1997.

John Tortorella
sports
John Tortorella was the former coach of the Tampa Bay Lightning. Tortorella won both the Jack Adams Award and the Stanley Cup, with the Lightning, in 1994.

Kobe Bryant
sports
Kobe Bryant (born) is an American professional basketball player who currently plays for the Los Angeles Lakers of the National Basketball Association.
He has won three championship rings from 2000-2002 with Shaquille O'Neal with Phil Jackson as coach.
He was awarded the season's MVP in the 2007-08 NBA season after leading his team to the 2008 NBA Playoffs as the first seed in the Western Conference.

Israel national football team
sports
The Israel National Football Team is the national football team of Israel and is controlled by the Israel Football Association.
They Play in Ramat Gan Staduim. Israel had one World Cup appearance in 1970.

Deniz Baykal
politics
Deniz Baykal (born 1938 in Antalya,Turkey) is a Turkish politician and the leader of Republican People's Party(CHP). CHP is the main opposition in the Turkish Parliament.

Daniel Alfredsson
sports
Daniel Alfredsson is the current captain of the Ottawa Senators. Alfredsson won the Calder Memorial Trophy in 1996.

Dany Heatley
sports
Dany Heatley is a ice hockey player for the Ottawa Senators. Heatley won the Calder Memorial Trophy in 2002. He won the trophy when he was playing for the Atlanta Thrashers. Heatley asked to be traded to Ottawa because of his involvement in a car accident that killed teammate Dan Snyder.

Amazing Grace
music
"Amazing Grace" is a well-known Christian hymn. The words were written late in 1772 by Englishman John Newton.
John Newton and the lyrics to Amazing Grace.
Amazing grace, how sweet the sound
That sav’d a wretch like me!
I once was lost, but now am found,
Was blind, but now I see.
’Twas grace that taught my heart to fear,
How precious did that grace appear,
Thro’ many dangers, toils and snares,
’Tis grace has brought me safe thus far,
And grace will lead me home.
The Lord has promis’d good to me,
He will my shield and portion be,
Yes, when this flesh and heart shall fail,
I shall possess, within the veil,
A life of joy and peace.
The earth shall soon dissolve like snow,
But God, who call’d me here below,

Florida Championship Wrestling
sports
Florida Championship Wrestling (FCW) is a professional wrestling promotion based in Tampa, Florida. It is the official developmental territory for World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE).
History.
The promotion, in its current form, was started by Steve Keirn in 2007 to be WWE's second developmental territory when they ended their relationship with the Georgia-based Deep South Wrestling in early 2007. It became their only developmental territory in early 2008 when they ended affiliation with Ohio Valley Wrestling.
FCW's first show was on June 26 2007 at Tampa, Florida's Dallas Bull. A 21 man Battle Royal was held during the show, with Harry Smith booked to win and become the first ever FCW Southern Heavyweight Champion. The next year the FCW Florida Heavyweight Championship was introduced, with Jake Hager becoming the first champion at a February 15 show after surviving a Battle Royal and defeating Ted DiBiase, Jr.. The FCW Florida Tag Team Championship was also introduced in February, with the Puerto Rican Nightmares (Eddie Colón and Eric Perez) beating Steven Lewington and Heath Miller to win it in the finals of a one night tournament. The singles titles were later unified, keeping the "Florida Heavyweight" name.
FCW currently runs shows every Tuesday at Bourbon Street nightclub, as well as spot shows on other nights at other venues in and around the Central Florida area. They are also in the getting ready to start a weekly television series when get a public restroom built in.

Michael Vick
sports
Michael Vick is an American football quarterback for the Atlanta Falcons.

Tom Brady
sports
Tom Edward Brady Jr. is an American Football quarterback for the New England Patriots. Brady was first drafted by the Patriots in the 2000 NFL draft from the University of Michigan. In the postseason, Brady has 1 MVP award, and 2 Super Bowl MVP awards. He is also called one of the best quarterbacks in the era.

Randy Moss
sports
Randy Moss is an Wide receiver for the New England Patriots.

Norm Van Brocklin
sports
Norm Van Brocklin (March 15, 1926 – May 2, 1983) was an American football coach for the Atlanta Falcons. He is a member of the NFL Hall of Fame as a player for the Los Angeles Rams (1949-1957) and the Philadelphia Eagles (1958-1960)

San Antonio Spurs
sports
The San Antonio Spurs are a team in the National Basketball Association in San Antonio, Texas.

Atlanta Hawks
sports
The Atlanta Hawks are a team in the National Basketball Association, in Atlanta, Georgia.

Golden State Warriors
sports
The Golden State Warriors are a professional basketball team.

Sacramento Kings
sports
The Sacramento Kings are a team in the National Basketball Association in Sacramento, California.

New York Knicks
sports
The New York Knicks are a team in the National Basketball Association in New York

Utah Jazz
sports
The Utah Jazz are a team in the National Basketball Association in Utah.

Houston Rockets
sports
The Houston Rockets are a team in the National Basketball Association in Houston, Texas.

Portland Trail Blazers
sports
The Portland Trail Blazers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Portland, Oregon.

Julius Eastman
music
Julius Eastman (October 27, 1940 – May 28, 1990) was an African-American composer, pianist, singer and dancer. He is a minimalist.
Eastman grew up in Ithaca, New York. He began piano at age 14. He studied piano at the Curtis Institute of Music, with Mieczyslaw Horszowski and composition with Constant Vauclain.
In 1970, Eastman joined the Center for the Creative and Performing Arts at SUNY Buffalo, where he met the Czech-born composer, conductor, and flute player Petr Kotik. Eastman and Kotik played together in the early to mid 1970s. Eastman was a maker of the S.E.M. Ensemble. From 1971 he performed and traveled with the group.
He died alone in Millard Fillmore Hospital in Buffalo, New York of heart problems. No attention was given to his death until an obituary in the "Village Voice" by Kyle Gannon January 22, 1991, eight months after he died.

Eli Manning
sports
Elisha Nelson "Eli" Manning (born January 3, 1981 in New Orleans, Louisiana) is an American football player. He is the quarterback for the New York Giants in the National Football League (NFL). Eli is the younger brother of Peyton Manning.
Manning played college football at the University of Mississippi after attending high school at Isidore Newman School in New Orleans. Manning was called the Most Valuable Player of the forty-second Super Bowl, which was played on February 3, 2008. In that game, he led the New York Giants to an unexpected win over the New England Patriots.
When Manning entered the NFL Draft (which is where professional American football teams choose new players for their teams), he was first chosen by the San Diego Chargers. But, the same day that the San Diego Chargers chose Manning, they decided to allow him to play for the New York Giants. In return, the New York Giants allowed Philip Rivers to join the San Diego Chargers. The New York Giants also allowed the San Diego Chargers to choose more players the next time the NFL Draft happened.
Personal life.
Eli Manning's home is in Hoboken, New Jersey,
When Eli Manning was young, it was difficult for him to learn how to read. He almost had to do one year of school twice. Manning said that his mother helped him a lot when he was learning how to read.
In 2007, Manning asked Abby McGrew to marry him. He met her while they were in college. On April 19, 2008 Manning and McGrew were married in San José del Cabo, Mexico.
When he is not playing football, Manning likes collecting antiques with his mother and wife.
On April 30, 2008, Eli Manning and the rest of the people who play for the New York Giants visited United States President George W. Bush at the White House for the Super Bowl champions celebration.
Manning plays golf with his father and brothers several times a year.

Paul Pierce
sports
Paul Anthony Pierce (born October 13, 1977 in Oakland, California) is an American basketball player for the Boston Celtics of the NBA.

Scotty Bowman
sports
William Scott "Scotty" Bowman (born September 18, 1933 in Montreal, Quebec, Canada) is a former National Hockey League head coach. He holds the record for most wins with 1,244.

Kanal D
media
Kanal D is a Turkish popular television channel broadcasting national. Euro D is the TV which broadcasts Kanal D programmes to the all Europe.

CNN Türk
media
CNN Türk is the Turkish version of international CNN. CNN Türk broadcasts nationwide in Turkey.

Milliyet
media
Milliyet is a major Turkish daily newspaper founded in 1950. Abdi İpekçi, the editor of Milliyet, was murdered in 1979 when coming from the newspaper to his home.

Radikal
media
Radikal is a nationwide newspaper in Turkey.Radikal is a left-wing newspaper.It shares social-democrat ideas.In Sundays it gives an extra called Radikal2.

Kenan Evren
politics
Ahmet Kenan Evren (born 17 July 1918 in Alaşehir, Manisa), was the 7th president of Turkey. He was a former Turkish general and the leader of the coup d'etat on 12 September 1980.

Show TV
media
"Show TV" is a national television channel in Turkey. Turkish news presenter Ali Kırca is one of the important people in Show TV.

Cumhuriyet
media
Cumhuriyet in English The Republic is a Turkish nationwide daily newspaper.Cumhuriyet newspaper shares secularist and republican ideas with its readers.Cumhuriyet is sold about 70.000 everyday.
Ilhan Selcuk, the editor of Cumhuriyet arrested by police after the conversative-Islamic government party AKP has wanted to closed.

Andrew W. Mellon
politics
Andrew William Mellon (March 24 1855 — August 27 1937) was an American banker who also owned many industrial businesses. He was the Secretary of the Treasury from March 4 1921 until February 12 1932.
Personal life.
Mellon was a lover of art, and had a large collection which he gave to the National Gallery of Art. Mellon was also a philanthropist - someone who gives to charity in order to make the world a better place.

Sezen Aksu
music
Sezen Aksu (born 1954) is a Turkish pop singer, song-writer and producer. She is popular in Turkey and outside of the country. She has sold over 40 million albums. She is called as Queen of the Turkish pop.
She supports other singers with working together or writing songs for them. She has worked with Turkish singer Tarkan.

Egon Krenz
politics
Egon Krenz (born 19 March, 1937) was a politician of the German Democratic Republic. He was a high-ranking member of the Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands. He was the successor to Erich Honecker as leader of East Germany in 1989, for a few weeks. He was sentenced to six and a half years in prison. He was released in 2003.

Peyton Manning
sports
Peyton Williams Manning (born March 24, 1976) is an American football quarterback who plays for the Indianapolis Colts, a team in the National Football League. Many people think that Peyton Manning is close to the best quarterback in the National Football League. Manning played college football for the University of Tennessee before he played professional football. Manning has played for the Indianapolis Colts all the time he has played professional football. He joined the team in 1998. Peyton is the older brother of New York Giants quarterback Eli Manning.
Manning has been in many television commercials. He has also had his picture on the covers of some video games for the Xbox, and was on an episode of "Saturday Night Live". Manning has also made a lot donations to charities and he has his own charitable group, called the Peyback foundation.
On February 4, 2007, Manning led the Indianapolis Colts to a victory over the Chicago Bears in the forty-first Super Bowl. He was called the Most Valuable Player of that game.

Cyndi Lauper
sports
Cynthia Ann Stephanie "Cyndi" Lauper (born in Queens, New York, United States, on June 22, 1953) is an American Grammy Award-winning singer, songwriter, and MTV VMA-winning video and Emmy Award-winning movie, television and theater actress. She became a very well known in the mid-1980s with the release of the album, "She's So Unusual". Lauper became the first artist in history to have four top-five singles released from one album. She has released 11 albums, over 40 singles, and has sold more than 25 million albums worldwide. She continues to tour the world in support of human rights.

Jack Brabham
sports
Sir John Arthur "Jack" Brabham, AO, OBE (born April 2 1926) is an Australian racing driver who was Formula One champion in 1959, 1960 and 1966.

Fatima Jinnah
politics
Mohtarma Fatima Jinnah (Urdu: فاطمہ جناح) (July 30, 1893 — July 8, 1967) was the sister of Quaid-i-Azam Muhammad Ali Jinnah, the founder of Pakistan and an active political figure in movement for independence from the British Raj. She is commonly known in Pakistan as Khatoon-e-Pakistan (Urdu: — "Lady of Pakistan") and Madar-e-Millat ("Mother of the Nation.") She was born in Karachi, Pakistan, then a part of British India. She was admitted to the Dr. R. Ahmed Dental College in the University of Calcutta in 1919 and went on to open her dental clinic in Bombay in 1923. She was an instrumental figure in the Pakistan movement and the primary organiser of All India Muslim Women Students Federation. After the formation of Pakistan and the death of her brother, she remained an active member of the nation's politics. In 1965, Miss Fatima Jinnah ran for President as a candidate of the Combined Opposition Party (COP); widely believed to win the election, her loss came as a shock to the world community. The election is still regarded as rigged by most historians. She continued to work for the welfare of the Pakistani people until she died in Karachi on July 8, 1967, there is also a conspiracy that she was murdered by Dictator Muhammad Ayub Khan himself.

Ben Roethlisberger
sports
Ben Roethlisberger (born March 2, 1982, in Lima, Ohio), nicknamed Big Ben, is an American football quarterback. He plays for the Pittsburgh Steelers in the National Football League.
Roethlisberger was the captain of his high school's football team, basketball team, and baseball team. He did not play football as a quarterback until his last year in high school.
Roethlisberger played college football for Miami University in Oxford. In 2003, Roethlisberger led his team to an unbeaten record, a Number 10 ranking in the Associated Press poll and a 49-28 victory over Louisville in the 2003 GMAC Bowl.
Roethlisberger was chosen by the Steelers in the 2004 NFL Draft. He earned the National Football League's "Rookie of the Year Award" in 2005.
On February 5, 2006, Roethlisberger became the youngest quarterback in NFL history to win a Super Bowl. He helped the Steelers to a 21-10 victory over the Seattle Seahawks in the fortieth Super Bowl. He was only 23 years old at the time. He played in his first Pro Bowl in 2007.

Peter Lalor
politics
Peter Lalor (February 5 1827 – February 9 1889) was the leader of the Eureka Stockade rebellion, one of Australia's few violent protests and seen by many as the start of democracy in Australia.
Lalor was born at Tenakill, Queens County, Ireland into a large family, active in Irish politics. He left Ireland with his brother, Richard, and went to Victoria, Australia, in 1852. They worked on building the railway between Melbourne and Geelong. In 1853 Peter went to the Ovens River looking for gold, and Richard went back to Ireland. Peter Lalor went to Ballarat to look for gold in 1854.
Eureka Stockade.
In 1854 the miners working in the goldfields (the area where gold was being found) became very angry about the cost of a gold mining license. In Ballarat the miners started the Ballarat Reform League and demanded changes to the laws. The government would not accept the demands, and the police increased the violent hunts for miners without licences. Peter Lalor became leader of the Reform League on November 30 1854 and made the miners promise to protect their rights and liberties. He told the miners to get weapons and be ready in case they were attacked. They built a small fort or stockade at Eureka in east Ballarat. This fort, the Eureka Stockade was attacked by 276 government soldiers at dawn on December 3, 1854. Thirty miners were killed, and Lalor was badly hurt. Friends hid him from the soldiers and he was able to get away. His left arm had to be amputated (cut off).
Politics.
After Eureka, Lalor was hidden in Geelong until the police stopped looking for him. The government changed the laws and miners on the goldfields were able to elect people to Parliament. Lalor was elected in November 1855. As part of the democratic changes, Victoria got a new constitution in 1856 and Lalor was elected to the new Parliament. His political views were not as democratic as the Ballarat miners wanted. He was against giving every one the right to vote and he wanted some people in the parliament to be appointed, not elected. Lalor became a director (person in charge) of several mining companies. He even supported wage cuts for miners working in his mines. He was seen as more interested in money and power than in people's rights. In 1859 he changed his seat in parliament and did not represent the Ballarat miners again.
In January 1871 Lalor lost his seat in an election. He was made Chairman (in charge) of the Clunes Water Commission with the job of getting water for the town of Clunes. He was voted back into parliament again in 1874. In 1875 he became Postmaster General (in charge of the postal service) and later Commissioner for Trade and Customs. From 1880 to 1887 he was Speaker of the Legislative Assembly. Lalor's wife and daughter died in 1887, he was also sick with diabetes, so he stopped being Speaker, but stayed as representative for South Grant until his death.
After his death, Peter Lalor is remembered with a statue in Ballarat (at the corner of Sturt and Dawson Streets), a suburb of Melbourne is named after him, and there is also a seat in the Australian Federal Parliament named after him.

Paul Kruger
politics
Stephanus Johannes Paulus Kruger (or just Paul Kruger) (October 10, 1825 – July 14, 1904) was the president of the Transvaal Republic (South African Republic) from 1880 to 1900. He became famous for leading the Boers against the British at the time of the Boer War.
Early Life.
Kruger grew up on his grandfather's farm. He worked as a commando (a soldier defending farms), and became a respected leader.
First Boer War.
In 1877 the British Army took control of Transvaal, and Kruger became the leader of the resistance (the people who wanted to fight British control). On December 30, 1880, the government of Transvaal elected (chose) him to be president. In 1881, the British lost the first Boer War, and Kruger negotiated (talked with the enemy to agree) the peace.
Kruger travelled to Europe, where many people respected him.
Second Boer War.
The Second Boer War began in 1899, and Kruger had to escape to Europe in October 1900. He moved to Clarens in Switzerland, where he died in 1904. People took his body back to South Africa and buried him in Church Street Cemetery in Pretoria

Eddie Giacomin
sports
Edward Giacomin (born June 6, 1939 in Sudbury, Ontario) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the New York Rangers and Detroit Red Wings in the National Hockey League, as well as for the Providence Reds of the American Hockey League. Giacomin's sweater number, #1, was the second one retired by the Rangers, after Rod Gilbert.
Early life.
Giacomin grew up in Gatchell, a small town near Sudbury. When Giacomin was a teenager, a kitchen stove exploded and heavily burned him. The doctors advised him to stop hoping to play hockey professionally.

Gilles Villemure
sports
Gilles Villemure (born May 30, 1940, in Trois-Rivières, Quebec, Canada) is a retired Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender. He played for the New York Rangers and Chicago Black Hawks in the 1960s and 1970's.

Richard Sevigny
sports
Richard Sevigny (November 4, 1957 in Montreal, Quebec) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the Montreal Canadiens and Quebec Nordiques in the National Hockey League. In the 1979 Stanley Cup Finals Michel Larocque was scheduled to start game two. Laroque was injured during the pre-game warm up and Sevigny was started instead. The Canadiens would win that year and Sevigny's name was engraved on the Stanley Cup before ever playing an NHL game. In the off season Ken Dryden retired, and Richard Sevigny earned a spot on the roster for the 1979–80 NHL season. Richard won the 1981 Vezina Trophy along with Denis Herron and Michel Larocque with Montreal. After being released by the Canadiens in 1984, Sevigny spent the next three seasons between the Quebec Nordiques and their American Hockey League affiliate in Fredericton, New Brunswick before finishing his career in France. He was, before 1990–91, player-coach of the Diables Rouges de Briançon.
According to hockey legends, Sevigny was quoted as saying that Guy Lafleur would have Wayne Gretzky in his back pocket during the 1981 playoffs, a quote that motivated the Oilers team to victory over the fabled Habs.
Sevigny has involved himself in old-timers charity hockey games and has coached the semi-pro Verdun Dragons.

Denis Herron
sports
Denis Herron (b. June 18, 1952 in Chambly, Quebec) is a former Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender who played for the Montreal Canadiens, Kansas City Scouts, and Pittsburgh Penguins in the National Hockey League.
Denis won the 1981 Vezina Trophy with Montreal along with Michel Larocque and Richard Sevigny and in 1982 he won the William M. Jennings Trophy with Rick Wamsley.
Reference.
Herron finds room at the inn; Ian MacDonald. The Gazette. Montreal, Que.: Dec 23, 2004. pg. C.3

Derek Jeter
sports
Derek Jeter (born June 26, 1974 in Pequannock Township, New Jersey) is an American Major League Baseball player. He is currently the captain and eight-time All-Star shortstop for the New York Yankees.
Jeter made his major league debut on May 29, 1995 with the New York Yankees against the Seattle Mariners when he was 20 years old. He has been playing with the New York Yankees for 13 years ever since he made it to the majors. He has won many awards such as the American League Rookie of the Year Award, a Silver Slugger Award, and three Gold Glove Awards. In the year 2000, Jeter became the only player to win both the All-Star Game MVP Award and the World Series MVP Award in the same year.
Early life.
Jeter was born in Pequannock Township, New Jersey, to an African-American father, Dr. Sanderson Charles Jeter; his mother Dorothy is of Irish and German descent. The family lived in North Arlington, New Jersey with his family, before moving to Kalamazoo, Michigan, when he was 4.
High school.
Jeter was inspired to play baseball by Hall of Famer Dave Winfield. In high school, Jeter was a star player at Kalamazoo Central High School. Jeter earned an All-State honorable mention while he was playing basketball also.
Jeter collected many awards at season's end, including the Kalamazoo Area B'nai B'rith Award for Scholar Athlete, the 1992 High School Player of the Year by the American Baseball Coaches Association, the 1992 Gatorade High School Player of the year award, and USA Today's High School Player of the Year.
In December 2007, Jeter was added to the Kalamazoo Central High School Athletic Hall of Fame.
Draft.
Although Jeter received a baseball scholarship to attend the University of Michigan, he was drafted by the New York Yankees with the 6th overall pick in the 1992 amateur draft and he chose to try to make it to the majors. Jeter has said that he will eventually go back to college and earn a degree.
Earnings.
Jeter has played a role for the Yankees since 1996. Jeter is one of three current veterans (the others are Jorge Posada and Mariano Rivera) who came up through the Yankees organization, and has played his entire professional career with the Yankees. As the Yankees Shortstop, he is currently the longest-serving position player on the team. As of his current contract, Derek earns $22 million a year in salary, and is the second highest paid endorser in baseball having earned $7 million in endorsements in 2006. Also, he was ranked as the most marketable player in baseball according to an 2005 Sports Business Survey.
Regular Season.
On May 29, 1995, Jeter made major league debut against the Seattle Mariners in the Kingdome. He made his first major league hit the following day off veteran pitcher Tim Belcher, and started 13 games before being sent back down to the minors.
He returned on Opening Day of the 1996 season as the starting shortstop (the first Yankee rookie since Tom Tresh in 1962 to do so) and hit his first major-league home run on that day. Coincidentally, his home run was called by another former Yankee shortstop, the late Hall of Famer Phil Rizzuto, with whom Jeter would get guidance from whenever the two met. Jeter played his way to a successful rookie season, hitting for a.314 batting average, 10 home runs, and 78 runs batted in and subsequently earning Rookie of the Year honors.

Dave Mustaine
music
Dave Mustaine (born September 13, 1961 in La Mesa, California) is the guitarist and singer for the thrash metal band, Megadeth. He was a member of another famous band, Metallica, but he was removed from the band in April of 1983. Him and members of Metallica have been angry at each other for years since then, but have made up since then.

Paul Pena
music
Paul Pena (January 26, 1950 – October 1, 2005) was an American singer, songwriter and guitarist. Pena was completely blind by the time he was 20.
Early life.
Pena was born in Hyannis, Massachusetts. Pena spoke Cape Verdean Creole with his family while growing up. His grandfather, Francisco Pena, and father, Joaquim "Jack" Pena, were both professional musicians, and taught Paul to play Cape Verdean music.

Louise Farrenc
music
Louise Farrenc (born Paris, 31 May 1804; died 15 September 1875) was a French composer, virtuoso pianist and teacher. She was very well-known during her lifetime, but her best compositions are not very well known. This is because the way to become a famous composer in France in the 19th century was by writing operas, but Farrenc never wrote operas. Her best compositions are chamber music.
Life.
Her name when she was born was Jeanne-Louise Dumont. Her father was a successful sculptor. She was very young when she started to learn the piano. Her teacher had been a pupil of Muzio Clementi. Soon she was having piano lessons with famous teachers such as Ignaz Moscheles and Johann Nepomuk Hummel. She loved composing, so her parents let her study composition with Anton Reicha at the Paris Conservatoire. At that time women were not allowed to go to composition classes at the Conservatoire, so she probably had her lessons privately. She met a flautist (flute player) called Aristide Farrenc. He was ten years older than she was. They often performed together and they married in 1821. She stopped her studies and travelled with her husband around France giving concerts. He soon grew tired of the concert life and decided to open a publishing house in Paris, which was called Éditions Farrenc. It became one of France’s most important music publishers for nearly 40 years.
Farrenc returned to her studies with Reicha. Then she started giving many concerts and became famous. She was so successful that in 1842 she was made Professor of Piano at the Paris Conservatoire. She stayed in that job for 30 years. Although it was a very good job she was paid less than the male teachers. When her nonet was performed it made her famous. Joseph Joachim was one of the performers. After this success she was paid the same salary as the male professors. Several other chamber works were very successful, but after her death people forgot about them.
Music.
At first, during the 1820s and 1830s, she just wrote for piano. Several music critics, including Schumann, thought they were very good. In the 1830s, she wrote chamber music and orchestral music. Her chamber music includes most of her best compositions.

The Times of India
media
"The Times of India" is a English language newspaper published in India. Initially the newspaper was founded on November 3, 1838 as "The Bombay Times and Journal of Commerce" and by 1861, was renamed "The Times of India". The newspaper has a conservative outlook.

Hindustan Times
media
"Hindustan Times" is a English language newspaper published in India. It has simultaneous editions from New Delhi, Mumbai, Lucknow, Patna, Ranchi and Kolkata. The newspaper has a centrist outlook.

The Statesman
media
"The Statesman" is a English language newspaper published in India. It is published simultaneously from Kolkata, New Delhi, Siliguri and Bhubaneshwar.

Deccan Herald
media
"Deccan Herald" is a English language newspaper published from Karnataka. The newspaper was founded in 1948.

Austen Chamberlain
politics
Sir Joseph Austen Chamberlain, KG (16 October 1863 – 17 March 1937) was a British politician. He received the Nobel Peace Prize in 1925. His father was another important politician, Joseph Chamberlain, and his half-brother (they had a different mother) was Neville Chamberlain, British Prime Minister from 1937 to 1940.
Early Life.
Austen was born in Birmingham on the 16 October 1863, but two days later his mother died. His grandparents looked after him and his sister, Beatrice. Austen went to Rugby school, a famous private school, and then studied at the University of Cambridge. He then studied in a political college in Paris and at a university in Berlin. He returned to Britain in 1888.
Parliament.
In 1892, Chamberlain became a Member of Parliament for Worcestershire, as a member of his father's party, the Liberal Unionist Party. The Liberal Unionists worked to keep Ireland as a part of the United Kingdom. Chamberlain worked hard for his father, and in 1895 the prime minister gave him a job helping to run the Royal Navy. Chamberlain became important very quickly. In 1903 the new prime minister, Balfour gave him the job of controlling the Post Office. Then in 1904 he became Chancellor of the Exchequer, responsible for the economy.
In 1906, the government lost the general election, and Chamberlain lost his job in the government. When his father became ill because of a stroke, he helped his father by fighting against Home Rule, the plan to make Ireland independent. In the First World War, Chamberlain got the job responsible for India, and after the war he became Chancellor of the Exchequer again. Here he helped Britain to recover from the war. He was leader of the Conservative Party from 1921 to 1922.
Foreign Secretary.
In 1924, the Prime Minister Stanley Baldwin gave Chamberlain the job of Foreign Secretary, working with important people from other countries. In 1925. At this time, France and Germany were arguing about war reparations, money paid by the Germans to the countries that won the First World War. Many people were worried that war might start again. Chamberlain met with Gustav Stresemann, the German Foreign secretary. Together with Aristide Briand, they signed the Locarno Pact, an agreement never to use the military to solve problems again. For this, all three men won the nobel Peace Prize, Chamberlain in 1925, Briand and Stresemann in 1926.
Warnings about Hitler.
After the 1929 general election, Chamberlain lost his job as Foreign Secretary. He stayed in parliament, and often argued with the government about their foreign policy (plans). From 1934 until his death in 1937, Chamberlain warned the government about the Nazi Germany, who were building a larger military. Together with Winston Churchill, he argued that Britain should build its military too.
Austen Chamberlain died on 17th March 1937, shortly before his half-brother, Neville Chamberlain became Prime Minister.

Itzhak Perlman
music
Itzhak Perlman (born August 31, 1945) is an Israeli-American violinist. He is one of the greatest violinists of this time.
Life.
Perlman was born in Tel Aviv which, three years later, became part of the state of Israel. When he was small he listened to the violin on the radio and decided he wanted to play it. He studied at the Academy of Music in Tel Aviv. Then he moved to the United States to study at the Juilliard School with Ivan Galamian and Dorothy DeLay. He made his debut (first public performance) at the Carnegie Hall in 1963. In 1964 he won the Leventritt Competition. Soon afterward he began to tour widely. He also appeared on American television in shows including "Sesame Street". He was invited to play at the White House.
Perlman had been ill with polio at the age of four. He got better, and managed to learn to walk again with the use of crutches. Today, he still walks with crutches and plays the violin sitting down.
In 1987, he joined the Israel Philharmonic Orchestra for their concerts in Warsaw and Budapest, as well as other Eastern bloc countries. He toured with the IPO in the spring of 1990 for their first-ever performance in the USSR, with concerts in Moscow and Leningrad, and toured with the IPO again in 1994, performing in China and India.
Perlman usually plays solos, but he also plays chamber music with other musicians, including Yo-Yo Ma, Jessye Norman and, especially, with Pinchas Zukerman.
Perlman usually plays classical music but sometimes he plays jazz. He made an album made with jazz pianist Oscar Peterson, and klezmer. Perlman has been a soloist for a number of movie scores, including the score of the 1993 film "Schindler's List" by John Williams.
Perlman plays on a special Stradivarius violin called the "Soil Stradivarius", made in 1714. He also plays on a Guarneri del Gesu made about 1743.
In recent years, Perlman has also begun to conduct, taking the post of principal guest conductor at the Detroit Symphony Orchestra.
Perlman has made many recordings and received many great honours.
Itzhak Perlman lives in New York City with his wife. They have five children.

Keep Holding On
music
Keep Holding On is a 2006 song by Avril Lavigne. It was on the Eargon soundtrack, as well as the album The Best Damn Thing. It was Avril Lavigne's first CD song (but not CD single) released in North America since Fall To Pieces. It was released in Australia on the iTunes Store as a digital download.

Maxim Vengerov
music
Maxim Vengerov (born August 20, 1974) is a famous Russian violinist.
Life.
He was born in Novosibirsk. His parents were musicians. His mother was a singer who was the director of a children’s orphanage. His father was the first oboist of the Novosibirsk Philharmonic Symphony Orchestra. He started to learn the violin when he was five. When he was seven he went to Moscow with his grandparents and teacher to study at The Central Special Music School, a specialist school which was linked with the Tchaikovsky Conservatory.
At the age of ten, after his grandfather became ill, the family went back to Novosibirsk, where Maxim studied with Zakhar Bron. He was still only ten when he won the Junior Wieniawski violin competition. At the age of 11, he played at the opening concert of the Eighth Tchaikovsky competition. When Bron left Russia in 1987 to teach at the Royal Academy of Music in London, Vengerov and his mother followed him there. They also followed Bron when he moved to Lübeck to open a school there.
In 1990, Vengerov and his family emigrated to Israel where his father continued his profession as an orchestral oboist in Israel. Vengerov took Israeli citizenship and served for a short time in the Israeli Army.
Career.
At age 15, Vengerov won the Carl Flesch International Violin Competition in London. He soon became very famous. He gave concerts, master classes, and recording contracts. He played as a representative of UNICEF and performed in Africa for charity.
In 2004, Vengerov took a six-month break from his solo career, during which he learned jazz improvisation and the electric violin. He also learned to dance Argentine tango.
In 2008 Vengerov announced that he was stopping his violin career to focus on teaching and conducting.

Coach (sport)
sports
In sports, a coach or manager is an person who directs, instructs and trains a team or other person.

Manny Ramirez
sports
Manuel Aristides "Manny" Ramírez Onelcida (born May 30, 1972 in Santo Domingo, Dominican Republic) is an American Major League Baseball player. The Boston Red Sox recently traded Ramirez to the Los Angeles Dodgers for Jason Bay on July 31, 2008. He is a nine-time Silver Slugger and one of twenty-four people to have hit over 500 career home runs. He is well recognized for his strong offensive abilities. Ramirez has the most career grand slams of any active baseball player, and has led the American League is three key batting measures: batting average, home runs and runs batted in. For the past ten years, Ramírez has been a fixture in the Midsummer Classic, and is an eleven-time All-Star. In 2004, he was named the Most Valuable Player of the World Series after helping the Red Sox win their first World Series championship in over 85 years.

Alfonso Soriano
sports
Alfonso Guilleard Soriano (born January 7, 1976) is a Dominican Republican professional Major League Baseball player. He currently plays for the Chicago Cubs as an outfielder. He has used to play with the Hiroshima Toyo Carp, New York Yankees, Texas Rangers and Washington Nationals before the Cubs. He played as a second baseman for the Yankees and Rangers. He bats right-handed and has batted as a lead-off hitter for most of his career.

Betty Davis
music
Betty Davis was funk-soul singer, famous in the 70's. She was married to the star of Jazz Miles Davis, from where she took her surname.

Konrad Lorenz
science
Konrad Zacharias Lorenz (November 7, 1903 in Vienna – February 27, 1989 in Vienna) was an Austrian zoologist, animal psychologist, ornithologist and Nobel Prize winner. He is thought of as one of the founders of modern ethology. Lorenz studied instinctive behavior in animals, especially in greylag geese and jackdaws.
Biography.
In his autobiographical essay, published in 1973 in "Les Prix Nobel" (People who win the Nobel Prize are asked to write essays about their lives), Lorenz said that his parents were the main reason he was so successful. He also said that a book by Selma Lagerlof's called"The Wonderful Adventures of Nils" that he read as a child was the reason he became interested in wild geese.
Lorenz began his studies in 1922 at Columbia University, but he returned to Vienna in 1923 to continue his studies at the University of Vienna until 1928. At this university he became an assistant professor from 1928 to 1935.
In 1936, Lorenz met his great friend and colleague Niko Tinbergen. Together they studied geese - wild, domestic, and hybrid.
In 1940 Lorenz became a professor of psychology at the University of Königsberg. He was drafted into the Wehrmacht in 1941. He tried to become a motorcycle mechanic, but instead he was assigned as a medic. He was a prisoner of war in the Soviet Union from 1942 to 1948. During this time, he continued to work as a medical doctor and "got quite friendly with some Russians, mostly doctors." When he was sent back home after the war, he was allowed to keep both the manuscript of the book he had been writing and his pet starling. He arrived back in Altenberg "with manuscript and bird intact." The manuscript became his book "Behind the Mirror".
Lorenz shared the 1973 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine "for discoveries in individual and social behavior patterns" with two other important early ethologists, Niko Tinbergen and Karl von Frisch. In 1969, he became the first person to receive the Prix mondial Cino Del Duca.
Lorenz retired from the Max Planck Institute in 1973 but continued to research and publish from Altenberg (his family home, near Vienna) and Grünau im Almtal in Austria.
Konrad Lorenz died on February 27, 1989, in Altenberg.
Politics.
Lorenz joined the Nazi Party in 1938 and accepted a university position under Nazi Germany. In his application for membership to the Nazi-party NSDAP he wrote in 1938: "I'm able to say that my whole scientific work is devoted to the ideas of the National Socialists."
When he accepted the Nobel Prize in 1973, Lorenz apologized for a 1940 publication that included Nazi views of science, saying that "many highly decent scientists hoped, like I did, for a short time [that] National Socialism [would produce good results], and many quickly turned away from it with the same horror as I [did]."
Lorenz' ideas.
Together with Nikolaas Tinbergen (Stefan Zeller), Lorenz formed the idea of an innate releasing mechanism to explain instinctive behaviors (fixed action patterns). Building on the ideas of William McDougall, Lorenz developed this into a "psychohydraulic" explanation of the motivation of behavior, which tended towards group selectionist ideas, which were influential in the 1960s. Another of his contributions to ethology is his work on imprinting. His influence on a younger generation of ethologists, as well as his books, were important in bringing ethology to the attention of the general public.
Lorenz' vision of the challenges facing humanity.
Lorenz predicted that market economics could eventually destroy Earth's ecosystem. In his 1973 book, "Civilized Man's Eight Deadly Sins", Lorenz considered the following paradox: "All the advantages that man has gained from his ever-deepening understanding of the natural world that surrounds him, his technological, chemical and medical progress, all of which should [help] to [ease] human suffering... tends instead to [make] humanity's destruction [more likely than it was before]" (Gli otto peccati capitali della nostra civiltà - Civilized Man's Eight Deadly Sins, Adelphi edizioni, Milano, 1974, p.26; the citation is translated from the Italian version of the book). Lorenz adopts an ecological model to attempt to explain how this contradiction can exist. He says that "all species... are adapted to [the place that they live]... including not only [the parts that are not alive]... but all the other living beings that [live in the area]." (page 31) Lorenz' theory of ecology is that feedback mechanisms which affect choices that an living thing must make are actually caused by the choices that an living thing makes. Depending on what the situation is, the organism may or may not do what it would do instictively. Thus pain and pleasure act as checks on each other: "To gain a desired prey, a dog or wolf will do things [that they would normally not do, such as] run through thorn bushes, jump into cold water and expose themselves to risks which would normally frighten them. All these inhibitory mechanisms... act as a counterweight to the effects of learning mechanisms... "The organism cannot allow itself to pay a price which is not worth paying "(page 53). In nature, these mechanisms tend towards a 'stable state' among the living beings of an ecology: "A closer examination shows that these beings... not only do not damage each other, but often constitute a community of interests. It is obvious that the predator is strongly interested in the survival of that species, animal or vegetable, which constitutes its prey.... It is not uncommon that the prey species derives specific benefits from its interaction with the predator species..." (pages 31-33).
Lorenz states that humanity is the only species that is not forced to abide by these mechanisms, as humans are the only species that has the ability to change its own environment: "[The pace of human ecology] is determined by the progress of man's technology" (page 35). Not only, but human ecology (economy) is governed by mechanisms of POSITIVE feedback, defined as a mechanism which tends to encourage behavior rather than to discourage it (page 43). "Positive feedback always involves the danger of an 'avalanche' effect... One particular kind of positive feedback occurs when individuals OF THE SAME SPECIES enter into competition among themselves... For many animal species, environmental factors keep... intraspecies selection from [leading to] disaster... But there is no force which exercises this type of healthy regulatory effect on humanity's cultural development; unfortunately for itself, humanity has learned to overcome all those environmental forces which are external to itself" (page 44).
Lorenz does not see human independence from natural ecological processes as necessarily bad. Indeed, he states that "a completely new [ecology] which corresponds in every way to [humanity's] desires... could, theoretically, prove as durable as that which would have existed without his intervention" (page 36). However, the principle of competition, typical of Western societies, destroys any chance of this: "The competition between human beings destroys with cold and diabolic brutality... Under the pressure of this competitive fury we have not only forgotten what is useful to humanity as a whole, but even that which is good and advantageous to the individual. [...] One asks, which is more damaging to modern humanity: the thirst for money or consuming haste... in either case, fear plays a very important role: the fear of being overtaken by one's competitors, the fear of becoming poor, the fear of making wrong decisions or the fear of not being up to snuff..." (pages 45-47).
In this book, Lorenz proposes that the best hope for mankind lies in our looking for mates based on the kindness of their hearts rather than good looks or wealth.
Philosophical ideas.
In his 1973 book "Behind the Mirror: A Search for a Natural History of Human Knowledge", Lorenz considers an old philosophical question: Do our senses actually tell us about the world as it is? Or do they only give us an illusion? Lorenz' answer comes from evolutionary biology. Only things that help a species to survive and reproduce are kept. Anything that does not benefit a species is quickly removed through the process of natural selection. Lorenz argued that if our senses gave us wrong information about our environment, humanity would soon be extinct. Therefore we can be sure that our senses give us correct information, for otherwise we would not be here to be deceived.
Books and essays Lorenz wrote.
Lorenz's best-known books are "King Solomon's Ring" and "On Aggression", both written for a popular audience. His scientific work appeared mainly in journal articles, written in German; they became widely known to English-speaking scientists through the descriptions of it in Tinbergen's 1951 boo] "The Study of Instinct", though many of his papers were later published in English translation in the two volumes titled "Studies in Animal and Human Behavior".

David Ortiz
sports
David Américo Ortiz Arias (born November 18, 1975 in Santo Domingo, Dominican Republic) is a Major League Baseball designated hitter who is currently playing for the Boston Red Sox. Ortiz used to play for the Minnesota Twins from -. Nicknamed "Big Papi" or "Señor Papi", Ortiz has played in four All-Star Games. He holds the Red Sox single-season record for home runs with 54, which he set during the 2006 season.
Early career.
Ortiz graduated from Estudia Espaillat High School in the Dominican Republic and
in he was signed by the Seattle Mariners who listed him as "David Arias" (possibly not understanding Spanish naming customs). In 1996, the Mariners received Dave Hollins from the Minnesota Twins for a player to be named later. Later that season, the Mariners announced that the player to be named later would be Arias. When Ortiz arrived in Minnesota, he informed the team that he preferred to be listed as "David Ortiz." He made his major league debut in September of 1997. After moving up and down from the majors to the minors, Ortiz hit.272 with 20 home runs and 75 RBI in, when the Twins lost in the American League Championship Series to the Anaheim Angels.

Nolan Bushnell
science
"Nolan Bushnell" (born on February 5, 1943) is a American electrical engineer and entrepreneur. He founded both Atari Inc. and Chuck E. Cheese's Pizza-Time Theaters.

Pete Young
sports
Bryan Owen "Pete" Young (born March 19 1968 in Meadville, Mississippi) is a former right-handed relief pitcher in Major League Baseball who played for the Montreal Expos in 1992 and 1993. He went to Mississippi State University, where he played college baseball.
Career.
On June 2, Young was drafted by the Cincinnati Reds in the 22nd round of the amateur draft, but did not sign to play Minor League Baseball with Cincinnati, deciding to instead attend Mississippi State where he practiced to become a better pitcher. Young was drafted again on June 5, by the Montreal Expos in the 6th round (148th overall pick) of the amateur draft. This time, Young signed to play in the minors in the Expos organization.
Young made his major league debut on June 5, with the Expos at age 24. On that day, Young pitched 1⅔ innings against the Reds, striking out one batter. The Expos lost the game 10-4. Young played his final major league game for the Expos on July 18,; on February 18, he was purchased along with Matt Stairs by the Boston Red Sox organization, but his career ended that season after not reaching the major league club.
At the time of his retirement, Young had earned a career earned run average of 3.63. He finished with 25⅔ innings pitched, striking out 14 batters, and playing in a total of 17 games. He allowed 22 hits, 1 home run, and 9 walks. He only got one win in his career, on July 10, against the San Diego Padres. Young came to bat only once in his two-season career.

Howard Florey
science
Howard Walter Florey (November 28, 1898 - February 21, 1968) was an Australian scientist who won the Nobel Prize for Medicine in 1945, for his study into penicillin.
Early life.
He was born in Adelaide, South Australia. He went to the Collegiate School of St.Peter and the Adelaide University. In 1921 he went to England as a Rhodes Scholar studying first at Oxford and then at Cambridge. He worked in the USA for 10 months before going back to London. In 1926 he married long time friend from Adelaide, Mary Ethel Hayter Reed. They were married in England.
Professor.
Florey took up a job teaching pathology at Cambridge University. He also studied for his Ph.D. His subject was on the flow of blood and lymph. In 1931 he became assistant professor of pathology at the University of Sheffield. From 1935 to 1962 he was a professor at the Sir William Dunn school of pathology at Oxford.
Penicillin.
Florey was always looking at new ideas in pathology. His most important work was turning penicillin into the first antibiotic. He worked with Ernst Chain to explore discoveries made earlier by Alexander Fleming. They looked at antibacterial substances that came from bacteria and fungi. They found that penicillin was the most interesting. Fleming had first discovered it in 1928. They were able to start experiments on humans in 1941. Because of World War 2 the drug was made in the USA. Its affects on wounded people was described as "miraculous".
He wrote more than 200 scientific papers. He kept an interest in Australia. he had a big role in starting the Australian National University (ANU), especially the John Curtin School of Medical Research. He was the main adviser to the school from 1948 to 1955. In 1965 he was appointed as Chancellor of the university. From 1962 he was Provost of The Queen's College at Oxford. He died from a heart attack in 1968.
Memorials.
He is remembered for his work. A suburb in Canberra, Australia, was named after him. His picture is on the Australian fifty dollar note. There is a lecture theatre and a professorship named after him at the ANU. The Queen's College have named a building after him. There is a memorial stone at St.Nicholas's church at Marston, and a memorial stone in Westminster Abbey. There are a number of paintings and a sculpture.

Édouard Daladier
politics
Édouard Daladier (18 June 1884 - 10 October 1970) was a French socialist politician, and Prime Minister of France at the start of the Second World War. He was one of the politicians who tried to stop the war at the Munich conference in 1938, together with the British prime minister, Neville Chamberlain and the two dictators of Germany and Italy, Adolph Hitler and Benito Mussolini.

Chris Thile
music
Chris Thile () (born February 20, 1981) is an American musician, best known as a member of acoustic band Nickel Creek. He has made six albums as a solo artist and with his band, Punch Brothers. His first, "Leading Off", was released in 1994 when Thile was 13. Thile has also played and recorded with artists like Mike Marshall, Béla Fleck, Glen Phillips, and Edgar Meyer.
Thile's third album, "Not All Who Wander Are Lost", was released in 2001. His fourth, "Deceiver" had all songs written and performed by Thile alone. His most recent solo work was 2006's "How to Grow a Woman from the Ground", and Thile released "Punch" in 2008 with the band Punch Brothers. Also in 2008, Thile will make an album with Edgar Meyer, which will come out in the fall.
1981-1999: Early life and career.
Thile was born in Oceanside, California in 1981. When he was two, his family started going to "That Pizza Place", where he listened to John Moore's band "Bluegrass Etc". When Thile was four, his family moved to Idyllwild, California.
He started playing mandolin at the age of five. He took lessons from John Moore. When Thile was eight, Nickel Creek was formed. After playing many music festivals with Nickel Creek, he won the national mandolin contest at the Walnut Valley Festival in Winfield, Kansas at age twelve.
In 1993, Thile was signed to the bluegrass record label Sugar Hill. The next year, he released his first album, "Leading Off", and most of the songs were written by Thile. In 1997, Thile released "Stealing Second" and Nickel Creek released "Here to There".
2000-2005: "Wander" and "Deceiver".
After "Nickel Creek" sold 500,000 copies, Thile released "Not All Who Wander Are Lost" in 2001. The name of the album comes from a quote in J. R. R. Tolkien's book "The Lord of the Rings". The album had guest appearances from his Nickel Creek bandmates as well as Stuart Duncan, Béla Fleck, Edgar Meyer, Jerry Douglas, and Bryan Sutton.
In 2003, Thile and mandolinist Mike Marshall made a duet album called "Into the Cauldron," which had covers by artists from Charlie Parker to Bach. The next year, Thile released "Deceiver", a pop album on which he played and wrote every song himself. He mainly played his mandolin on the album, but also played electric guitar, piano, drums, violin, viola, cello, and bass.
2006-Present: Punch Brothers.
In August 2006, Nickel Creek announced in "Billboard" and on their official website that they would take an "indefinite hiatus", which means a break for an unknown amount of time.
The band's members are Thile (mandolin), Gabe Witcher (fiddle), Chris Eldridge (guitar), Greg Garrison (bass), and Noam Pikelny (banjo). Bryan Sutton also played guitar for the band when Chris Eldridge couldn't. In 2007, the band changed its name twice: first to "The Tensions Mountain Boys" and then "Punch Brothers."
Punch Brothers released their first album, "Punch", on the Nonesuch Records on February 26, 2008. The album has Thile's four piece song "The Blind Leaving the Blind", along with other original songs.

Hugo de Vries
science
Hugo Marie de Vries (Feb 16 1848, Haarlem - May 21 1935, Lunteren) was a Dutch botanist and one of the first geneticists. He is known chiefly for suggesting the concept of genes, rediscovering Gregor Mendel's laws of heredity in the 1890s, and for developing a mutation theory of evolution.

Carl Correns
science
Carl Erich Correns (September 10, 1864 - February 14, 1933) was a German botanist and geneticist. Tdoay, he is notable primarily for his independent discovery of the principles of heredity, and for his rediscovery of Gregor Mendel's earlier paper on that subject, which he achieved simultaneously but independently of the botanists Erich Tschermak von Seysenegg and Hugo de Vries.
By a quirk of history Correns was a student of Nageli, a renowned botanist with whom Mendel corresponded about his work with peas, but who failed to understand how significant Mendel's work was. Tschermak was a grandson of a man who taught botany to Mendel, during Mendel's student days in Vienna.

Alex Rodriguez
sports
Alexander Emmanuel Rodriguez (born July 27, 1975 in New York, New York), also called A-Rod, is a Dominican American baseball player playing as third baseman for the New York Yankees. In the past, he played as shortstop for the Seattle Mariners and Texas Rangers.
He is currently first in runs scored and total bases; second in extra base hits and RBI, and 4th in hits among all players in baseball history since their 31st birthday. Also, Rodriguez has more HR, RBI, runs scored and more base hits than all-time leaders Hank Aaron (RBI), Barry Bonds (HR), Rickey Henderson (runs scored), and Pete Rose (hits) did before their 31st birthdays. He is the youngest player ever to hit 500 home runs, breaking the record Jimmie Foxx set in 1939.
He has been said to be the best all-around players currently in baseball.

Social Darwinism
science
Social Darwinism is a term used for different movements. Charles Darwin was one of the main discoverers of evolution. Evolution is a concept from biology that tries to explain how different life-forms change over time. It basically says that because most children are not exactly like their parents, there is change. Some of the children will have features (or traits). These features will mean that some children are better adapted to the place where they live. They will therefore be better able to have offspring. Some of the offspring might also have the trait of their parents.
Social Darwinism theories try to use these ideas from biology for human society. They talk about a "Struggle for survival" of human societies. During the era of Nazi ideologies, the idea of Survival of the fittest combined with racism. Since the Aryan race was better than all the other races, it needed more space to live. This space was to be provided in the east (where mostly Slavs lived).
Today, this is mostly seen as badly named. Most of the ideas for the theories are from Lamarckism and not from the theory of evolution, proposed by Charles Darwin.

Lamarckism
science
Lamarckism (also called Lamarckian evolution) is a theory of evolution. Evolution tries to explain how species change over time. Today, the most accepted theory of evolution was developed by Charles Darwin.
Lamarckism was developed by Jean-Baptiste de Lamarck. He based his ideas on those of Erasmus Darwin. Lamarckism says that indiviuals do not only pass on the things they received form their parents, but also all those things that they learned during their lifetime. As an example, he cited the giraffes. Giraffes have a long neck because their parents needed to strech their neck a lot. Therefore, the children have longer necks.
Lamarck therefore says that evolution is oriented towards a goal; it is not just random as Darwin claims.
Gregor Mendel found some rules to explain inheritance. These rules are known as Mendelian inheritance today. They also disproved Lamarck.
Lamarck's theory.
The identification of "Lamarckism" with the inheritance of acquired characteristics is regarded by some as an artifact of the subsequent history of evolutionary thought, repeated in textbooks without analysis. Stephen Jay Gould wrote that late 19th century evolutionists "re-read Lamarck, cast aside the guts of it... and elevated one aspect of the mechanics - inheritance of acquired characters - to a central focus it never had for Lamarck himself"." He argued that "the restriction of "Lamarckism" to this relatively small and non-distinctive corner of Lamarck's thought must be labelled as more than a misnomer, and truly a discredit to the memory of a man and his much more comprehensive system". Gould advocated defining "Lamarckism" more broadly, in line with Lamarck's overall evolutionary theory.
In essence, a change in the environment brings about change in "needs" ("besoins"), resulting in change in behavior, bringing change in organ usage and development, bringing change in form over time — and thus the gradual transmutation of the species.
However, as scientist historians such as Michael Ghiselin and Stephen Jay Gould have pointed out, none of these views were original to Lamarck. On the contrary, Lamarck's contribution was a systematic theoretical framework for understanding evolution. He saw evolution as comprising two processes;

Darwinism
science
Darwinism is a term used to talk about different ideas connected to those Charles Darwin had about evolution. The meaning of "Darwinism" has changed over time, and depends on who is using the term.
The term was coined by Thomas Henry Huxley in April 1860. He used it to describe evolutionary concepts, including earlier concepts such as Malthusianism and Spencerism. In the late 19th century it came to mean the concept that natural selection was the only mechanism of evolution, in contrast to Lamarckism. Around 1900, Gregor Mendels work was rediscovered, "Darwinism" was the word used to classify the ideas. Today, both theroies have been unified.
As modern evolutionary theory has developed, the term has been associated at times with specific ideas.

Francis Galton
science
Sir Francis Galton F.R.S. (16 February 1822 – 17 January 1911), half-cousin of Charles Darwin, was an English Victorian scientist. He was a polymath, an anthropologist, an eugenicist, a tropical explorer, geographer, inventor, meteorologist, proto-geneticist, psychometrician, and statistician. He was knighted in 1909.
Galton had was very intelligent. He produced over 340 papers and books throughout his lifetime. He also created the statistical concept of correlation and widely promoted regression toward the mean. He was the first to apply statistical methods to the study of human differences and inheritance of intelligence. He also introduced the use of questionnaires and surveys to collect data on human communities. He needed such data for genealogical and biographical works and for his anthropometric studies. He was a pioneer in eugenics, coining the very term itself and the phrase "nature versus nurture". As an investigator of the human mind, he founded psychometrics (the science of measuring mental faculties) and differential psychology. He created a method for classifying fingerprints that proved useful in forensic science. As the initiator of scientific meteorology, he devised the first weather map, proposed a theory of anticyclones, and was the first to establish a complete record of short-term climatic phenomena on a European scale. He also invented the Galton Whistle for testing differential hearing ability.

Lúcio
sports
Lucimar da Silva Ferreira, called Lúcio (born May 8 1978 in Brasília, Brazil) is a Brazilian footballer and the captain of the Brazil national football team, for that he has played 67 matches and made three goals. His team is Bayern Munich.

Aung San
politics
Aung San (February 13 1915 – July 19 1947) was a Burmese revolutionary, nationalist, general, and politician. He was the father of Nobel Peace laureate Aung San Suu Kyi.

Motherwell F.C.
sports
The Motherwell Football & Athletic Club Ltd.
is a Scottish football club based in Motherwell, North Lanarkshire. Motherwell currently play in the Scottish Premier League; their home stadium is Fir Park. Mark McGhee was appointed as the club's manager on June 18, 2007, with former club captain Scott Leitch, as his assistant manager.
Fir Park.
Due to safety concerns, the capacity at Fir Park is limited to 13,742, all-seated. This is because of the Taylor Report. The average attendance for the 2006-07 season was 5,885. The club's record attendance for a home match is 35,632, against Rangers in a Scottish Cup quarter-final replay on March 12, 1952.
The record transfer fee paid by the club was that to Everton for John Spencer in 1999 (GPB 500,000) and the highest received was that for Phil O'Donnell for his move to Celtic in 1994 (GBP 1,750,000). O'Donnell later rejoined Motherwell but died after collapsing on the pitch in a game against Dundee United on December 29, 2007.
Current squad.
"On loan from Celtic FC"
"On loan from Celtic FC"
Sponsorship.
Motherwell are currently sponsored by Anglian Home Improvements. The deal was announced on May 11, 2006 and is due to expire at the end of the 2007-08 season. They replaced Zoom Airlines, who're owned by club director John Boyle, and who still advertise on both the Davie Cooper Stand and the South Stand. The previous sponsor, from 2002-04, was a local company called The Untouchables. Previously the club had a long-term association with Motorola, but this ended after 11 years in 2002 as the sponsor started to reduce its manufacturing operations in Scotland. This had in turn followed another long-term association with local car dealer Ian Skelly, who had sponsored the club since 1984.
The club have had a number of different kit manufacturers since the 1970s. Bukta are the 2007-08 season kit providers, taking over from Xara, who had previously filled this role from 1998. Major manufacturers Adidas, Admiral, Hummel, Patrick, Pony and Umbro, have all been kit providers for Motherwell.
For the 2008-09 season, the club's shirt sponsor will be JAXX, a German gambling company.

Hugo Wolf
music
Hugo Wolf (born Windischgraz (now Slovenj Gradec, Slovenia) 13 March, 1860; died Vienna, 22 February 1903) was an Austrian composer of Slovene origin. He is famous for his Lieder (German art songs). He found new ways of expressing poetry in music. He used the song forms that had been made by Schubert and Schumann, but his harmonies bring something very new and personal to German song. He was particularly fond of the music of Richard Wagner and his tonal writing is influenced by him. He belongs to the late Romantic period.
Although he wrote other kinds of music besides Lieder, the only other piece of his which is played regularly is his "Italian Serenade".
At times Wolf worked very hard and composed a lot of music. At other times he felt unhappy and had depression. Towards the end of his life he went mad and had to go to an asylum. He died of syphilis.
His name is pronounced “Hoo-go Volf” (rhyming with “golf”).
Early life (1860 – 1887).
The town where Wolf was born is now called Slovenj Gradec in Slovenia, but at that time it was part of the Austrian Empire. He was a child prodigy. When he was four he learned the piano and violin from his father. When he went to school he learned with Sebastian Weixler. Music was the only thing he was interested in at school. He changed schools but still did little work except for music. He went to Vienna to study at the Vienna Conservatory. His father did not want him to become a musician. He was made to leave the Conservatory because he did not obey their rules. Wolf said later that he left because he did not like the old-fashioned teaching.
After eight months with his family, he returned to Vienna to teach music. He had a fiery temper which did not make him an ideal teacher. However, he found some rich people who thought he was a good composer and paid him money so that he could have the time to compose.
One of his rich patrons had a daughter called Vally. Wolf fell in love with her, and he was very depressed when she left him after three years. He did not get on well with his family either. His father thought he was not trying to make a living. Wolf got a job as
second Kapellmeister at Salzburg. However, he was not a good conductor and he soon left that job and went back to Vienna. to teach.
Wolf was fascinated by the music of Wagner. He tried to get Wagner’s attention once, running after his coach and begging Wagner to listen to his music. He was terribly sad when Wagner died. He wrote a song "Zur Ruh, zur Ruh" (“To rest, to rest") which is one of his best early works. He was very depressed because Wagner had gone and he felt that there was no one who could inspire him to compose.
The great composer Franz Liszt became interested in him, and told him he ought to try to compose some longer pieces. He wrote a symphonic poem "Penthesilea". Wolf also became a music critic. He wrote about new pieces of music. He liked the music of Liszt, but hated the music of several other composers such as Anton Rubinstein and Johannes Brahms. He made many enemies because of the harsh things he wrote about them. People called him "Wild Wolf". He composed several works, but could not get them performed. He had been very critical of the famous Rosé Quartet, so they refused to play his music when they were asked.
He stopped writing musical criticism in 1887 and began composing once more. He wrote songs which set poems by Goethe, Joseph von Eichendorff. He wrote an orchestral work called "Italian Serenade" which is one of his best works outside Lieder. Then his father died and he did not compose for the rest of the year.
Maturity (1888 – 1896).
Wolf composed a lot during the years 1888 and 1889. He stayed with some friends outside Vienna and wrote songs using poetry by Mörike. He stayed with other friends and composed music to poems by Eichendorff. Then he wrote 51 Goethe songs, followed by "Spanisches Liederbuch" ("Spanish Song Book"). Wolf soon became very famous. His songs had very good reviews, although not everyone was enthusiastic. Brahms wrote bad things about him because, of course, Wolf had written bad things about Brahms.
By 1891 Wolf had become exhausted. His health became poor and he suffered from syphilis as well as from depression. He composed nothing for several years, although his fame continued to spread. Even Brahms changed his mind a wrote good reviews of his music.
Composers were always expected to write large pieces such as symphonies and operas if they were to be taken seriously. Wagner was given the words for an opera called "Der Corregidor". At first he did not want to use it because the libretto was not good, but then he decided to write the opera. However, although it was performed it never became a success.
Final years (1897 – 1903).
Wolf last appeared at a concert in February 1897. Soon afterwards he went mad and had to be put in an asylum. A lady called Melanie whom he had loved visited him faithfully during his last years until his death on February 22, 1903. However, she felt very bad because she had not been faithful to her husband, and she killed herself in 1906.
Wolf is buried in the Zentralfriedhof (Central Cemetery) in Vienna, together with many other great composers.
Music.
Wolf’s true greatness lies in his Lieder. Although he tried at times to write larger musical works, his real genius lay in writing the smaller forms. He had a great feel for poetry and it is expressed beautifully in many ways: in the late-Romantic harmony which is often very chromatic, in the very original way he writes the piano accompaniments, and in the clever way in which he organizes his songs into groups with connecting themes. His most famous collections are "Mörike-Lieder" (1888), "Eichendorff-Lieder" (1889), "Goethe-Lieder" (1890), "Spanisches Liederbuch" (1891), "Italienisches Liederbuch" (1892, 1896) and "Michelangelo Lieder" (1897).
Wolf wrote hundreds of Lieder, three operas, incidental music, choral music, as well as some rarely-heard orchestral, chamber and piano music. His most famous instrumental piece is the "Italian Serenade" (1887), originally for string quartet and later arranged for orchestra.

Keir Hardie
media
James Keir Hardie (15 August 1856 - 26 September 1915) was a Scottish socialist and labour leader, and was the first independent labour Member of Parliament (MPs) in the UK Parliament, seven years before the start of the Labour Party.
He worked as a coal miner, but his bosses stopped him from working when he made a union. He became a politician, and was elected to (chosen for) parliament in 1892. At first he was a Liberal, but he was interested in making a working class party. He started the Independent Labour Party in 1893, and what became the modern Labour party in 1900.

Shimon Peres
politics
Shimon Peres (Hebrew: שמעון פרס) born August 2, 1923 is the President of the State of Israel.

Ehud Olmert
politics
Ehud Olmert (born 30 September 1945) is the 12th and former Prime Minister of the State of Israel. He was the head of the Kadima Party until September 2008.

Fed Cup
sports
Fed Cup is the premier team competition in women's tennis, launched in 1963 to celebrate the 50th Anniversary of the International Tennis Federation (ITF). The competition was known as the Federation Cup until 1995.

She's So Unusual
music
She's So Unusual is the first solo album by the famous American 1980s pop singer Cyndi Lauper. It was released in 1983. It included the popular single, "Girls Just Want to Have Fun".

Rainer Küchl
sports
Rainer Küchl (*August 25 1950 in Waidhofen an der Ybbs) is an Austrian violinist and professor of music.
He started to play the violin at the age of 11. At the age of 14 he studied music at the University of Music and Performing Arts, Vienna.
He became the concertmaster of the Vienna Philharmonic Orchestra at the age of 20. In 1973 he founded the Küchl Quartett which is known as the Wiener Musikverein Quartett.

Wilhelm Wundt
science
Wilhelm Maximilian Wundt (August 16 1832-August 31 1920) was a German medical doctor, psychologist, physiologist, and professor. Together with William James, he is regarded as the father of psychology. In 1879, Wundt founded the one of first formal laboratory for psychological research at the University of Leipzig, and the first journal for psychological research in 1881.

Ronald Fisher
science
Sir Ronald Aylmer Fisher, FRS (17 February 1890 – 29 July 1962) was an English statistician, evolutionary biologist, and geneticist. He was described by Anders Hald as "a genius who almost single-handedly created the foundations for modern statistical science" and Richard Dawkins described him as "the greatest of Darwin's successors".

Sewall Wright
science
Sewall Green Wright (December 21, 1889 – March 3, 1988) was an American geneticist. He has become known for his influential work on evolutionary theory and also for his work on path analysis. With R. A. Fisher and J.B.S. Haldane, he was a founder of theoretical population genetics. He is the discoverer of the inbreeding coefficient and of methods of computing it in pedigrees. He extended this work to populations, calculating the amount of inbreeding of members of populations as a result of random genetic drift. Together with Fisher, he pioneered methods for calculating the distribution of gene frequencies among populations as a result of the interaction of natural selection, mutation, migration and genetic drift. The work of Fisher, Wright, and Haldane on theoretical population genetics was a major step in the development of the modern evolutionary synthesis of genetics with evolution. Wright also made major contributions to mammalian genetics and biochemical genetics.

J. B. S. Haldane
science
John Burdon Sanderson Haldane FRS (November 5, 1892 – December 1, 1964), known as Jack (but who used 'J.B.S.' in his printed works), was a British-born Indian geneticist and evolutionary biologist. He was one of the founders (along with Ronald Fisher and Sewall Wright) of population genetics.

Jeff Tesreau
sports
Charles Monroe "Jeff" Tesreau (March 5, 1888 - October 24, 1946) was an American baseball player. Tesreau signed with a Minor League Baseball team of the St. Louis Browns in 1909. In 1910, his contract was bought by the New York Giants where he played Major League Baseball with.

Heiko Westermann
sports
Heiko Westermann (born August 14, 1983 in Wasserlos, Germany) is a German footballer of FC Schalke 04. On the German national football team, he made three matches and no goals.

Ernst Mayr
science
Ernst Walter Mayr (July 5, 1904, Kempten, Germany – February 3, 2005, Bedford, Massachusetts U.S.), was one of the 20th century's leading evolutionary biologists. He was also a well-known taxonomist, tropical explorer, ornithologist, historian of science, and naturalist. His work contributed to the reform of the theory of evolution that is known as modern evolutionary synthesis today. He also contributed to what scientists consider a species today.
Neither Darwin nor anyone else in his time knew the answer to the "species problem": how multiple species could evolve from a single common ancestor. Ernst Mayr approached the problem with a new definition for the concept species. In his book "Systematics and the Origin of Species" (published in 1942) he wrote that a species is not just a group of individuals that look similar, but a group that can breed only among themselves, excluding all others. When populations of organisms get isolated, the sub-populations will start to differ by genetic drift and natural selection over a period of time. This way, they will evolve into new species. The most significant and rapid genetic reorganization occurs in extremely small populations that have been isolated. This happens if a species gets trapped on an island, for example.
Mayr is generally credited with inventing the modern philosophy of biology, particularly of evolutionary biology, which he distinguished from physics, for its introduction of (natural) history into science.

Aberdeen F.C.
sports
Aberdeen Football Club (also known as The Dons, The Reds and The Dandies) is a Scottish professional football club based in Aberdeen. They compete in the Scottish Premier League and are one of the most successful teams in their country, having won four league titles and seven Scottish Cups. They are also the only Scottish team to have won two European trophies, both in the same year, however they have not won any silverware since 1995.
Formed in 1903 as a result of the amalgamation of three clubs from Aberdeen, they rarely challenged for honours until the 1950s, when they won each of the major Scottish trophies under manager Dave Halliday. This level of success was surpassed in the 1980s, when, under the management of Alex Ferguson, they won three league titles, four Scottish Cups and a Scottish League Cup, alongside the European honours. Aberdeen were the last club outside of the Old Firm to win a league title, in 1984–85.
Aberdeen have played at Pittodrie Stadium since their inception. The ground currently has a capacity of 22,199 and was the first all-seated and all-covered stadium in the United Kingdom. Pittodrie was also the first football stadium to feature a dugout, an invention of player and coach Donald Colman. The club's colours have been primarily red and white since 1939; before this, they played in black and gold vertical stripes.
Aberdeen attract support from the city and surrounding areas, as they are the only senior team within a wide area. Aberdeen have no geographically close rivals; their nearest neighbours at the same level are in the city of Dundee, with Dundee United having been their principal rivals in the New Firm in the 1980s. Rangers supplanted Dundee United as rivals in the late 1980s, but the rivalry, while fierce, does not approach that of the Old Firm.
Colours and crest.
For the 1904–05 season, Aberdeen adopted a black and gold striped shirt, which led to the team being nicknamed "Wasps". This strip, with only minor variations, was worn until just before the start of the Second World War. The blue shorts lasted until 1911, and then were replaced with white ones. Socks were black with gold trim, either as stripes or as a solid bar at the turndown.
In March 1939, Aberdeen changed the black and gold colours to red and white, reflecting the silver and red colours of the official City of Aberdeen arms. The first red strips were worn with white shorts, these were worn with either red or white socks from 1939 until the 1965–66 season. In 1966, Aberdeen adopted red shorts, making the official kit all-red, similar to that of Liverpool, who made a similar change at around the same time. This arrangement has continued to the present day, with several variations in design, in common with most senior clubs as the replica shirt market has expanded. In the late 1970s an Admiral strip featured five vertical white stripes on the left side of the shirt and shorts, and the early 1980s shirts—as worn at the 1983 European Cup Winners Cup final—featured white vertical pinstripes. Later design changes included significant amounts of blue, and a one season reversion to white shorts, although the all-red scheme returned in 1997.
Shirt sponsorship began in 1987, and the initial shirt sponsor was JVC. Since then, with the club making fewer appearances on the international stage, shirt sponsors have tended to be more local—they have included one of the local commercial radio stations, Northsound. Aberdeen last season had announced their intention to move away from local sponsorship. Sponsored by Apex Tubulars at the time, that deal ended at the end of the 2007/08 season. In a turnaround though, Aberdeen FC Managing Director, Duncan Fraser, announced the side would bare the name of local company Team Recruitment on their shirts for the next two seasons. It is believed no international sponsor showed interest.
Change, or "away", strips have tended to be either white, often with black shorts, or a combination of yellow and black, referring back to the black and gold strips of the pre-war era, although for a time in the 1970s, Aberdeen sported an all-blue change strip with white socks. For the 2007–08 season, the change strip is all-white, with a third kit of yellow and black halves available if needed for European games, or in the event of a clash involving both red and white.
The club did not have an official crest before 1972, but several variations on the letters AFC had from time to time featured on the shirt, usually in some kind of cursive font. In November 1972, the club unveiled an official crest or logo, designed by Aberdonian graphic designer Donald Addison. The design represented a capital letter "A" as the side view of a football goal, with a ball forming the crossbar of the letter. This ball was crosshatched in such a way as to depict it as being inside the net, signifying the scoring of a goal. The logo was completed by the letters "FC" in smaller type at a level with the ball element. This badge was used on the shirts from around 1978, with no significant alterations until the mid-1980s when the words "Aberdeen Football Club" were added in a circular border, and the date of the club's founding, 1903, was added under the goal element. The current version of the crest, which retains these elements in a unified design, was introduced at the start of the 1997–98 season. Two stars signifying the winning of the two European cups in 1983 were introduced over the badge in the 2005–06 season.
Stadium.
Aberdeen have played at Pittodrie Stadium, the name of which comes from the Pictish for "place of manure", throughout their existence. The ground was first used by the original Aberdeen F.C. in 1899, in a 7–1 win over Dumbarton; when they merged with two other teams in 1903, the new club took over the old Aberdeen ground. On August 15 1903, 8,000 spectators turned up to watch the new Aberdeen draw 1-1 against Stenhousemuir, the first game played at Pittodrie by its amalgamated tenants. The club initially rented the ground, but subsequently bought it in 1920. The stadium contains 21,600 seats, but due to the directors' boxes, some sources place this figure at 22,000. The record attendance occurred on March 13 1954, when 45,061 spectators turned up for a Scottish Cup match between Aberdeen and Hearts.
The stadium consists of four stands. The Main Stand, which houses the club offices and players facilities, holds the majority of the supporters. The Merkland Road Stand is primarily for families. The South Stand is opposite the main stand and a quarter of this section is used to accommodate travelling supporters, except for Old Firm games, where half of this stand is given to the visiting fans. The newest element is the Richard Donald stand at the East, or Beach End, of the ground, and is named after former chairman Dick Donald. This is a modern, two–tier design, completed in 1993, containing hospitality suites which is significantly taller than the other structures at the ground. In 1978, Pittodrie became the first all covered, all-seater stadium in Britain.
The club are examining a move to a new stadium in Aberdeen.
Current squad.
"As of 29 May 2008."
Managers.
"List of full-time managers, as of March 31 2008. Only competitive matches are counted. Caretaker managers are not listed."

Gunnar Nordström
science
Gunnar Nordström (12 March 1881, Helsinki – 24 December 1923, Helsinki) was a Finnish physicist. He is best known for his theory of gravitation, which was a competitor of Albert Einstein's general relativity. In 1914, Nordström added a space dimension to his theory. This described gravity and electromagnetism at the same time. Unluckily, Theodor Kaluza and Oskar Klein have got most attetion on this subject. Nordström is not well-known in his own home country, but what he has done is known well in other countries. Some Finnish authors call Nordström as "Finnish Einstein".
Nordström was born in Helsinki, the capital of Finland during the time when Finland was part of Russian Empire). He studied at University of Helsinki and completed his dissertation in 1908. Before this, he studied for some time in Göttingen where he met the world's best scientists. After this, he became a professor at the university. In 1910, he started his trip in Europe. He visited at Zürich, Berlin, Vienna, and Leyden. During his time in the Netherlands, he married Cornelia van Leeuwen. They had three children.
Nordström was very close friend to Albert Einstein and Niels Bohr. He died at Helsinki in 1923 because of radioactivity. In that time, radioactivity was thought to have healing effects.

Modern evolutionary synthesis
science
Modern evolutionary synthesis is a theory how life changes over time. It tells how different species adapt to their environment. It is largely based on the theory of evolution by Charles Darwin and the Mendelian laws of inheritance.
The theory in short.
The idea that speciation occurs after populations are reproductively isolated has been much debated. In plants, polyploidy must be included in any view of speciation. Formulations such as 'evolution consists primarily of changes in the frequencies of alleles between one generation and another' were proposed rather later. The traditional view is that developmental biology ('evo-devo') played little part in the synthesis, but an account of Gavin de Beer's work by Gould suggests he may be an exception.
Almost all aspects of the synthesis have been challenged at times, with varying degrees of success. There is no doubt, however, that the synthesis was a great landmark in evolutionary biology. It cleared up many confusions, and was directly responsible for stimulating a great deal of research in the post-WWII era.
References.
ED Zachary "Evidence for Evoluiotn.Introduction." 2008 ACOC.

Love Street
music
Love Street is a Scottish football stadium in Paisley, Glasgow. It is owned by St Mirren F.C. who play their home games at the stadium.

Valdas Adamkus
politics
Valdas Adamkus (born on November 3, 1926 in Kaunas, Lithuania,by 1955 Valdemaras Adamkavičius) is the current president of the Republic of Lithuania. First elected in 1998, he ended his term in office in 2003. When Rolandas Paksas, the new elected president, was impeached and removed by the Lithuanian Parliament in 2004, Adamkus was re-elected. He has been the President since 2004 and his term in office shall end in 2009.

Palestine Liberation Organization
politics
The Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO) is a group that works to create a state for Palestinians. The group was created in 1964. From 1993 to 1998 they made agreements with Israel that created the Palestinian National Authority (PNA), which is in charge of leading Gaza and the West Bank. The leader of the PLO used to be Yasser Arafat. He signed a series of Peace Treaties called the Olso Accords with Yitzhak Rabin who the Prime Minister of Israel at the time. Many members of the PLO and Israel didn't agree with the Accords and Yasser was soon killed by his own people. Israel also re-elected another Prime Minister to take Rabin's position after the Accords.

Rangers F.C.
sports
Rangers Football Club are an association football team based in Glasgow, Scotland, who currently play in the Scottish Premier League. They have won 51 league titles, a world record, and have won more major trophies than any football club in the world. The club are nicknamed "The Teddy Bears", from the rhyming slang for "Gers", which in turn is short for "Rangers", and the fans are known to each other as "Bluenoses". The club's correct name is simply "Rangers F.C.", although they are sometimes referred to as "Glasgow Rangers" for European matches to avoid confusion.
For most of their history, Rangers have enjoyed a fierce rivalry with their cross-city opponents Celtic, and the two are collectively known as the Old Firm.
The club's home, the all-seated 51,082-capacity Ibrox Stadium in south-west Glasgow, has been accredited as one of UEFA's five-star stadia. The stadium was the first one in Scotland to be granted this accolade, which it now shares with Hampden Park, Scotland's national stadium.
Club colours and crest.
The club colours of Rangers F.C. are royal blue, white and red.
The team's home strip invariably features a royal blue shirt (often with white and/or red trim). Traditionally this is accompanied by white shorts (often with royal blue and/or red trim) and black socks with red turn-downs. However when wearing the 'home strip' Rangers will occasionally alter the shorts and socks, sometimes replacing the black socks with white ones; or replacing the white shorts and black socks combination with royal blue shorts and socks.
The basic design of Rangers away strips has changed far more than the traditional home strip. White and red have been the most common predominant colours for Rangers alternate strips, though dark and light blue have also featured highly.
In recent years, Rangers have also introduced a third kit. This is usually worn if both the home and away kits clash with their opponents. The colours used range from light blue to red to a very controversial tangerine.

Pakistan Peoples Party
politics
The Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP) (Urdu: پاکستان پیپلز پارٹی): is a centre-left Islamic Socialist political party in Pakistan affiliated to the Socialist International. To date, its leader has always been a member of the Bhutto family. The Pakistan Peoples Party Parliamentarians (PPPP) is a party formed in 2002 by the PPP for the purpose of complying with electoral rules governing Pakistani parties.
The party was founded on November 30 1967 by Zulfiqar Ali Bhutto who was also its first chairman. The party creed is: "Islam is our faith; democracy is our politics; socialism is our economy; all power to the people."
Although its center lies in the southern province of Sindh, it also has considerable support in the more densely populated province of Punjab and even Azad Kashmir.

Toronto Raptors
sports
The Toronto Raptors are the National Basketball Association team in Toronto. They were started in 1995.

Toronto Argonauts
sports
The Toronto Argonauts are the Canadian Football League team in Toronto.

Dustin Pedroia
sports
Dustin Luis Pedroia (born August 17, 1983 in Woodland, California) is a Major League Baseball player for the Boston Red Sox. He played college baseball at Arizona State University. He is and 180 lbs. He won the 2007 American League Rookie of the Year award.

Roger Clemens
sports
William Roger Clemens (born August 4, 1962 in Dayton, Ohio) is an American starting pitcher in Major League Baseball. Clemens played in the major leagues for 24 seasons for the Boston Red Sox, Toronto Blue Jays, New York Yankees, and Houston Astros, from to. Clemens has won seven Cy Young Awards, two more than any other pitcher.

Dundee United F.C.
sports
Dundee United Football Club is a professional football club from Dundee, Scotland. They currently play in the Scottish Premier League, and managed by Scottish manager Craig Levein. In the 2007-08 season, they finished 5th in the Scottish Premier League, behind the Old Firm Celtic and Rangers, Motherwell F.C. and Hibernian F.C. despite a relatively impressive season. They had been very close to finishing 3rd, and reached the Scottish Cup Final only to be beaten by Rangers in a very close game.
Stadium.
Dundee United's home ground throughout their history has been Tannadice Park, located on Tannadice Street in the Clepington area of the city. It is situated only away from Dens Park, home of rivals Dundee F.C.; the two stadia are the closest senior football grounds anywhere in the United Kingdom.
The club have only ever played one home fixture at another venue. This was a League Cup tie against Rangers in March 1947, when despite snow rendering Tannadice unplayable, the match was able to go ahead across the road at Dens Park.
The age and proximity of their stadia has led to the possibility of both clubs moving to a new, purpose-built shared stadium being discussed on various occasions. The most recent and serious proposal for this was put forward as part of Scotland's bid to joint-host the 2008 European Football Championship, with several clubs seeking to benefit from a new stadium with planning permission given to a proposed site at Caird Park. Special dispensation was requested to proceed with the proposal, as rules at the time forbade SPL teams from groundsharing. Following Scotland's failed bid to host the tournament, the scheme was shelved for the time being, although the plan was raised again in June 2008 following doubts about joint-host Ukraine's ability to stage Euro 2012 with the Scottish Football Association keen as alternative hosts.

The Scotsman
media
The Scotsman is a daily newspaper from Scotland, United Kingdom. It has recently been changed to a compact form, but the Sunday version remains a broadsheet

Turkey national football team
sports
The Turkish national football team is the national football team of the Republic of Turkey and is worked by the Turkish Football Federation. They are in association with UEFA.
Turkey has a footballing tradition that has been good and bad. In World Cup competition Turkey has qualified three times for the 1950, 1954, and 2002 editions. Turkey failed to make an appearance for the 1950 World Cup because they withdrew.

Otto Abetz
politics
Otto Abetz (March 3, 1903 in Schwetzingen / Germany – May 5, 1958) was a German diplomat. In 1931, he became a member of the NSDAP and worked until 1934 as "Reichsjugendführer". Starting in 1935, he worked for Joachim von Ribbentrop as expert for French. He get the German ambassador for the Vichy-Government in 1940.
After the War he went to prison for 20 years. He was reaseased from prison in 1954. He died on May 5, 1958 in an auto accident near Langenfeld bei Dortmund on the Cologne-Ruhr autobahn.

Patrick Poivre d'Arvor
media
Patrick Poivre d'Arvor (born 20 September, 1947 in Reims; known in France as PPDA) is a French journalist. He has presented the main evening news on French Television since 1987. He studied political sciences and Slavic languages in Paris. He is married, and has 5 children; 3 daughters and one sone with his wife Véronique, and a son with Claire Chazal. He had an affair with Chazal (who is also a well-known news presenter in France) in the 1990s.
One of his daughters was anorexic. She committed suicide, aged 19, in 1995. She jumped in fornt of a metro train in Paris. She left a note: "Thank you for everything, but I do not like life. I want to be inciderated, and kept in a small box. Please do not throw me into the sea."

Fight song
music
A fight song is a song that sports fans sing when supporting their favorite team. They are very popular in the United States. Many colleges and universities there have fight songs. In other countries they are sometimes called team songs or team anthems.

Hopman Cup
sports
The Hopman Cup is an yearly international team tennis tournament played in Perth, Western Australia in January each year.

Keyshia Cole
music
Keyshia Miesha Cole (born October 15, 1981) is an African-American R&B singer-songwriter, and record producer known for her soulful voice. She released her platinum selling debut album "The Way It Is" in 2005, and her second album "Just like You" in 2007. She is currently in the process of making a third album entitled "A Different Me" coming out in December 2008.

Free Bird
music
"Free Bird" is a rock anthem made by the American rock band Lynyrd Skynyrd.

Ride the Lightning
music
"Ride The Lightning" is the second album released by the heavy metal band Metallica. It was released on 19 November 1984.

Enrique Iglesias
music
Enrique Miguel Iglesias Preysler (born May 8, 1975) is a Spanish pop singer-songwriter. His career started in Mexico on Indie label Fonovisa who helped turn him into one of the most popular artists in Latin America and in the Latin market in the United States, selling more Spanish albums than any other artists in that period of time. Before the turn of the millennium he made a crossover into the mainstream English market and signed a unique multi-album deal with Universal Music for an unprecedented $48,000,000, with Universal Music Latino to release his Spanish albums and Interscope to release English albums, Enrique Iglesias has so far sold over 47 million albums worldwide. Iglesias has had two Billboard Hot 100 #1s and one #3, and he holds the record for producing eighteen number #1 Spanish-language singles on the Billboard's Hot Latin Tracks. He is currently dating tennis star Anna Kournikova.

Sergei Fedorov
sports
Sergei Viktorovich Fedorov (Russian:Сергей Викторович Фёдоров, "Sergey Viktorovich Fyodorov"; born December 13 1969 in Pskov, Soviet Union) is a Russian professional ice hockey forward and occasional defenseman who plays for the Washington Capitals of the National Hockey League. He gained fame playing for the Detroit Red Wings before tenures with the Anaheim Mighty Ducks and Columbus Blue Jackets.

Pavel Bure
sports
Pavel Vladimirovich Bure (; born on March 31, 1971 in Moscow, USSR) is a former professional ice hockey player. He played in the National Hockey League for twelve seasons with the Vancouver Canucks, Florida Panthers and New York Rangers.

Rosario Dawson
music
Rosario Dawson (born May 9, 1979) is a American actress and singer.

The Age
media
"The Age" is a newspaper made in Melbourne, Australia. It is owned by an Australian company called Fairfax, and its first edition was on 17 October 1854.
The newspaper was first made by John and Henry Cooke. They also had a merchant business called Francis Cooke and Co.. They said they would use the newspaper to help miners in the Australian Gold Rush. The newspaper has become very popular since then. According to its website, it gets up to 957,000 on Saturdays. The editor is Andrew Jaspan, who got the job in 2004. He got in trouble in 2008 when "The Age" journalists agreed that he had been making it hard for them to make news reports independently.

Grant Fuhr
sports
Grant S. Fuhr (born September 28, 1962), is a former goaltender in the National Hockey League. In 2003, he was added into the Hockey Hall of Fame. Born of biracial parents, Fuhr was adopted as a baby and raised in Spruce Grove, Alberta.

Ron Hextall
sports
Ron Hextall (born May 3, 1964 in Brandon, Manitoba) is a retired Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender most often associated with the Philadelphia Flyers of the National Hockey League. He is the grandson of Hall-of-Famer Bryan Hextall, the son of former NHL player Bryan Hextall Jr. and nephew of former NHL player Dennis Hextall.

Brandon Wheat Kings
sports
The Brandon Wheat Kings are a Canadian junior ice hockey team based in Brandon, Manitoba. They compete in the Western Hockey League, and joined the league in the 1967–68 season. Before that they played in the Manitoba Junior Hockey League and were called the Brandon Elks for a short time in the 1940s. They won eight Turnbull Cup Championships as Manitoba Junior Champions, 1939, 1947, 1949, 1950, 1960, 1962, 1963, & 1964 and appeared in the Memorial Cup four times: in 1949 (as an MJHL team), 1979, 1995, and 1996, losing each time. The team plays its home games in Westman Communications Group Place (Keystone Centre). They also played at Wheat City Arena until 1969, and the Manex Arena from 1969 to 1972. Starting in 1973, the Wheat Kings owned and operated a farm team in the MJHL, called the Travellers.
An earlier version of the Wheat Kings played for the Stanley Cup in 1904, but lost to the Ottawa Senators.
The 1949 Brandon Wheat Kings won the Abbott Cup defeating the Calgary Buffalos. They went on to lose the Memorial Cup to the Montreal Royals. The 1949 Brandon Wheat Kings were inducted into the Manitoba Hockey Hall of Fame in the team category.
The Wheat Kings hold the CHL record for most points (125) in a single season, setting the mark in 1978–79.
Season-by-season record.
"Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties OTL = Overtime losses Pts = Points, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against"

John Vanbiesbrouck
sports
John Vanbiesbrouck (born September 4, 1963 in Detroit, Michigan) is a retired American professional ice hockey goaltender, who was inducted into the United States Hockey Hall of Fame in 2007. He's played for the New York Rangers, Florida Panthers, Philadelphia Flyers, New York Islanders, and New Jersey Devils.

Pelle Lindbergh
sports
Per-Erik "Pelle" Lindbergh (, May 24, 1959 – November 11, 1985) was a Swedish professional ice hockey goaltender who played parts of five seasons in the NHL for the Philadelphia Flyers.
Awards.
The Philadelphia Flyers named an award, the Pelle Lindbergh Memorial, in his honor. Since 1993–94, it has been annually awarded to the most improved player on the team.
International Play.
1980 - Played for Sweden in the XIII Olympic Winter Games

Wernher von Braun
science
Wernher Magnus Maximilian Freiherr von Braun (23 March, 1912 - 16 June, 1977) was a German engineer, scientist and rocket designer. He worked for the Nazi's during World War II. After the war, he worked NASA in the USA.
He developed the V2 rocket, the first rocket to penetrate into space. He also developed the Saturn V rocket which took people to the moon in 1969.

Pete Peeters
sports
Peter H. Peeters (born 1 August, 1957 in Edmonton, Alberta) is a retired professional ice hockey goaltender who was one of the NHL's most colourful characters in the 1980s.
Peeters was drafted 135th overall by the Philadelphia Flyers in the 1977 NHL Amateur Draft after playing for the Medicine Hat Tigers of the WCHL. Peeters played in 489 career NHL games, with a record of 246 wins, 155 losses and 51 ties. He also registered 21 shutouts and a 3.08 Goals Against Average. Peeters also played several years for the Washington Capitals.

Trent Green
sports
Trent Jason Green (born July 9, 1970 in Cedar Rapids, Iowa) is an American football quarterback for the St. Louis Rams of the National Football League. He was first drafted by the San Diego Chargers in the eighth round of the 1993 NFL Draft. He played college football at Indiana.
Green has also played for has also played for the British Columbia Lions, Washington Redskins, Kansas City Chiefs and Miami Dolphins. He earned a Super Bowl ring during his first stint with the Rams and was selected to two Pro Bowls with the Chiefs.

Worf
politics
Worf is a ' and ' character. He is played by Michael Dorn. He serves on the starship Enterprise as Lieutenant Junior Grade. Worf is the first Klingon main character to appear in star trek, and has appeared in more star trek episodes than any other character.
Character story.
Worf is the son of Mogh. When Worf was a child, his parents and family were killed by the Romulan attack on the Khitomer outpost. Worf, his nanny Kahlest, and his brother Kurn survived the attack. Worf was then adopted by a human couple, Sergey and Helena Rozhenko while his brother was raised in the Klingon homeworld and was not revealed until they were both adults. Although Worf never took the Rozhenko's last name, for he preferred to be addressed as "Worf, son of Mogh". It was during his time on gault that the 13-year-old Worf, captain of his school's soccer team accidentally killed another boy during a championship by throwing himself at him as the two children ran after the ball which flew in the air. This was something Worf would never forget.

Azmi Bishara
politics
Azmi Bishara (, born July 22, 1956), was an Israeli politician. He is a Palestinian Christian and an Israeli citizen. Bishara was a member of the Israeli Knesset (MK) as a member of the Balad party from 1996 until resigning (stopped being a member) in April 2007. He is also the leader of that political party.
His resignation happened during news that the Israeli security services said he had committed many crimes. The news at that time did not say what the crimes were. It was later said that the crimes were treason and espionage. Because he resigned, Bishara lost his parliamentary immunity. He was not in Israel when this happened and chose not to go back to Israel at that time. He has said that he does want to return.
Early life.
Bishara was born in Nazareth. He created the first National Committee of Arab High School Students. In 1974, he was in charge of that group. In 1976, he helped create the Committee for the Defense of Arab Lands and the first National Arab Student Union.
In the 1970s, Bishara studied at the Hebrew University in Jerusalem. He was the head of the Arab Student Union and was active in the Jewish-Arab student group Campus. At the time, Bishara was a member of the Israeli Communist party Rakah (now part of Hadash), and supported an Internationalist-Marxist political agenda.
Upon finishing his Ph.D in philosophy at Humboldt University of Berlin in 1986, he joined the faculty of Bir Zeit University. He was in charge of the Philosophy and Cultural Studies Department for two years, from 1994 to 1996. He has also worked as a senior researcher at the Van Leer Institute in Jerusalem.
Political career.
Bishara was a Knesset member from the fourteenth Knesset (first seating June 17 1996) until April 22, 2007. He was the most important member of his political party, the National Democratic Assembly (NDA-Balad) in the Knesset during this time.
Bishara was the first Arab citizen of Israel to try to become Prime Minister. He tried to become Prime Minister in the 1999 election, but stopped two days before election day.
The Central Elections Committee (CEC) said that MKs Ahmad Tibi and Azmi Bishara, as well as Bishara's party, Balad, could not be elected for the 16th Knesset in 2003. Attorney General Elyakim Rubinstein agreed with this and had also tried to stop them from being allowed to be elected. The CEC said that they believed that Bishara and Balad wanted "to destroy the Jewish character of the state and supported the armed struggle against it". The Israeli Supreme Court said this was wrong and that they could be elected.
Visits to Syria.
Bishara went to Syria in 2001. He gave a speech at a memorial ceremony for Syrian President Hafez al-Assad where he showed support for Hezbollah. When he got back to Israel, the government said that he was guilty of trying to cause violence and supporting a terrorist organization, as defined by Israel's Prevention of Terror Ordinance.
Bishara went back to Syria in September 2006. While he was there, he said that Israel might attack Syria in more than one place to try to fix problems in Israel and show other countries that it would not be a good idea to attack it. He also went to Lebanon. He told the Lebanese prime minister that Hizbullah fighting against Israel has "lifted the spirit of the Arab people". Soon after this, Interior Minister Roni Bar-On asked Attorney General Menachem Mazuz see if Balad MKs Azmi Bashara, Jamal Zahalka and Wassel Taha were guilty of any crimes because of their visit to Syria. He did this because after Bashara's visit to Syria in 2001, the Knesset made a law that said that MKs could not go to any enemy countries.
Resignation from Knesset and Suspicion of High Treason.
On April 22, 2007, Bishara resigned from the Knesset at the Israeli Embassy in Cairo, Egypt. He did this after a police investigation of foreign people he knew and talk with. It was also said that he helped the enemy during wartime, gave information on to the enemy and laundered money he got from foreign sources. It was said that he might stay out of Israel because he did not want to go to jail and because it would end his political career." He also said that he believed he would not get a fair trial.
Court documents say that Bishara was questioned two times about the case. During the second time, he said that he was going to leave Israel for a couple of days. He said he would attend a third questioning session when he got back to Israel.
Bishara talked to a group of supporters in Nazareth using a telephone in April 2007. He told the thousands of supporters that, "My guilt is that I love my homeland... our intellect and our words are our weapons. Never in my life did I draw a gun or kill anyone."
Awards.
Bishara was awarded the “Ibn Rushd 'Averroes' Prize for Freedom of Thought” for the year 2002 in Berlin, and the Global Exchange Human Rights Award for the year 2003 in San Francisco.

Heart of Midlothian F.C.
sports
Heart of Midlothian Football Club (commonly known as "Hearts") is a professional football club based at Tynecastle Stadium in Edinburgh, Scotland. They play in the Scottish Premier League along with their city rivals Hibernian. Hearts were one of the teams invited to join the Scottish Football League when it first started in 1890. Hearts have won the Scottish Cup on 7 occasions, the League title 4 times and the League Cup 4 times.
The current owner of Hearts is the Russian-Lithuanian businessman and banker Vladimir Romanov. He became the major shareholder of Hearts in 2004.
Players.
(*) denotes player is on loan from FBK Kaunas, a Lithuanian football club also owned by Vladamir Romanov

Hibernian F.C.
sports
Hibernian Football Club is a professional football club based at Easter Road in Edinburgh, Scotland. They play in the Scottish Premier League with their city rivals Hearts.

Inverness Caledonian Thistle F.C.
sports
Inverness Caledonian Thistle Football Club is a professional football club based at Caledonian Stadium in Inverness, Scotland. They play in the Scottish Premier League and are currently managed by Craig Brewster.

Kilmarnock F.C.
sports
Kilmarnock Football Club is a professional football club based at Rugby Park in Kilmarnock, Scotland. They were founded in 1869, and are the oldest professional club in Scotland. They currently play in the Scottish Premier League and manager by Jim Jeffries

Josip Broz Tito
politics
Josip Broz nicknamed Tito was the leader of Yugoslavia.

Robert Rodriguez
music
"Robert Anthony Rodriguez (born June 20 1968) is an American director, writer, producer, cinematographer, editor and musician perhaps best known for making profitable, crowd-pleasing independent and studio films with fairly low budgets and fast schedules by Hollywood standards. He shoots and produces many of his films in Texas and Mexico.

Amani Toomer
sports
Amani Toomer () (born September 8, 1974 in Berkeley, California) is an American football wide receiver for the New York Giants of the National Football League.

The Sydney Morning Herald
media
"The Sydney Morning Herald" is a newspaper made in Sydney, Australia. It is made by an Australian company called Fairfax, and started on 18 April 1831.

Milwaukee Bucks
sports
The Milwaukee Bucks are a professional basketball team in Milwaukee, Wisconsin. They play in the National Basketball Association. The current franchise owner is U.S. Senator Herb Kohl.

Julio Lugo
sports
Julio Cesar Lugo (born on November 16, 1975) is a Major League Baseball shortstop for the Boston Red Sox, born in Barahona, Dominican Republic. He bats and throws right-handed. Lugo is the older brother of baseball pitcher Ruddy Lugo.

Gregorio Allegri
music
Gregorio Allegri (born 1582; died February 17, 1652) was an Italian composer and priest. He lived most of his life in Rome, and died there.
He composed a lot of church music. By far the most famous of his compositions is the "Miserere mei, Deus", often just refered to as "Allegri's 'Miserere'". There is a very famous story about this music.
"Miserere mei, Deus" is a motet written to be sung by two choirs, one in which the singers are divided into five groups (five voices) and the other in four groups. One choir sings a simple kind of tune called a fauxbourdon which is based on a plainchant. The other sings a more complicated version, with a top part which goes up to top C (the note two octaves higher than Middle C).
The piece is written in a traditional church style. Allegri had learned composition from a friend of Giovanni da Palestrina, the greatest church composer of the Renaissance. However, the style of Allegri's music is more modern than Palestrina. Allegri was writing in the early Baroque period.
Allegri wrote the "Miserere" to be sung in the Pope's Sistine Chapel. The Vatican did not want anyone else to perform the music, so no one was allowed to take the music away or make copies of it. However, when the 14-year-old Mozart visited the Vatican in 1770 with his father, he heard it twice, went home and wrote all the music out from memory. Mozart's copy of the music was sent to England where it was published by Dr Charles Burney. There were no copyright laws in those days, so there was nothing that the Vatican could do about it.

Albert Spalding
sports
Albert Goodwill Spalding (born September 2, 1850 in Byron, Illinois – September 9, 1915 in Point Loma, California) was a professional baseball player, manager and co-founder of A.G. Spalding sporting goods company.

Charlie Waitt
sports
Charlie Waitt (born October 14, 1853 in Hallowell, Maine – October 21, 1912) was a professional baseball player. He was teased and taunted at and was called a "sissy" for wearing what was one of the first baseball gloves ever worn.

Doug Allison
sports
Douglas L. Allison (born July 12, 1846 in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, died December 19, 1916 in Washington, DC) was a professional baseball catcher for the Cincinnati Red Stockings, the first fully professional baseball team.

Bill Doak
sports
Bill Doak (born January 28, 1891, in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania) played 11 years with the St. Louis Cardinals. In, he went 20-6 with a league leading 1.72 ERA. Doak won 20 games in. Doak led the National League in ERA again in 1921. Doak was traded to the Brooklyn Robins in mid-1924.

The Australian
media
"The Australian" is a newspaper made in Australia. It is made by an Australian company called News Limited, is published every day, and started in 1964.

Brisbane Times
media
Brisbane Times is a website that reports news for Brisbane, Australia, as well as Queensland, the state that Brisbane is in. It started on 7 March 2007 and is owned by a company called Fairfax.

Load (album)
music
Load is an album by the heavy metal band Metallica. It was released in 1996.

Jimmy Calderwood
sports
Jimmy Calderwood (born 28 February 1955) is a former professional footballer and current manager of Scottish club Aberdeen F.C..

Gordon Strachan
sports
Gordon David Strachan OBE (born 9 February 1957, in Edinburgh) is a retired Scottish football player, and is now a football manager. He is currently manager of Celtic F.C.

Craig Levein
sports
Craig William Levein (born 22 October 1964 in Dunfermline) is a Scottish former professional footballer and current football manager. Levein currently manages Scottish Premier League club Dundee United where he is also the Director of Football. During his playing career he played for Cowdenbeath F.C., Heart of Midlothian and won 16 caps for the Scotland national team.

Michael Collins (Irish leader)
politics
Michael John ("Mick") Collins (; 16 October 1890 – 22 August 1922) was an Irish revolutionary leader. He was Minister for Finance in the First Dáil of 1919, Director of Intelligence for the IRA, and member of the Irish delegation during the Anglo-Irish Treaty negotiations. Later, he was both Chairman of the Provisional Government and Commander-in-chief of the National Army. He was shot and killed in August 1922, during the Irish Civil War.
Most Irish political parties think his contributions were important to make the modern Irish state. Members and supporters of Fine Gael remember him in particular as one of the founders of their movement, or its predecessor Cumann na nGaedhael. That name was adopted in 1923 by the pro-Treaty wing of Sinn Fein.

Bob Sauvé
sports
Robert F. "Bob" Sauvé (born June 17, 1955, in Sainte-Geneviève, Quebec) was a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender. He is currently a player agent.

The Omen
music
"The Omen" is a 1976 suspense/horror movie directed by Richard Donner. The movie stars Gregory Peck, Lee Remick, David Warner, Harvey Stephens, Billie Whitelaw, Patrick Troughton, Martin Benson, and Leo McKern. A remake, "The Omen," was released on June 6, 2006.

Bhumibol Adulyadej
music
Bhumibol Adulyadej (;; Royal Institute: Phummiphon Adunyadet;) (born Monday, December 5, 1927), is the current King of Thailand. Most people in Thailand know him as "the Great" (Thai: มหาราช, "Maharaja"), he is also known as Rama IX. Having been the king since June 9, 1946, he is the world's longest-serving current head of state and the longest-serving monarch in Thai history.
A billionare, Bhumibol has used some of his money to pay for over 3,000 development projects, mostly in rural areas. He is very popular in Thailand, and is like a semi-divine figure in a number of thais.
Bhumibol was born in the United States and taught in Switzerland. Bhumibol is also an good musician, artist, and sailor.

Craig Brewster
sports
Craig James Brewster, (born in Dundee December 13, 1966), is a Scottish manager and former professional footballer. He is currently manager of Inverness Caledonian Thistle for the second time, but had previously made his name in a long and successful career playing as a prolific centre forward for numerous clubs in Scotland, but most notably for Ionikos in Greece.

Mark McGhee
sports
Mark Edward McGhee (born 25 May 1957 in Glasgow, Scotland) is a former professional footballer and current manager of Scottish club Motherwell.
Playing career.
McGhee played for many Scottish and English clubs, before he had to retire because of injury. He started his playing career at Greenock Morton before moving on to Newcastle United, Aberdeen, Hamburg, Celtic, IK Brage and Reading and won the Scottish PFA Players' Player of the Year in 1982 as well as four caps and two goals for the Scotland national football team. His greatest career moment came in 1983 when he was in the Aberdeen side that defeated Real Madrid 2-1 to lift the European Cup Winner's Cup.

Walter Smith
sports
Walter Smith, OBE (born 24 February 1948 in Lanark) is a Scottish former football player, but is better known as a football manager. He is currently the manager of Scottish Premier League club Rangers, his second spell in that capacity with the club.
Early life and career.
Walter Smith was born in Lanark, South Lanarkshire, and grew up in Carmyle in the east end of Glasgow as a boyhood fan of Rangers. He trained as an electrician and gained employment at the South of Scotland Electricity Board before launching his football career in the 1960s with Junior League team Ashfield.
Smith signed as a defender with Dundee United in 1966, joining as a part-timer while working as an electrician. He was a decent player rather than a gifted one. In September 1975 he moved to Dumbarton, but returned to United in 1977. At the age of 29, a pelvic injury threatened his career and he was invited to join the Dundee United coaching staff by Jim McLean. His first team appearances were limited thereafter, but he remained a signed player and his final club match was in September 1980. In total, he made over 250 senior appearances, scoring three goals.

Gus MacPherson
sports
Angus 'Gus' Ian MacPherson (born 11 October 1968 in Glasgow) is a former Scottish footballer and is currently manager of St Mirren.
Playing career.
McPherson started his career as a youth player with Rangers, but was unable to break in to the first team, spending a period on loan to Exeter City. In 1991 he moved to Kilmarnock, where he went on to play over 350 games.
He played with Dunfermline Athletic for two season before moving to St Mirren as player–assistant manager in 2003.
MacPherson was then appointed as player–manager on 18 December 2003 after the resignation of John Coughlin.
He retired from playing at the end of the 2003-04 season.

Marc Bulger
sports
Marc Robert Bulger () (born April 5, 1977 in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania) is the starting quarterback for the St. Louis Rams in the National Football League. He was voted Most Valuable Player of the 2004 Pro Bowl.

Dennis Green
sports
Dennis "Denny" Green (born February 17, 1949 in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania) is a former head coach for the Minnesota Vikings and Arizona Cardinals, in the National Football League.

Emmitt Smith
sports
Emmitt James Smith III (born May 15 1969 in Pensacola, Florida) is a former National Football League player who played for the Dallas Cowboys and Arizona Cardinals.

Bart Starr
sports
Bryan Bartlett Starr (born January 9, 1934 in Montgomery, Alabama) is a former American football player and coach for the National Football League. He was the quarterback for the Green Bay Packers (1956-1971) and the MVP of the first two Super Bowls. He went to the Pro Bowl four times. He was added to the Pro Football Hall of Fame in 1977.

Tom Coughlin
sports
Thomas Richard Coughlin (born August 31, 1946 in Waterloo, New York) is the head coach for the New York Giants, the 2007 National Football League (NFL) Super Bowl Champions. He was the coach at Boston College before moving to the NFL.

Josh McCown
sports
Joshua Treadwell McCown (born July 4, 1979 in) is an American football quarterback for the Miami Dolphins of the National Football League. He was drafted by the Arizona Cardinals in the third round of the 2002 NFL Draft. He played college football at Sam Houston State.

Matt Leinart
sports
Matthew Stephen Leinart (born May 11, 1983 in Santa Ana, California) is an American football quarterback for the Arizona Cardinals of the National Football League. He played college football for the University of Southern California Trojans. In 2004, his junior year at USC, he won the Heisman Trophy.

Mike Sweeney
sports
Michael John Sweeney (born July 22, 1973 in Orange, California) is a first baseman and designated hitter in Major League Baseball for the Oakland Athletics.

Jeff Suppan
sports
Jeffrey Scot Suppan (; born January 2, 1975, in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma), is a Major League Baseball pitcher for the Milwaukee Brewers.

Pet Sounds
music
Pet Sounds is the tenth music album by the American band The Beach Boys (not counting their Christmas album), which was released in 1966. It was very popular because of its originality; most of The Beach Boys' albums before it had all been about surfing, summer, cars, girls, and fun, and were quite basic musically (mostly rock-n-roll and surf). Pet Sounds was different because of its more complex arrangements; their bass player Brian Wilson, who wrote all of their songs, used a system of recording songs different from the system he had used recording earlier songs. He would record different instrumental pieces for the song separately, then put them together to make the song "whole", meaning that he was able to create sounds that he couldn't create with just the band playing the song. In the recording stringed and wind instruments were used, as well as such unusual for rock music instruments as vibraphone, harp, French horn, harpsichord, electro-theremin and things as bicycle ring, whistles, Coca Cola cans with stones inside of it. Moreover, the lyrics of the songs were more serious and described problems, disappointments and sadness of a young man. Because all the songs are united by similar mood and themes, it is considered to be a concept album.
However, much of the album Brian recorded by himself, with a symphony orchestra and professional studio musicians--people who are hired to play songs for an album--which some of the other Beach Boys didn't like, because they felt like he was ignoring their talents. Mike Love, one of the band's members, thought that it would be too difficult to play these songs on scene, and that their fans would not understand them.
After its release Pet Sounds was not sold very well and reached 10th place in American hit-parade - which was seen as a failure by its main author, but music critics everywhere loved it. The album gained real recognition in 1990s-2000s, when many music magazines listed it in their lists of the best albums in popular music (New Musical Express, Rolling Stone, Melody Maker, Mojo Magazine).
Following its success, Brian decided he wanted to make another album in the same way, which he called "SMiLE." (See the article on SMiLE (album) for more information)

Losing Grip
music
Losing Grip is a 2003 single by Avril Lavigne.

Pete Seeger
music
Pete Seeger (born May 3, 1919 in Patterson, New York) is an American folk musician and songwriter. He was a longtime friend of Woody Guthrie, and founder of The Almanac Singers and The Weavers, two famous folk bands. Seeger's usual musical instrument is a banjo.
Music.
Seeger's original songs include "Where Have All The Flowers Gone?", "The Hammer Song" (also called "If I Had A Hammer"), and "Turn, Turn, Turn", whose words were adapted from Ecclesiastes in the Bible. Other musicians played and recorded his songs, including Judy Collins, Peter, Paul and Mary, and The Byrds. Seeger started "Broadside", a magazine devoted to folk music, and also "Sing Out!" to promote music and singing by the public.
Early career.
Seeger attended Harvard University, but left after he began spending more time working on social causes than school. He organized or played at many benefit concerts, to help people who had been hurt by bad business practices or governmental policies, or sometimes by disasters. He also wrote songs to promote the things he believed in, and to protest things he opposed.
Seeger was a liberal, not afraid to speak his views openly, or to support unpopular causes such as Communism. Seeger's musical career was sometimes limited by his views. The American Federal Bureau of Investigation kept a dossier on Seeger, and the House Un-American Activities Committee put pressure on him, because of his beliefs. He refused to change his views, or to stop doing what he believed was right. Because of this, Seeger was blacklisted in many places, and could not play music there. He was also not allowed to appear on television for most of the 1950s and 1960s. One rare appearance, on the "Smothers Brothers Comedy Hour", was censored because the song he played, "Waist Deep In The Big Muddy", was an allegory against the Vietnam War, which most Americans supported at the time.
Later career.
As years went by, social trends changed in America, and Seeger's views became more acceptable. He was finally able to make television appearances, and was admired for his dedication to folk music, and to causes. He played music together with Arlo Guthrie, the son of Woody Guthrie, performing Woody's old songs and others. He received awards for his music, including the American National Medal for the Arts, and a Kennedy Center Honor. He was also inducted into the Songwriters Hall of Fame, and even the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame, as an influence to rock musicians.
Seeger is still active, both as a musician and as a spokesperson for important matters, like the environment, alternative fuels, and people who need a champion to support them.

Strawberry Fields Forever
music
Strawberry Fields Forever is a song made by The Beatles. It was made and released in 1966. Many people think that the song is one of the best by The Beatles.

New York Dragons
sports
The New York Dragons are an Arena Football League team. They were started in 1995 as the Iowa Barnstormers. In 2001, the team moved to New York. They now play in the Eastern Division of the National Conference.

Amsterdam Admirals
sports
The Amsterdam Admirals were a professional American football team in the NFL Europa. They are based in Amsterdam, Netherlands.

Live Free or Die Hard
music
"Live Free or Die Hard" (called "Die Hard 4.0" outside of North America) is an action movie starring Bruce Willis and Justin Long.
Plot.
The movie starts with John McClane trying to talk to his daughter Lucy. He pulls her boyfriend out of the car. An angry Lucy goes up to her apartment. Afterwards, the police call McClane and ask him to pick up a kid named Matt Farrell. However, when McClane goes down there, mercenaries attack the two. McClane manages to fight them off and gets Farrell into the car.
Day breaks in Washington D.C. The villain, Thomas Gabriel, launches his plan. He takes control over all of the things that help run the country, like traffic lights and transportation systems. He shuts down the FBI building and calls in an anthrax alert. He makes the lights go green and red very fast so that cars crash into each other. McClane and Farrell get out and walk to the FBI trailer outside. Farrell realizes that this is a "fire sale" – where everything being taken over by these hackers and it is called a fire sale because "everything must go."
McClane and Farrell then head to Middleton, Virginia, because some systems, like electricity, cannot be taken fully over with computers. However, Mai (Gabriel's girlfriend) is already at the plant and has taken over it. McClane attacks her and throws her to the ground and tells Farrell to put the system back up. Mai gets up and kicks him out of the building. McClane uses a car and rams her and they fight inside an elevator shaft. It ends when the car falls with Mai inside.
Farrell and McClane send a picture of Gabriel to the FBI, where they say that Gabriel was hired by them. Gabriel wanted tighter security, but they said no and fired him. Gabriel contacts the Middleton plant to ask what happened. He gets very angry when McClane tells him that Mai is dead and tells his hackers to send all the natural gas they can to the Middleton plant. He also finds Lucy and kidnaps her. The plant blows up and knocks all the power out in the nearby area.
McClane and Farrell take a helicopter to Baltimore, Maryland to meet another computer hacker who calls himself The Warlock. He finds out where Gabriel is – at the Social Security Administration building in Woodlawn. Before the government fired him, Gabriel had made a system; when there was a computer attack, all financial data would be downloaded into the computers there. One of Gabriel's men went down there and starts downloading the data early on in the movie.
Both McClane and Farrell head down there. Gabriel takes Farrell and escapes with the data before McClane can reach him. McClane gets into the truck behind Gabriel's car. Gabriel calls in a jet fighter to attack McClane. During the fight, the highway is destroyed, but McClane manages to jump off and slide to safety, while the pilot ejects from the plane.
He then fights Gabriel inside a warehouse. McClane is shot and he loses his gun. Gabriel puts him in an arm lock and orders his man to shoot Lucy. McClane presses the gun into his shoulder and fires, injuring himself but killing Gabriel. Farrell wildly fires his gun to kill the man that is holding Lucy. The movie ends with the FBI swarming the area and taking Farrell and McClane to the hospital.

Minnesota Timberwolves
sports
The Minnesota Timberwolves are a basketball team in Minneapolis, Minnesota in the United States.

Kolo Touré
sports
Kolo Habib Touré (born March 19, 1981 in Bouake), is an Ivorian footballer who plays for Arsenal.

Luca Toni
sports
Luca Toni Varchetta Delle Cave (born May 26, 1977 in Pavullo nel Frignano, Modena) is an Italian World Cup-winning footballer.

The Boy with No Name
music
"The Boy with No Name" is the latest release by Indie pop band Travis and was released in May of 2007. The name of this record came from the fact it took Francis Healy (singer) a long time to name his son.
All songs written by Fran Healy, except where noted.
"3 Times and You Lose" (Healy, Andy Dunlop) – 4:14
This track uses several lyrics and the overall theme from the 1997 B-side "Standing on My Own" (which was included on the single release of "Tied to the 90's").[3]
"Big Chair" (Healy, Dunlop) – 4:07
Backing vocals provided by Julia Stone.
"Under the Moonlight" (Susie Hug) – 4:00
Backing vocals provided by KT Tunstall.
"Colder" (Healy, Dougie Payne) – 4:06
"Sailing Away" (hidden bonus track) – 3:31
Starts at 5:52 into last track (5:38 on UK and Mexican release).
"Perfect Heaven Space" (UK bonus track) – 3:50
"Say Hello" (iTunes bonus track) - 3:33 (Only available on the release date)
Closer was the first single the band released from this album.

Demosthenes
politics
Demosthenes (384–322 BC, Greek: Δημοσθένης, Dēmosthénēs) was a well-known Greek statesman and orator of ancient Athens. His speeches show well, how agile Athenians were, when speaking. They also give an insight into the politics and culture of ancient Greece during the 4th century BC. Demosthenes learned rhetoric by studying the speeches of previous great orators. He delivered his first judicial speeches when he was twenty. He argued effectively to gain from his guardians what was left of his inheritance. For a time, Demosthenes made his living as a professional speech-writer and a lawyer, writing speeches for use in private legal suits.
Demosthenes grew interested in politics during the time he wrotes speeches for others.In 354 BC he gave his first public political speeches. He went on to devote his most productive years to opposing Macedon's expansion. He idealized his city and tried throughout his life to restore Athens' supremacy and motivate his compatriots against Philip II of Macedon. He sought to preserve his city's freedom and to establish an alliance against Macedon, in an unsuccessful attempt to impede Philip's plans to expand his influence southwards by conquering all the Greek states. After Philip's death, Demosthenes played a leading part in his city's uprising against the new King of Macedon, Alexander the Great. However, his efforts failed and the revolt was met with a harsh Macedonian reaction. To prevent a similar revolt against his own rule, Alexander's successor, Antipater, sent his men to track Demosthenes down. Demosthenes took his own life, in order to avoid being arrested by Archias, Antipater's confidant.
The "Alexandrian Canon" compiled by Aristophanes of Byzantium and Aristarchus of Samothrace recognized Demosthenes as one of the ten greatest Attic orators and logographers. According to Longinus, Demosthenes "perfected to the utmost the tone of lofty speech, living passions, copiousness, readiness, speed". Cicero acclaimed him as "the perfect orator" who lacked nothing, and Quintilian extolled him as "lex orandi" ("the standard of oratory") and that "inter omnes unus excellat" ("he stands alone among all the orators").

Harpo Marx
music
Arthur Marx (previously Adolph Marx), also called Harpo Marx (November 23, 1888 – September 28, 1964), was one of the Marx Brothers. While playing Harpo Marx, he doesn't speak, only using horns, whistles, and other props.

Gerd Müller
sports
Gerd Müller, (born November 3, 1945 in Nördlingen), used to be a football player for West Germany, and was one of the best players in his time. He has set many records for scoring.

Triple J
media
Triple J is a radio station from Australia. It is funded and owned by the Australian Government. The music played by the station is aimed at youth (usuaully between 12 and 25 years old) and is usually alternative music. The station started in 1972 as "Double Jay" as part of Gough Whitlam's government. It can now be heard all around Australia.

Radovan Karadžić
politics
Radovan Karadžić (Serbian Cyrillic: Радован Караџић; born June 19, 1945 in Petnjica, Montenegro, Yugoslavia) is a former Serb politician. He also worked as a poet. He is a psychiatrist. For a long time, he was a fugitive (running from the law), from 1995 until July 21, 2008. The International Criminal Court in The Hague looked for him. They say he might have commited war crimes.
Arrest.
Official sources in Belgrade reported that he had been arrested in Serbia and brought before Belgrade's War Crimes Court. There had been an international arrest warrant against Karadžić for more than a decade. The tribunal looking into war crimes in the Yugoslav war said there were reasons to believe Karadžić had committed war crimes. This includes genocide, mainly directed against Muslims. The United States government had offered a $5 million award for information that led to his arrest, and that of Ratko Mladić. Karadžić was arrested and arraigned at a Serbian court on July 21, 2008.
The film "The Hunting Party" was based on Karadzic's life as a fugitive.

NHL All-Star Team
sports
The NHL All-Star Teams were first named at the end of the 1930–31 NHL season, to honor the best performers over the season at each position.
Members of the Professional Hockey Writers' Association vote for the All-Star Team at the end of the regular season.
From 1931–40.
Aurel Joliat • Howie Morenz • Bill Cook
Eddie Shore • King Clancy
Charlie Gardiner
Bun Cook • Frank Boucher • Dit Clapper
Sylvio Mantha • Ching Johnson
Tiny Thompson
Busher Jackson • Howie Morenz • Bill Cook
Eddie Shore • Ching Johnson
Charlie Gardiner
Aurel Joliat • Hooley Smith • Charlie Conacher
Sylvio Mantha • King Clancy
Roy Worters
Baldy Northcott • Frank Boucher • Bill Cook
Eddie Shore • Ching Johnson
John Roach
Busher Jackson • Howie Morenz • Charlie Conacher
King Clancy • Lionel Conacher
Charlie Gardiner
Busher Jackson • Frank Boucher • Charlie Conacher
King Clancy • Lionel Conacher
Charlie Gardiner
Aurel Joliat • Joe Primeau • Bill Cook
Eddie Shore • Ching Johnson
Roy Worters
Busher Jackson • Frank Boucher • Charlie Conacher
Eddie Shore • Earl Seibert
Lorne Chabot
Aurel Joliat • Cooney Weiland • Dit Clapper
Cy Wentworth • Art Coulter
Tiny Thompson
Sweeney Schriner • Hooley Smith • Charlie Conacher
Eddie Shore • Babe Siebert
Tiny Thompson
Paul Thompson • Bill Thoms • Cecil Dillon
Earl Seibert • Ebbie Goodfellow
Wilf Cude
Busher Jackson • Marty Barry • Larry Aurie
Babe Siebert • Ebbie Goodfellow
Normie Smith
Sweeney Schriner • Art Chapman • Cecil Dillon
Earl Seibert • Lionel Conacher
Wilf Cude
Paul Thompson • Bill Cowley • Gord Drillon & Cecil Dillon
Eddie Shore • Babe Siebert
Tiny Thompson
Toe Blake • Syl Apps • Gord Drillon & Cecil Dillon
Art Coulter • Earl Seibert
Dave Kerr
Toe Blake • Syl Apps • Gord Drillon
Eddie Shore • Dit Clapper
Frank Brimsek
Johnny Gottselig • Neil Colville • Bobby Bauer
Earl Seibert • Art Coulter
Earl Robertson
Toe Blake • Milt Schmidt • Bryan Hextall
Dit Clapper • Ebbie Goodfellow
Dave Kerr
Woody Dumart • Neil Colville • Bobby Bauer
Art Coulter • Earl Seibert
Frank Brimsek
From 1940–50.
Sweeney Schriner • Bill Cowley • Bryan Hextall
Dit Clapper • Wally Stanowski
Turk Broda
Woody Dumart • Syl Apps • Bobby Bauer
Earl Seibert • Ott Heller
Frank Brimsek
Lynn Patrick • Syl Apps • Bryan Hextall
Earl Seibert • Tommy Anderson
Frank Brimsek
Sid Abel • Phil Watson • Gord Drillon
Pat Egan • Bucko McDonald
Turk Broda
Doug Bentley • Bill Cowley • Lorne Carr
Earl Seibert • Jack Stewart
Johnny Mowers
Lynn Patrick • Syl Apps • Bryan Hextall
Jack Crawford • Bill Hollett
Frank Brimsek
Doug Bentley • Bill Cowley • Lorne Carr
Earl Seibert • Babe Pratt
Bill Durnan
Herb Cain • Elmer Lach • Maurice Richard
Emile Bouchard • Dit Clapper
Paul Bibeault
Toe Blake • Elmer Lach • Maurice Richard
Emile Bouchard • Bill Hollett
Bill Durnan
Syd Howe • Bill Cowley • Bill Mosienko
Glen Harmon • Babe Pratt
Mike Karakas
Gaye Stewart • Max Bentley • Maurice Richard
Jack Crawford • Emile Bouchard
Bill Durnan
Toe Blake • Elmer Lach • Bill Mosienko
Kenny Reardon • Jack Stewart
Frank Brimsek
Doug Bentley • Milt Schmidt • Maurice Richard
Kenny Reardon • Emile Bouchard
Bill Durnan
Woody Dumart • Max Bentley • Bobby Bauer
Jack Stewart • Bill Quackenbush
Frank Brimsek
Ted Lindsay • Elmer Lach • Maurice Richard
Bill Quackenbush • Jack Stewart
Turk Broda
Gaye Stewart • Buddy O'Connor • Bud Poile
Kenny Reardon • Neil Colville
Frank Brimsek
Roy Conacher • Sid Abel • Maurice Richard
Bill Quackenbush • Jack Stewart
Bill Durnan
Ted Lindsay • Doug Bentley • Gordie Howe
Glen Harmon • Kenny Reardon
Chuck Rayner
Ted Lindsay • Sid Abel • Maurice Richard
Gus Mortson • Kenny Reardon
Bill Durnan
Tony Leswick • Ted Kennedy • Gordie Howe
Leo Reise • Red Kelly
Chuck Rayner
From 1950–60.
Ted Lindsay • Milt Schmidt • Gordie Howe
Red Kelly • Bill Quackenbush
Terry Sawchuk
Sid Smith • Sid Abel & Ted Kennedy • Maurice Richard
Jimmy Thomson • Leo Reise
Chuck Rayner
Ted Lindsay • Elmer Lach • Gordie Howe
Red Kelly • Doug Harvey
Terry Sawchuk
Sid Smith • Milt Schmidt • Maurice Richard
Hy Buller • Jimmy Thomson
Jim Henry
Ted Lindsay • Fleming Mackell • Gordie Howe
Red Kelly • Doug Harvey
Terry Sawchuk
Bert Olmstead • Alex Delvecchio • Maurice Richard
Bill Quackenbush • Bill Gadsby
Gerry McNeil
Ted Lindsay • Ken Mosdell • Gordie Howe
Red Kelly • Doug Harvey
Harry Lumley
Ed Sandford • Ted Kennedy • Maurice Richard
Bill Gadsby • Tim Horton
Terry Sawchuk
Sid Smith • Jean Beliveau • Maurice Richard
Doug Harvey • Red Kelly
Harry Lumley
Danny Lewicki • Ken Mosdell • Bernie Geoffrion
Bob Goldham • Fern Flaman
Terry Sawchuk
Ted Lindsay • Jean Beliveau • Maurice Richard
Doug Harvey • Bill Gadsby
Jacques Plante
Bert Olmstead • Tod Sloan • Gordie Howe
Red Kelly • Tom Johnson
Glenn Hall
Ted Lindsay • Jean Beliveau • Gordie Howe
Doug Harvey • Red Kelly
Glenn Hall
Real Chevrefils • Ed Litzenberger • Maurice Richard
Fern Flaman • Bill Gadsby
Jacques Plante
Dickie Moore • Henri Richard • Gordie Howe
Doug Harvey • Bill Gadsby
Glenn Hall
Camille Henry • Jean Beliveau • Andy Bathgate
Fern Flaman • Marcel Pronovost
Jacques Plante
Dickie Moore • Jean Beliveau • Andy Bathgate
Tom Johnson • Bill Gadsby
Jacques Plante
Alex Delvecchio • Henri Richard • Gordie Howe
Marcel Pronovost • Doug Harvey
Terry Sawchuk
Bobby Hull • Jean Beliveau • Gordie Howe
Doug Harvey • Marcel Pronovost
Glenn Hall
Dean Prentice • Bronco Horvath • Bernie Geoffrion
Allan Stanley • Pierre Pilote
Jacques Plante
From 1960–70.
Frank Mahovlich • Jean Beliveau • Bernie Geoffrion
Doug Harvey • Marcel Pronovost
Johnny Bower
Dickie Moore • Henri Richard • Gordie Howe
Allan Stanley • Pierre Pilote
Glenn Hall
Bobby Hull • Stan Mikita • Andy Bathgate
Doug Harvey • Jean-Guy Talbot
Jacques Plante
Frank Mahovlich • Dave Keon • Gordie Howe
Carl Brewer • Pierre Pilote
Glenn Hall
Frank Mahovlich • Stan Mikita • Gordie Howe
Pierre Pilote • Carl Brewer
Glenn Hall
Bobby Hull • Henri Richard • Andy Bathgate
Tim Horton • Elmer Vasko
Terry Sawchuk
Bobby Hull • Stan Mikita • Kenny Wharram
Pierre Pilote • Tim Horton
Glenn Hall
Frank Mahovlich • Jean Beliveau • Gordie Howe
Elmer Vasko • Jacques Laperriere
Charlie Hodge
Bobby Hull • Norm Ullman • Claude Provost
Pierre Pilote • Jacques Laperriere
Roger Crozier
Frank Mahovlich • Stan Mikita • Gordie Howe
Bill Gadsby • Carl Brewer
Charlie Hodge
Bobby Hull • Stan Mikita • Gordie Howe
Jacques Laperriere • Pierre Pilote
Glenn Hall
Frank Mahovlich • Jean Beliveau • Bobby Rousseau
Allan Stanley • Pat Stapleton
Gump Worsley
Bobby Hull • Stan Mikita • Kenny Wharram
Pierre Pilote • Harry Howell
Ed Giacomin
Don Marshall • Norm Ullman • Gordie Howe
Tim Horton • Bobby Orr
Glenn Hall
Bobby Hull • Stan Mikita • Gordie Howe
Bobby Orr • Tim Horton
Gump Worsley
Johnny Bucyk • Phil Esposito • Rod Gilbert
J.C. Tremblay • Jim Neilson
Ed Giacomin
Bobby Hull • Phil Esposito • Gordie Howe
Bobby Orr • Tim Horton
Glenn Hall
Frank Mahovlich • Jean Beliveau • Yvan Cournoyer
Ted Green • Ted Harris
Ed Giacomin
Bobby Hull • Phil Esposito • Gordie Howe
Bobby Orr • Brad Park
Tony Esposito
Frank Mahovlich • Stan Mikita • John McKenzie
Carl Brewer • Jacques Laperriere
Ed Giacomin
From 1970–80.
Johnny Bucyk • Phil Esposito • Ken Hodge
Bobby Orr • J.C. Tremblay
Ed Giacomin
Bobby Hull • Dave Keon • Yvan Cournoyer
Brad Park • Pat Stapleton
Jacques Plante
Bobby Hull • Phil Esposito • Rod Gilbert
Bobby Orr • Brad Park
Tony Esposito
Vic Hadfield • Jean Ratelle • Yvan Cournoyer
Bill White • Pat Stapleton
Ken Dryden
Frank Mahovlich • Phil Esposito • Mickey Redmond
Bobby Orr • Guy Lapointe
Ken Dryden
Dennis Hull • Bobby Clarke • Yvan Cournoyer
Brad Park • Bill White
Tony Esposito
Rick Martin • Phil Esposito • Ken Hodge
Bobby Orr • Brad Park
Bernie Parent
Wayne Cashman • Bobby Clarke • Mickey Redmond
Bill White • Barry Ashbee
Tony Esposito
Rick Martin • Bobby Clarke • Guy Lafleur
Bobby Orr • Denis Potvin
Bernie Parent
Steve Vickers • Phil Esposito • Rene Robert
Guy Lapointe • Borje Salming
Rogie Vachon
Bill Barber • Bobby Clarke • Guy Lafleur
Denis Potvin • Brad Park
Ken Dryden
Rick Martin • Gilbert Perreault • Reggie Leach
Borje Salming • Guy Lapointe
Glenn Resch
Steve Shutt • Marcel Dionne • Guy Lafleur
Larry Robinson • Borje Salming
Ken Dryden
Rick Martin • Gilbert Perreault • Lanny McDonald
Denis Potvin • Guy Lapointe
Rogie Vachon
Clark Gillies • Bryan Trottier • Guy Lafleur
Denis Potvin • Brad Park
Ken Dryden
Steve Shutt • Darryl Sittler • Mike Bossy
Larry Robinson • Borje Salming
Don Edwards
Clark Gillies • Bryan Trottier • Guy Lafleur
Denis Potvin • Larry Robinson
Ken Dryden
Bill Barber • Marcel Dionne • Mike Bossy
Borje Salming • Serge Savard
Glenn Resch
Charlie Simmer • Marcel Dionne • Guy Lafleur
Larry Robinson • Ray Bourque
Tony Esposito
Steve Shutt • Wayne Gretzky • Danny Gare
Borje Salming • Jim Schoenfeld
Don Edwards
From 1980–90.
Charlie Simmer • Wayne Gretzky • Mike Bossy
Denis Potvin • Randy Carlyle
Mike Liut
Bill Barber • Marcel Dionne • Dave Taylor
Larry Robinson • Ray Bourque
Mario Lessard
Mark Messier • Wayne Gretzky • Mike Bossy
Doug Wilson • Ray Bourque
Billy Smith
John Tonelli • Bryan Trottier • Rick Middleton
Paul Coffey • Brian Engblom
Grant Fuhr
Mark Messier • Wayne Gretzky • Mike Bossy
Mark Howe • Rod Langway
Pete Peeters
Michel Goulet • Denis Savard • Lanny McDonald
Paul Coffey • Ray Bourque
Roland Melanson
Michel Goulet • Wayne Gretzky • Mike Bossy
Rod Langway • Ray Bourque
Tom Barrasso
Mark Messier • Bryan Trottier • Jari Kurri
Paul Coffey • Denis Potvin
Pat Riggin
John Ogrodnick • Wayne Gretzky • Jari Kurri
Paul Coffey • Ray Bourque
Pelle Lindbergh
John Tonelli • Dale Hawerchuk • Mike Bossy
Rod Langway • Doug Wilson
Tom Barrasso
Michel Goulet • Wayne Gretzky • Mike Bossy
Paul Coffey • Mark Howe
John Vanbiesbrouck
Mats Naslund • Mario Lemieux • Jari Kurri
Larry Robinson • Ray Bourque
Bob Froese
Michel Goulet • Wayne Gretzky • Jari Kurri
Mark Howe • Ray Bourque
Ron Hextall
Luc Robitaille • Mario Lemieux • Tim Kerr
Larry Murphy • Al MacInnis
Mike Liut
Luc Robitaille • Mario Lemieux • Hakan Loob
Ray Bourque • Scott Stevens
Grant Fuhr
Michel Goulet • Wayne Gretzky • Cam Neely
Gary Suter • Brad McCrimmon
Patrick Roy
Luc Robitaille • Mario Lemieux • Joe Mullen
Chris Chelios • Paul Coffey
Patrick Roy
Gerard Gallant • Wayne Gretzky • Jari Kurri
Al MacInnis • Ray Bourque
Mike Vernon
Luc Robitaille • Mark Messier • Brett Hull
Ray Bourque • Al MacInnis
Patrick Roy
Brian Bellows • Wayne Gretzky • Cam Neely
Paul Coffey • Doug Wilson
Darren Puppa
From 1990–00.
Luc Robitaille • Wayne Gretzky • Brett Hull
Ray Bourque • Al MacInnis
Ed Belfour
Kevin Stevens • Adam Oates • Cam Neely
Chris Chelios • Brian Leetch
Patrick Roy
Kevin Stevens • Mark Messier • Brett Hull
Brian Leetch • Ray Bourque
Patrick Roy
Luc Robitaille • Mario Lemieux • Mark Recchi
Phil Housley • Scott Stevens
Kirk McLean
Luc Robitaille • Mario Lemieux • Teemu Selanne
Chris Chelios • Ray Bourque
Ed Belfour
Kevin Stevens • Pat LaFontaine • Alexander Mogilny
Larry Murphy • Al Iafrate
Tom Barrasso
Brendan Shanahan • Sergei Fedorov • Pavel Bure
Ray Bourque • Scott Stevens
Dominik Hasek
Adam Graves • Wayne Gretzky • Cam Neely
Al MacInnis • Brian Leetch
John Vanbiesbrouck
John LeClair • Eric Lindros • Jaromir Jagr
Paul Coffey • Chris Chelios
Dominik Hasek
Keith Tkachuk • Alexei Zhamnov • Theoren Fleury
Ray Bourque • Larry Murphy
Ed Belfour
Paul Kariya • Mario Lemieux • Jaromir Jagr
Chris Chelios • Ray Bourque
Jim Carey
John LeClair • Eric Lindros • Alexander Mogilny
Vladimir Konstantinov • Brian Leetch
Chris Osgood
Paul Kariya • Mario Lemieux • Teemu Selanne
Brian Leetch • Sandis Ozolinsh
Dominik Hasek
John LeClair • Wayne Gretzky • Jaromir Jagr
Chris Chelios • Scott Stevens
Martin Brodeur
John LeClair • Peter Forsberg • Jaromir Jagr
Nicklas Lidstrom • Rob Blake
Dominik Hasek
Keith Tkachuk • Wayne Gretzky • Teemu Selanne
Chris Pronger • Scott Niedermayer
Martin Brodeur
Paul Kariya • Peter Forsberg • Jaromir Jagr
Al MacInnis • Nicklas Lidstrom
Dominik Hasek
John LeClair • Alexei Yashin • Teemu Selanne
Ray Bourque • Eric Desjardins
Byron Dafoe
Brendan Shanahan • Steve Yzerman • Jaromir Jagr
Chris Pronger • Nicklas Lidstrom
Olaf Kolzig
Paul Kariya • Mike Modano • Pavel Bure
Rob Blake • Eric Desjardins
Roman Turek
From 2000-Today.
Patrik Elias • Joe Sakic • Jaromir Jagr
Nicklas Lidstrom • Ray Bourque
Dominik Hasek
Luc Robitaille • Mario Lemieux • Pavel Bure
Rob Blake • Scott Stevens
Roman Cechmanek
Markus Naslund • Joe Sakic • Jarome Iginla
Nicklas Lidstrom • Chris Chelios
Patrick Roy
Brendan Shanahan • Mats Sundin • Bill Guerin
Rob Blake • Sergei Gonchar
Jose Theodore
Markus Naslund • Peter Forsberg • Todd Bertuzzi
Nicklas Lidstrom • Al MacInnis
Martin Brodeur
Paul Kariya • Joe Thornton • Milan Hejduk
Sergei Gonchar • Derian Hatcher
Marty Turco
Markus Naslund • Joe Sakic • Martin St. Louis
Scott Niedermayer • Zdeno Chara
Martin Brodeur
Ilya Kovalchuk • Mats Sundin • Jarome Iginla
Chris Pronger • Bryan McCabe
Roberto Luongo
Alexander Ovechkin • Joe Thornton • Jaromir Jagr
Nicklas Lidstrom • Scott Niedermayer
Miikka Kiprusoff
Dany Heatley • Eric Staal • Daniel Alfredsson
Zdeno Chara • Sergei Zubov
Martin Brodeur
Alexander Ovechkin • Sidney Crosby • Dany Heatley
Nicklas Lidstrom • Scott Niedermayer
Martin Brodeur
Thomas Vanek • Vincent Lecavalier • Martin St. Louis
Chris Pronger • Dan Boyle
Roberto Luongo
Alexander Ovechkin • Evgeni Malkin • Jarome Iginla
Nicklas Lidstrom • Dion Phaneuf
Evgeni Nabokov
Henrik Zetterberg • Joe Thornton • Alexei Kovalev
Brian Campbell • Zdeno Chara
Martin Brodeur
First Team leaders by position.
The following is a list of the most selected First Team All-Stars by position.
See also.
NHL All-star game

Sara Evans
music
Sara Evans (born February 5, 1971) is a traditional country singer born in Boonville, Missouri. She has had several #1 hits, gold albums and platinum albums.
Early life.
Music was a big part of her life when she was young. At age 8, she was hit by a car in front of her house and broke both of her legs. She spent months in a wheelchair and kept singing to pay her hospital bills.
At age 16, she began performing in a nightclub in Columbia, Missouri. She did this for two years. At age 20, she moved to Nashville, Tennessee because she wanted to be a country music singer. She met musician Craig Schelske there. A year later, they moved to Oregon, but when they married, they moved back to Nashville.
In 1995, Sara began recording demos. Someone named Harland Howard was impressed by them so much he he decided to help her get a contract. This paid off when she signed with RCA Records.
Her first album under RCA was called "Three Chords and the Truth", released in 1997. People liked it for being traditional, and it was in many Top 10 lists for that year.
However, country music radio didn't like it that much. None of the singles made the Top 40.
In 1998, Sara released her next album, "No Place That Far". People didn't like it because it was more of a pop-country sound. The first single (Cryin' Game) didn't do anything, but the next single (No Place That Far, a duet with Vince Gill) became a #1 hit. Because of that the album was certified gold.

Georg Cantor
science
Georg Cantor was an important German mathematician.

Cleveland Cavaliers
sports
The Cleveland Cavaliers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Cleveland, Ohio.

Indiana Pacers
sports
The Indiana Pacers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Indianapolis, Indiana.

Washington Wizards
sports
The Washington Wizards are a team in the National Basketball Association in Washington, D.C..

Orlando Magic
sports
The Orlando Magic are a team in the National Basketball Association in Orlando, Florida.

Charlotte Bobcats
sports
The Charlotte Bobcats are a team in the National Basketball Association in Charlotte, North Carolina.

Denver Nuggets
sports
The Denver Nuggets are a team in the National Basketball Association in Denver, Colorado.

Memphis Grizzlies
sports
The Memphis Grizzlies are a team in the National Basketball Association in Memphis, Tennessee.

Los Angeles Clippers
sports
The Los Angeles Clippers are a team in the National Basketball Association in Los Angeles, California.

Félix Houphouët-Boigny
politics
Félix Houphouët-Boigny () (18 October 1905 – 7 December 1993) was the first President of Côte d'Ivoire.

Robert Christgau
media
Robert Christgau (born April 18, 1942) is an American music journalist. He has called himself the "Dean of American Rock Critics".

Undertow (Tool album)
music
"Undertow" is Tool's first full-length album, released in 1993. When this album was released, grunge music was at its most popular, and pop punk was slowly beginning to become popular. "Undertow" helped heavy metal music continue as a leading mainstream musical style, and allowed several later bands to break through to the mainstream. Allmusic saw the album's success in the "striking, haunting visuals that complemented the album's nihilistic yet wistful mood." It was eventually certified double platinum by the RIAA on May 14, 2001.
The album was recorded between October and December 1992 at Grand Master Studios, Hollywood, California, and includes songs that the band decided to not release on their previous EP, "Opiate".
CD.
All songs written by Tool unless otherwise noted.
"Disgustipated" is track 69 on most pressings in North America (causing most CD players upon reaching the end of track 9 to advance through tracks 10-68, which contain no data, at a rate of about 2 per second until track 69 is reached). It also appears as track 39, track 10 (mostly in Europe) or as a hidden track following "Flood" on track 9.
On certain Japanese imports, "Disgustipated" is track 70, with a short live version of "Flood" as track 71.

Bill Cowher
sports
William Laird "Bill" Cowher (born May 8, 1957) is a former American football coach and player. He coached the Pittsburgh Steelers for 15 seasons. He is an analyst for "The NFL Today".

Brad Delson
music
Bradford Phillip "Brad" Delson (born December 1, 1977 in Agoura Hills, California) is the lead guitarist of alternative rock band Linkin Park.
Early Life.
Brad went to Agoura High School with fellow member of Linkin Park Mike Shinoda.

Duane Allman
music
Duane Allman (November 20, 1946 – October 29, 1971) was an American musician and lead guitarist of the southern rock group, the Allman Brothers Band. In 2004, Rolling Stone magazine called him the second best guitarist of all time.

Nimrod (album)
music
"Nimrod" is the fifth album by the punk rock band Green Day, released on October 14, 1997 on Reprise Records.

Ole Gunnar Solskjær
sports
Ole Gunnar Solskjær (born February 26, 1973 in Kristiansund) is a Norwegian former footballer who played most of his career for Manchester United F.C. and the Norway national team. He is popular because he scored the winning goal for Manchester United F.C. in the 1999 Champions League Final. Today, he is the coach of the Manchester United F.C. Reserve team.

George Best
sports
George Best (May 22, 1946 - November 25, 2005) was a Northern Irish footballer who played many years for Manchester United. He is considered by many to be the most talented Manchester United player and no one disagrees that he was Northern Ireland national team's best ever player. In Belfast, where Best was born, they named the international airport after him.

John Kiffmeyer
music
John Kiffmeyer (also known as Al Sobrante) was the original drummer for the punk rock band Green Day, and used to be the drummer for Isocracy. He was given his nickname because to his hometown name, El Sobrante.

Slappy
music
"Slappy" is the second EP by Green Day, and was released on Lookout! Records in the summer of 1990 on seven-inch vinyl
Track listing.
All tracks by Green Day, except where noted.

Sweet Children (EP)
music
"Sweet Children" is the third EP released by punk rock band Green Day.
Track listing.
All songs by Green Day, except where noted.

Kerplunk (album)
music
"Kerplunk" (also known as "Kerplunk!") is the second full-length album by punk rock band Green Day. It was released on January 17, 1992 by Lookout! Records.
Track listing.
All songs by Billie Joe Armstrong (lyrics) and Green Day (music), except where noted.
Bonus tracks.
The following tracks are only available on the CD release. They were first released on the "Sweet Children" EP.

Green Party of Pakistan
politics
The Green Party was founded on April 28 2002 and since has been active in local politics. Members of the political party are known as the "Pakistan Greens". It is a member of the Asia-Pacific Green Network. Liaquat Ali heads the legal party.

Robert Downey, Jr.
music
Robert Downey Jr. (born April 4 1965) is an American actor. One of his most famous roles is Tony Stark in the film "Iron Man".

Lilian Garcia
music
Lilian Annette García (born August 19, 1966) is an American singer and ring announcer.

The Courier-Mail
media
"The Courier-Mail" is a newspaper made in Australia. It is made by an Australian company called News Limited. "The Courier-Mail" is published during the week in Brisbane. The first issue was published 1933.

Işın Karaca
music
Işın Karaca (born in London, United Kingdom, on March 7, 1973) is a Turkish-Cypriot pop singer.
She has released three music albums. These are: "Anadilim Aşk", "İçinde Aşk Var" and "Başka 33/3". She will release a new album in October 2008. The name of the new album is "Aşkın Uyanışı". She also has been an actress for the film "Sen Ne Dilersen".

Oklahoma City Thunder
sports
The Oklahoma City Thunder is a professional basketball franchise based in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma. The successor to the now-defunct Seattle SuperSonics franchise, the club is set to replace Seattle in the Western Conference's Northwest Division and begin play at Oklahoma City's Ford Center during the 2008–09 NBA season.

Larry Bird
sports
Lawrence Joseph "Larry" Bird (born December 7 1956) is an American retired NBA basketball player. He is widely believed to be one of the best players of all time and one of the best clutch performers in the history of sports.

Seattle SuperSonics
sports
The Seattle SuperSonics (also called the Seattle Sonics) were an American professional basketball team based in Seattle, Washington that played in the Pacific and Northwest Divisions of the National Basketball Association (NBA) from 1967 until its final season in 2007–2008.

Irving Berlin
music
Irving Berlin (May 11, 1888 – September 22, 1989) was a Russian-born American composer and lyricist. He never learned how to read music very well, but he made many songs, including well known ones such as "White Christmas" and "God Bless America".

Lemony Snicket
music
Lemony Snicket is the name of the author who wrote the A Series of Unfortunate Events books. Lemony Snicket's real name is Daniel Handler.
Snicket as a character.
He also dedicated his life to the Baudelaire orphans story.

Tulsa Revolution
sports
The Tulsa Revolution is a professional soccer team from Tulsa, Oklahoma that plays in the Central Division of the American Indoor Soccer League.

Christian Gottlob Neefe
music
Christian Gottlob Neefe (1748–1798) was Ludwig van Beethoven's first teacher.

Electronic Gaming Monthly
media
"Electronic Gaming Monthly" (abbreviated as "EGM") is an American video game magazine published by Ziff Davis. It's one of the most popular gaming magazines in America.
April Fools' Day.
Every April Fools' Day, "Electronic Gaming Monthly" does an April Fools' Day joke. One of the most famous is when they said that Sonic and Tails can be found in "Super Smash Bros. Melee" if the player completes a very hard task, and for a long time after that, people thought that they really were in. Sonic later appeared in "Super Smash Bros. Brawl".

Isaac Hayes
music
Isaac Hayes (August 20, 1942 - August 10, 2008) was a famous soul singer, songwriter, and actor. He was also famous for playing Chef in "South Park", but he left this role because he did not like it when "South Park" made fun of scientology, which was his religion.
Death.
Isaac Hayes was found on the floor of his house on August 10, 2008. He was taken to the hospital, and died there. He was 65 years old.

Horst-Wessel-Lied
music
The "Horst-Wessel-Lied" ("Horst Wessel Song"), also known as "Die Fahne hoch" ("The flag on high", from its opening line), was the anthem of the Nazi Party from 1930 to 1945. From 1933 to 1945 it was also part of Germany's national anthem.
The lyrics of the song were composed in 1929 by Horst Wessel, a Nazi activist and local commander of the Nazi militia, the SA, in the Berlin district of Friedrichshain. Wessel was assassinated by a Communist activist in January 1930, and the propaganda apparatus of Berlin Gauleiter Dr Joseph Goebbels made him the leading martyr of the Nazi Movement. The song became the official Song of Consecration ("Weihelied") for the Nazi Party, and was extensively used at party functions as well as being sung by the SA during street parades.
When the Nazis came to power in 1933, the "Horst-Wessel-Lied" was recognised as a national symbol by a law issued on May 19, 1933. Nazi Germany thus had a double anthem, consisting of the first verse of the "Deutschlandlied" followed by the "Horst Wessel-Lied". A regulation attached to a printed version of the "Horst Wessel-Lied" in 1934 required the right arm to be raised in a "Hitler salute" when the first and fourth verses were sung.
With the fall of the Nazi regime in 1945, the "Horst-Wessel-Lied" was banned, and both the lyrics and the tune remain illegal in Germany and Austria to this day except for educational and scholarly uses (under sections 86 and 86a of the "Strafgesetzbuch").
Lyrics.
The "Rotfront" ("Red Front") was a reference to the Rotfrontkämpferbund, a paramilitary organization associated with the Communist Party of Germany (KPD). It was common for Nazis' Sturmabteilung and Communists' Redfront to attack each other in violent street confrontations, which eventually grew into full-scale battles after 1930. "Reaction" was a reference to the conservative parties and the liberal democratic German state of the Weimar Republic period, which made several unsuccessful attempts to suppress the SA. "Servitude" is a reference to what the Nazis saw as Germany's "servitude" to the Treaty of Versailles of 1919, which imposed huge reparations on Germany and deprived her of her colonies and territory along her eastern border.
The dropping of the reference to "barricades" reflected the Nazi Party's desire in the period 1930-33 to be seen as a constitutional political party aiming at taking power by legal means rather than as a revolutionary party.
The line "Kameraden, die Rotfront und Reaktion erschossen" is ghastly German, but it was never amended.
After Wessel's death, new stanzas were composed in his honour. These were frequently sung by the SA but did not become part of the official lyrics used on party or state occasions.
Melody.
After Wessel's death, he was officially credited with having composed the melody as well as having written the lyrics for the "Horst-Wessel-Lied". Between 1930 and 1933, however, German critics disputed this claim, pointing out that the melody had a long prior history. Such criticism became impossible after 1933.
In 1936 a German music critic, Alfred Weidemann, published an article in which he identified the melody of a song composed in 1865 by the Weimar composer Peter Cornelius as the "Urmelodie" (source-melody). According to Weidemann, Cornelius described the tune as a "Viennese folk tune." This appeared to him to be the ultimate origin of the melody of the "Horst-Wessel-Lied".
The musical score is much more ocmplex than the text of the song; given its characteristics, it could easily be soung even by people without much singing practice, and be played by amateur bands. Often, fanfares were used to give a more military touch to the tune.
See also the Wikipedia article on Carl Boberg (1859-1940), particularly the note on similarities and dissimilarities between "Horst Wessel Lied" and the Swedish tune O STORE GUD (widely sung as "How Great Thou Art").
Parodies.
The Stahlhelm was a veterans' organisation closely aligned with the Nazis.
Ernst Thälmann was the KPD leader.
Wilhelm Frick was the Interior Minister. Baldur von Schirach was the Hitler Youth leader. Heinrich Himmler was head of the SS and police.
Kurt Schmitt was Economics Minister 1933-35.
References.
This article is largely based on George Boderick, "The Horst-Wessel-Lied: A Reappraisal," "International Folklore Review" Vol. 10 (1995): 100-127, available online

Bill Tapia
music
Uncle Bill “Tappy” Tapia (born January 1, 1908) is an American musician, born in Honolulu, Hawaii. His parents were Portuguese. At age 10, Tapia already had been a professional musician, playing “Stars and Stripes Forever” for World War I soldiers in Hawaii.
His long career started in Vaudeville and soon after he became a jazz guitarist and ukulele player. He has worked with big names such as Bing Crosby, Louis Armstrong, and Elvis Presley and has also worked with Hawaiian musicians such as King Bennie Nawahi, Sol Ho‘opi’i and Andy Iona. People think that Tapia is the first musician to play jazz on the ukelele.

The Black Parade Is Dead!
music
"The Black Parade is Dead!" is a CD/DVD by My Chemical Romance it was recorded live in Mexico.
Track Listing.
All songs written and composed by My Chemical Romance.
From the Palacio de los Deportes in Mexico City, Mexico on October 7, 2007
From the Palacio de los Deportes in Mexico City, Mexico on October 7, 2007[4]
From Maxwell's in Hoboken, New Jersey, on October 24, 2007[4]

BBC Two
media
BBC Two is a television channel in the United Kingdom. It started on 20 April 1964, and was the third television channel in the United Kingdom. The channel is owned by the BBC. BBC Two was channel of the year in 2007.
Controllers.
This is a list of the controllers of BBC Two.
As of August 2008, the controller of BBC Two is Roly Keating, who took up the post in June 2004 having formerly been controller of BBC Four. He became controller after Jane Root departed in May 2004 to become the executive vice president and general manager of the US-based Discovery Channel. Jane Root was appointed in 1999 and was the first woman to be appointed controller of a BBC television channel.

Malik Ghulam Muhammad
politics
Ghulam Muhammad (20 April 1895 - 12 September 1956) (Urdu: ملک غلام محمد) served as third Governor-General of Pakistan from 1951 until 1955, and was also the 1st Finance Minister shortly before his death in 1956.

Honey to the B
music
"Honey To The B" is the first album by pop singer Billie Piper, released in 1998 (see 1998 in music). Billie (she was known at the time only by her first name) was the first British female singer to have a first single start at #1 on the UK pop charts.

BBC Parliament
media
BBC Parliament is a British television channel from the BBC. It broadcasts live and recorded coverage of the British House of Commons and House of Lords, the Northern Ireland Assembly, the Scottish Parliament and the Welsh Assembly, and occasionally from the General Synod of the Church of England. The channel also broadcasts reports from the European Parliament.
Before being taken over by the BBC, the channel was known as The Parliamentary Channel.

Incesticide
music
"Incesticide" is a compilation album by the American grunge band, Nirvana. This album features many of their B-Sides and demos of their songs. On the back of the CD, Kurt Cobain spells his name wrong. He spells it "Kurdt Cobain."

Muhammad Rafiq Tarar
politics
Muhammad Rafiq Tarar (Urdu: محمد رفیق تارڑ) (b. November 2, 1929) was President of Pakistan from January 1, 1998 until June 20, 2001. During Pakistan's independence in 1947, Rafiq Tarar worked as a relief worker in camps set up by Muslim Students Federation for refugees, migrating from British India to Pakistan.

Muhammad Ali Bogra
politics
Muhammad Ali Bogra (1909 - 1963) (Bengali: মোহাম্মদ আলী বগুড়া محمد علی بوگرہ Urdu) was a Pakistani statesman of Bengali origin. He served as Prime Minister of Pakistan from 1953 until 1955.

Chaudhry Muhammad Ali
politics
Chaudhry Muhammad Ali (Urdu: چوہدری محمد علی) (July 15, 1905 - December 2, 1980) was a Pakistani statesman. He served as Prime Minister of Pakistan from 1955 to 1956.

Huseyn Shaheed Suhrawardy
politics
Huseyn Shaheed Suhrawardy (September 8, 1892 - December 5, 1963) was a politician from Bengal in undivided India, and later in East Pakistan. He served as Prime Minister of Pakistan from 1956 until 1957. He is also known for his controversial role in the Direct Action Day of August 16, 1946. Following riots in Bengal during the last days of India's fight for freedom, he was considered a favourite of Muhammad Ali Jinnah. He is also considered to be the first populist leader in Pakistan's history. He is the founder of the Awami League, one of the two major political parties of present day Bangladesh.

Ibrahim Ismail Chundrigar
politics
Ibrahim Ismail Chundrigar (Urdu: ابراہیم اسماعیل چندریگ, April 15, 1898 - March 13, 1968), commonly known as I. I. Chundrigar, was Prime Minister of Pakistan for about 2 months from October 17, 1957 to December 16, 1957.

Nurul Amin
politics
Nurul Amin (Bengali: নূরুল আমীন, Urdu: نورالامین, July 15, 1893 - October 2, 1974) was a Prime Minister and Vice President of Pakistan. He was a well known Bengali leader of the Pakistan's Muslim League, and served as Chief Minister of East Pakistan.

Muhammad Khan Junejo
politics
Muhammad Khan Junejo (Urdu/Sindhi: محمد خان جونیجو) (August 18, 1932 – March 16, 1993) was the eleventh Prime Minister of Pakistan.

Ghulam Mustafa Jatoi
politics
Ghulam Mustafa Jatoi (Urdu: غلام مصطفیٰ جتوئی) (born 14 August 1931) was Prime Minister of Pakistan for 3 months, from August 6, 1990 to November 6, 1990.

Zafarullah Khan Jamali
politics
Mir Zafarullah Khan Jamali (Urdu/Baloch: میر ظفراللہ خان جمالی) (born January 1, 1944) is a former Prime Minister of Pakistan. He is the current chairman of the Pakistan Hockey Federation.

Shaukat Aziz
politics
Shaukat Aziz (Urdu: شوکت عزیز), (born March 6, 1949 in Karachi, Pakistan) was the Prime Minister of Pakistan from 2004 to 2007. He became Finance Minister in November 1999. Aziz was chosen by President Musharraf for the position of Prime Minister after the resignation of Zafarullah Khan Jamali on June 6, 2004. He became Prime Minister on August 28, 2004 and served until November 15, 2007. He became the first Prime Minister of Pakistan to complete a full term in office.

Yousaf Raza Gillani
politics
Syed Makhdoom Yousaf Raza Gillani (Urdu: مخدوم سيد يوسف رضا گیلانى) (born June 9, 1952 in Karachi) is the twenty-sixth and current Prime Minister of Pakistan. He was a former Speaker of the National Assembly of Pakistan (1993-1997) and former Federal Minister (1985-1986).
He was nominated by Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP), with the support of coalition partners, Pakistan Muslim League (N), Awami National Party, Jamiat Ulema-e-Islam (F) and Muttahida Qaumi Movement on 22 March 2008. He took the oath of office from President Pervez Musharraf on 25 March 2008. Gilani is the first elected Prime Minister of Pakistan from the Seraiki-speaking belt.
Gilani is also the present vice chairman of the Pakistan Peoples Party.

Chaudhry Khaliquzzaman
politics
Chaudhry Khaliquzzaman was an Indian Muslim politician and leader of the All India Muslim League in the United Provinces (now Uttar Pradesh). A strong supporter of Muhammad Ali Jinnah and the Pakistan movement, Khaliquzzaman migrated to Pakistan in 1947.

Iron Maiden (album)
music
Iron Maiden is a first album made by British heavy metal band Iron Maiden.
It was released on 11th April 1980. The main musical type of the album is heavy metal but some songs, like Sanctuary or Running Free are like punk rock music. Many fans feel that a song from this album - Phantom Of The Opera is the best song Iron Maiden have ever made.

Bangladesh Awami League
politics
The Bangladesh Awami League (Bengali: বাংলাদেশ আওয়ামী লীগ; also translated Bangladesh People's League) is the mainstream secular political party in Bangladesh. The party is now headed by Sheikh Hasina, the daughter of the late Sheikh Mujibur Rahman. The Awami League has been in government twice, about eight and a half years, since Bangladesh's independence in 1971.

Jatiyo Gano Front
politics
The Jatiyo Gano Front (National People's Front) is a left-wing political group in Bangladesh. The JGF used to be part of the Workers Party of Bangladesh but split from them in 1995. The JGF is led by Tipu Biswas.

Azad Pakistan Party
politics
The Azad Pakistan Party is a left-wing Pakistani party founded by Mian Iftikharuddin an ex-member of the Indian Congress who went on to join the Muslim League that created Pakistan.

Insaf Party
politics
The Insaf Party (Justice Party), was a Muslim political party. It was founded by Syed Shahabuddin in 1989 as a split from the Janata Party - it formed as a protest against the alliance between V.P. Singh and the right wing Bharatiya Janata Party. When the V.P. Singh government fell in 1990, the IP stopped being a party.

Apna Dal
politics
The Apna Dal is a political party in India. Most of the people who support are from the Kurmi caste. Its main base is in central Uttar Pradesh. Apna Dal is led by Sone Lal Patel.

Ambedkar National Congress
politics
The Ambedkar National Congress is a political party based in India. The party works for the rights of Dalits. Mr. Mohammed Kazam Ali Khan is the founder and President of the ANC.

Brisbane Broncos
sports
The Brisbane Broncos are a rugby league team that is based in Brisbane. They play in the National Rugby League premiership. the have won the competition 6 times in the last 20 years thus making them the most successful rugby league team in Australia.

Iggy Pop
music
James Newell Osterberg, Jr. (born April 21, 1947), better known by his stage name Iggy Pop, is an American rock singer, songwriter, and sometimes an actor.

Joe Namath
sports
Joseph William Namath (born May 31 1943, Beaver Falls, Pennsylvania), also known as Broadway Joe, is a former American football quarterback.

Phil Simms
sports
Phillip Martin Simms (born November 3, 1955 in Lebanon, Kentucky) is a former American football quarterback, and currently a television sportscaster for the CBS network.

Aaron Rodgers
sports
Aaron Charles Rodgers (born December 2, 1983 in Chico, California, U.S.) is the starting American football quarterback for the Green Bay Packers of the NFL.

Johannes Heesters
music
Johannes Heesters (born December 5, 1903) is a Dutch actor, singer, and entertainer. He has worked for 91 years, and has almost always worked in German-speaking places. As of 2008, Heesters is the oldest working person in entertainment. Some people have had problems with Heesters because he once sung for Adolf Hitler.

Dmitry Medvedev
politics
Dmitry Medvedev is the President of Russia, officially on May 7, 2008. He won the presidential election held on March 2, 2008 with about 70% of the vote.

BBC Three
media
BBC Three is a British television channel from the BBC. It does not broadcast on analogue, but only on digital platforms like freeview.
__TOC__
BBC Three is described by the BBC as a channel for 'New drama, talent, comedy, films, and accessible news'. It runs from 19:00 to about 04:00 each night, in order to share terrestrial digital bandwidth with the CBBC channel. Unlike its commercial rivals, 90% of BBC Three's output is from the United Kingdom and other European Union countries. 80% is original, covering all genres: from current affairs, to drama, to comedy to animation.
BBC Three has a unique '60 second news' format. This was adopted so that operation of the channel could be completely automated, without the complication of dealing with variable length live news broadcasts. The current controller of the station is Danny Cohen, and the Head of Scheduling is Dan McGolpin.
Launch.
BBC Three is the successor to the similar BBC Choice channel and was launched on 9 February 2003. It was launched by Stuart Murphy, who previously ran BBC Choice.
Programming.
Some of the programmes that have appeared for their first showing on BBC Three include EastEnders (2003), Little Britain (October 2004), Doctor Who Confidential (2005), and Torchwood (2006), The Apprentice, You're Fired! (2006). When the first episode of Torchwood was launched in October 2006 on BBC Three, 2.4 million people watched it. This broke BBC Three's previous record of 1.8 million. The second episode attracted an equally impressive 2.3 million viewers, and boosted BBC Three to a 3.5% share of multichannel viewing that evening, compared to the network's three month Sunday average of 0.9%.
The channel features hourly news updates called "60 Seconds", which includes the top news, sport and entertainment stories. It is presented in a cheeky, relaxed style in keeping with the rest of the channel. As part of the BBC's discussions with the government in whether the channel could launch originally, a longer news programme had been promised to provide a daily section of news and current affairs. "The News Show", as it came to be called upon launch was later rebranded "The 7 O'Clock News". However, the BBC discontinued the bulletin in 2005, claiming that in fact, the programme's audiences were minuscule and the output was provided elsewhere on the BBC.
Viewing.
The channel is aimed at 25-34 year olds, and competes with other digital channels including ITV2 and E4.
Its share of the audience during its transmission hours is 2.6% among 25-34 year olds, and 1.7% among all individuals. BARB, the official ratings agency, averages out BBC Three's viewing figures over 24 hours even though the channel only broadcasts in the evening, giving a distorted sense of the channel's viewership. Despite several official complaints from the BBC, BARB continues to publish figures which the BBC argues are unrepresentative. Nine million people watch BBC Three every week.
Awards.
The channel has had critical and popular successes, winning more awards in its four year history than its commercial rivals (Sky One, Living, E4, ITV2, Five and Paramount Comedy Channel) have won in their combined 25-year history. In total BBC Three has won 7 BAFTA awards, 5 British Comedy Awards, 15 Royal Television Society Awards and 5 Rose d'Or Awards since the channel was launched in February 2003. Most recently, it won "Broadcast Magazines "Digital Channel of the Year" Award for Best General Entertainment Channel, and MGEITF Non Terrestrial Channel of the Year.
All three of BBC Three's dramas produced in 2004 ("Outlaws", "Bodies" and "Conviction") received BAFTA nominations, as did classical music show "Flashmob The Opera".
In 2008, BBC Three's Gavin and Stacey won the BAFTA audience award and the best comedy performance award was awarded to James Corden for his part.
Criticism.
The channel has also come in for criticism from several corners, the most prominent of which are some of the BBC's long-standing presenters. These include John Humphrys, who argued that BBC Three and BBC Four should be shut down in the face of budget cuts to Radio 4's Today programme, which he presents, John Sweeney of Panorama, and Jeremy Paxman are among other journalists have also criticised the channel and its content.
Proposed earlier start time for BBC Three.
BBC Vision director Jana Bennett confirmed in an interview for Broadcast magazine in May 2008 that the BBC Trust has been petitioned to change the start of transmission time from the current time of 7pm each evening to earlier in the afternoon. A decision from the Trust is not expected until 2009.
Bennett said that some of the extra hours would be given over to BBC Switch the BBC's teen programming strand.

Bob McGrath
music
Image:Bob McGrath Sesame Place headshot.jpg|250px|thumb|right|Bob McGrath before a Sesame Place concert starts. (Photo by
Robert Emmet "Bob" McGrath (born June 13, 1932) is an American singer and actor who is best known for playing the human character "Bob" on "Sesame Street". He was born in in Ottawa, Illinois. McGrath's character of Bob is one of the longest lasting human characters on "Sesame Street".

BBC Four
media
BBC Four is a television channel operated by the BBC. It is only available through digital means such as freeview or Sky. It launched on March 2, 2002. It often shows alternative programs that often have a much smaller audience than BBC One or Two.

WQED (TV)
media
WQED (channel 13, digital channel 38) is a PBS television station based in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. Established 1 April 1954, it was the first community-sponsored television station in the United States as well as the fifth public TV station. WQED also became the first station to telecast classes to elementary classrooms when Pittsburgh launched the Metropolitan School Service in 1955. WQED has produced many shows for PBS, such as Mister Rogers' Neighborhood (which aired first run episodes from 19 February 1968 to 31 August 2001). Pittsburgh Magazine is also a publication of WQED.

The Daily Telegraph
media
"The Daily Telegraph" is a newspaper published in Sydney, Australia. It is made by an Australian company called News Limited. It started in 1879.

The West Australian
media
"The West Australian" is a newspaper published in Perth, Australia. It is made by an Australian company called West Australian Newspapers Holdings. It started in 1833.

Missy Higgins
music
Missy Higgins (born Melissa Morrison Higgins on 19 August 1983) is an Australian singer and songwriter. She has released two very popular albums in Australia; "The Sound of White" and "On a Clear Night".
Early life and work.
Higgins was born in Melbourne, Australia. She was a student at Geelong Grammar School. Most of her spare time at the school was spent in a music room, playing the piano. When she was 15 years old, she wrote a song called "All for Believing" that got an "A" in a school assignment. The next year, Higgins went to a record label, but was denied because she had not written any other songs. She began writing new songs. In the meantime, her sister sent "All for Believing" to Triple J, and it won an "Unearthed" competition. Because of this, record labels Sony and EMI both contacted her. Higgins chose "Eleven", a part of EMI.

Songs About Jane
music
Songs About Jane is the debut album by pop-rock alternative band Maroon 5. The album was released in 2002. Singles include Harder to Breathe, This Love, She Will Be Loved, Sunday Morning, Must Get Out, and Shiver.

It Won't Be Soon Before Long
music
It Won't Be Soon Before Long is the second studio album by Maroon 5 released in May of 2007. Singles include Makes Me Wonder, Wake Up Call, Won't Go Home Without You, and If I Never See Your Face Again and other songs include Goodnight Goodnight, Not Falling Apart, and Nothing Lasts Forever.
The "Background".
A chorus from the song called Nothing Lasts Forever (the 7th track off "It Won't Be Soon Before Long") was featured in a song by Kanye West. The Kayne West song, featuring the lead singer Adam Levine, was called Heard 'Em Say. It was released in 2005 on the album Late Registration. The first track off the album, called "If I Never See Your Face Again", was released as a remix in May, 2008. This track had been worked on with help from Rihanna. The song turned out to be a music video and ranked #51 on the U.S. "Billboard" Hot 100.

Chariot (album)
music
"Chariot" is an album by rock singer Gavin Degraw. The album features singles "I Don't Wanna Be", "Chariot", and "Follow Through". The album was released in 2004. "Chariot" also was re-released in 2005 as a live acoustic album.

Bernard Fanning
music
Bernard Fanning is the singer, guitarist and main song-writer for the Australian rock band Powderfinger.

Convention People's Party
politics
The Convention People's Party (CPP) was a political party made by Kwame Nkrumah in 1949. It was formed as a split from the United Gold Coast Convention, which, before the forming of the CPP, Nkrumah became general secretary of in 1947. Nkrumah split from the UGCC because Nkrumah did not agree with the UGCC's beliefs and ways.. The party continues to exist today.

Chris Paul
sports
Christopher Emmanuel Paul (born May 6 1985) is a professional basketball player who currently plays point guard for the New Orleans Hornets of the NBA. His nickname is CP3. In 2008 Paul won an Olympic gold medal as part of the United States basketball team.

Paul Kelly (musician)
music
Paul Maurice Kelly was born on 13 January 1955 in Adelaide, South Australia). Kelly is an Australian rock music singer-songwriter, guitarist and harmonica player. Kelly has led many groups including Paul Kelly and the Dots, Paul Kelly and the Coloured Girls and Paul Kelly and the Messengers. Kelly is one of Australia's best singer-songwriters.. His importance was recognised in 1997 when he was added to the Australian Recording Industry Association (ARIA) Hall of Fame.
Kelly writes and plays in many music styles, from bluegrass to reggae. His main styles are folk, rock, and country. Kelly's Top 40 singles on the National charts were his 1980s songs "Billy Baxter", "Before Too Long", "Darling it Hurts", "To Her Door", "Dumb Things", and his 2000 single "Roll on Summer". "To Her Door", written by Kelly, was his best local hit. It got to Number 14 on the Australian singles charts in 1987. "Dumb Things" got to Number 16 on the US "Billboard" Modern Rock chart in 1988. He has also had success with his albums with Top 20 hits on the National charts for "Gossip", "Under The Sun" and "So Much Water So Close To Home" from the 1980s; "Comedy", "Wanted Man", ' and "Words and Music" from the 1990s; and "Nothing But A Dream", "Ways & Means" and "Stolen Apples" from the 2000s. The compilation album "Songs from the South" got to Number 2 in 1997. His highest charting studio album was "Nothing But A Dream" which got to Number 7 in 2001.

Muhammad Hashim Gazdar
politics
Muhammad Hashim Gazdar (Urdu: محمّد ہاشم گزدار) was mayor of Karachi in the Sindh province of Pakistan.
Early life.
He was born in 1895 in Jaisalmer but moved with his family to Karachi where he was educated. In 1911 he passed his intermediate and was later to study engineering in Pune. He was involved in an uplift project for the lower caste in Bombay, however this was unsuccessful and he along with a number of people this project were fired.
Political life.
After losing his job in Bombay he returned to Karachi where he joined the District Local Board as an engineer.

David Paterson
politics
David Alexander Paterson (born May 20, 1954) is an American politician and the current Governor of New York. He is the first black governor of New York and the first legally blind governor of any state. He became governor when Eliot Spitzer resigned. Due to Paterson becoming governor, two black governors are serving at the same time for the first time in more than 100 years; as Governor Deval Patrick of Massachusetts is also African American.

Aslak Brekke
music
Aslak Brekke (October 6, 1901 – 1978) was a Norwegian vocalist of stev (a type of Scandinavian poetry which is sung). He was also a singer of folksongs. Brekke was born in Vinje, Telemark. He was the first folksinger to sing on a radio broadcast to all of Norway.
In 1945, Brekke sang at an important concert in the ceremonial hall (the "Aula") at the University of Oslo. He also made a recording of the song "Ståle Storli", together with Eivind Groven (harmonium).

Chris Osgood
sports
Christopher John Osgood (born November 26, 1972 in Peace River, Alberta) is a Canadian professional ice hockey goaltender with the Detroit Red Wings of the National Hockey League. He spent the first part of his career with Detroit, and then played for the New York Islanders and the St. Louis Blues during his 14-year NHL career before returning to Detroit in 2005. He has won three Stanley Cup championships in his career, all with the Red Wings, two of them while he was the starting goaltender.

Edward Emerson Barnard
science
Edward Emerson Barnard was an American astronomer. He is famous for discovering Amalthea, a moon of the planet Jupiter. A star, Barnard's star, was named after him.

Mulan II
music
"Mulan II" is a Disney 2005 movie and the sequel to the 1998 animated movie "Mulan". It was directed by Darrell Rooney and Lynne Southerland, and features Mulan, and her new fiancé, Shang, on a special mission: getting the Emperor's three daughters across the country to meet their soon-to-be fiancés. The movie deals with arranged marriages, loyalty, relationships, making choices, trust, and finding true love. The entire cast from the first movie returned, except for Eddie Murphy (Mushu), Miriam Margolyes (The Matchmaker), Chris Sanders (Little Brother) and Matthew Wilder (Ling's singing voice). Murphy and Margolyes were replaced by Mark Moseley and April Winchell, and Gedde Watanabe does his own singing for the sequel.
The Story.
Fa Mulan gets the surprise of her young life when her love, Captain (now General) Li Shang asks for her hand in marriage. Before the two can have their happily ever after, the Emperor assigns them a secret mission, to escort three princesses to Chang'an, China. Mushu is determined to drive a wedge between the couple after he learns that he will lose his guardian job if Mulan marries into the Li family. After the princesses unexpectedly fall in love with the Gang of Three, Mulan decides to help them escape the fate of marrying men they do not love. This contradicts the Emperor's orders and forces him to put Mulan's relationship with Shang into question. They are attacked by Mongolians, and the fate of China hangs in the balance.
Soundtrack.
The soundtrank contains songs from the movie performed by various artists, as well as portions of the movie's score composed by Joel McNeely. It was released on January 25, 2005 by Walt Disney Records.

How to Save a Life
music
How to Save a Life is a studio album by The Fray. The album was released in September of 2005. Singles include How to Save a Life, Over My Head (Cable Car), All at Once, and Look After You.

Tony Lazzeri
sports
Anthony Michael Lazzeri was a Major League Baseball player, mostly for the New York Yankees. He is a member of the Baseball Hall of Fame.

Nevermind
music
"Nevermind" is the second studio album by the American grunge band, Nirvana. While the album before this, "Bleach", was not very popular, "Nevermind" was. It had 4 singles: "Smells Like Teen Spirit," "Come as You Are," "In Bloom," and "Lithium." There was some controversy because of a child's penis which was visible on the front cover.

Just Stand Up!
music
"Just Stand Up!" is a song featuring the vocals of an all-star group of pop/rock performers, including this is the order in which they are listed on the cover Mariah Carey, Beyoncé, Mary J. Blige, Rihanna, Fergie, Sheryl Crow, Melissa Etheridge, Natasha Bedingfield, Miley Cyrus, Leona Lewis, Carrie Underwood, Keyshia Cole, LeAnn Rimes, Ashanti and Ciara.

Marat Safin
politics
Marat Safin is a professional tennis player from Russia. He was once ranked number 1 in the world. In 2000 and 2005, Safin won the US Open and the Australian Open. In 2002 and 2004, Safin played in the last round of the Australian Open, but lost. In 2008, Safin became the first Russian man to play in the semifinals in the Wimbledon Championships. Born to a Tatar family, he learned tennis in Spain when he was a teenager.

Jim Keltner
music
Jim Keltner is an American musician (drummer). His career began in the early 1960s, playing at recording sessions for other musicians, and even for bands, including Gary Lewis.
Keltner played on recordings by members of The Beatles, after they disbanded. He and Ringo Starr played drums as a team during George Harrison's Concert for Bangladesh in 1971, and got along well. Keltner even played drums on some of Starr's solo records, and Starr was thought of as one of the best drummers in rock and roll music.
John Lennon counted on Keltner to play drums on his solo records, when Starr was not available. In 1973, he helped Lennon's wife Yoko Ono put a band together to record and tour with her.
Keltner toured the United States with George Harrison during 1974. He told Harrison he did not want to be paid to play on the tour. Harrison wanted to give him something for his work. Keltner was tired of driving his old car, so Harrison bought him a new Mercedes-Benz, as payment.
While Keltner had played for many artists and bands, he had never been a member of a band, until Little Village formed in the late 1980s.

Graham Nash
music
Graham William Nash (born February 2, 1942, Blackpool, England) is a British-born American musician, singer and songwriter. He was a founding member of The Hollies, but left that band to form Crosby, Stills & Nash with David Crosby and Stephen Stills. He moved to California to be part of the new group, which Neil Young also joined later.
While Crosby, Stills, Nash and Young broke apart and came back together many times, Nash has almost always worked with David Crosby since the 1960s.
Nash became an American citizen in 1978. Besides music, he is also a talented photographer, and collector of photographs.

The Mail on Sunday
media
"The Mail on Sunday" is a British newspaper. Over six million people read it every week. It was first published in 1982 by Lord Northcliffe. It sells the second biggest amount of sunday newspapers in Britain after"The News of the World".. The "Daily Mail" was launched nearly a century before(1896) and is The Mail on Sunday's "sister paper".
They are both owned by Associated Newspapers, but the editorial staff are completely separate.
History.
"The Mail on Sunday" was first launched on 2 May 1982, to go with the "Daily Mail". The first story ever printed on the front page was the "RAF's bombing of Port Stanley airport in the Falklands". The Daily Mail and General Trust(DMGT)came up with some tough targets for the paper to reach. Initially DMGT wanted to sell 1.25 million copies a week. But the launch of The Mail on Sunday was not a success. After six weeks, sales were only around 700,000 copies.
Today (2008)the circulation is around 2.3 million, an increase of more than 1.5 million.
The newspaper's reputation developed thanks to Stewart Steven. Its circulation grew from around 1 million to almost 2 million during his time in charge. The editor who followed him was Jonathan Holborow and the current editor is Peter Wright.

Miguel Ángel Nadal
sports
Miguel Ángel Nadal was born on July 28, 1966 in Manacor, Majorca. He was a spanish footballer and played as a defender or a midfielder. He played for RCD Mallorca from 1986 to 1991 and for FC Barcelona from 1991 until 1999 where he was nicknamed "The Beast of Barcelona". He also played for the Spanish national football team earning 62 caps, and played in three world cups (1994, 1998, 2002). He returned to RCD Mallorca in 1999 until 2005 when he retired.
He is Rafael Nadal's uncle and his brother is "Rafa's" coach, Toni Nadal.

Roger Bresnahan
sports
Roger Philip Bresnahan (June 11, 1879 – December 4, 1944), nicknamed "The Duke of Tralee" for his Irish roots, was an American Major League Baseball player who played catcher and a player-manager.

Isaac Slade
music
Isaac Slade is an American singer-songwritter of the rock band formed in 2002 called The Fray. He was born in May of 1981. He has released several albums with the band "The Fray" including How to Save a Life (album) and "Live at the Electric Factory". He records and performs more of a piano rock and aocustic. Singles include "How to Save a Life", "Look After You", and "Cable Car".

Skull Ring
music
"Skull Ring" is a 2003 album by Iggy Pop.

Bullet in a Bible
music
"Bullet in a Bible" is a live CD, DVD and UMD release by Green Day, which was issued on November 15 2005.

Distancing effect
science
The distancing effect (from the German "Verfremdungseffekt") is a theatrical and cinematic device.

Jason White (musician)
music
Jason White (born November 11, 1973 in Little Rock, Arkansas) is a U.S. guitarist who has played in many punk rock bands.

Jason Freese
music
Jason Jeremy Freese (born in Orange County, California, on January 12, 1975) provides piano/keyboard, guitar, tenor saxophone, accordion, trombone and backing vocals for Green Day.

Gabrial McNair
music
Gabrial "Gabe" McNair (born September 8, 1973) is a multi-instrumentalist and composer.

Petra Haden
music
Petra Haden (born October 11, 1971 in New York City) is an American violinist and singer.

Boys Like Girls (album)
music
Boys Like Girls is the debut hit album released in 2006 by rock band Boys Like Girls. The album was recorded in 2005-2006. The album contains of 4 singles.
Track listing.
The album was re-released on November 13, 2007 which contains an acoustic version of "Hero/Heroine" plus live performance videos and photo galleries as part of the enhanced portion of the disc.

London Gazette
media
The "London Gazette" is one of the official records of the British government, and one of the most important in the UK. The "London Gazette" claims to be the oldest surviving English newspaper. It was first published on 7 November 1665. It is not a normal newspaper with typical news stories. The "London Gazette" is still published each weekday, except for Bank Holidays. The Gazette is being digitising and records between the years 1752–1998 are online.
History.
The "London Gazette" was first published as the "Oxford Gazette" on 7 November 1665. Charles II and the Royal Court had moved to Oxford to escape the Great Plague of London, and courtiers were unwilling to touch, let alone read, London newspapers for fear of becoming ill. When the King returned to London after the end of the plague the "Gazette" moved too. The first issue of the "London Gazette" (labelled No. 24) was published on 5 February 1666. The "Gazette" was not a newspaper in the modern sense: it was sent in manuscript by post to subscribers. It was not printed for sale to the general public.
Traditions.
In time of war, dispatches from the various conflicts are published in the "London Gazette". People referred to are said to have been mentioned in despatches. When members of the armed forces are promoted, and these promotions are published here, the person is said to have been “gazetted”.
Being "gazetted" (or "in the gazette") sometimes also meant becoming bankrupt. Notices of engagement and marriage also used to be published in the "Gazette".

And did those feet in ancient time
music
"And did those feet in ancient time" is a short poem by William Blake. It comes in the introduction to a long poem called "Milton: a Poem" (1804). Today it is best known as the hymn "Jerusalem", sung to music written by C. Hubert H. Parry in 1916, more than a century after Blake had written the poem.
What the poem is about.
There is a legend that the young Jesus went to England with his uncle, Joseph of Arimathea, to England and visited Glastonbury. The poem connects this legend to an idea in the Book of Revelation (3:12 and 21:2) describing a Second Coming in which Jesus builds a new Jerusalem. Some Christians thought that a new Jerusalem would be like Heaven, somewhere of love and peace. The poem asks if Jesus visited England and if Heaven was created in England. Blake lived in the time of the early Industrial Revolution when there was a lot of poverty and misery. Many people think the “dark Satanic mills” were the factories where many people worked in horrible conditions. This contrasts with the country with its beauty and clean air: “England’s green and pleasant Land”. The second half of Blake's poem says people should try to establish "Jerusalem" once more.
Parry composes the music.
Blake’s poem was not very well known during the 19th century, but in 1916 a collection of poems was published which included “Jerusalem”. Britain was fighting a terrible war (the First World War), and so the people needed some strong, patriotic music to give them courage. Robert Bridges, the Poet Laureate asked Parry to put it to music at a Fight for Right campaign meeting in London's Queen's Hall. He wanted Parry to write a tune that the audience would be able to sing easily. At first Parry wanted verse one to be sung by a solo female voice, but the version sung nowadays is the arrangement for orchestra made in 1922 by Sir Edward Elgar. When King George V heard it for the first time he said that he preferred "Jerusalem" to "God Save the King", the National Anthem.
England (as distinct from Britain) does not have an official anthem and so the British National Anthem "God Save the Queen" is used for national occasions, for example before English international football matches or at the Last Night of the Proms. The song is also the unofficial anthem of the British Women's Institute. It is often sung as a hymn in churches, although people in some churches think it is not a hymn. It is also sung in many schools.

Hubert Parry
music
Sir Charles Hubert Hastings Parry, 1st Baronet (born Bournemouth, 27 February 1848; died Rustington, near Worthing, Sussex, 7 October 1918) was an English composer. He was born at a time when England was not a very musical country. He started to change this, composing music which was to be a great influence other English composers such as Elgar and Vaughan Williams. Parry wrote a great deal of music, but by far the best known piece he wrote is the song "Jerusalem". Another piece which is often sung is the anthem "I was glad" written for the coronation of Edward VII.
His early life.
Parry was born into a wealthy family. He went to school in Eton and got his music degree while he was still there. He then went to Oxford to study. He learned from the English-born composer Henry Hugo Pierson in Stuttgart, and with William Sterndale Bennett and the pianist Edward Dannreuther in London. He started to compose a lot of chamber music which was first performed at Dannreuther’s house. He became famous in 1880 when Dannreuther played his piano concerto and his choral work "Prometheus Unbound" was performed at the Gloucester Festival. Other choirs started to ask him to write music for them. One of his best choral pieces was the ode "Blest Pair of Sirens" (1887). Other choral works include "Ode on Saint Cecilia's Day" (1889), the oratorios "Judith" (1888) and "Job" (1892). “Judith” includes a tune which became a well-loved hymn tune called “Repton” sung in churches to the words “Dear Lord and Father of Mankind”.
His orchestral works from this period include four symphonies, a set of Symphonic Variations in E minor, the "Overture to an Unwritten Tragedy" (1893) and the "Elegy for Brahms" (1897). He also wrote for the Greek play 'The Birds' by Aristophanes.
Mid career.
As Parry became more famous he got many invitations to important jobs. He started teaching at the Royal College of Music in 1884 and became its director in 1894, a post he held until his death. In 1900 he succeeded John Stainer as professor of music at Oxford University. In 1908 his doctor advised him to resign from his Oxford job.
Later years.
During the last decade of his life he wrote some of his best works, including the "Symphonic Fantasia '1912 (also called "Symphony No. 5"), the "Ode on the Nativity" (1912), "Jerusalem" (1916) and the "Songs of Farewell" which includes the song “My Soul, there is a Country”. These were songs about the needless suffering in the war.
His influence.
Parry had a lot of influence on English music in the 20th century. This was not just because of his compositions, but also through his teaching and his writings about music. The composers he liked best and who influenced his style were Bach and Brahms. His music is firmly tonal (always in clear major or minor keys), and Elgar and Vaughan Williams learned a lot from studying his music.
Parry was a man who always liked to help people, and so he took on a great deal of work, which did not do his health much good. When he had free time he enjoyed driving fast cars and sailing.
He was made a knight, and the first Baronet of Highnam in the Baronetage of the United Kingdom in 1902.
The house in Richmond Hill, Bournemouth where he was born is marked with a blue plaque.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music & Musicians ed Stanley Sadie (1980) ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Everything That Happens Will Happen Today
music
"Everything That Happens Will Happen Today" is the second album made by David Byrne and Brian Eno, released on August 18, 2008. They also made an album in 1981 called "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts" and Eno helped make songs with Byrne and Talking Heads. Byrne and Eno made this music in 2007 and early 2008. Byrne will tour for this album and play these songs and other music these two have written.
History.
In December 2007, David Byrne announced on the BBC Radio music show, "The Weekender", that he was working with musician/producer and former collaborator Brian Eno on a brand new album of "proper songs", describing it as a "completely different thing" from "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts", which was mostly experimental. While discussing the 2006 remix of that album at a dinner party, Eno suggested finishing some songs that he had written and intended to finish but that did not have lyrics, some of which were eight years old. Byrne visited Eno's studio to listen to the rough mixes of the demos and the two decided to collaborate to finish writing the songs, leaving Eno and Peter Chilvers to convert a variety of digital music formats into Musical Instrument Digital Interface to strip out information and make them suitable for Byrne to embellish. (Chilvers would be thanked in the liner notes as "Digitial Archeologist.") The two continued to write for several months - although Byrne confessed that he was initially "terrified" at writing lyrics for the demos - and agreed that if the project wasn't fun for both of them, they would abandon it.
Composition.
He elaborated, "In a nutshell, Brian wrote most of the music, and I composed most of the vocal melodies and lyrics, and then sang them." If Byrne's vocal harmonies were radical enough, Eno would revise the instrumentation to accompany it. Using a style similar to the Talking Heads album "Speaking in Tongues", Byrne scatted and murmured some lyrics before they were completed and Eno also contributed some vocal harmonization he credits as "inhuman piano."
Both musicians continued to work on their own projects during the composition of "Everything That Happens Will Happen Today" - including Byrne conducting the second season of "Big Love" and composing and recording "Here Lies Love" with Fatboy Slim, Eno producing Coldplay's "Viva la Vida". Chris Martin of Coldplay even wrote a song to the instrumental track for "One Fine Day", but acquiesced when he heard Byrne's song saying that he "couldn't do better than that." Once that song was finished, the two began in earnest writing the rest of the music. As the project progressed, Byrne got to working several hours a day on the project.
The two were inspired by Gospel music while making the album; both have described it as "electronic Gospel", in particular the track "Life Is Long." In addition to subtle Biblical themes in the lyrics, Eno was inspired by Gospel music, which he initially discovered through Talking Heads while working on "More Songs About Buildings and Food" by listening to "Surrender to His Will" by Reverend Maceo Woods and the Christian Tabernacle Choir. While Byrne considers the music "[un]like any contemporary gospel record that you would hear out there," it is "informed by that feeling and those kind of lyrics, which allude to hope in the face of despair." Eno also considers the album "[S]omething that combines something very human and fallible and personal, with something very electronic and mathematical sometimes." The two tried to "make that picture of the human still trying to survive in an increasingly complicated digital world... It's quite easy to make just digital music and it's quite easy to make just human music, but to try and make a combination is sort of, exciting, I think."
Eno's demos were primarily written in major chords, which Byrne considered slightly "ominous." In spite of this, Byrne's lyrics ended up being hopeful and spiritual, with themes of redemption. Byrne has speculated that the hopeful lyrics might be an antidote to being "completely pessimistic and cynical about politics and the state of the world." As he explained, "I was surprised that's what came out... The tracks are very different from what I would have done myself. I lean toward things that are more complicated." Eno also thinks the album is "[m]uch better than the songs [he] imagined."
Eno has also said the album is about "paint[ing] a picture of the human trying to survive in an increasingly digital world." Themes of humanity struggling with technology are apparent on several tracks. The lyrical content includes "a sinister inflection" but "many songs feel fairly uplifting and the overall tone is hopeful." Byrne attempted to write "simple but not corny, basic but heartfelt;" one of his inspirations in writing lyrics was the story of Valentino Achak Deng in Dave Eggers' ' and the two are thanked in the liner notes.
Production.
By March 2008, the duo had recruited multi-instrumentalist and previous Eno collaborator Leo Abrahams to play guitar, percussion instruments, and piano and Seb Rochford to play drums with Byrne in New York City. Abrahams continued to perform in his home studio and only played guitar with Byrne on one occasion. They would continue working on the tracks in Abrahams' studio through May, with all collaborations being carried on via e-mail. In April 2008, speaking at an event in New York, Byrne confirmed the release of a new album, calling it a "record of sung songs" in contrast to the experimental music from "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts" and later told the "New York Daily News" that "Brian had written a lot of music, but needed some words, which I know how to do. What's it sound like? Electronic Gospel. That's all I'm saying." Eno also explained the differences between this album and their previous one saying, "[T]his is quite different from "My Life" in that the intention of that album was to not use our voices at all, but instead to find voices and stick them on to the music. This new one is different – these are songs written and sung by David. They cover quite a range. They go from electronic folk Gospel to quite indefinable areas of music."
Throughout the spring and summer, Abrahams recorded drums at his home studio and Cherif Hashizume recorded more Cafe Music Studios, while Robert Harder at Harder Sound recorded the drums on "My Big Nurse", "Never Thought", "The Painting", and "Life Is Long". Mixing continued through June 2008 in New York by Patrick Dillett at Kampo Studios, who recorded brass and percussion and sent the audio to Greg Calbi at Sterling Sound for mastering. On July 28, 2008, details of the album became of public knowledge when Byrne posted on his blog that he and Eno had finished the new album, titled "Everything That Happens Will Happen Today", and that it would be released on August 18, 2008. The album website was launched on the same day, with an introduction and a promotional video of Byrne announcing the new album.
Release.
The album was self-released on August 18, 2008, only through the official album's website. It is available there free for streaming and for purchase as a download of DRM-free MP3s; they plan to release the album from other online digital music services in September 2008. No record label is involved on the release, and independent distributors will handle the physical product, which will be released in October 2008 as an enhanced CD and a deluxe-packaged CD with graphics and packaging done by Stefan Sagmeister, who received a Best Boxed or Special Limited Edition Package Grammy Award in 2005 for art direction on the Talking Heads' "Once in a Lifetime" box set and designed the cover to Byrne's "Feelings". This design of a domestic scene has been compared to "The Sims".
The next day, Byrne's soundtrack to the television series "Big Love" - ' - was released as a Compact Disc.
Versions.
In addition, customers are entitled to lossless FLAC versions of the album at no extra cost for all versions of the album.
Singles.
The first single off the album, "Strange Overtones", was released on August 4, 2008 as a free digital download only through the album's website. The track has been described as "a song about writing a song." It was downloaded over 40,000 times within the first three days it was available.
Critical reception.
Album reviews have been mostly positive; for instance, with eight reviews, the album has received a 77% on Metacritic. Positive reviews have labeled it "exceedingly pleasant," "maddeningly infectious," and "vibrant."
Promotion.
While Byrne and Eno have done a few interviews for the album, the two are attempting to market it via word-of-mouth and Internet hype rather than a traditional marketing scheme. Eno was convinced in part because of his own preferences for digital music from the iTunes Music Store rather than CDs as well as the success of Radiohead's "In Rainbows" from 2007. Byrne was also impressed by the band's release strategy as a means of valuing music. The duo have carefully avoided Internet leaks by not giving out promotional copies of the album to journalists, but Byrne did preview the song "One Fine Day" prior to the release by performing it with a choir of senior citizens.
Byrne has outlined the relative merits of different distribution models with this one reflecting his "self-distribution model" in which "the artist stands to receive the largest percentage of income from sales per unit — sales of anything. A larger percentage of fewer sales, most likely, but not always. Artists doing it for themselves can actually make more money than the massive pop star, even though the sales numbers may seem minuscule by comparison."
The duo enlisted a music marketing startup company - Topspin Media - to design their site, delivery options for the digital music, and promotional web widgets. The company used viral marketing techniques to collect potential customers' e-mail addresses and encourage them to post the album streaming on their blogs. The approach has been lauded as a way of undermining copyright infringement. Topspin have also created a Flickr pool encouraging users to upload screenshots of the widget posted to web sites.
Songs of David Byrne and Brian Eno Tour.
Byrne has assembled a band to tour for the album, performing music from this collaboration as well as the duo's previous "My Life in the Bush of Ghosts" and songs from the three Eno-produced Talking Heads albums - "More Songs About Buildings and Food", "Fear of Music", and "Remain in Light". (The two also collaborated for several tracks on Byrne's "The Catherine Wheel".) By performing music from all of their collaborations, Byrne hopes to "draw a line linking this new material with what we did 30 years ago, a little bit anyway." Although early reports indicated that Eno would be participating, he will not.
In planning the set lists for the tour, Byrne has assembled songs "from this new record, as well from collaborations Brian and I have done in the past which includes one song from "Bush of Ghosts" [and] three songs from the three Talking Heads records we did together."

Hakan Yakin
sports
Hakan Yakin (born 22 February 1977 in Basel, Switzerland) is a Swiss football player of Turkish origin. He is the brother of Murat Yakin and half-brother of former Swiss football professional Ertan Irizik.
Yakin's biggest success was the winning of the Swiss championship and the Swiss Cup with the FC Basel in 2002. With the Swiss national team, he took part at the European Championship in 2004 and 2008 and at the World Cup in Germany in 2006. Yakin is a specialist in free-kicks and final passes.
Yakin received the award for the "Most Valuable Player" in Swiss football in 2003 and 2008.
He currently plays for Al Gharafa (Qatar).

Martin O'Neill
sports
Martin Hugh Michael O'Neill, OBE is an Northern Irish football manager. He is currently the manager of Aston Villa F.C., and has previously managed Celtic F.C..

BBC Radio Scotland
media
BBC Radio Scotland is BBC Scotland's national English language radio network. It broadcasts a wide variety of programming including news, sport, music, the arts, comedy, drama, history and lifestyle. It replaced the Scottish opt-out part of BBC Radio 4 in November 1978.
History.
BBC Radio Scotland was founded as a full-time radio network in 1978, although the name had been used since 1974 for the Scottish opt-out parts of BBC Radio 4. The creation of a separate network was made possible when Radio 4 became a fully national network and moved from medium wave to long wave.
Opt-out stations were established in Inverness and Aberdeen in 1976, followed by Orkney and Shetland in 1977, and Selkirk and Dumfries in 1983. Previously planned opt-outs in Edinburgh, Glasgow and Dundee were never realised.
Programmes.
The station broadcasts a wide range of programming including news, debate, music and sport commentaries.
News and Current Affairs.
News and current affairs programming has always constituted the dominant part of BBC Radio Scotland's schedules, especially on weekdays. In addition to regular news bulletins (usually hourly), the station broadcasts a wide range of longer in-depth news and current affairs programmes.
Good Morning Scotland (weekdays, 0600-0900) is Scotland's longest-running radio programme and one of the most popular in the country. It provides regular news, sport, business, travel and weather bulletins along with interviews and in-depth reports. It is similar to BBC Radio 4's "Today" programme, but from a Scottish perspective. It also includes the daily religious slot "Thought for the Day", again similar to that broadcast on Radio 4's "Today" programme.
The other daily news and current affairs strands are the "Morning Extra" phone-in (0905-1000), "Scotland Live" (1200-1245), "Newsdrive" (1600-1800) and the political news programme "Scotland At Ten" (2205-2230).
Weekend programmes include "Newsweek Scotland" (Sat, 0800-0900), "Shereen" (Sun, 0900-1000) and "The Business" (Sun, 1000-1030).
Sport.
Like Radio 5 Live, BBC Radio Scotland covers most of the major sporting events in Scotland. It holds exclusive rights to the Scottish Premier League and operates its Sportsound programme on a multitude of frequencies on Saturdays when games are being played. Other sporting events that can be heard on Radio Scotland include both of Scotland's domestic football cup competitions, Scotland football internationals and European games affecting Scottish teams and the rugby union Six Nations championships. Alongside the live action sports programmes, Radio Scotland also produces popular sporting shows such as football fanzine Off the Ball, phone-in forum "Your Call with Jim Traynor" and the multi-sports programme "Sports Weekly", presented by former Scotland rugby player, John Beattie.
Local opt-outs.
Orkney and Shetland each have a half hour daily news programme — "Around Orkney" (0730-0800) and "Good Evening Shetland" (1730-1800). During the winter months, this is supplemented for both areas by an hour long programme, broadcast Monday-Friday, between 1805-1900. Local bulletins are broadcast from Selkirk, Dumfries, Aberdeen and Inverness throughout the day.
Heads of Radio, Scotland.
Controllers of BBC Radio Scotland hold the title "Head of Radio, BBC Scotland" on account of BBC Scotland's radio productions for other BBC networks.

Daily Mirror
media
The Daily Mirror is a British newspaper.

Shayne Ward
music
Shayne Ward is an English singer. He won the television programme X Factor in 2005.

Cheryl Cole
music
Cheryl Cole is an English singer and a member of the pop group Girls Aloud. She is also a judge on the TV programme The X Factor. Cheryl Cole is married to a Chelsea and England football player, Ashley Cole.

Dannii Minogue
music
Danni Minogue is an Australian pop singer, actress, presenter and model. She is a judge on the British television programme the X Factor. Her sister is Kylie Minogue.

The College Dropout
music
"The College Dropout" is the debut album by rapper and producer Kanye West, released February 10, 2004. It was nominated for Grammy Award for Album of the Year and won Best Rap Album and Best Rap Song for "Jesus Walks" in 2005. It was voted as the best album of the year by "Rolling Stone" magazine and in The Village Voice Pazz & Jop critics poll, was ranked #1 in "Spin" magazine's "40 Best Albums of the Year", and received a near-perfect 4.5 mic rating from "The Source". The album has received great acclaim from critics and mainstream fans alike, for its balance of mainstream commercial appeal and its innovative subject matter.
Info.
"The College Dropout" reached #1 on Billboard's Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums Chart, and reached #2 on the Billboard 200. In the UK, it peaked at #12 on the album chart and spent several months in the top 20. The album went triple platinum in the United States.
The first single from the album, "Through the Wire", was recorded while West's mouth was wired shut after a near-fatal car accident in October 2002. It features a Chaka Khan sample, peaked at #15 on the Billboard Hot 100 Singles chart while its successor "All Falls Down", which features R&B singer Syleena Johnson, peaked at #7. The third single, "Jesus Walks", peaked at #11 while a fourth extract, "The New Workout Plan", made a minor impression on the R&B/Hip-Hop charts (see list of US Billboard chart positions below). In the UK, "Through The Wire" peaked at #9 on the singles sales chart, "All Falls Down" peaked at #10, and "Jesus Walks" peaked at #11.

Rick Rubin
music
Frederick Jay "Rick" Rubin (born March 10 1963 in Long Island, New York) is an American record producer. He is currently in charge of Columbia Records. He helped merge the rap and heavy metal genres. MTV called him "the most important producer of the last 20 years." Rubin won five Grammy Awards in 2006 including "Producer Of The Year, Non-Classical". In 2007, Rubin was listed among "Time Magazines 100 Most Influential People in The World. Rubin is the owner of a mansion in Los Angeles called The Mansion. Many albums he produces are recorded there.

John Carew
sports
John Alieu Carew is a professional football player from the Norway. He was born on September 5, 1979 in Lørenskog and currently plays for Aston Villa in the English Premier League, wearing the number 10 shirt. Drogba is the current Norwegian Footballer of the Year. In season 2007-2008, he was the top scorer of the Aston Villa with 13 goals. Drogba played for Vålerenga at Adeccoligaen and Tippeligaen. He moved to Rosenborg in 1999 and scored 29 goals in the next season. He played also with Valencia, Roma, Beşiktaş, Olympique Lyonnais.

Ernest Lawrence
science
Ernest Orlando Lawrence was an American physicist. he was born on the 8th October, 1901 in South Dakota and he died in 1958. He helped invent the nuclear bomb during World War II and he won the Nobel prize for physics in 1939. His work was important in the science of nuclear physics. He worked out a way of measuring the mass of an electron, part of an atom.

Adam Levine
music
Adam Noah Levine (born March 18, 1979) is the lead singer of American pop-rock band Maroon 5. He is also a songwriter and guitarist.

Tjako van Schie
music
Tjako van Schie (Coevorden, 17 April 1961) is a pianist and composer from the Netherlands. At the Amsterdam Conservatory he is professor. Even in China, Van Schie has played piano but he teaches in Holland and Portugal. Van Schie was educated in Zwolle by pianist Ben Smits and a student of New York pianist Jacob Lateiner. He now lives in the Dutch province Overijssel.

Slipknot (album)
music
"Slipknot" is the first album by Nu metal band Slipknot. The album was released in the year 2000. Singles include "Wait and Bleed", "Spit It Out", and "Eyeless".

All Hope Is Gone
music
All Hope Is Gone is the 4th studio album by metal band Slipknot. The album was released in 2008 featuring the singles "Psychosocial" and "All Hope Is Gone".

Carlos Valderrama
sports
Carlos Valderrama is a former Colombian football player. He played for Colombia national team.

Dino Zoff
sports
Dino Zoff is a former Italian football player. He has playe for Italy national team.

Franco Baresi
sports
Franco Baresi (born 8 May, 1960) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Gheorghe Hagi
sports
Gheorghe Hagi is a former football player. He has played for and Romania national team.

Gordon Banks
sports
Gordon Banks is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Johnny Haynes
sports
Johnny Haynes is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Javier Saviola
sports
Javier Saviola (born 11 December, 1981) is an Argentine football player. He plays for Real Madrid and Argentina national team.

Kenny Dalglish
sports
Kenny Dalglish is a former football player. He has played for Scotland national team.

Roberto Baggio
sports
Roberto Baggio (born 18 February, 1967) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Walter Winterbottom
sports
Walter Winterbottom is a former football player. He has played for Manchester United.

Dennis Bergkamp
sports
Dennis Bergkamp (born 10 May, 1969) is a former Dutch football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Fabien Barthez
sports
Fabien Barthez is a former football player. He has played for France national team.

Osvaldo Ardiles
sports
Osvaldo Ardiles (born 3 August, 1952) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team.

Philadelphia Soul
sports
The Philadelphia Soul is a American football team in the Arena Football League. The team plays in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. They are not to be confused with the Philadelphia Eagles. They are owned by Jon Bon Jovi and Ron Jaworski, a former player for the Philadelphia Eagles. They won the Arena Bowl in 2008.

Johnny Shines
music
Johnny Shines (April 26 1915 – April 20 1992) was an American blues singer and guitarist.
Life.
He was called John Ned Shines when he was born, in Frayser, Tennessee. He spent most of his childhood in Memphis playing slide guitar for money on the streets. He listened to and was inspired by Blind Lemon Jefferson and Howlin’ Wolf, but he was taught to play the guitar by his mother. Shines moved to Hughes, Arkansas in 1932 and worked on farms for three years. "First time I came to Helena was 1932, I think it was. That's the time I met Robert the first time." When he met Robert Johnson, his greatest influence, that gave him inspiration to return to music. In 1935, Shines began playing with Johnson around the south and heading as far north as Ontario where they appeared on a local radio program. The two split up in 1937, one year before Johnson died. "He (Johnson) was alright to travel with, he was a good companion to travel with, 'cos he talked a lot and I didn't."
Shines played more in the U.S. South until 1941 when he decided to go back to Canada and then to Africa. He never made it past Chicago. In Chicago, Shines found work in the construction trade and continued to play in bars.
He made his first recording in 1946 for Columbia Records, but the music was never released. He later recorded for Chess was still the music was never released. He kept playing with blues musicians in the Chicago area for several more years. In 1952, Shines recorded for J.O.B. Records record label. The recordings were a failure and Shines sold his guitar and went back to construction.
In 1966, Vanguard Records found Shines taking photographs in a Chicago blues club and had him record tracks for the third installment of "Chicago/The Blues/Today!" The album has since then become a blues classic.
Shines played with the Chicago All Stars and Lee Jackson, Big Walter Horton and Willie Dixon. In the late 1960s and 1970s, Shines played with Robert Johnson's stepson, Robert Lockwood, Jr.. In 1980, Shines stopped played after he suffered a stroke. He managed to release one last album, "Back To The Country".
In 1989, Shines met a young, blues player called Kent Duchaine, and the two of them played together for the next several years until Shines died.
Shines died on 20 April 1992, in Tuscaloosa, Alabama. He was put into the Blues Hall of Fame later the same year.

WWE Women's Championship
sports
The World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Women's Championship is an official championship in World Wrestling Entertainment competed for by divas. The title is exclusive to the Raw brand.
History.
The WWE Women's Championship has descended from the National Wrestling Alliance World Women's Championship. The Title became inactive in 1990 when Rockin' Robin Vacated the Title after departing from the WWF. In 1993 Alundra Blayze won the Title after Winning a Tournament. However the Title became Inactive after Alundra Blayze dropped the Title into a Garbage Can live on WCW Monday Nitro this incident forced her to give up the title.
The WWE Women's Championship was then reactivated in September 1998 when Jacqueline Moore won a match against Sable.
Current champion.
The current champion is Beth Phoenix who is in her second reign, along with Santino Marella, defeated Mickie James and WWE Intercontinental Champion Kofi Kingston intergender in an tag team match to win both titles at SummerSlam in Indianapolis, Indiana on August 17, 2008

World Tag Team Championship (WWE)
sports
The World Tag Team Championship is a professional wrestling tag team championship in World Wrestling Entertainment. It is the original world tag team title of WWE. Currently, it is exclusive to the Raw brand.
History.
The championship was first introduced into the then "World Wide Wrestling Federation (WWWF)" in 1971. Following its introduction into the WWF Luke Graham and Tarzan Tyler became the first "WWWF Tag Team Champions" on June 3. In 1979 the title became known as the "World Wrestling Federation (WWF) Tag Team Championship" when the promotion renamed itself World Wrestling Federation
In 2001 at the Survivor Series Pay-per-view during the Invasion Storyline The Hardy Boyz, Matt Hardy and Jeff Hardy who were the current "World Tag Team Champions" and were competing for the "World Wrestling Federation" took on The Dudley Boys, Bubba Ray Dudley and D-Von Dudley who were the current WCW World Tag Team Champions and were competing for "The Alliance" in a title unification match inside a Steel Cage, The Dudley Boys defeated The Hardy Boyz and were named the last WCW Tag Team Champions while also becoming the "WWF Tag Team Champions"
After the WWE name change in 2002, the championship was referred to as the "World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) Tag Team Championship". After a period where the championship was to be freely defended on either WWE Monday Night Raw or WWE Thursday Night Smackdown the championship became exclusive to the Raw Brand. The current General Manager at this time Stephanie McMahon created new WWE Tag Team Titles which were to be exclusive to the Smackdown Brand.
Current Champions.
The current champions are John Morrison and The Miz, who are in their first reign as a team. They defeated CM Punk and Kofi Kingston at a House show on December 13, 2008.

Arthur Mutambara
politics
Arthur Guseni Oliver Mutambara (born May 25, 1966) is a Zimbabwean politician. He became the President of a faction of the Movement for Democratic Change (MDC) in February 2006. He has worked as the Managing Director and CEO of Africa Technology and Business Institute since September 2003.

Kill 'Em All
music
"Kill 'Em All" is thrash metal band Metallica's first album. It was released on July 29, 1983.

Good Morning (Kanye West song)
music
"Good Morning" is a single on Kanye West's 3rd studio album "Graduation". The song was released in late August 2007 on iTunes. "Good Morning" is the 1st track on the album.

All the Greatest Hits
music
All the Greatest Hits is an album from the band McFly. They released it on November 5, 2007 and it features all of McFly's UK singles. The album also includes 3 new songs: "The Heart Never Lies", "The Way You Make Me Feel" and "Don't Wake Me Up".

The Judas Kiss
music
The Judas Kiss is the fourth single off the album by rock band Metallica off their ninth studio album Death Magnetic.

Death Magnetic
music
"Death Magnetic" is the ninth hit studio album by thrash metal band Metallica. The album was released September 12, 2008 with the hits "The Day That Never Comes", "Cyanide", "My Apocalypse", "The Unforgiven III", and "The Judas Kiss". "St. Anger" was the previous rock album released in 2003 of April with the singles "Frantic", "St. Anger", and "The Unnamed Feeling".

Walt Walsh
sports
Walter William Walsh (April 30, 1897 to January 15, 1966) was a Major League Baseball player. Walsh only played two games, never getting an at-bat for the Philadelphia Phillies in 1920. He was used as a pinch runner in the two games he played. Walsh was born in Newark, New Jersey and died in Avon-by-the-Sea, New Jersey

Whitey Wistert
sports
Francis Michael "Whitey" Wistert (born February 20, 1912 in, died April 23, 1985 in) was an American football and baseball player. He played college football for the University of Michigan Wolverines. He was added into the College Football Hall of Fame after he was elected to it in 1967. He and his two brothers are three of the seven players who have had their uniform numbers retired by Michigan Wolverines football. While at college, Wistert helped Michigan win the Big Ten Conference football championship in 1931, 1932, and 1933. He was also Big Ten Most Valuable Player in college baseball. He later played for the Cincinnati Reds of Major League Baseball.
College athletics.
Wistert graduated from Chicago's Schurz High School in 1929. He attended the University of Michigan where he was an athlete in both football and baseball in 1931, 1932, and 1933.
The Wistert brothers of Michigan.
Wistert played for the Michigan Wolverines before his two brothers, Al Wistert and Alvin Wistert, did. All three Wistert brothers wore the number 11 for the Wolverines football team, and all three were members of the College Football All-America team, which is the best players through all of the United States. When interviewed by the "Detroit News" in 2004, brother Alvin Wistert said, "And if I'm not mistaken I think this is unprecedented in the annals of college football: that three brothers all would go to the same school, all played football. All played tackle, all wore the same number 11, all made All-American. Two of us played on four national championship teams. They all made it into the College Football Hall of Fame."
The Wistert brothers grew up on the northwest side of Chicago and were the sons of a Lithuanian family. Their father was a Spanish-American War veteran, who later died while working for the Chicago Police Department. Brother Alvin Wistert said that their father, "was born Casmir Vistertus and he Anglicized it when he came to America to Wistert."
The story of the Wistert brothers at Michigan began when Whitey's Carl Schurz High School school-mate John Kowalik was invited to visit the University of Michigan. At the time, Whitey Wistert "was working in a factory building "Majestic radios"." Kowalik took Whitey with him on his visit Ann Arbor, Michigan, and Alvin Wistert later said, "that's how it started: the Wisterts of Michigan."
Football.
As a football player, Wistert played for National Championship teams that never lost a game in 1932 and 1933 and was a chosen All-American in 1933. The 1934 University of Michigan yearbook, the "Michiganensian", had this to say by Grantland Rice: "Wistert was unanimously selected as the best tackle in the Middle-West this year. He was an important part of Michigan's defensive line play. He was a very good tackler and it was nearly impossible to fool him on trick plays. He was keen, quick, and accurate in finding out how a play would happen." Wistert and Chuck Bernard were the leaders of the 1933 offensive line when the team went 7-0-1 with a tie to the University of Minnesota Golden Gophers.
One of Wistert's teammates on the 1932 and 1933 Michigan football teams was Gerald Ford who later became the U.S. President. In an interview in the February 1974 copy of "Michigan Alumnus", Wistert said about Ford: "He was a real good competitor—a real bulldog type. Even during a losing year, he was voted team Most Valuable Player by his teammates, because they believed he was someone who could stay and fight even when they lose." In 1936, he was a member Michigan football coaching staff of Coach Harry Kipke.
Baseball.
Wistert earned varsity letters in baseball three years. He was chosen as the Most Valuable Player in the Big Ten Conference in 1934. The 1934 "Michiganensian" yearbook wrote that the final game of the baseball season was a 4–0 shutout by Wistert against the University of Chicago Maroon. It wrote, "Wistert, for the Wolves, allowed only five well-scattered hits during the game. Although Whitey Wistert walked four men, he more than off-set this by striking out nine of the Maroons to face him." Wistert also allowed, as the pitcher, Ohio State four hits in a game.
Professional baseball.
Wistert, still being a minor league baseball player, played for a short while in Major League Baseball, playing in three games for the Cincinnati Reds between September 11, 1934 and September 25, 1934. In two times he pitched, Wistert let only one run in eight innings, for a career earned run average of 1.13. Though, in the three times he batted, he went did not hit the ball, so he struck out twice. Although he only played for a short while in Major League Baseball, Wistert played five years of professional baseball. Fellow 1933 Michigan Wolverines football All-American, Ted Petoskey also debuted for the Reds in September 1934.
Honors.
Wistert became part of the College Football Hall of Fame in 1967, one year before his brother Albert did so. In 1981, he was named to the University of Michigan Hall of Honor in the fourth class of Hall of Fame joiners with his brothers. Only five other Michigan football players earned this honor before him.
Non-athletic.
Wistert became a New York lawyer after he retired from sports. He went on to become a vice president of an industrial relations in. He was United States Navy lieutenant in World War II.

Al Wistert
sports
Albert Alexander "Ox" Wistert (born December 28, 1920) is a former All-Pro American football player.

Alvin Wistert
sports
Alvin "Moose" Wistert (June 26 1916 – October 3 2005) was an American Football player.

The Detroit News
media
"The Detroit News" is one of the two major newspapers in the U.S. city of Detroit, Michigan.

John Kowalik
sports
Janusz “John” Kowalik (born 26 March, 1944 in Nowy Sącz) was a Polish football striker.

Gianfranco Zola
sports
Gianfranco Zola OBE (born 5 July, 1966) is a retired Italian footballer, who is now the manager of West Ham United F.C.
As a footballer he played for S.S.C. Napoli, Parma A.C. and Chelsea F.C. He was renowned for his technique, skill and dribbling. In total, he played in 619 league games and scored 222 goals in his career. He became manager of West Ham on 11 September 2008, after resigning (stopping) as Italy Under-21's manager.

ReLoad
music
ReLoad is an album by Metallica. It was released on November 18, 1997.

Chuck Bernard
sports
Joseph Charles "Chuck" Bernard (in) was a professional American football center who played for the Detroit Lions in 1934 and was a two-time All-American at the University of Michigan.

Dixie Dean
sports
William 'Dixie' Dean, simply known as Dixie Dean was an English football player. He played for Everton FC during the 1920s and 30s. He has scored more goals than any other player in English football history. Worldwide, only Pele has scored more competitive goals than Dean.

Wes Welker
sports
Wesley Carter Welker (born May 1, 1981 in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma) is an American football wide receiver for the New England Patriots of the National Football League.

Ted Petoskey
sports
Frederick Lee "Ted" Petoskey (born January 5, 1911 in, died November 30, 1996 in) was a three-sport athlete at the University of Michigan.

Californication (album)
music
"Californication" is the seventh studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on June 8, 1999 on record label Warner Bros. Records. The producer was Rick Rubin. On "Californication", John Frusciante returned to Red Hot Chili Peppers. He had appeared on "Mother's Milk" and "Blood Sugar Sex Magik", but Dave Navarro was the guitarist on the band's last album, "One Hot Minute". The band's sound was very different because of Frusciante's return.

By the Way
music
"By the Way" is the eighth studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on July 9, 2002 by record label Warner Bros. Records. It sold over 282,000 copies in the first week, and reached the number two position on the "Billboard" 200 chart. The singles from the album were "By the Way", "The Zephyr Song", "Can't Stop", "Dosed" and "Universally Speaking". The lyrics on the album were about different things to past Red Hot Chili Peppers albums. However, some critics thought it was similar to the previous album, "Californication", but more a bit more serious.

Stadium Arcadium
music
"Stadium Arcadium" is the ninth studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on May 9, 2006 by record label Warner Bros. Records. It sold 442,000 copies in the U.S. in the first week. It also appeared in the number one position on the "Billboard" 200 chart. According to Anthony Kiedis, "Stadium Arcadium" was going to be three different albums that the band would release; one every six months. However, they changed their mind and made one big double album. Critics said in reviews of "Stadium Arcadium" that the music on it was not very original, and was similar to the band's older work. However, they said it was still very good music. "Stadium Arcadium" won a Grammy Award, and so did "Dani California", the first single.

Joy Giovanni
sports
Joy Giovanni (born January 20, 1978) is an American actress, glamour model, and former WWE Diva. She is best known for her time with World Wrestling Entertainment, working on its "SmackDown!" brand.

One Hot Minute
music
"One Hot Minute" is the sixth studio album by American alternative rock band Red Hot Chili Peppers. It was released on September 12, 1995 by record label Warner Bros. Records. John Frusciante had left the band after their previous album, "Blood Sugar Sex Magik", so Dave Navarro joined as the new guitarist.
Red Hot Chili Peppers' music was very different because of Navarro. "One Hot Minute" is less about sex and love than the band's previous work, but is instead about themes like drugs and depression. It also had some heavy metal guitar riffs. Anthony Kiedis had become addicted to cocaine and heroin in 1994, so some of the lyrics he wrote were about the effects of drugs.
"One Hot Minute" did not sell many copies, even though it reached number four on the "Billboard" 200 chart. "Blood Sugar Sex Magik" sold twice as many copies as "One Hot Minute". In 1998, Navarro was asked to leave the band. Red Hot Chili Peppers told the media it was because they and Navarro liked to make different kinds of music. Stephen Thomas Erlewine of Allmusic said that "One Hot Minute" is as musically ambitious as "Blood Sugar Sex Magik", but is even more unfocused, which means it provides the fewest thrills of any of the group's albums."

Good Life (Kanye West song)
music
Good Life is a rap single by Kanye West and featuring T-Pain. The song was released off the album "Graduation". The video was released September of 2007.

Alfred Wegener
science
Alfred Lothar Wegener (November 1, 1880 – November 2 or 3, 1930) was a German scientist and meteorologist. He was born in Berlin and in 1904 he earned his Ph.D in Astronomy at the University of Berlin. In 1914 he was put into the German army but released from battle after he was severely wounded. He is most notable for his theory of continental drift, proposed in 1912, which hypothesized that the continents were slowly drifting around the Earth. However, at the time he was unable to demonstrate a mechanism for this movement; this combined with not enough solid evidence meant that his hypothesis was not accepted until the 1950s, when numerous discoveries provided evidence of continental drift.

The Michigan Daily
media
"The Michigan Daily" is the student newspaper of the University of Michigan given out everyday.

Kenny Black
sports
Kenneth George Black (born 29 November 1963) is a former professional footballer and current manager of Scottish club Airdrie United F.C..

David Irons
sports
David John Irons (born July 18 1961 in Glasgow) is a Scottish former professional footballer. His playing career spanned 26 years as a central defender or midfielder. He is currently manager of Scottish League club Greenock Morton.

Roberto Landi
sports
Roberto Landi (born January 2, 1956 in Forlì) is an Italian football manager, currently in charge of Scottish First Division side Livingston.

Gordon Chisholm
sports
Gordon Chisholm (born April 8 1960 in Glasgow, Scotland) is a former professional footballer and is currently the manager of Scottish First Division club Queen of the South from Dumfries.

Derek Adams
sports
Derek Adams (born 25 June 1975) is a Scottish footballer who is currently player-manager at Ross County. He is the son of youth supremo George Adams, who is the Director of Football at the Dingwall club.

Derek McInnes
sports
Derek McInness is a former professional footballer and current manager of Scottish club St. Johnstone.

Chase This Light
music
"Chase This Light" is an album by Alternative rock band Jimmy Eat World. It was released on October 23 2007.
Several singles came from this album including "Big Casino", "Always Be" and "Let It Happen".

Enzo Scifo
sports
Enzo Scifo is a former football player. He has played for Belgium national team.

Peter Bonetti
sports
Peter Bonetti is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Alan Shearer
sports
Alan Shearer is a former English football player. He has played for England national team.

Ruud Gullit
sports
Ruud Gullit is a former football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Zbigniew Boniek
sports
Zbigniew Boniek is a former football player. He has played for Poland national team.

Good Girl Gone Bad
music
"Good Girl Gone Bad" is the third studio album by Rihanna. The album has 2 versions. One version called "Good Girl Gone Bad:Reloaded" was released June 2008. It features newer singles including "Take a Bow", "Disturbia", and "If I Never See Your Face Again" which is a remix single from rock-pop band "Maroon 5". The singles from the album include (from the original version of the album) "Umbrella", "Breakin' Dishes", "Shut Up and Drive", "Don't Stop the Music", and "Hate That I Love You".
The Good Girl Gone Bad Tour.
Rihanna did a worldwide concert tour on September 15, three months after the release of the album. The tour had three parts with sixty-one shows. It ended on April 5, 2008. The first part of the tour began in Canada. It included eleven shows across the country with Akon. The tour later went through United States and Europe without Akon.
Supporting acts for the tour were Akon, Ciara and David Jordan.
"Good Girl Gone Bad: Reloaded".
The album was released a second time as a two disc special version named "Good Girl Gone Bad: Reloaded" in June 2008. The set includes twelve original tracks, three new tracks—the lead U.S. number-one single "Take a Bow", a remix of "If I Never See Your Face Again" with Maroon 5, and the U.S. number-one single "Disturbia"—and a DVD containing behind the scenes footage and four live performances from her tours. It came with new album art, which features a green toned background instead of the original's grey toned background. In the UK, the background is a white-gray toned background instead of the green. The new version of the album was released in most countries on June 17, but the CD version was released on June 2 in the UK (with the DVD version following on June 16) and on June 21 in Australia. "Disturbia" was released online in May 2008. The song "Cry" was released on international versions of the album and is a UK and Australian bonus track on the re-release. The re-release made the album soar from 124 to 7 on the Billboard 200, selling 63,000 copies and having a 930% sales increases. iTunes has now removed the standard version of "Good Girl Gone Bad" and replaced it with the new reloaded version. In France the album soared from 141 to forty-three having the greatest gainer of the week. In the UK it soared from number fifty-nine to number twelve having the "Greatest Gainer" certification, before rising to number five later on in its chart run. By September 14 2008 the album has still been charting strongly in the UK, dipping in and out of the top 10 for many weeks. Good Girl Gone Bad: Reloaded reached a new peak of #3 on the UK Albums Chart.

Music of the Sun
music
Music of the Sun is the first album by pop and R&B singer Rihanna. The album was released August of 2005 with the single "Pon de Replay".

Golda Meir
politics
Golda Meir "(pronounced, Gol-da My-ear)", (, born Golda Mabovitch, May 3 1898 - December 8 1978, known as Golda Myerson from 1917-1956) was the fourth prime minister of the State of Israel.
Golda Meir became Prime Minister of Israel on March 17 1969 after serving as Minister of Labour and Foreign Minister. She was said to be the "Iron Lady" "(a strong minded woman)" of Israel's politics years before that name became said about the British prime minister, Margaret Thatcher. Meir was Israel's first and so far only female prime minister. She was the world's third female prime minister. The two biggest events of her time as prime minister were the murder of eleven Israeli athletes at the 1972 Summer Olympic Games and the 1973 Yom Pippur War. After questions about her handling of the war, Meir resigned from her job even though she had been found to be not to blame for problems with the war.
Before she became prime minister.
Her name at birth was Golda Mabovitch () in Kiev in the former Russian Empire (today Ukraine), to Blume Naidich and Moshe Mabovitch, a carpenter. The family moved to Milwaukee, Wisconsin, USA. Her father found a job as a carpenter, and her mother ran a grocery store. At the age of eight, she was already put in charge of watching the store when her mother went to the market for supplies. At age 14, Golda went to North Division High School and worked part-time. Her mother wanted her to leave school and marry, but she did not. She ran away from home and bought a train ticket to Denver, Colorado, and went to live with her married sister, Sheyna Korngold. The Korngolds held evening meetings at their home where Meir learned about the Jew's desire for a country of their own, literature, women's rights, trade unions and more. In Denver, she also met Morris Meyerson, a sign painter, whom she later married at the age of 19.
During time as prime minister.
The two biggest things to happen during her time as prime minister were; the murder of eleven Israeli athletes at the 1972 Summer Olympic Games by the terrorist group Black September, and the twenty day warcalled the Yom Kippur War between Israel and the Arab states led by Egypt and Syria in October 1973.
End of time in office.
The Yom Kippur War was from October 6 to October 26, 1973 and was between a group of Arab countries led by Syria and Egypt against Israel. Israel was surprised by the attack and after the Yom Kippur War, the government was asked questions about Israel's not being ready for the war. A group of people who were asked to look into the war cleared her of direct blame, and her party won the elections in December 1973, but she left on April 11 1974, because of what she felt the people of Israel wanted. Yitzhak Rabin became prime minister after her on June 3 1974.
In 1975, Meir was awarded the Israel Prize for her services to the State of Israel.
Death.
On December 8 1978, Golda Meir died of cancer in Jerusalem at the age of 80. She was buried on Mount Herzl in Jerusalem on December 12, 1978.

Pete Wentz
music
Peter Lewis Kingston Wentz III (born June 5, 1979) is an American musician and songwriter. He is most famous for his work with the Chicago-based band Fall Out Boy. In recent years, he has also become an entrepreneur and the host of the MTV program, FNMTV. He is married to Ashlee Simpson.

Lil Wayne
music
Dwayne Michael Carter, Jr. (born September 27, 1982), better known by his stage name Lil Wayne, is an American rapper. Currently part of the newly reunited rap group Hot Boys, he joined the Cash Money Records collective as a teenager. He worked with B.G. on the album "True Story" and eventually recorded for the label. "Get It How U Live", released in 1997, was Lil Wayne's first album with Hot Boys, and "Tha Block is Hot", his solo debut, came out 1999. "Block" debuted in the top ten on the American Billboard 200 chart and Lil Wayne was nominated for "Best New Artist" from magazine the same year. Following this success, Wayne soon featured on other rappers' singles, including "Bling Bling" by B.G. and "#1 Stunna" by the Big Tymers in 2000.
Info.
After his hit debut album "Tha Block Is Hot" and two albums released with little promotion, Lil Wayne reached higher popularity with 2004's "Tha Carter" and its two subsequent albums "Tha Carter II" (2005) and "Tha Carter III" (2008). During that period, he appeared on several mixtapes and singles of other artists.
"Tha Carter III" (2008).
Initially planned to be released in 2007, "Tha Carter IIIs largest delay came after the majority of the tracks were leaked and distributed on mixtapes, such as "The Drought Is Over Pt. 2" and "The Drought Is Over Pt. 4". Lil Wayne initially decided to use the leaked tracks, plus four new tracks, to make a separate album, titled '. "The Leak" was to be released December 18, 2007, with the actual album being delayed until March 18, 2008, The release of "The Leak" in this format never came to fruition, but an official EP titled "The Leak" and containing five tracks was released digitally on December 25, 2007.

Tha Carter III
music
"The Carter III" is the 6th official studio album by rapper "Lil Wayne". The album contains singles like Lollipop, Got Money, A Milli, "Mrs. Officer", and "Mr. Carter". in the first two months after it's release, it became 2x platinum.

Corey Taylor
music
Corey Taylor (born December 1973) also known by his number #8, is an American singer. He is the lead singer of the bands Slipknot and "Stone Sour".

All Hope Is Gone (song)
music
All Hope Is Gone is the 2nd single off the album by Slipknot called "All Hope Is Gone".

Michigan Wolverines
sports
The Michigan Wolverines are 24 varsity sports teams at the University of Michigan.

Lev Yashin
sports
Lev Yashin (born 22 October, 1929) is a former football player. He has played for Dynamo Moscow and USSR national team.

Ronaldo
sports
Ronaldo (born 18 September, 1976) is a Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Emilio Butragueño
sports
Emilio Butragueño is a former football player. He has played for Spain national team.

Francisco Gento
sports
Francisco Gento is a former football player. He has played for Spain national team.

Telmo Zarra
sports
Telmo Zarra is a former football player. He has played for Spain national team.

Andoni Goikoetxea Olaskoaga
sports
Andoni Goikoetxea Olaskoaga is a former Spanish football player. He has played for Spain national team.

Hugo Sánchez
sports
Hugo Sánchez (born 11 July, 1958) is a former Mexican football player. He has played for Mexico national team.

Paolo Maldini
sports
Paolo Maldini (born 26 June 1968) is an Italian football player. He plays for Milan.

Alessandro Del Piero
sports
Alessandro Del Piero (born 9 November, 1974) is a Italian football player. He plays for Juventus and Italy national team.

Critically Ashamed
music
Critically Ashamed is the sophomore effort by Fm static, a canadian pop punk band, like I've said before LOL.
Below are a few songs I'd like to mention
Waste of time.
Waste of time was a main single from this album. It's about how God has pushed trevor mcnevan through the shadows of his life (trevor explained this on one of his myspace blogs for fm static)
Tonight.
Tonight is the acoustic (well, sort of) ballad that you find on pop punk albums. It was written about trevors brother who died at an early age. He remembers the times they had and is thinking about what would be happening, had his brother still been alive.
Hope the rock show goes good.
The above title is a short song, an intro to the album, where trevors nephew is wishing him look for his concert.
The next big thing.
The next big thing is this fun-sounding song with a huge warning. To convince people you are good, you almost have to tell yourself your the best. New artists buy into that, and its unfortunate.

Linus Pauling
science
Linus Carl Pauling (February 28, 1901 – August 19, 1994) was an American scientist, peace activist, author and educator. He was one of the most important chemists in history and ranks in the most important scientists in history.
Pauling was one the first scientists to work in the fields of quantum chemistry, molecular biology and orthomolecular medicine. He is one of a small group of people to have been awarded more than one Nobel Prize and is one of only two people to receive them in different fields (the other person was Marie Curie) and the only person in that group to have been awarded each of his prizes without having to share it with another winner.
Life and education.
Pauling was born and grew-up in Oregon, USA. He went to Oregon Agricultural College and graduated in 1922 with a degree in chemical engineering. Pauling then went to the California Institute of Technology (Caltech), where he received his Ph. D in physical chemistry and mathematical physics in 1925. Two years later, he became an assistant professor at auniversity called Caltech.
Work and awards.
In 1932, Pauling came up with the idea of electronegativity and made a scale that would help predict the chemical bonding. Pauling kept doing this work while he also did work on the structure of the atomic nucleus.
In 1954, Pauling was given the Nobel Prize in Chemistry for work that he did on the structure of DNA. This work led to scientists in the UK to come up with the double-helix of DNA.
During the Second World War, Pauling worked on military research and development. But, after the war had ended he became worried about the making and future use of atomic weapons and with the destruction forced on the world by war. Ava Helen Pauling, Linus's wife, was a pacifist and in time he came to share her beliefs. Pauling then began to talk about his worries with the effects of nuclear fallout and in 1962, was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize for his work against above ground nuclear testing.
Work as author and teacher.
Pauling was also an author and a teacher. His first book, "The Nature of the Chemical Bond" (1939), is still used today. his introductory textbook, "General Chemistry" (1949). Later in life, he became an advocate for greatly increased consumption of vitamin C and other nutrients. He generalized his ideas to define orthomolecular medicine, which is still regarded as unorthodox by conventional medicine. He popularized his concepts, analyses, research and insights in several successful but controversial books, such as "How to Live Longer and Feel Better" in 1986.
Death.
Pauling died of prostate cancer on August 19, 1994, at 7:20 PM at home in Big Sur, California. He was 93 years old. A grave marker for him is in Oswego Pioneer Cemetery in Lake Oswego, Oregon.
Honors and awards.
Pauling received numerous awards and honors during his career. Following are awards and honors he has received.

Chris Waddle
sports
Chris Waddle is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Ian Ure
sports
Ian Ure is a former football player. He has played for Scotland national team.

Chris Cornell
music
Chris Cornell (born Christopher John Boyle on July 20, 1964) is best known as the vocalist in the grunge band Soundgarden but is also known as the vocalist in Audioslave and Temple of the Dog.

Kim Thayil
music
Kim Thayil (born September 4, 1960 in Seattle, Washington) best known as the lead guitarist in Soundgarden.

Matt Cameron
music
Matthew David Cameron (born November 28, 1962 in San Diego, California) is an American drummer best known as the drummer in Soundgarden and Pearl Jam.

Ben Shepherd
music
Ben Shepherd (born Hunter Benedict Shepherd, on September 20, 1968) is an American musician, best known as the bass player in the grunge band Soundgarden from 1990 until the band's 1997 break-up.

A-Sides
music
"A-Sides" is a best-of album by Soundgarden with songs spanning the band's thirteen year career. It was released on November 4, 1997 through A&M Records.

Down on the Upside
music
"Down on the Upside" is the fifth and final studio album by Soundgarden.

Louder Than Love
music
"Louder Than Love" is the second full-length album by the American grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on September 5, 1989 through A&M Records. After touring in support of its first full-length studio album, "Ultramega OK", released in 1988, the band signed with A&M and began work on its first album for a major label. The songs on the album featured a heavy rock sound with some songs featuring unusual or unorthodox time signatures.
Because of some of the song lyrics the band faced various retail and distribution problems upon the album's release, including the addition of a Parental Advisory sticker on the album packaging. "Louder Than Love" would become the band's first album to chart on the "Billboard" 200. The band supported the album with tours of North America and Europe. It was the last Soundgarden album to feature the band's original bassist, Hiro Yamamoto.

Ultramega OK
music
"Ultramega OK" is the debut album by the American grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on October 31, 1988 through SST Records. Following the release of the EPs "Screaming Life", released in 1987, and "Fopp", released in 1988, for the Sub Pop record label, the band signed with the independent record label SST and went to work on its first full-length studio album.
The resulting album contained elements of psychedelic rock, classic rock, and hardcore punk. The band supported the album with a tour of the United States as well as its first overseas tour. In 1990, the album earned a Grammy Award nomination for Best Metal Performance.

James Milner
sports
James Milner is a football player. He plays for Aston Villa.

Peter Osgood
sports
Peter Osgood is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Trevor Francis
sports
Trevor Francis is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Fopp (EP)
music
"Fopp" is the second EP by the grunge band Soundgarden, released in August 1988 on Sub Pop Records. In 1990 it was combined with the band's first EP "Screaming Life" (1987) and released as "Fopp".

Screaming Life
music
"Screaming Life" is the debut EP by the Seattle grunge band Soundgarden, released in October 1987 on Sub Pop Records. "Screaming Life" was later combined with the band's next EP, "Fopp" (1988) and released as "Fopp" in 1990.
Recording.
The EP was recorded in 1987 in Seattle's Reciprocal Studios with producer Jack Endino, who also produced albums for Nirvana and Mudhoney.
Music and lyrics.
Drummer Matt Cameron described the sound on the EP as "pretty raw." "Hunted Down", Soundgarden's first single, is representative of the early "grunge" sound — with its dirty guitar, dissonant atmosphere and lyrics concerning entrapment and escape. "Nothing to Say" features drop D tuning, which would become a signature of Soundgarden's sound on later albums. Guitarist Kim Thayil said he learned about the tuning from the Melvins's Buzz Osborne. The original version of "Tears to Forget" appeared on the 1985 "Deep Six" compilation album, which featured some of the first recordings by the earliest Seattle grunge bands, including Soundgarden. That version was recorded with drummer Scott Sundquist, but the version on "Screaming Life" was recorded with Cameron.
Some time prior to recording, producer Jack Endino found old rolls of quarter-inch tape at a garage sale, and some contained recordings of a Christian preacher giving sermons in the early 1950s. Soundgarden vocalist Chris Cornell had the idea to have the preacher's voice on "Hand of God". The recording was synched with the eight-track machine, copied to an empty track and by coincidence (or because, as Endino says, "God smiled upon us") the tape rolls matched perfectly with the song. Cornell also added his own sarcastic preacher-style vocals, with the lines "let it be known today that if you've got two hands you're supposed to pray!". However, according to Endino, the labels on the rolls of tape were near-illegible and thus the name of the preacher remains unknown.
Release and reception.
Cornell said that the EP was met with rave reviews and that "everybody loved it." "Hunted Down" was Soundgarden's first single and also the first song on Sub Pop's "hold music" tape. According to Thayil, "you would call them up, and when they put you on hold you heard 'Hunted Down'". It was the only single released from the EP. "Nothing to Say" was Soundgarden's first B-side, released on the "Hunted Down" single. The song also appeared on the KCMU compilation tape "Bands That Will Make Money", which was distributed to record companies. Upon hearing the song, record labels began contacting the band, which eventually led to the band signing with A&M Records.
Imagery and design.
The cover of "Screaming Life" was taken by grunge photographer Charles Peterson, and features Cornell singing and Thayil playing guitar in the background. The album cover was an attempt by Sub Pop to capitalize on Cornell's image. The first 500 copies of the EP were pressed on orange vinyl; after that, they were released on standard black vinyl.
The title of the EP inspired the title of a book of photography by Peterson, named "Screaming Life: A Chronicle of the Seattle Music Scene". Published in 1995, it is composed mainly of live photos taken by Peterson from the mid 1980s though the mid 1990s. Many of Peterson's photographs were used as album artwork for grunge bands. The book is accompanied by a CD, with 9 songs selected by Peterson from bands of the era – Soundgarden's "Entering" is one of these songs.

Loudest Love
music
"Loudest Love" is an EP by the grunge band Soundgarden. It was released in October 1990 through A&M Records.
Overview.
The EP was first released in Japan, and later released in the United States. The track listing is the same as that for the "Loud Love" single, but with the addition of "Hands All Over", "Heretic" and "Come Together".

Screaming Life/Fopp
music
"Screaming Life/Fopp" is a compilation album by the grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on May 11, 1990 through Sub Pop Records.
Overview.
The album combines the band's first two EPs: "Screaming Life" (1987) and "Fopp" (1988). It was released in 1990 (see 1990 in music) by Sub Pop. There are two cover songs on the album; "Swallow My Pride" is a Green River cover and "Fopp" is an Ohio Players cover.
Track listing.
"Recorded for Screaming Life:"
"Recorded for Fopp:"

Louder Than Live
music
"Louder Than Live" is a home video released by the Seattle grunge band Soundgarden featuring songs performed live at the Whisky a Go Go in Los Angeles, California on December 7, 1989 and December 10, 1989. It was released on May 22, 1990.
Overview.
It features five live tracks filmed during the Louder Than Love tour. The live tracks are "Get on the Snake", "Gun", "I Awake", "Big Dumb Sex", and a medley of Spinal Tap's "Big Bottom" and Cheech & Chong's "Earache My Eye", with footage from both concerts mixed together. It also features footage of the band performing two songs in the studio. The studio clips are "Loud Love" and "Hands All Over". It is on this video that frontman Chris Cornell is seen wearing his infamous silver duct-tape shorts. The bassist for these performances was Jason Everman. "Louder Than Live" was released on VHS only, with no official DVD version available.
In addition to the home video, A&M released a promo 12" (on blue vinyl, July 1990) and CD (May 1990) with the same title, "Louder Than Live". The vinyl includes the 5 live tracks from the video in addition to "Beyond the Wheel". The center label features a close-up picture of guitarist Kim Thayil's face. The CD came wrapped in brown paper, duct-taped closed with a yellow and black sticker that reads "Soundgarden: "Louder Than Live". In addition to the 6 other live tracks, it includes "Hunted Down". This album has been bootlegged on black vinyl; genuine copies can be distinguished by the A&M logo.

Motorvision
music
"Motorvision" is a home video released by the Seattle grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on November 17, 1992.
Overview.
It features eight songs performed live at the Paramount Theatre in Seattle, Washington on March 5, 1992 and March 6, 1992 during the "Badmotorfinger" tour. "Motorvision" was released on VHS only, with no official DVD version available.
The video features candid footage of the band and people associated with it, including Sub Pop co-founders Bruce Pavitt and Jonathan Poneman. Before the first song begins, the band is introduced on stage by a clown, J. P. Patches.

Songs from the Superunknown
music
"Songs from the Superunknown" is an EP by the grunge band Soundgarden. It was released on November 21, 1995 through A&M Records. It was released on the same day as the CD-ROM "Alive in the Superunknown".
Overview.
The EP is the audio-only counterpart to "Alive in the Superunknown". "Jerry Garcia's Finger" is featured exclusively on "Songs from the Superunknown".
The CD-ROM "Alive in the Superunknown" contains the first four tracks from "Songs from the Superunknown" plus a multimedia portion featuring photos of the band, a video game, four music videos ("My Wave", "Fell on Black Days", "Black Hole Sun", and "The Day I Tried to Live"), and a live video of "Kickstand", among other things.

Jason Everman
music
Jason Everman (born August 16, 1967 in Kodiak, Alaska) is an American guitarist who played with Nirvana and Soundgarden.
Nirvana.
Everman joined Nirvana in February 1989 as a second guitarist. He is listed as being second guitarist on Nirvana's "Bleach", but did not actually play on any of the tracks. Nirvana founder Kurt Cobain said the credit was a token of thanks to Everman for paying a fee of US $606.17 to record the album. The cash was never repaid. Everman toured with Nirvana in summer of 1989 in support of "Bleach". During his time with Nirvana, he can sometimes be seen using Fender guitars, generally the Fender Telecaster.
A two-song Nirvana session featuring Everman on guitar is available, albeit in separate releases. A Kiss cover called "Do You Love Me?" was released on a tribute album and "Dive" was released on 2004's "With the Lights Out". Both tracks were recorded at Evergreen State College's 24-track studio in June 1989.
Soundgarden.
Everman left Nirvana in July 1989 following a stressful tour and joined Soundgarden the following year as Hiro Yamamoto's temporary successor on bass. In April 1990, he played on the band's cover of The Beatles' "Come Together", which appeared on an EP called "Loudest Love". Everman appeared in Soundgarden's "Louder Than Live" home video. Later in 1990, Everman left the band and Soundgarden found Yamamoto's ultimate successor, bassist Ben Shepherd.
The "Come Together" cover remains the only recorded Soundgarden material to feature Everman.
Mind Funk.
Everman's subsequent projects included a stint on guitar in Mind Funk. In September 1994, he left Mind Funk to join the Army 2nd Ranger Battalion and the Special Forces, serving tours in Afghanistan and Iraq.

Hiro Yamamoto
music
(born April 13, 1961;) is a bassist who was a founding member of grunge band Soundgarden, along with Kim Thayil and Chris Cornell in 1984. He left the band in 1989 and one year later he started the independent rock band Truly together with Screaming Trees drummer Mark Pickerel and Robert Roth from The Storybook Krooks.

Chuck Schuldiner
music
Charles Michael "Chuck" Schuldiner was an American singer, songwriter and guitarist. He was a key member or the Death metal band, Death. The band were a major influence on other death metal bands. He is often called " 'the Father of Death metal' " He died of pneumonia in 2001, after a long battle with brain cancer.

Thomas Friedman
media
Thomas Lauren Friedman (born July 20, 1953) is an American journalist.
Friedman is known for supporting a compromise resolution to the Israeli-Palestinian conflict, modernization of the Arab world, environmentalism and globalization. Although an early supporter of the invasion of Iraq, he later became an outspoken critic of the war and the Bush administration.

Mark Bosnich
sports
Mark Bosnich is a football player. He plays for Central Coast Mariners.

Dario Gradi
sports
Dario Gradi is a former football manager.

Rio Ferdinand
sports
Rio Ferdinand (born 7 November, 1978) is a English football player. He plays for Manchester United and England national team.

Jack Charlton
sports
Jack Charlton is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Mick McCarthy
sports
Mick McCarthy is a former football player. He has played for Republic of Ireland national team.

Ali Daei
sports
Ali Daei is a former football player. He has played for Iran national team.

Carsten Ramelow
sports
Carsten Ramelow is a former football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Charles Curtis
politics
Charles Curtis (January 25, 1860 – February 8, 1936) was a Representative and a Senator from Kansas as well as the thirty-first Vice President of the United States.

Hubert Humphrey
politics
Hubert Horatio Humphrey, Jr. (May 27, 1911 – January 13, 1978) was the thirty-eighth Vice President of the United States, serving under President Lyndon B. Johnson. Humphrey twice served as a United States Senator from Minnesota, and served as Democratic Majority Whip. He was a founder of the Minnesota Democratic-Farmer-Labor Party and Americans for Democratic Action. He also served as mayor of Minneapolis, Minnesota, 1945–1949. In 1968, Humphrey was the nominee of the Democratic Party in the United States presidential election but narrowly lost to the Republican nominee, Richard Nixon.

Charles G. Dawes
music
Charles Gates Dawes (August 27, 1865 – April 23, 1951) was an American banker and politician who was the thirtieth Vice President of the United States. For his work on the Dawes Plan for World War I reparations he was a co-recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize. He served in the First World War, was U.S. Comptroller of the Currency and the first director of the Bureau of the Budget, and in later life the U.S. ambassador to the United Kingdom.

Jens Jeremies
sports
Jens Jeremies is a former football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Ferenc Puskás
sports
Ferenc Puskás (April 2, 1927 - November 17, 2006) is a former Hungarian football player. He has played for Hungary national team and Spain national team.

Michel Platini
sports
Michel Platini (born 21 June, 1955) is a former French football player. He has played for France national team.

Hidetoshi Nakata
sports
Hidetoshi Nakata (born 22 January, 1977) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Chris Brown (album)
music
"Chris Brown" is the first album by Chris Brown. The album was released November of 2005. He had made several songs on the album sound anywhere from rap and hip hop to dance and R&B. He released five popular singles off the album. His first was a pop and hip hop song called "Run It!" featuring Juelz Santana.

John Layfield
sports
John Charles Layfield (born November 29, 1966) known by his current ring name John "Bradshaw" Layfield or JBL, is an American professional wrestler. He is currently working for World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE), previously known as World Wrestling Federation (WWF), wrestling on its "Raw" brand. He is the longest reigning World Champion in SmackDown history, the brand which he recently left his position as a color commentator to restart his career as an in-ring competitor.

Mary J. Blige
music
Mary Jane Blige (or simply Mary J Blige, born January 11, 1971) is an R&B, rap and pop singer. She released 8 studio albums, 30 singles, and 5 other albums.
Music Career.
In 1988, Blige recorded an impromptu cover of Anita Baker's "Caught Up in the Rapture" at a recording booth in a local mall. Her mother's boyfriend at the time later played the cassette for Jeff Redd, a recording artist and A&R runner for Uptown Records. Redd then sent it to the president and CEO of the label, Andre Harrell. Harrell met with Blige and, in 1989, she was signed to the label; becoming the company's youngest and first female artist.
"Whats the 411?".
Production for Blige's debut album began in 1991, with Sean "Puffy" Combs (at the time a fledgling A&R executive at Uptown) largely overseeing the project. Also enlisted were some of the top R&B and hip hop producers of the time, among them Tony Dofat, Mark Morales and Cory Rooney, Dave "Jam" Hall, and DeVante Swing.

Arsène Wenger
sports
Arsène Wenger (born 22 October, 1949) is a French football manager. He manages for Arsenal.

John Arne Riise
sports
John Arne Riise is a football player. He plays for Roma and Norway national team.

Patrick Vieira
sports
Patrick Vieira is a football player. He plays for Internazionale Milano and France national team.

David Seaman
sports
David Seaman is a former football player. has played for England national team.

Luther Blissett
sports
Luther Blissett is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Jimmy Greaves
sports
Jimmy Greaves is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Eugenio Corini
sports
Eugenio Corini is a football player. He plays for Torino.

Vasile Miriuţă
sports
Vasile Miriuţă is a former football player. He has played for Hungary national team.

Jerzy Dudek
sports
Jerzy Dudek is a football player. He plays for Real Madrid.

Henrik Larsson
sports
Henrik Larsson (born 20 September, 1971) is a Swedish football player. He plays for Helsingborgs IF and Sweden national team.

Ian Wright
sports
Ian Wright is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Clyde Best
sports
Clyde Best is a former football player. He has played for Bermuda national team.

Edgar Davids
sports
Edgar Davids (born 13 March, 1973) is a football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Marc-Vivien Foé
sports
Marc-Vivien Foé (born 1 May, 1975) is a former football player. He has played for Cameroon national team.

Demi Lovato
music
Demetria Devonne "Demi" Lovato (b. August 20, 1992) is an American singer and actress. In 2008, she stared in a Disney ChannelOriginal Movie called "Camp Rock". She released one studio album in September of 2008. She sang songs in the soundtrack for "Camp Rock", for example, "We Rock", "This Is Me", and "Who Will I Be".

Rivaldo
sports
Rivaldo (born 19 April, 1972) is a Brazilian football player. He plays for Bunyodkor.

Peter Reid
sports
Peter Reid is a football manager. He manages for Thailand national team.

Mehdi Mahdavikia
sports
Mehdi Mahdavikia (born 24 July, 1977) is a football player. He plays for Eintracht Frankfurt and Iran national team.

Ali Karimi
sports
Ali Karimi is a football player. He plays for Persepolis and Iran national team.

Ray Harford
sports
Ray Harford is a former football player.

José Luis Chilavert
sports
José Luis Chilavert (born 27 July, 1965) is a former football player. He has played for Paraguay national team.

Erik Nevland
sports
Erik Nevland is a football player. He plays for Fulham and Norway national team.

Bill Shankly
sports
Bill Shankly is a former football player. He has played for Scotland national team.

Billy McNeill
politics
Billy McNeill is a former football player. He has played for Celtic and Scotland national team.

Adrian Mutu
sports
Adrian Mutu is a Romanian football player. He plays for Fiorentina and Romania national team.

David Moyes
sports
David Moyes is a former Scottish football player. He is now the manager of Everton.

Jim McLean
sports
James (Jim) Yuille McLean (born 1937) is a former Scottish football player and manager. He is best known for being the manager of Dundee United F.C. for 22 years between 1971 and 1993. While he was at Dundee United, the team won the 1982/83 Scottish Football League Championship and made it to many cup finals including the 1987 UEFA Cup Final against IFK Gothenburg.

Morrissey
music
Stephen Patrick Morrissey (born May 22, 1959), known by the stage name of Morrissey from his surname is a English musician, singer and songwriter. He helped form and sang lead for the English band The Smiths from 1982 to 1987. After the band's break up he went on to become a successful solo artist. Morrissey produced many Top 10 Hits.
Biography.
Born at Park Hospital in Davyhulme Morrissey grew up as a Catholic as his parents were Irish Catholic immigrants. His parents had emigrated to England just before Morrissey's birth and, along with his only sibling (elder sister Jackie) they created a new life for themselves within the Manchester district Hulme.
The Smiths.
The Smiths were formed in early 1982 by Steven Morrissey and John Maher, a guitarist and songwriter, Maher later changed his surname to Marr to avoid confusion with the Buzzcocks drummer. During the five years of The Smiths Marr and Morrissey produced four studio albums, one live album aswell as nineteen singles, along with the two other band members, bass player Andy Rourke and drummer Mike Joyce.
Each of their four albums The Smiths, Meat Is Murder, The Queen Is Dead and Strangeways, Here We Come charted in the top two of the UK Albums Chart. Their live album Rank also peaked at number two in the album charts. To date seven compilation albums have been produced with an eigth due for release in November of this year.
Solo Career.
Following the split of The Smiths Morrissey has went on to produce and release nine studio albums under five different music labels, his forthcoming album Years of Refusal is set for a February 2nd release in 2009.

Fragile Future
music
"Fragile Future" is the third album by Hawthorne Heights. It was released in 2008. It was their first album without Casey Calvert, because he died in late 2007.
Hawthorne Heights didn't have a lot of success on the singles, but it was seen as a new start for the band.
While much of the album was inspired by things that had been happening to the band, it never says the words "Casey" or "Victory Records"
The album art includes a picture of Casey Calvert near a lamppost.

Pakistan Peoples Party Parliamentarians
politics
The Pakistan People's Party Parliamentarians (PPPP) is a party created by Makhdoom Amin Fahim. The party is an electoral extension of the Pakistan Peoples Party.

Bangladesh Nationalist Party
politics
Bangladesh Nationalist Party (Bengali: বাংলাদেশ জাতীয়তাবাদী দল Bangladesh Jatiotabadi Dôl, BNP) is the immediate past ruling political party of Bangladesh.

Franz von Papen
politics
Franz Joseph Hermann Michael Maria von Papen zu Köningen (29 October 1879 - 2 May 1969) was a German nobleman, Catholic monarchist politician, General Staff officer, and diplomat, who served as Chancellor of Germany in 1932 and as Vice-Chancellor in 1933-1934.

Zack de la Rocha
music
Zack de la Rocha (born January 12, 1970) is the lead singer of American rock band Rage Against the Machine.
Early Life.
Zack was born in Long Beach, California.

Charlotte Moore Sitterly
science
Charlotte Emma Moore Sitterly (September 24, 1898 – March 3, 1990) was an American astronomer.
Charlotte Moore was born in Ercildoun, Pennsylvania. She graduated from Swarthmore College in 1920 and went on to Princeton to assist Henry Norris Russell. During this time, she worked at the Princeton University Observatory and the Mt. Wilson Observatory. She worked much on solar spectroscopy, studying the spectral lines of the Sun and identifying the chemical elements in the Sun. She earned a Ph.D. in astronomy in 1931 from the University of California, Berkeley on a Lick Fellowship. She then returned to Princeton.
During her second stay at Princeton, she met and married Bancroft W. Sitterly, who became a physics professor. She joined the then National Bureau of Standards (NBS) in 1945. Her tables of atomic spectra and energy levels, published by NBS, have remained essential references in spectroscopy for decades.
Later in her life, it became possible to launch instruments on rockets and she extended her work to the ultraviolet spectral lines.

A Little Bit Longer
music
A Little Bit Longer is the third hit studio album by American teen pop-rock band "The Jonas Brothers". The album was released August 12th of 2008 in the United States. The title of the album, "A Little Bit Longer," comes from their song of the same name, which Nick Jonas wrote about his dealings with having Type One Diabetes. The album artwork was released by Team Jonas, the Jonas Brothers' official fan club, to fan club members via an e-mail newsletter on June 20, 2008. Like their last album, this one also features that includes more than 30 pages of bonus features with exclusive video performance, 60 printable photos, complete album lyrics, downloadable graphics, and hidden links. In addition, the packaging of the album is made from 100% recycled materials.

CBBC
media
CBBC (Children's BBC) is the name of the BBC's television programmes that are for children. It is also the name of a television channel that often shows these programmes. The programmes are meant for children that are between 6 and 12 years old. The "Children's BBC" name began on 9 September 1985. Before then there were BBC children's programmes, but they were not branded under one name. The name "CBBC" was used informally since 1990, and became the official name in 1997.
CBBC programmes are shown on BBC One, BBC Two and the CBBC Channel. CBBC has a sister brand, CBeebies, for children under 6. The CBBC brands for BBC One and BBC Two are "CBBC One" and "CBBC Two".
CBBC is run by the BBC Children's department, who make the programmes for children up to the age of 16. Most of their offices are in the East Tower of the BBC Television Centre, with some programmes coming from Scotland and Bristol. CBBC produces a whole range of programme types, including drama, news, entertainment and educational programmes.
Anne Gilchrist is Creative Director of CBBC, and Michael Carrington is Creative Director of CBeebies.
Presentation.
Monday 3 September 2007 saw the fifth CBBC relaunch. As part of the relaunch, new logos, idents, interactive services, programmes and presenters were introduced. The previous computer generated backgrounds used from December 2006 were replaced by a real set.
Ed Petrie became the chief continuity presenter, accompanied by a puppet sidekick "Oucho T. Cactus" (operated and voiced by Warrick Brownlow-Pike). They regularly present live, weekday afternoon links on the CBBC channel with Petrie voicing pre-recorded, out-of-vision announcements during for weekdays on BBC One. On 29 August 2008, they went on extended leave to record a new series for CBBC - they are due to return to continuity duties on 1 December 2008. During this period, relief presenter Holly Walsh is presenting weekday afternoon links for the channel.
Anne Foy presented pre-recorded in-vision links at the weekend alongside her dog, Elliot, until her departure in March 2008. Foy was replaced by two new presenters, Ben Hanson and Ciaran Joyce, who previously appeared in CBBC show "The Story of Tracy Beaker". The duo regularly present in-vision links at the weekend and stand in for Ed and Oucho.
CBBC extra.
"CBBC extra" is a free interactive television service from CBBC. It is found on the BBCi pages. It is accessible from the CBBC Channel by pressing the red button and then selecting "CBBC extra". It can also be accessed from any other BBCi page by pressing 570.
The service is different on different digital platforms, for example Sky viewers can access the video loop. But it is only available on Freeview when BBCi is not showing other interactive services, like sports events.
CBBC extra offers games, the UK Top 40 music, jokes sent in by viewers, "Nev's Horoscopes", and a weekly competition. The current presenter of CBBC extra is Ed Petrie.
CBBC Quiz.
This new feature allows the viewers to play a quiz. There are 5 levels, each containing 5 questions. Viewers can also send in their questions which could be shown on the service. The "CBBC Quiz" can be from the CBBC extra page, by selecting the option called "CBBC Quiz". This option is also available on the main interactive menu on the "CBBC Channel", by pressing the red button.
Website.
The CBBC website has a wide range of activities, such as games, puzzles, message boards and frequently updated news feeds. The website is found.
My CBBC.
"My CBBC" is a feature to the new CBBC website. It allows users to create their own room which they can decorate. It is also possible to create your own avatar. The new feature is often promoted on the "CBBC Channel".
Adventure Rock.
"Adventure Rock" (renamed from CBBC World) is a virtual online world that launched on 1 March 2008. Press releases have stated "it would allow digitally literate children the access to characters and resources they had come to expect. Users would be able to build an online presence, known as an avatar, then create and share content."
The main points of the system are safety and responsibility online, with no chatrooms or the financial aspects available in other online worlds such as "Second Life".
Controller of Children's BBC Richard Deverell said: "Adventure Rock" is a good example of the way we need to go. The thing that interests me is that children are at the vanguard. And that is where we are taking Children's BBC."

Take This to Your Grave
music
"Take This to Your Grave" is the second studio album by rock band Fall Out Boy. The album was released 2003. Credits are Patrick Stump, Pete Wentz, Joe Troham, and Andy Hurley.

Yulia MacLean
music
Yulia (full name Yulia MacLean) is a Russian-born New Zealand crossover singer. Her first Solo Album 'Into The West' went platinum in its first week of sales in New Zealand, achieving four times platinum sales. She won 2 NZ Music Awards; 'Best female solo artist' and '42Below Best selling album in New Zealand'. She has supported Amici and Russell Watson with 2 sold-out tours in Tokyo. Yulia's albums "Into the West" and "Montage" had three top 40 radio hits in New Zealand, "Into the West", "Angel" & "We're All Alone". Yulia is known for her amazing contralto singing voice.
She was also the lead singer in a pop duo with her husband Glyn MacLean, called the MacLeaNZ.
Life.
Yulia moved to New Zealand to live, from Russia in 2002.
Within two years Yulia learned to speak English, passed all of her senior high school exams at Cashmere High School in Christchurch and signed a recording deal with Sony Music New Zealand. She was taught by Cashmere High School's music department head Gary Thin and teacher Noeleen Penter.
Her first ever concert was in Christchurch with Ivan Rebroff where she received a standing ovation for her version of "Ave Maria".
She was first discovered on regional television as a last minute subject for a ten minute segment on "Good Living With Kerry Pierson" on Christchurch's local television station CTV.
Gray Bartlett, co-director and owner of the Auckland-based promotion company Pacific Entertainment Limited, signed her to a 6 year worldwide sole agency deal but was ended early by Yulia and she was managed temporarily by Michael Glading, ex head of Sony NZ.
In 2007 Yulia met Glyn MacLean, 17 years her senior, director and owner of Oikos Music Group and signed to a management and music publishing deal. On Feb 10th 2008, Yulia married Glyn.

Amy Lee
music
Amy Lynn Hartzler (née Lee; born December 13, 1981) best known as Amy Lee, is an American singer and songwriter, and the lead vocalist and co-founder of the rock band Evanescence. She is also a classically-trained pianist and she often composes the bands' music.
Lee was discovered by Ben Moody, who is the other co-founder of Evanescence, in 1994 when she performed a song in summer camp. She sometimes designs her own clothes and likes Victorian styled clothing. Lee is the spokesperson of the Epilepsy Foundation and started a campaign called "Out of the Shadows".
Lee was inspired by many artists from classical artists such as Mozart to modern artists like Björk, Tori Amos, Danny Elfman and Plumb. She is the only original band member who is still in the band. In 2008, she won the Icon Award as songwriter of the year.
Life.
Amy Lee was born in Riverside, California to John Lee and Sara Cargill. Her family moved to many places and finally setteled in Little Rock, Arkansas. She has two sisters, Carrie and Lori, and one brother, Robby. She had a third sister who died 1987. Lee wrote the songs "Hello" and "Like You" for her late sister. She is mostly of Scottish and English heritage.
Lee went to Pulaski Acadamy and graduated in 2000. She then went to Middle Tennessee State University for a short while. Amy was the president of her highschool choir. She wrote the song "Listen to the Rain" and sang it with the choir. She also took piano lessons for nine years. The first song Lee had written was when she was eleven years old, when she wanted to become a classical composer.
Lee is married to Josh Hartzler, a therapist and long time friend of Amy's. They got married on May 6, 2007.
Evanescence.
Lee met Ben Moody in a youth summer camp in 1994. She was singing a song while playing on the piano when Moody met her. The pair first started playing acoustic songs in bookstores and coffeehouses, then they made two EPs. In 2000, they made the Origin EP, which was longer than the first two.
In 2003, Evanescence released their first album, Fallen, which became very successful. The band won two Grammy Awards for "Fallen". Some songs from "Origin" were also included in the album.
Ben Moody left the band on October 22, 2003, because of "creative differences". He was replaced by Terry Balsamo, who helped write most of the songs for Evanescecne's second album, The Open Door.
Image.
Many fans admire Lee becuase she doesn't use sex appeal in her music. The song "Everybody's Fool" and its video were made to mock artists who use sex appeal.
Style and fashion.
In public events, Lee often wears Victorian styled clothes. Some of her clothes are inspired by Gothic fashion. She sometimes designs her outfits, like the red dress in the music video for "Going Under". She chose Japanese designer H. Naoto to make her clothes after she designed them. Lee used to have a piercing on her left eyebrow, which can be clearly seen on the cover of "Fallen".
Lee mentioned in an interview with AOL that her image is different from when she is on stage and explained that what she wears on stage is to complete the image.
Voice.
Lee is known for her usage of choir like notes, especially in "The Open Door". Lee is classified as a mezzo-soprano, with a vocal range of three octaves. Her highest recorded note on Evanescence albums is a C#6 in the song "Weight of the World" from The Open Door.
Other Projects.
Lee worked with other artists, including David Hodgens, who used to be a member of Evanescence. The singer performed a duet with Shaun Morgan of Seether on the track "Broken (Seether song)". She also performed "Freak on a Leash" live with Korn. She also had a guest appearance in the music video for Johnny Cash's "God's Gonna Cut You Down", and chose to appear laying flowers on a grave.
Lee covered songs like Korn's "Thoughtless". She also recorded a cover of "Sally's Song" for "Nightmare Revisited".
She is the current American Chairperson for the "Out of the Shadows" foundation.

Leonard Cohen
music
Leonard Cohen is a Canadian singer, musician, poet and writer.

Jeff Buckley
music
Jeff Buckley was an American singer and guitarist. He died in 1997.

Julen Guerrero
sports
Julen Guerrero is a former football player. He has played for Athletic Bilbao and Spain national team.

Emile Heskey
sports
Emile Heskey is a football player. He plays for Wigan Athletic and England national team.

Jan Koller
sports
Jan Koller is a football player. He plays for Krylia Sovetov Samara and Czech Republic national team.

Rüştü Reçber
sports
Rüştü Reçber is a football player. He plays for Beşiktaş and Turkey national team.

Bryan Robson
sports
Bryan Robson is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Robbie Fowler
sports
Robbie Fowler is a football player. He plays for Blackburn Rovers.

Hernán Crespo
sports
Hernán Crespo (born 5 July, 1975) is an Argentine football player. He plays for Internazionale Milano.

Kevin Keegan
sports
Kevin Keegan (born 14 February, 1951) is a former English football player. He has played for England national team.

Luís Figo
sports
Luís Figo (born 4 November, 1972) is a football player. He plays for Internazionale Milano.

Rudi Völler
sports
Rudi Völler is a former football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Freddy Adu
sports
Freddy Adu (born 2 June, 1989) is a football player from Ghana. He plays for Monaco and United States national team.

Eamon Dunphy
sports
Eamon Dunphy is a former football player. He has played for Republic of Ireland national team.

Murat Yakin
sports
Murat Yakin is a former football player. He has played for Switzerland national team.

Paul Sturrock
sports
Paul Sturrock is a former football player. He has played for Dundee United and Scotland national team.

Avi Ran
sports
Avi Ran is a former football player. He has played for Maccabi Haifa and Israel national team.

Mark Viduka
sports
Mark Viduka is a football player. He plays for Newcastle United.

Baichung Bhutia
sports
Baichung Bhutia is a football player. He plays for Mohun Bagan and India national team.

Matthew Le Tissier
sports
Matthew Le Tissier is a former football player. He has played for Southampton and England national team.

Amarok (software)
sports
Amarok is a music player for the KDE desktop environment. Unlike most KDE programs, it has it's own schedule for releasing versions, so a new version of Amarok might not be released when a newer version of KDE comes out. Amarok's first stable version was released in 2003. They are now on version 1.4.10. A new version, known as Amarok 2.0, is being developed for KDE 4.0.
Features.
Amarok cannot play videos. However, it can play most sound and music files in a large range of formats, like MP3, Ogg Vorbis, and WMA. Amarok also includes an internet radio tuner, and supports submitting a listener's music preferences to Last.fm. It can sync music to most MP3 players, like the iPod or ZEN.

Friedrich Hund
science
Friedrich Hund (4 February 1896 - 31 March 1997) was a German physicist from Karlsruhe known for his work on atoms and molecules. He worked at the Universities of Rostock, Leipzig, Jena, Frankfurt am Main, Göttingen and was a member of the International Academy of Quantum Molecular Science.
He had published more than 250 papers and essays and made contributions to quantum theory about the structure of the atom and the structure of molecular spectra. The Hund's rule was named after him and in 1926 he discovered the later so-called tunnel effect.
His life.
Hund worked with well known physicists as Schrödinger, Dirac, Heisenberg, Max Born, and Walter Bothe. At that time, he was Born's assistant, working with quantum mechanics.
After his studies of mathematics, physics, and geography in Marburg and Göttingen, he worked as a private lecturer in theoretical physics at Göttingen in 1925, professor at Rostock in 1927, Leipzig in 1929, Jena in 1946, Frankfurt/Main in 1951 and from 1957 again in Göttingen. Additionally he stayed in Copenhagen (1926) with Niels Bohr and lectured on the atom at Harvard University, Cambridge, Massachusetts in 1928.
On the occasion of his 100th birthday, the book: Friedrich Hund: Geschichte der physikalischen Begriffe [history of physics terms] (Heidelberg, Berlin, Oxford), Spektrum, Akademie Verlag 1996, ISBN 3-8274-0083-X was published. A review was also written by Werner Kutzelnigg.
Friedrich Hund became an honorary citizen of Jena - Saale, and a street in Jena was named after him. Since June, 2004, a part of the new building of the Physics Department was given the Friedrich-Hund-Platz 1 address. The same name was chosen for the Institute for Theoretical Physics at the University of Göttingen.
Hunds cases.
The Hund's cases, which are particular regimes in molecular angular momentum coupling, and the Hund's rules, which govern electron configurations, are important in spectroscopy and quantum chemistry. In chemistry, the first of Hund's rules is especially important and is often referred to as simply Hund's Rule.

Toba catastrophe theory
science
The Toba catastrophe theory is a scientific theory that the volcano Toba (on Sumatra) erupted. The eruption happened between 75.000 and 70.000 years ago. According to the theory, the average temperature dropped between 3-3.5 degrees Kelvin. This caused most of the humans living at that time to die. According to the theory, only 10.000 (perhaps only 1.000) pairs of humans survived the disaster. Perhaps it led to the other hominids becoming extinct. After this, the Earth was colonised again, starting from Africa.

Gerard K. O'Neill
science
Gerard Kitchen “Gerry” O’Neill (February 6, 1927–April 27, 1992) was an American scientist. He taught physics at Princeton University. He invented a machine for holding subatomic particles. He also invented the mass driver, a machine used to launch things into outer space. He wrote about building cities in space.
His space station design is known as the "O’Neill cylinder". He started the Space Studies Institute (SSI). SSI is a group focused on learning about space manufacturing and colonization.
In 1954 O'Neill finished school at Cornell University. Then he began his work on particle physics at Princeton.
Two years later he wrote about a device to hold very fast moving subatomic particles. In 1965 he used his device to shoot two beams of particles at each other for the first time. This experiment was done at Stanford University. Scientists used the experiment to discover the size of the electron.
While he was teaching, O’Neill became excited about humans living in outer space. He wrote about the O’Neill cylinder in “The Colonization of Space”. This was his first paper about people living in space. He met with other scientists at Princeton in 1975. There he talked with them about manufacturing in outer space. O’Neill built his first mass driver with help from scientist Henry Kolm in 1976. Mass drivers were part of his plan to mine the Moon and asteroids. His book "The High Frontier" won an award and got people excited about outer space. He died in 1992 after a seven year fight against leukemia.

Dunfermline Athletic F.C.
sports
Dunfermline Athletic Football Club are a Scottish football team based in Dunfermline, Fife, commonly known as just Dunfermline. They play at East End Park and are nicknamed "The Pars".
They are currently Coach (sport)managed by Jim McIntyre who was given the job on a permanent basis on Thursday 3 January 2008. He took over from Stephen Kenny in December of 2007 originally as caretaker boss. The 2008-09 season will be the club's 2nd season in the second tier of Scottish football, after being relegated from the Scottish Premier League in 2007.

Folie à Deux (album)
music
"Folie à Deux" is Fall Out Boy's next album. It is a follow-up to "Infinity on High". The album is set to be released on November 4, 2008. Its title comes from the French for "a madness shared by two".

Smiley Smile
music
"Smiley Smile" is the tenth studio album by The Beach Boys. It was released in 1967.

Michael Laudrup
sports
Michael Laudrup is a former football player. He has played for Denmark national team.

Clive Charles
sports
Clive Charles is a former English football player.

Paul Gascoigne
sports
Paul Gascoigne is a former English football player. He has played for England national team.

Marcel Desailly
sports
Marcel Desailly is a former football player. He has played for France national team.

Vinnie Jones
sports
Vinnie Jones is a former English football player. He has played for Wales national team. Jones is also an actor. He played Juggernaut in Marvel's '.

Peter Schmeichel
sports
Peter Schmeichel is a former Danish football player. He has played for Denmark national team.

Peter Shilton
sports
Peter Shilton is a former English football player. He has played for England national team.

Marcus Hahnemann
sports
Marcus Hahnemann is an American soccer player. He plays for Reading and United States national team.

Kit Symons
sports
Kit Symons is a former English football player. He has played for Wales national team.

Tim Howard
sports
Tim Howard is am American soccer player. He plays for Everton and United States national team.

Marcelo Salas
sports
Marcelo Salas is a football player. He plays for Universidad Chile.

Duncan Edwards
sports
Duncan Edwards is a former football player. He has played for Manchester United and England national team.

Roger Milla
sports
Roger Milla is a former football player. He has played for Cameroon national team.

Toni Turek
sports
Toni Turek is a former football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Janis Joplin
music
Janis Lyn Joplin (January 19, 1943 – October 4, 1970) was an American singer, songwriter, and music arranger, from Port Arthur, Texas. She rose to prominence in the late 1960s as the lead singer of Big Brother and the Holding Company, and later as a solo artist. In 2004, "Rolling Stone" magazine ranked Joplin #46 on its list of the 100 Greatest Artists of All Time. She died in Los Angeles, California of a drug overdose at the age of 27.

Gary Glitter
music
Gary Glitter (born Paul Francis Gadd) is a British Glam rock singer. He was born on May 8 1944. He has become infamous after being convicted of child sexual abuse.

Rick Astley discography
music
This article presents the discography of the pop singer Rick Astley.

Arthur Ransome
media
Arthur Mitchell Ransome (born 18 January 1884 in Leeds - died 3 June 1967) was an English writer and journalist. He is best known for writing the "Swallows and Amazons series" of children's books.
Ransome was born in Leeds. His father was Professor of History there. His father's death in 1897 affected Ransome for a long time. He always tried to get past his belief that his father had did not think his abilities were very good.
Ransome got his formal education first in Windermere. He then studied at the Rugby School (where he lived in Lewis Carroll's study room). He did not fully like his time there because of his poor vision, lack of skills at sports, and limited achievement. He attended Yorkshire College, his father's college studying chemistry. After a year there, he stopped going to the college. He went to London to become a writer. He took low-paying jobs as an office assistant in a publishing company. He also worked as editor of a magazine, "Temple Bar Magazine", that was not making much money. During this time, he was writing and became a member of the literaryscene of London.
"Swallows and Amazons".
Ransom's most well known book series, "Swallows and Amazons", tells the stories of school-holiday adventures of children. The stories are mostly set in the Lake District and the Norfolk Broads. Many of the books involve sailing. Other common things are fishing and camping. The books are so popular that they give a basis of a tourist industry around Windermere and Coniston Water — the two lakes that Ransome used as the basis for his fictional North Country lake.

Malcolm Young
music
Malcolm Mitchell Young (born January 6 1953) is an Australian guitarist for the band, DC.

Paul Breitner
sports
Paul Breitner is a former German football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Bobby Convey
sports
Bobby Convey is an American soccer player. He plays for Reading and United States national team.

Bruce Arena
sports
Bruce Arena is a former American soccer player. He has played for United States national team.

Jimmy Glass
sports
Jimmy Glass is a former English football player.

Miklós Fehér
sports
Miklós Fehér is a former Hungarian football player. He has played for Hungary national team.

Åge Hareide
sports
Åge Hareide is a former Norwegian football player. He has played for Norway national team.

Moussa Hojeij
sports
Moussa Hojeij is a football player. He plays for Al-Mabarrah and Lebanon national team.

Paul Mariner
sports
Paul Mariner is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Peter Kropotkin
science
Prince Peter (Pyotr) Alexeyevich Kropotkin () (9 December 1842 - 8 February 1921) was one of Russia's most important anarchists and one of the first advocates of anarchist communism. Because of his title of prince and his fame as an anarchist in the late 19th and early 20th centuries, he was known by some as "the Anarchist Prince".

Tay Zonday
music
Adam Nyerere Bahner (born July 6, 1982), often called by the pseudonym Tay Zonday, is an American keyboardist. His song "Chocolate Rain", and its YouTube video, became a popular Internet meme in July 2007. He has won Youtube Awards and Webby Awards, and was nominated for a People's Choice Award.

Vheissu
music
"Vheissu" is an album by experimental band Thrice. It was released in 2005. The album introduced a new sound to the bands post-hardcore roots. It also used many new elements from music boxes to chain gangs and has much softer, dreamy songs such as "Atlantic"
The album artwork was created by author Dave Eggers and artist Brian McMullen. It includes pictures of various things and quotes lyrics from different Thrice songs found on the album.

The Artist in the Ambulance
music
"The Artist in the Ambulance" is the third album by the post-hardcore band Thrice. It was released on July 22 2003.
Like previous Thrice albums, some of the money made from selling "The Artist in the Ambulance" was given to a charity. The album's booklet features individual cards that have lyrics from Thrice songs, notes, photographs and comments from the band members and the producer.
"Stare at the Sun" is a main single from the album.

René Adler
sports
René Adler (born January 15, 1985 in Leipzig) is a German footballer. He plays on the position of a goalkeeper for Bayer 04 Leverkusen, also known as Bayer Leverkusen. Leverkusen is a city in Germany. The club Bayer Leverkusen plays in the Bundesliga, the first football league in Germany.
On October 11, 2008, Adler made his first match in the German national team against Russia (2-1).

Colin Barnett
politics
Colin James Barnett (born 15 July 1950) is the 29th Premier of Western Australia. He became Premier on 23 September 2008. He is from the Liberal Party.

Nathan Rees
politics
Nathan Rees (born 1968) is the 41st Premier of New South Wales. He became Premier on 5 September 2008. He is from the Labor Party.

Anna Bligh
politics
Anna Maria Bligh (born 14 July 1960) is the 37th Premier of Queensland. She became Premier on 13 September 2007. She is from the Labor Party. She is the first female to be Premier of Queensland.
Early Life.
Anna was born at Warwick, Queensland. She is a descendant of Captain William Bligh. She grew up on the Gold Coastin south east Queensland. She was educated at several Catholic primary schools. Her secondary schooling was at Miami State High School. She completed the last 6 months of her schooling at Nowra State High School. She studied for an Arts degree from the University of Queensland which she finished in 1980. Anna Bligh worked for many community organisations and the Queensland Public Service. She worked in the area of employment, training and industrial relations policy. She was elected to the Queensland Parliament on 15 July 1995.
Parliament.
She was made the Minister for Families, Youth and Community Care and Disability Services in the Beattie Labor Government in June 1998. Ann was Queensland's first female Education Minister. She later became minister for Finance, State Development, Trade and Innovation. In 1995 she was made Deputy Premier of Queensland, and also was the Treasurer and Minister of Infrastructure with a budget of $33 billion dollars.

Mike Rann
media
Michael David Rann (born 5 January 1953) is the 44th Premier of South Australia. He became Premier on 6 March 2002. He is from the Labor Party.

David Bartlett
politics
David John Bartlett (born 19 January 1968) is the 43rd Premier of Tasmania. He became Premier on 26 May 2008. He is from the Labor Party.

John Brumby
politics
John Mansfield Brumby (born 21 April 1953) is the 45th Premier of Victoria. He became Premier on 30 July 2007. He is from the Labor Party.

Alan Carpenter
media
Alan John Carpenter (born 4 January 1957) was the 28th Premier of Western Australia from 26 January 2006 to 23 September 2008. He is from the Labor Party. He is still in the Western Australian parliament.

Geoff Gallop
politics
Professor Geoffrey Ian Gallop (born 27 September 1951) was the 27th Premier of Western Australia from 10 February 2001 to 16 January 2006. He was from the Labor Party.

Richard Court
politics
Richard Fairfax Court (born 27 September 1947) was the 26th Premier of Western Australia from 16 February 1993 to 10 February 2001. He was from the Liberal Party. His father, Charles Court, was also a Premier of Western Australia.

Carmen Lawrence
politics
Dr Carmen Mary Lawrence (born 2 March 1948) was the 25th Premier of Western Australia from 12 February 1990 to 16 February 1993. She was from the Labor Party. She became Premier after Peter Dowding resigned. She was the first woman to become Premier of an Australian state and she is Western Australia's only woman Premier. After she was Premier she became of member of the Australian parliament.

Peter Dowding
politics
Peter M'Callum Dowding (born 6 October 1943) was the 24th Premier of Western Australia from 25 February 1988 to 12 February 1990. He was from the Labor Party. He became Premier when Brian Burke resigned. He had a difficult time as Premier because some people in his government broke the law. He is now a lawyer.

Jim Duggan
sports
James Stuart Duggan (born January 14, 1954), better known by his ring name "Hacksaw" Jim Duggan, is an American professional wrestler, currently signed to World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE) wrestling on its "Raw" brand.

Tommy Tynan
sports
Tommy Tynan is a former football player.

Lennie Lawrence
sports
Lennie Lawrence is a former football manager.

Neil Warnock
sports
Neil Warnock is a former football player.

Sepp Maier
sports
Sepp Maier is a former football player. He has played for Bayern Munich and Germany national team.

Bob Stokoe
sports
Bob Stokoe is a former football player.

Lothar Matthäus
sports
Lothar Matthäus (born 21 March, 1961) is a former German football player. He has played for Germany national team.

John Charles
sports
John Charles is a former football player. He has played for Wales national team.

Fredrik Ljungberg
sports
Fredrik Ljungberg is a Swedish football player. He has played for Sweden national team.

Martin Peters
sports
Martin Peters is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Dmitri Sychev
sports
Dmitri Sychev is a Russian football player. He plays for Lokomotiv Moscow and Russia national team.

Shinji Ono
sports
Shinji Ono (born 27 September, 1979) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Bochum.

Iker Casillas
sports
Iker Casillas (born 20 May, 1981) is a Spanish football player. He plays for Real Madrid and Spain national team.

Robert Esche
sports
Robert Esche (born January 22, 1978 in Whitesboro, New York) is an American professional ice hockey goaltender currently playing for the Kontinental Hockey League's St. Petersburg SKA.

Brian Burke
politics
Brian Thomas Burke (born 25 February 1947) was the 23rd Premier of Western Australia from 25 February 1983 to 25 February 1988. He was from the Labor Party. He worked as a journalist before becoming a politician. As Premier he was popular at first but later on his government was involved in a number of private companies that failed. He resigned to become an ambassador. During the 1990s he was convicted of committing crimes while he was Premier and spent time in jail.

Ray O'Connor
sports
Raymond James O'Connor (born 6 March 1926) was the 22nd Premier of Western Australia from 25 January 1982 until 25 February 1983. He was from the Liberal Party. He became Premier when Charles Court resigned. Later he was convicted of stealing and spent time in jail.

Charles Court
politics
Sir Charles Walter Michael Court (29 September 1911 – 22 December 2007) was the 21st Premier of Western Australia from 8 April 1974 to 25 January 1982. He was from the Liberal Party. He became a politician in 1953. His son, Richard, was also a Premier.

John Tonkin
politics
John Trezise Tonkin (2 February 1902 - 20 October 1995) was the 20th Premier of Western Australia from 3 March 1971 to 8 April 1974. He was from the Labor Party.

David Brand
politics
Sir David Brand (1 August 1912 – 15 April 1979) was the 19th Premier of Western Australia from 2 April 1959 to 3 March 1971. He was from the Liberal Party.

Albert Hawke
politics
Albert ("Bert") Redvers George Hawke (3 December 1900 - 14 February 1986) was the 18th Premier of Western Australia from 23 February 1953 to 2 April 1959. He was from the Labor Party. His nephew, Bob, became Prime Minister of Australia in the 1980s.

Ross McLarty
politics
Sir Duncan Ross McLarty (17 March 1891 – 22 December 1962) was the 17th Premier of Western Australia from 1 April 1947 to 23 February 1953. He was from the Liberal Party.

Frank Wise
politics
Frank Joseph Scott Wise (30 May 1897 – 29 June 1986) was the 16th Premier of Western Australia from 31 July 1945 to 1 April 1947. He was from the Labor Party.

Kevin Moore (rugby league)
sports
Kevin Moore (born 30 November, 1965 in St Johns Lakemba, New South Wales, Australia) is a rugby league coach and former player. He is the head coach for the Bulldogs in the NRL from the 2009 season. As a player, he played as a scrum-half.

Roman Čechmánek
sports
Roman Čechmánek (born March 2, 1971 in Gottwaldov (now called Zlín), Czechoslovakia) is a Czech professional ice hockey goaltender.
International play.
His only Olympic appearance was for the Czech Republic in the 1998 Winter Olympics. Backing-up star goaltender Dominik Hašek, Čechmánek's team won the gold medal after defeating Russia in the gold medal deciding match, despite not playing a single game. Czech Republic won in a tight 1–0 game.
His other debuts were in the 2004 and 2007 IHWC also playing for the Czech Republic team.

Jaromír Jágr
sports
Jaromír Jágr (pronounced, born February 15, 1972 in Kladno, Czechoslovakia, now the Czech Republic) is a professional ice hockey right winger, who plays for Avangard Omsk in the Kontinental Hockey League. Jagr formerly played in the National Hockey League with the Pittsburgh Penguins, Washington Capitals, and most recently the New York Rangers. Jágr is currently in the top fifteen among players in NHL career goals, assists, and points, and is regarded as one of the game's all-time great players.

Roman Turek
sports
Roman Turek (born May 21, 1970 in Strakonice, Czechoslovakia — now the Czech Republic) is a professional ice hockey goaltender, who played for the Dallas Stars, St. Louis Blues, and Calgary Flames in a 9-year National Hockey League career. Currently he is playing in the Czech Extraliga for HC České Budějovice.

Eddie Su'a
sports
Eddie Su'a born 13 January, 1983 is a rugby league player for the Cronulla Sharks in the NRL. He plays as a prop.

Boris Johnson
media
Alexander Boris de Pfeffel Johnson (born 19 June 1964) is a British politician and journalist. The current Mayor of London, he previously served as the Conservative Member of Parliament for Henley and as editor of "The Spectator" magazine.
Johnson was educated at Eton and Balliol College, Oxford, where he read Classics. He began his journalism career with "The Times", and later moved on to "The Daily Telegraph" where he was assistant editor. He was appointed editor of "The Spectator" in 1999. In the 2001 general election he was elected to the House of Commons and became one of the most high profile politicians in the country, partly because of his distinctive appearance and persona. He gained praise for several appearances on the "Have I Got News for You" television programme, but received negative headlines in October 2004 after an editorial column in "The Spectator" criticised the people of Liverpool after the death of Kenneth Bigley. He has also written several books.
Under Michael Howard, Johnson briefly served on the Conservative front bench as the Shadow Minister for the Arts from April 2004 until November 2004 when he was sacked after allegedly lying to Howard when denying he had had an affair with Petronella Wyatt. When contemporary David Cameron was elected leader of the Conservative Party in 2005, Johnson was re-appointed to the front bench as Shadow Minister for Higher Education and resigned as editor of "The Spectator" to concentrate on his new role. In September 2007 he was selected as the Conservative candidate for the 2008 Mayor of London election. Though some questioned his suitability for the role, Johnson defeated Labour incumbent Ken Livingstone and was elected Mayor, after which he resigned as an MP from the House of Commons.
Early life, education and marriages.
Johnson is the eldest of the four children of Stanley Johnson, a former Conservative MEP and employee of the European Commission and World Bank, and his first wife, painter Charlotte Fawcett (later Wahl), the daughter of Sir James Fawcett, a prominent barrister and president of the European Commission of Human Rights. Johnson was born in New York City in the United States of America.
On his father's side Johnson is great-grandson of Ali Kemal Bey, a liberal Turkish journalist and interior minister in the government of Damat Ferid Pasha, Grand Vizier of the Ottoman Empire, who was murdered during the Turkish War of Independence. During World War I, Boris's grandfather and great aunt were recognised as British subjects and took their grandmother's maiden name of Johnson. In reference to his cosmopolitan ancestry, Johnson has described himself as a "one-man melting pot" — with a combination of Muslims, Jews and Christians comprising his great-grandparentage. His father's maternal grandmother, Marie Louise de Pfeffel, was a descendent of Prince Paul of Württemberg through his relationship with a German actress. Through Prince Paul, Johnson is a descendent of King George II of Great Britain and through George's great-great-great grandfather King James I of England, a descendent of all the previous British royal houses.
Johnson was born in New York City, New York, USA, but his family returned to England soon afterwards as his mother had yet to take her Oxford finals. Johnson's sister Rachel was born a year later. As a child, Boris Johnson suffered from severe deafness and had to undergo several operations to have grommets inserted in his ears, and was reportedly rather quiet as a child. He was educated at the European School in Brussels, Ashdown House and then at Eton College, where he was a King's Scholar. He read Classics at Balliol College, Oxford, as a Brackenbury scholar, and was elected President of the Oxford Union, at his second attempt. Frank Luntz and Radek Sikorski have claimed Johnson touted himself as a supporter of the Social Democratic Party, then a dominant current at the university, as a strategy to win the Union presidency, though Johnson denies he was more than the SDP's preferred candidate. Along with David Cameron he was a member of Oxford's Bullingdon Club, a student dining society known for its raucous feasts.
In 1987 he married Allegra Mostyn-Owen but the marriage lasted less than a year, finally being dissolved in 1993. Later that same year he married Marina Wheeler, a barrister, the daughter of journalist and broadcaster Sir Charles Wheeler and his Sikh Indian wife, Dip Singh. The Wheeler and Johnson families have known each other for decades, and Marina Wheeler was at the European School in Brussels at the same time as her future husband. They have two sons—Theodore Apollo (born 1999) and Milo Arthur (born 1995)—and two daughters—Lara Lettice (born 1993) and Cassia Peaches (born 1997). Boris Johnson and his family currently live in Holloway, North London.
Political career.
In 2001, Johnson was elected MP for Henley-on-Thames, succeeding Michael Heseltine, having previously been defeated in Clwyd South in the 1997 general election. In 2004 he was appointed to the front bench as Shadow Minister for the Arts in a small reshuffle resulting from the resignation of the Shadow Home Affairs Spokesman, Nick Hawkins. He was also from November 2003 vice-chairman of the Conservative Party, with an emphasis on campaigning.
Johnson was dismissed from these high-profile posts in November, 2004 over accusations that he lied to Michael Howard about a four-year extramarital affair with Petronella Wyatt, "The Spectators New York correspondent and former deputy editor. Johnson derided these allegations as "an inverted pyramid of piffle", but Howard sacked Johnson because he believed press reports showed Johnson had lied, rather than for the affair itself.
He was appointed Shadow Minister for Higher Education on 9 December 2005 by new Conservative Leader David Cameron, and resigned as editor of "The Spectator" soon afterwards. On 2 April 2006 it was alleged in the "News of the World" that Johnson had had another extramarital affair, this time with "Times Higher Education Supplement" journalist Anna Fazackerley. The video shows him emerging from her flat and waving to her in a taxi. Subsequently, in a speech at the University of Exeter concerning student finance, he allegedly made comical remarks about his gratitude to the audience for not "raising other issues" during the talk, which may have been a reference to the allegations. A report in "The Times" stated that Cameron regarded the possible affair as a private matter, and that Johnson would not lose his job over it.
2008 London Mayoral election.
After several days of speculation, Johnson announced he was a potential Conservative candidate for the London mayoral election in 2008 on 16 July 2007. Reported as saying "the opportunity is too great and the prize too wonderful to miss... the chance to represent London and speak for Londoners", he resigned as Shadow Minister for Higher Education. He was confirmed as the Conservative candidate on 27 September 2007 after gaining 75% of the vote in a public London wide primary.
Alcohol use ban on public transport.
On 7 May 2008, Johnson announced plans to ban the consumption of alcohol on the London transport network, effective from 1 June, a policy described by Jeroen Weimar, Transport for London's director of transport policing and enforcement, as reasonable, saying people should be more considerate on the trains. The ban initially applies on the London Underground, Buses, DLR and Croydon Trams. The London Overground will be added later in June 2008. Press releases said that the ban would apply to "stations across the capital", but did not specify whether this included National Rail stations - especially those stations not served by the TfL lines on which alcohol is banned.
On the final evening on which alcohol was to be permitted on London transport, thousands of drinkers descended on the Underground system to mark the event. Six London Underground stations were closed as trouble began, and a number of staff and police were assaulted. Police made 17 arrests as several trains were damaged and withdrawn from service.
2008 Olympics.
Johnson was present at the closing ceremony of the 2008 Beijing Olympics as London's representative to receive the Olympic flag from Guo Jinlong, the Mayor of Beijing in order to formally announce London as Olympic host city. He was accused by Chinese media of being "rude, arrogant and disrespectful" for accepting the Olympic flag with one hand, putting his hands in his pockets and not buttoning up his jacket. At the subsequent handover party held at London House in Beijing, he gave a speech in which he declared 'ping pong is coming home'.

B. F. Skinner
science
Burrhus Frederic Skinner (March 20, 1904 – August 18 1990) was an important American psychologist author. He also was an inventor who wanted to change the society he lived in.and a poet. He was the Edgar Pierce Professor of Psychology at Harvard University from 1958 until his retirement in 1974.

Satyajit Ray
music
Satyajit Ray () (2 May 1921–23 April 1992) was a Bengali Indian movie director. Many people consider him as one of the greatest "auteurs" of 20th century film.
He was born in the city of Kolkata. His Bengali family was prominent in arts and letters. Ray studied at Presidency College and at the Visva-Bharati University. He started his career as a commercial artist. Ray was interested in filmmaking by meeting French filmmaker Jean Renoir and seeing the Italian neorealist film "Bicycle Thieves" during a visit to London.
Ray directed thirty-seven films. These include feature films, documentaries and shorts. Ray's first film, "Pather Panchali", won eleven international prizes, including "Best Human Document" at Cannes Film Festival. This film along with "Aparajito" and "Apur Sansar" form the "Apu trilogy". Ray did scripting, casting, scoring, cinematography, art direction, editing and designed his own credit titles and publicity material. He was a fiction writer, publisher, illustrator, graphic designer and film critic. Ray won an Academy Award in 1992.

Johnny Marr
music
Johnny Marr (born John Martin Maher on 31 October 1963 in Ardwick, Manchester) is an English guitarist, keyboardist, harmonica player, and singer. Marr rose to fame in the 1980s as the guitarist in The Smiths, where he formed an influential songwriting partnership with Morrissey.

Years of Refusal
music
"Years of Refusal" is the forthcoming ninth solo album by Morrissey, the former lead singer of The Smiths. The album, to be distributed by Decca, is set for release on February 2, 2009 in the United Kingdom and February 3, 2009 in the United States.

John Willcock
politics
John Collings Willcock (9 August 1879 – 7 June 1956) was the 15th Premier of Western Australia from 20 August 1936 to 31 July 1945. He was from the Labor Party.

Philip Collier
politics
Philip Collier (21 April 1873 – 18 October 1948) was the 14th Premier of Western Australia from 17 April 1924 to 23 April 1930 and then from 24 April 1933 to 19 August 1936. He was from the Labor Party.

Ken Livingstone
politics
Kenneth Robert Livingstone (born 17 June 1945) is a British socialist politician. He has twice held the leading political role in London local government: firstly as leader of the Greater London Council from 1981 until the council was abolished in 1986 by the government of Margaret Thatcher, and secondly as the first Mayor of London, a post he held from its creation in 2000 until 2008. He also served as Labour Party Member of Parliament for Brent East between 1987 and 2001.
He was initially elected as Mayor of London as an Independent candidate after the Labour Party chose not to nominate him as their candidate in the first mayoral elections. In January 2004, he was re-admitted to the Labour Party. He stood as the official Labour Party candidate for Mayor in the June 2004 elections, which he won with a total of 828,380 first- and second-preference votes. On 1 May 2008 Livingstone was defeated in his second re-election bid by Conservative candidate Boris Johnson, and his term as Mayor of London ended on 4 May 2008.
He has announced his intention to run again for the post of London mayor in 2012. In the meantime, he has been appointed as an adviser for urban planning to Hugo Chávez.
Early and private life.
Livingstone was born in Lambeth, London, England, the son of Ethel Ada (Kennard), a professional dancer, and Robert Moffat Livingstone, who was of Scottish descent and worked as a ship's master in the Merchant Navy. Livingstone has described his parents as "working class Tories".
Livingstone attended Tulse Hill Comprehensive School. He did not pass the eleven-plus examination in 1956 but still managed to obtain a few O-levels. He worked for eight years as a cancer research technician, between 1962 and 1970. He also trained as a teacher, qualifying in 1973, but was never active in the profession. Livingstone joined the Labour Party in 1968 at a time when party membership was falling and few new young members were joining, and rose rapidly in the local party. He was elected to the Lambeth Borough Council in May 1971 and served as Vice-Chair of the Housing Committee from 1971 to 1973 (succeeding John Major in the job).
At the a> just before the deadline to stand for the council in 1978, and was elected there. Livingstone's performance in Hampstead in the United Kingdom 1979 general election was good, although he did not come close to winning what was at that time a safe Conservative seat.
He married Christine Pamela Chapman in 1973 and the marriage ended in divorce in 1982. Around that time he became involved with Kate Allen (Amnesty International UK), now director of Amnesty International in the UK, but the couple separated in November 2001.
Livingstone and his current partner Emma Beal, also his office manager, have a son, Thomas, born 14 December 2002 at the University College Hospital, London, and a daughter, Mia, born on 20 March 2004 at the Royal Free Hospital in Hampstead. He also has three other children from previous relationships, whose existence was only publicly revealed during the London mayoral election, 2008. Livingstone is a noted "bon vivant", having twice worked as a food critic for London's "Evening Standard" newspaper and various magazines.
He is known for his enthusiasm for keeping and breeding newts.
Livingstone in parliament.
Livingstone again stood for Parliament in the 1987 general election, winning a seat in the north-west London constituency of Brent East. He replaced Labour MP Reg Freeson who was a committed left-winger, but his relatively moderate ("sensible left") views made him vulnerable to the hard left in the early 1980s. Freeson was able to retain his seat at the 1983 general election, but was deselected in 1985 after a bitter struggle, described as "political 'murder'" in his Guardian obituary, and replaced as Labour candidate in Brent East by Livingstone.
In his maiden speech to Parliament in July 1987, Livingstone used Parliamentary privilege to raise a number of allegations made by Fred Holroyd, a former MI6 operative in Northern Ireland. Despite the convention of maiden speeches being non-controversial, Livingstone alleged that Holroyd had been mistreated when he tried to expose MI5 collusion with loyalist paramilitaries in the 1970s and the part Captain Robert Nairac is alleged to have played. He also voiced Colin Wallace's allegations of MI5 dirty tricks levelled at Harold Wilson, part of what became known as the "Wilson plot".
As a Labour backbencher, Livingstone lost the public platform he possessed as head of the GLC; furthermore, his brand of radical socialism was increasingly out of step with the Labour leadership, which had moved sharply towards the centre under the leadership of Neil Kinnock who now blamed left-wingers like Livingstone for Labour's 'unelectability.' Over the long term, though, it was Livingstone rather than Kinnock who was to achieve electoral success. In September 1987 he was elected to the party's National Executive Committee, although he lost this position two years later; he regained it in 1997 beating Peter Mandelson in what some interpreted as a rebuke to Tony Blair. He was re-elected MP in the general election of 1992, with a 6% swing to Labour in his Brent East constituency. Besides serving in the Commons, Livingstone held a number of other 'odd jobs' during this period, including game show contestant and host, after-dinner speaker, and restaurant reviewer for the "Evening Standard". In 1987 he published an autobiography-cum-political tract, "If Voting Changed Anything They'd Abolish It".
As a politician comfortable in light-hearted and satirical situations, in 1990, Livingstone made the first of seven appearances on the topical panel show "Have I Got News For You". For a long time, his first six appearances would stand as the show's record; his current tally of seven - the last being in 2002 - fall one short of the record for guest appearances currently held by Germaine Greer and Will Self.
In 1995, Livingstone appeared on the track "Ernold Same" by the band Blur, taken from the album "The Great Escape". Livingstone provided spoken word vocals and was listed as 'The Right On Ken Livingstone.'
Livingstone appeared in one of a series of advertisements extolling the virtues of cheese in the 1980s, appropriately endorsing red Leicester. On the other side of politics, Edward Heath advertised Danish Blue. Their respective choices are down to the colour red being associated with the Labour Party, and blue with the Conservative Party.
Greater London's first mayor.
Livingstone was again re-elected in the 1997 general election, in which Labour was returned to power under the leadership of Tony Blair. Among Labour's proposals was the establishment of a Greater London Authority which was to be a strategic body: unlike the GLC the Greater London Authority would not provide any services to Londoners directly. The new Greater London Authority would be headed by a directly-elected mayor, who would be watched over by a 25-member Assembly.
Despite having earlier criticised the specific proposals for a new London-wide authority, Livingstone was widely tipped for the new post of Mayor. The mayoral election was scheduled for 2000, and in 1999, Labour began the long and trying process of selecting its candidate. Despite Blair's personal antipathy, Livingstone was included on Labour's shortlist in November 1999, having pledged that he would not run as an independent if he failed to secure the party's nomination. William Hague, then Leader of the Opposition taunted Blair at Prime Minister's Question Time: "Why not split the job in two, with Frank Dobson as your day mayor and Ken Livingstone as your nightmare?"
Labour chose its official candidate on 20 February 2000. Although Livingstone received a healthy majority of the total votes, he nevertheless lost the nomination to former Secretary of State for Health Frank Dobson, under a controversial system in which votes from sitting Labour MPs and MEPs were weighted more heavily than votes from rank-and-file members. On 6 March, Livingstone announced that he would run against Dobson as an independent, confirming speculation that he would renege on his earlier pledge. He was suspended from the Labour Party the same day and expelled on 4 April. Tony Blair said that Livingstone as mayor would be a "disaster" for London; he later said he was wrong in that prediction.
The result of the election — held on 4 May — was a foregone conclusion: Dobson, who it was alleged, had been pressured into running by the party leadership, unsuccessfully based his campaign on claims that Livingstone was an egomaniac, and the Conservatives remained becalmed after their catastrophic national defeat in 1997. Livingstone came out ahead in the first round of balloting with 38% of first-preference votes to Conservative Steven Norris's 27%; Dobson finished third, with 13% of all first-preference votes — just ahead of Liberal Democrat Susan Kramer, with 12%. Under the modified instant-runoff voting system employed for the election, only the votes cast for Livingstone and Norris were considered in the second round, where Livingstone won with 58% of first- and second-preference votes, versus 42% for Norris.
Livingstone continued to sit in parliament, as an independent having had the Labour whip withdrawn, until standing down at the 2001 General Election.
2004 re-election.
Livingstone applied for readmittance to the Labour Party in 2002 but was rejected. In November 2003, however, rumours emerged that the Labour Party would allow Livingstone to rejoin, just ahead of the 2004 London mayoral election. Opinion polls consistently gave a poor showing to Labour's official candidate, Nicky Gavron, and many in the party leadership (including Tony Blair himself) feared that Labour would be humiliated by a fourth-place finish. In mid-December, Gavron announced she would stand down as the Labour candidate in favour of a 'unity campaign,' with Gavron as Livingstone's deputy, with Labour's National Executive Committee voting 25-2 to pave the way for Livingstone's readmittance. The deal hinged on a 'loyalty test' administered by a special five-member NEC panel on 9 January. The panel recommended that Livingstone be allowed back in the party. The move towards readmittance came amid considerable opposition from senior party members, including Chancellor of the Exchequer Gordon Brown, Deputy Prime Minister John Prescott, and former party leader Neil Kinnock. In a ballot of Labour Party members in London, Livingstone was overwhelmingly endorsed as the Labour candidate for the 2004 Mayoral election.
Livingstone was re-elected Mayor of London on 10 June 2004. He won 36% of first preference votes to Conservative Steven Norris's 28% and Liberal Democrat Simon Hughes's 15%. Six other candidates shared the remainder of the votes. When all the candidates except Livingstone and Norris were eliminated and the second preferences of those voters who had picked neither Livingstone or Norris as their first choice were counted, Livingstone won with 55% to Norris's 45%.
2008 Election.
Livingstone sought re-election in 2008, but was defeated by Conservative candidate Boris Johnson on a night that saw the Labour Party suffer its worst electoral defeats for forty years. Once first and second votes were taken into account Johnson had 1,168,738 votes, Livingstone 1,028,966 - a margin of 139, 772 votes or just over 6% of those who voted.
Speaking immediately after the count, Johnson paid public tribute to his defeated rival, praising "the very considerable achievements of the last mayor of London" and describing Livingstone as "a very considerable public servant". Johnson went on to say "You shaped the office of mayor. You gave it national prominence and when London was attacked on 7 July 2005 you spoke for London."
Johnson also spoke of Livingstone's "courage and the sheer exuberant nerve with which you stuck it to your enemies" and expressed a desire that the new Conservative administration could "discover a way in which the mayoralty can continue to benefit from your transparent love of London".
Public transport.
Livingstone's greatest challenge as Mayor of London has been dealing with the city's ageing transportation infrastructure. Despite conflict over appropriate funding schemes and engineering challenges to modernising both the London Underground and the city's bus system, an Association of London Government survey, conducted by MORI towards the end of Livingstone's first term in 2004, suggested growing public satisfaction with public transport, with buses in particular being seen as more frequent and reliable.
In accordance with his pre-election pledge, bus fares were frozen for four years, but then the standard single cash fare on buses more than doubled. Further, and contrary to his pledge during his first election campaign, when he said "only a de-humanised moron would get rid of the Routemaster", Livingstone removed the famous Routemaster buses from routine service on 9 December 2005, claiming it was because the new buses were wheelchair-accessible, although several of the old buses are used on shortened "heritage routes". There was some question over the legality of using the old Routemaster under the Disability Discrimination Act 1995 as the Routemasters effectively banned wheel chair users.
In tandem with the removal of Routemaster buses, Livingstone oversaw the introduction of bending articulated buses. These buses have faced criticism for allegedly being fire-prone, dangerous to cyclists, and unable to navigate some winding streets; see London articulated bus controversy.
Livingstone has been a strong proponent of the Oyster card smartcard ticketing system for London's public transport network introduced in 2003. In late 2005, Livingstone proposed large fare increases for on-the-spot tickets across the Tube and bus network to encourage regular travellers to use the automated Oyster system to reduce queuing at Underground stations and avoid delays in conductorless buses as drivers issue tickets. The plans, although ratified by the GLA and introduced in January 2006 were condemned by those who argued that the increases would increase the cost of travelling in London to tourists and others who do not travel regularly. Civil liberties groups have expressed concern over the way in which Transport for London is able to track the movements of passengers using the Oyster card system. Livingstone moved to make all bus journeys free for passengers under the age of 18 enrolled in full-time education who travel with an Oyster card and introduced initiatives to enable visitors to buy an Oyster card before arriving in London.
One of the key points of conflict between Livingstone and the Labour Party had been the proposed 'Public-Private Partnership' for the London Underground. Livingstone had run in 2000 on a policy of financing the improvements to Tube infrastructure by a public bond issue, which had been done in the case of the New York City Subway. However the Mayor did not have power in this area at the time as the Underground operated independently of Transport for London. The PPP deal went ahead in July 2002, but it did not diminish Livingstone's desire to re-join Labour. Metronet, one of the winners of the contract for PPP, subsequently went into administration in July 2007.
Congestion charge.
Livingstone introduced the London congestion charge with the purpose of reducing traffic congestion in central London. Since being introduced the charge has proved to be controversial, though Transport for London maintains that traffic has fallen by 20% within the charge zone since the scheme began. One reason for the controversy is that whilst the scheme has been lucrative for its private-sector operator, Capita, some critics argue it has failed to raise the promised levels of funding for public transport as costs eat up the revenue.
However, its apparent success in reducing congestion has led to similar schemes being proposed in other major cities such as New York.
In November 2003, Livingstone was named 'Politician of the Year' by the Political Studies Association, which cited his implementation of what the association called a 'bold and imaginative' congestion charge scheme.
The United States Embassy for many years has refused to pay the charge because they argue it is a tax and not a charge on congestion.
Environmental policies.
Ken Livingstone has been called “an environmentalist, a leftist, a lover of newts," and has made a significant effort to reduce London’s impact on the environment. He began by creating the and the in his first term as Mayor of London. The Mayor’s, “green light to clean power,” commits London to reducing its emissions of carbon dioxide by 20%, relative to the 1990 level, by 2010. However, he does support the Thames Gateway Bridge in East London that Friends of the Earth say "would bring few benefits to the local people and lead to more traffic, more noise and air pollution and an increase in climate-changing emissions". In October 2007, London Councils stated Livingstone had gone back on his promise to help chair the developing London Waste and Recycling Board, and to provide £6 million of funding for the project, because "the government had failed to provide him with absolute control of the Board."
In June 2007, Livingstone criticised a planned £200 million desalination plant at Beckton, which would be the United Kingdom's first, calling it "misguided and a retrograde step in UK environmental policy", and that "we should be encouraging people to use less water, not more."
Same-sex civil partnerships.
In 2001 Livingstone set up Britain's first register for same-sex couples; while falling short of legal marriage rights, the register was seen as a "step towards" such rights. Legal status was later passed by the government through the Civil Partnership Act 2004.
Religious and other festivals.
After rejecting the idea for a couple of years, Livingstone hosted a Jewish Hanukkah ceremony at City Hall in December 2005. He said he intended this to be an annual occurrence. On 17 March 2002 Livingstone introduced an annual Saint Patrick's Day festival to London to celebrate the contributions of the Irish to London, with around 250,000 people annually turning out for this. On 28 October 2006 he helped organise the first ever "Eid in the Square" in Trafalgar Square, in commemoration of the Eid ul-Fitr festival which marks the end of Ramadan, the Muslim month of fasting.
Reaction to 7 July 2005 London bombings.
After the 7 July 2005 London bombings Livingstone, from the 117th IOC Session in Singapore, where it had recently been announced London would host the 2012 Olympic Games, delivered a speech.
Finally, I wish to speak directly to those who came to London today to take life. I know that you personally do not fear giving up your own life in order to take others - that is why you are so dangerous. But I know you fear that you may fail in your long-term objective to destroy our free society and I can show you why you will fail. In the days that follow, look at our airports, look at our sea ports and look at our railway stations and, even after your cowardly attack, you will see that people from the rest of Britain, people from around the world will arrive in London to become Londoners and to fulfil their dreams and achieve their potential. They choose to come to London, as so many have come before because they come to be free, they come to live the life they choose, they come to be able to be themselves. They flee you because you tell them how they should live. They do not want that and nothing you do, however many of us you kill, will stop that flight to our city where freedom is strong and where people can live in harmony with one another. Whatever you do, however many you kill, you will fail.
Livingstone defended the police after the mistaken killing of a Brazilian man, Jean Charles de Menezes, who police believed was a suicide bomber.
Racism policies.
In 2001 Livingstone revived the free anti-racism Music festival now called. He believes that this, along with other anti-racist policies, is why London has seen a 35% decrease in racist attacks.
In September 2005 Livingstone came out in support of placing a statue of Nelson Mandela, the former President of South Africa, on the north terrace of Trafalgar Square. Livingstone said "There can be no better place than our greatest square to place a statue of Nelson Mandela so that every generation can remind the next of the fight against racism." He was highly critical of the Planning and City Development Committee of Westminster City Council who refused planning permission.
In 2008 Livingstone's race advisor Lee Jasper resigned after being accused of corruption and inappropriate behaviour. Simon Woolley of Operation Black Vote has said the 2008 Mayoral campaign has seen a "wholly disproportionate" focus on Jasper, Doreen Lawrence (Livingstone supporter and mother of Stephen Lawrence), and others.
Apology for London's role in the transatlantic slave trade.
"It is because it is the anniversary of the biggest slave revolt in history, that UNESCO officially marks this day, the 23 August, the anniversary of that outbreak in Haiti, as slavery's official remembrance day. This is why we, in London, call for it to be the annual slave memorial day. We are therefore here to initiate London's annual slavery memorial day, and call for the establishment of a national, annual memorial day. In 1999, Liverpool became the first major British slaving city to formally apologise. The Church of England soon followed suit. In March I invited representatives of London's institutions to join the City of Liverpool and the Church of England for formally apologising for London's role in this monstrous crime. As Mayor, I offer an apology on behalf of London and its institutions for their role in the transatlantic slave trade."
Rejecting the idea that it is not possible to "meaningfully apologise for something a former generation did," Livingstone emphasised that London and by implication the rest of the developed world still profited enormously from the assets accumulated in the slave era, adding "It was the racial murder of not just those who were transported but generations of enslaved African men, women and children. To justify this murder and torture black people had to be declared inferior or not human. We live with the consequences today."
Cronyism and corruption allegations.
In March 2002, while still independent, Livingstone was accused of "cronyism" by some Labour party members in the London Assembly after he had appointed six officials as special advisers at a salary level which seemed to them excessive, and a manoeuvre to help his chances of being re-elected. Livingstone denied the allegations and stated the appointments were a "necessary efficiency drive."
In December 2007, the "Evening Standard" published news of an investigation into grants worth £2.5 million paid to organisations in which Ken Livingstone's adviser Lee Jasper was involved. It is confirmed that some of these grants were paid directly by the mayor's office.
Following Mr. Livingstone’s defeat in the 2008 Mayoral Elections, "The Daily Mail" reported that “Eight 'cronies' of Ken Livingstone are to receive £1.6 million in pay-offs following his defeat in the London mayoral elections.” Mr. Livingstone changed the rules for political appointees who would otherwise not have been eligible for severance packages, which paved the way for the eight City Hall advisors to receive an average of £200,000. Liberal Democrat Leader Dee Doocey stated that the payments were “completely inexcusable” and added that “It seems like there's one law for the ordinary working person and one law for the political class.” Tony Travers, local government expert at the London School of Economics, said: “I think most people will be shocked. You could do quite a lot about knife crime with £1.6 million. It is odd indeed that the full benefits of labour laws designed to protect the vulnerable are being claimed by courtiers who knew they would lose their jobs if their master lost the election.”
Mr Livinstone refuted the comments by stating that 'It's a question of what the law requires. Either there's a legal responsibility or there isn't.'
Dispute with the "Evening Standard".
The epithet "German war criminal" and Livingstone's subsequent jibes refer to the Standard's owners, the Daily Mail and General Trust, which endorsed Oswald Mosley's Fascists in 1934 and supported Nazism until 1939. Livingstone also claimed the "Standard" was guilty of "harassment of a predominantly lesbian and gay event". Gay rights campaigner Peter Tatchell suggested in the Evening Standard that this explanation "came across as patronising. Gay people don't need the Mayor's protection to fend off a journalist asking simple questions."
After listening to the recording supplied by Finegold, the London Assembly voted unanimously to ask Livingstone to apologise. Livingstone responded by saying "the form of words I have used are right. I have nothing to apologise for." Deputy Mayor Nicky Gavron, herself the daughter of a Holocaust survivor, said of Livingstone: "These were inappropriate words and very offensive, both to the individual and to Jews in London." Some two dozen complaints were referred to the Standards Board for England, the body responsible for English local government standards, which passed it to the Adjudication Panel for England, which has the power to ban individuals from public office for five years.
The Adjudication Panel addressed the case over two days on the 13 & 14 December 2005 and adjourned the hearing for two months. On 24 February 2006, Ken Livingstone was found guilty of bringing his office into disrepute and suspended from office for four weeks, stating that he seemed "to have failed... to have appreciated that his conduct was unacceptable". Livingstone attacked the decision on the grounds that the Adjudication Panel members ought not to suspend a democratically elected official from power, describing their actions as "striking at the heart of democracy". The ban was due to begin on 1 March 2006, but on 28 February, a High Court judge postponed it pending an appeal by Livingstone.
The decision was later quashed by the High Court of Justice when on 5 October, Mr Justice Collins overturned the suspension, regardless of the outcome of Livingstone's appeal concerning the breach of standards. The final judgment upheld Livingstone's appeal and stated that the Adjudication Panel had misdirected itself, although the judge stated that the Mayor should have apologised.
On 7 December 2006, at a City Hall reception marking the launch of the London Jewish Forum, Livingstone apologised for any offence that he had caused the Jewish community.
Criticism of Livingstone by the Evening Standard intensified during the 2008 campaign, with daily front page articles attacking him, under the direction of editor Veronica Wadley who originally urged Johnson to stand and who is closely linked to Tory leadership. According to articles in The Guardian and Time Out London, she is strongly influenced by the need to renew Associated Newspaper's multi-million pound contract to deliver the Metro free paper in London Underground stations in 2010, a decision within the gift of the Mayor.
Remarks over foreign policy.
In 2004 Livingstone said "I just long for the day I wake up and find that the Saudi Royal Family are swinging from lamp-posts and they've got a proper government that represents the people of Saudi Arabia."
In a March 2005 commentary in "The Guardian" he accused Israel's prime minister Ariel Sharon of being a "war criminal", citing his alleged personal responsibility for the Sabra and Shatila massacre in 1982 and accusations of ethnic cleansing. Accusations that Sharon was implicated are frequently made by other organisations and leading politicians including the official Israeli Kahan Commission investigation into the massacres in 1982.
"I think you've just had 80 years of western intervention into predominantly Arab lands because of the western need for oil. We've propped up unsavoury governments, we've overthrown ones we didn't consider sympathetic. And I think the particular problem we have at the moment is that in the 1980s ... the Americans recruited and trained Osama Bin Laden, taught him how to kill, to make bombs, and set him off to kill the Russians and drive them out of Afghanistan. They didn't give any thought to the fact that once he'd done that he might turn on his creators. A lot of young people see the double standards, they see what happens in Guantanamo Bay, and they just think that there isn't a just foreign policy."
"Under foreign occupation and denied the right to vote, denied the right to run your own affairs, often denied the right to work for three generations, I suspect that if it had happened here in England, we would have produced a lot of suicide bombers ourselves."
Commentator Mark Steyn described the interview as Livingstone "artfully" attempting "to draw a distinction between Muslim terrorists blowing up his own public transit (which he didn't approve of) and Muslim terrorists blowing up Israeli public transit (which he was inclined to be sympathetic to)."
In November 2003, Livingstone made headlines for referring to US President George W. Bush as 'the greatest threat to life on this planet,' just before Bush's official visit to the UK. Livingstone also organised an alternative 'Peace Reception' at City Hall 'for everybody who is not George Bush,' with anti-war Vietnam veteran Ron Kovic as the guest of honour. In 2004 he referred to Bush as "the most corrupt American president since Harding in the Twenties". In July 2007 Livingstone suggested that Prime Minister Gordon Brown needed to explain to Bush "that US governments need to return to a realistic view of the world. The US is the world's single most powerful country, but much weaker than the rest of the world put together. The attempt by one country to unilaterally impose itself on the rest of the world is not only undesirable but simply won't work."
Venezuelan oil deal.
In February 2007, Ken Livingstone signed a deal with Venezuela to provide cheaper oil for London buses. In return, the Greater London Authority advises Venezuela on recycling, waste management, traffic and reducing carbon emissions. This deal came under criticism from the London Assembly Conservatives including Richard Barnes, who stated that the "money would be better directed at the poor of Venezuela," and journalist Martin Bright, who said that the deal "effectively takes from the poor of Latin America to give to one of the richest cities in the world." Prices have been slashed by 20%; following this, half-price bus travel became available to Londoners on income support. Livingstone stated the plan "rises on the suggestion of President Hugo Chávez and builds on the work his government is doing around the world in tackling the problems of poverty," and also said, "This will make it cheaper and easier for people to go about their lives and get the most out of London. The agreement... will also benefit the people of Venezuela, by providing expertise in areas of city management in which London is a world leader."
The deal was discontinued by incoming mayor Boris Johnson (effective from September 2008), a decision criticized by Livingstone.
Dispute with embassies over payment of congestion charge.
A dispute with the US Embassy in London over payment of the London Congestion Charge escalated on 27 March 2006 when Livingstone criticised the Embassy's decision not to pay. The Embassy argued that the charge is a form of taxation, not a charge for a service, and diplomats and their staff are therefore exempt under the 1961 Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations. Embassy officials have never paid the charge, which was instituted in 2003. Livingstone, however, alleged that the decision was made by Robert Tuttle, who took up the post of Ambassador in July 2005. Livingstone described Tuttle as "one of George Bush's closest cronies and a big funder of his election campaign" and said he was trying to "skive out of [paying] like some chiselling little crook". The group Liberty and Law reported this remark to the Standards Board for England as a breach of its code, but the board chose not to investigate it.
Germany stopped paying the charge in 2005, Japan followed in 2006, and in 2007 France, Russia, Belgium, and 50 other missions followed suit when the zone extended to their missions' locations (Iran, Sweden and Syria continue to pay the charge). Asked about Japan's refusal to pay in a March 2007 interview on LBC Radio, Livingstone responded, "I think there are several problems with Japan that we could go on about here. Admitting their guilt for all the war crimes would be one thing. So if they've not got round to doing that, I doubt they're too worried about the congestion charge." London's Japanese embassy responded that their government had already apologised for previous war crimes.
Post-mayoral career.
Livingstone acted as a stand-in presenter on London talk radio station LBC 97.3's Jeni Barnett for a week beginning on 30 June 2008. In July 2008 he announced his intention to run again for the office of Mayor of London at the next mayoral elections and signalled his intent to organise a "progressive alliance" of political parties (such as the Labour Party and the Green Party), trade unions and interest groups to defend the progress which was made during his terms as Mayor and to prepare for the next mayoral elections.
On 28 August 2008, it was announced that Livingstone will be an adviser on urban planning to Caracas, Venezuela. He will act as a consultant on the capital's policing, transport and other municipal issues. As a friend of Hugo Chávez, Livingstone was appointed personally by him to advise officials and mayoral candidates in Caracas, in order to help transform the city, which journalist Rory Carroll described as suffering from, "Gridlocked traffic, a crumbling centre, hillside slums, horrific murder rates, corrupt police and inept local government". Livingstone reckoned that in twenty years a "first-world city" can be made out of Caracas, stating, "I have a very extensive network of contacts both domestically and internationally which I will be calling on to assist in this." No decision on a salary for the ex-mayor has been made, although he mentioned that, "The whole cost of this trip has been paid for by the government of Venezuela and as an unemployed citizen I would not be able to pay for my own fare otherwise." The appointment follows on from the controversy surrounding the deal brokered by Livingstone in February 2007 for the Greater London Authority and Transport for London to provide advice to Venezuela in exchange for cheap fuel to help with bus subsidies. The deal was later overturned by new mayor Boris Johnson, and Livingstone offered his services to Chávez so that Venezuela gets the "advice that we promised". Livingstone played down any accusations that his close relationship with the Venezuelan President was controversial, "unless you believe American propaganda", while a spokesperson for Johnson said, "Ken Livingstone is free, as a private individual, to offer his advice and services to whomever he wants." Livingstone is now being touted as a key asset for Chávez in the upcoming November elections in the country.

Discovering the Waterfront
music
"Discovering the Waterfront" is a song by Silverstein. It is the title track of their second album.
Music video.
The official music video featured the band laying down and singing/talking on the phone. However, there was also a montage video released on victory records, which includes the band playing on stage and some of them standing in the way of closing elevator doors getting hurt.

Abid Hamid Mahmud
politics
Lieutenant General Abid Hamid Mahmud al-Tikriti was an Iraqi military officer under Saddam Hussein's deposed regime.

Mahmoud an-Nukrashi Pasha
politics
Mahmoud Fahmi an-Nukrashi Pasha (1888 - 1948) (Arabic: محمود فهمي النقراشي باشا‎) was an Egyptian political figure. He was the Prime Minister of Egypt from 1945 to 1946 and again from 1946 to 1948. He was assassinated by the Muslim Brotherhood while he was Prime Minister.

Ivan Pavlov
science
Ivan Petrovich Pavlov (, September 14, 1849 – February 27, 1936) was a Russian physiologist, psychologist, and physician. He was given the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine in 1904 for research about the digestive system. Pavlov is widely known for first describing the phenomenon of classical conditioning.

Katy Perry
music
Katy Perry (born Katheryn Elizabeth Hudson October 25, 1984) is an American dance-pop singer. Perry had released one studio album and 1 EP album. June 17th, 2008 Katy Perry released her first pop album called "One of the Boys" with singles like "I Kissed a Girl", "Hot N Cold", and "One of the Boys".
Ur So Gay.
In November of 2007, Katy Perry released an EP album called "Ur So Gay". A song called "Lost" from the EP album was put on the 2008 album "One of the Boys".

One of the Boys (Katy Perry album)
music
"One of the Boys" is the first album by pop singer Katy Perry.

Thunder (Boys Like Girls song)
music
"Thunder" is a single released by American rock band Boys Like Girls. "Thunder" was released May 6th, 2008 on radio airplay. The single was originally released months before May 6th, 2008 as an acoustic version. The song was released off the album "Boys Like Girls".
Music Video.
The music video shows a group of friends, in which there are couples, hang out. The music video starts with the band playing, and then moves on to the friends going to restaurant to eat, with intervals of the band playing. The friends then go a field, where they drink and laugh. The friends then start making a human pyramid, but fail. The couples start hanging out alone and kissing. From this on, the band is shown playing in the rain. The friends are then shown going to a swimming pool and start swimming, with a couple kissing underwater. They then run through a carpark and stand by the railings to see the sunrise. The couples are then kissing again, and the music video ends with the band leaving their instruments.
FN'MTV.
The video for "Thunder" was released on the MTV summer special "Friday Night MTV" (or "FNMTV").

Colin Powell
politics
Colin Luther Powell, KCB (Honorary), MSC,
(born April 5, 1937) is a retired General in the United States Army. He was the 65th United States Secretary of State (2001-2005), serving under President George W. Bush. He was the first African American appointed to that position. As a General in the United States Army, Powell also served as National Security Advisor (1987–1989) and as Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff (1989–1993), holding the latter position during the Gulf War. He was the first and, so far, the only African American to serve on the Joint Chiefs of Staff.

Emiliano Zapata
politics
Emiliano Zapata Salazar (August 8, 1879 - April 10, 1919) was a leader in the Mexican Revolution, which started in 1910.
Salazar was ambushed and shot by Mexican troops in 1919. Zapata is a folk hero in Mexico to this day.

Jack Peddie
sports
Jack Peddie is a former football player.

Nwankwo Kanu
sports
Nwankwo Kanu (born 1 August, 1976) is a football player. He plays for Portsmouth and Nigeria national team.

Jay-Jay Okocha
sports
Jay-Jay Okocha (born 14 August, 1973) is a former football player. He has played for Nigeria national team.

Nicky Butt
sports
Nicky Butt is a football player. He has played for England national team.

Mike Adamle
sports
Michael David Adamle (born October 4, 1949; pronounced) is a sports personality and former National Football League player. He is perhaps best known as the co-host of the cult-favorite "American Gladiators" series for seven years.

Good (Morphine album)
music
"Good" is the first album by rock band Morphine. It was released in 1992.

Cure for Pain
music
"Cure For Pain" was the second album released by the band Morphine. It was put out on the Rykodisc label in 1993. The tracks "Sheila" and "In Spite of Me" were part of the soundtrack of the 1994 independent movie "Spanking the Monkey".

James Forrestal
politics
James Vincent Forrestal (February 15, 1892 – May 22, 1949) was a United States Secretary of the Navy and the first United States Secretary of Defense.

Mark Lambert (rugby union)
sports
Mark Lambert born 19 February, 1985 in England is a rugby union player for Harlequins in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a prop.

James Inglis (rugby union)
sports
James Inglis born 26 August, 1986 in England is a rugby union player for Harlequins in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a second-row.

Alex Rogers
sports
Alex Rogers born 16 December, 1986 in England is a rugby union player for Harlequins in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a prop.

Gareth Williams (rugby union)
sports
Gareth Williams born 7 March, 1988 in Wales is a rugby union player for Harlequins in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a scrum-half.

David Blaney
sports
David Blaney born 3 March, 1979 in England is a rugby union player for Bristol Rugby in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a hooker.

Ryan Prosser
sports
Ryan Prosser born 10 July, 1988 in England is a rugby union player for Bristol Rugby in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a hooker.

Iain Grieve
sports
Iain Grieve born 19 February, 1987 in Jwaneng, Botswana is a rugby union player for Bristol Rugby in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a back-row.

Chris Ashwin
sports
Chris Ashwin (born 19 November 1987 in Gloucester) is a rugby union player for Bristol Rugby in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a fly-half.

Lachlan Mitchell
sports
Lachlan Mitchell born 30 September, 1987 in Australia is a rugby union player for the London Wasps in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a centre.

Charlie Beech
sports
Charlie Beech born 21 July, 1987 in Stevenage, England is a rugby union player for the London Wasps in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a prop.

Hugo Ellis
sports
Hugo Ellis born 4 February, 1988 in Isleworth, London, England is a rugby union player for the London Wasps in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a back-row.

Ross Batty
sports
Ross Batty born 20 September, 1986 in England is a rugby union player for the Newcastle Falcons in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a hooker.

Tim Swinson
sports
Tim Swinson born 17 February, 1987 in London, England is a rugby union player for the Newcastle Falcons in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a lock.

Rory Clegg
sports
Rory Clegg born 6 January, 1990 in Germany is a rugby union player for the Newcastle Falcons in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a fly-half.

Paul Cook (footballer)
sports
Paul Anthony Cook (born February 22, 1967 in Liverpool) is an English former footballer and the current manager of Sligo Rovers F.C. in Ireland. He had a lengthy career, playing for a number of clubs in the Football League as a left sided or central midfielder before retiring from the game in 2006.

David Cook (singer)
music
David Cook is an American Alternative rock and Post grunge singer-songwriter. He was born on December 20, 1982. His hometown is Blue Springs, Missouri.
American Idol.
In 2008, David was crowned the winner of American Idol 7.

Mumia Abu-Jamal
media
Mumia Abu-Jamal (born Wesley Cook on April 24, 1954) is an American who was convicted and sentenced to death for the 1981 murder of police officer Daniel Faulkner. Before his arrest he was a Black Panther Party activist, taxi driver, and journalist. Since his conviction, his case has received international attention and he has become a controversial cultural icon. Supporters and opponents disagree on the appropriateness of the death penalty, if he is guilty, or if he received a fair trial. During his imprisonment he has published several books and other commentaries, notably "Live from Death Row". As of 2008, his legal appeals are still unsettled and he is a prisoner at State Correctional Institution Greene near Waynesburg, Pennsylvania.

Ronaldinho
sports
Ronaldinho (born 21 March, 1980) is a Brazilian football player. He plays for Milan and Brazil national team.

Les Ferdinand
sports
Les Ferdinand is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Chris Sutton
sports
Chris Sutton is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Teddy Sheringham
sports
Teddy Sheringham is a former football player. He has played(plays for England national team.

Dwight Yorke
sports
Dwight Yorke is a football player from Trinidad and Tobago. He plays for Sunderland and Trinidad and Tobago national team.

Uwe Seeler
sports
Uwe Seeler is a former football player. He has played for Hamburger SV and Germany national team.

Herbert Chapman
sports
Herbert Chapman is a former football player.

Jari Litmanen
sports
Jari Litmanen is a former football player. He plays for Lahti and Finland national team.

Denis Compton
sports
Denis Compton is a former English football player. He has played for Arsenal.

Jan Mølby
sports
Jan Mølby is a former football player. He has played for Denmark national team.

Tore André Flo
sports
Tore André Flo is a former football player. He has played for Norway national team.

Iván Zamorano
sports
Iván Zamorano is a former football player. He has played for Chile national team.

Marc Jones
sports
Marc Jones born 3 April, 1987 in Pontypridd, Wales is a rugby union player for the Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a hooker.

Mark Hopley
sports
Mark Hopley born 1 May, 1984 in Crewe, England is a rugby union player for Northampton Saints in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a flanker.

Hal Colebatch
politics
Sir Harry Pateshall Colebatch (29 March 1872 – 12 February 1953) was the 12th Premier of Western Australia from 17 April to 17 May 1919. He was from the Nationalist Party. He was Premier for the shortest time in Western Australian history. This was because he was a member of the upper house of Parliament and it was usual for the Premier to be from the lower house. When he could not find a position in the lower house he resigned.

Henry Lefroy
politics
Sir Henry Bruce Lefroy (24 March 1854 – 19 March 1930) was the 11th Premier of Western Australia from 28 June 1917 to 17 April 1919. He was from the Nationalist Party.

Chevvy Pennycook
sports
Chevvy Pennycook born 6 April, 1987 in Bristol, England is a rugby union player for Bristol Rugby in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a flanker.

John Scaddan
politics
John Scaddan (4 August 1876 – 21 November 1934) was the 10th Premier of Western Australia from 7 October 1911 to 27 July 1916. He was from the Labor Party.

Mathew Turner
sports
Mathew Turner born 18 January, 1988 in Cape Town, South Africa is a rugby union player for Bristol Rugby in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as on the wing.

Mark Odejobi
sports
Mark Odejobi born 18 January, 1988 in London, England is a rugby union player for London Wasps in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a winger.

Damien Varley
sports
Damien Varley born 29 October, 1983 in Ireland is a rugby union player for London Wasps in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a winger.

Theodor Heuss
politics
Theodor Heuss (31th of January 1884 – 12th of December 1963) was a German politician. He was the first person elected to a regular term as President of the Federal Republic of Germany.
Heuss was born in Brackenheim, near Heilbronn.
He studied art history and state studies in Munich and Berlin.
He received his doctorate in 1905 in Munich.
In 1908 he married Elly Heuss-Knapp (1881-1952).
He worked for a political magazine from 1908 to 1912, afterwards for a regional newspaper.
In 1910 he joined the Progressive People's Party and stayed there until 1918.
Between 1923 and 1926 he published the magazine Die Deutsche Nation ("The German Nation")
Heuss became a member of the German Democratic Party (Deutsche Demokratische Partei, DDP) and was a member of parliament for two periods.
In 1933 Heuss voted in favour of the Enabling Act (Ermächtigungsgesetz) against his personal attitude, fellowing his party.
After World War II Heuss was the first Minister of Culture in Baden-Württemberg.
He was one of the founders of the Free Democratic Party of Germany after WW II.
In 1949 he was elected to the first President of the Federal Republic of Germany.

Ferdinand Lassalle
politics
Ferdinand Lassalle (11 April 1825 — 31 August 1864) was a German jurist and socialist politician.
Lassalle was born in Breslau. His father sent hin to a business school in Leipzig. Lassalle changed to the University of Breslau. He later studied in Berlin.
He studied Philosophy, Philology (Latin and Ancient Greek) and Law.
Lassalle took part in the revolutions of 1848-49. He was put into prison and later banned from Berlin. He lived in Düsseldorf that time. In 1859, Lassalle returned to Berlin.
Lassalle was a liberal politician in the early 1860s. The liberals had some struggles with Otto von Bismarck. Lassalle though about the live conditions of the working class. He found that the idea of self-help would not help the working class people. This led him to become a member of the Communist league. There he was in opposition to Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels.
Lassalle founded the Allgemeiner Deutscher Arbeiterverein (General German Workers' Association, ADAV) in 1863. This party later became the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD).
Lassalle was killed in a duel.

Hans-Dietrich Genscher
politics
Hans-Dietrich Genscher (born March 21, 1927) is a German politician. He was born at Reideburg, near Halle.
Genscher served in World War II from 1943 to 1945. He joined the Nazi Party in the age of 18. After the war, he studied economics and law in Halle and Leipzig. He joined the East German Liberal Democratic Party (LDPD) in 1946.
In 1952, Genscher fled to West Germany. There he joined the Free Democratic Party (FDP). He passed his second state examination in law in Hamburg in 1954. After that, he became a solicitor in Bremen. In 1965, Genscher was elected to the West German parliament for the first time. From 1969 to 1974, he was Home Secretary under Chancellor Willy Brandt.
Gensher was Foreign Minister and Vice Chancellor of Germany from 1974 to 1982 under Helmut Schmidt. Two weeks later, he began to serve in the same positions under Helmut Kohl. He served the second time from 1982 to 1992. He was Germany's longest serving Foreign Minister and Vice Chanellor of Germany|Vice Chancellor.

Jonny Kennedy (rugby union)
sports
Jonny Kennedy (born 16 February 1990) is an English rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a centre or on the wing.

Franz Müntefering
politics
Franz Müntefering (born January, 16th, 1940) is a German politician. He is Chairman of the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SPD).
Müntefering was born in Neheim-Hüsten near Arnsberg.
After his school time he was taught to became an industrial salesman.
He joined the Social Democratic Party in 1966.
He was member of the Bundestag (Federal Parliament) from 1974 to 1992 and has been member again since 1998.
1998 he was a member of the Landtag (state parliament) of North Rhine-Westphalia.
From 1992 to 1995 he was Secretary of Social affairs in the State of North Rhine-Westphalia.
From 1995 to 2001 Party Chairman in that state.
From 1995 to 1998 he was Bundesgeschäftsführer (federal executive director) of the SPD.
In 1998 he became Secretary for Transport and Infrastructure of Germany under Chancellor Gerhard Schröder.
From 1999 to 2002 he was Secretary General of the Social Democratic Party.
From 2002 to 2005 fraction leader in the Bundestag.
He was Party Chairman of the SPD from 2004 to 2005.
Uo from 2005 to 2007 he was Secretary for Working and Social Affairs and Vice Chancellor of Germany under Angela Merkel in her Grand Coaltion.
In 2007 he gave up all his jobs - excepted the mandate in Federal Parliament - for caring his ill wife.
After the death of his wife he returned.
In 2008 he became Party Chairman of the SPD again.

Nick Royle
sports
Nick Royle is an English rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a winger.

Carl Fearns
sports
Carl Fearns (born 28 May 1989 in Liverpool, England) is a rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a back-row.

James Gaskell
sports
James Gaskell (born 20 May 1990 in Crewe, England) is a rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a lock.

Martin Halsall
sports
Martin Halsall (born 25 December 1984 in Blackpool, England) is a rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a prop.

Alex Shaw
sports
Alex Shaw (born 31 March 1987 in Maidstone, Kent, England) is a rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a back-row.

Chris Leck
sports
Chris Leck (born 21 May, 1986 in Manchester, England) is a rugby union player for Sale Sharks in the Guinness Premiership. He plays as a scrum-half.

John Ashcroft
music
John David Ashcroft (born May 9, 1942) is an American politician who was the 79th United States Attorney General. He served during the first term of President George W. Bush from 2001 until 2005. Ashcroft was previously the Governor of Missouri (1985–1993) and a U.S. Senator from Missouri (1995–2001).

Ron Simmons
sports
Ron Simmons (born May 15, 1958) is an American retired professional wrestler and retired American football player.

Bleach (album)
music
"Bleach" was the first album by the American grunge band, Nirvana. It did not become popular when it was released, but when Nirvana's second album "Nevermind" was released in 1991, many Nirvana fans discovered "Bleach".

Oliver Wolcott, Jr.
politics
Oliver Wolcott Jr. (January 11, 1760 June 1, 1833) was United States Secretary of the Treasury from 1795 to 1800 and governor of Connecticut from 1817 to 1827.

Evan Longoria
sports
Evan Michael "Longo" Longoria is a third baseman for the Tampa Bay Rays. Longoria is in his Rookie year in Major League Baseball, where he has won the American League Rookie of the Year award.

Soulja Boy
music
DeAndre ellis`, also known as Soulja Boy, is an American rapper. He is widely known for the songs "Crank That (Soulja Boy)" and "Tell 'Em". Though he has been commercially successful, Way is often criticized for making mindless and nonsensical music that carries no message.

Zlatko Zahovič
sports
Zlatko Zahovič is a former football player. He has played for Slovenia national team.

Francis Lee
sports
Francis Lee is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Shaun Goater
sports
Shaun Goater is a football player. He plays for Bermuda Hogges.

Vladimír Šmicer
sports
Vladimír Šmicer is a football player. He plays for Slavia Prague.

Dietmar Hamann
sports
Dietmar Hamann is a German football player. He plays for Manchester City.

Arthur Rowley
sports
George Arthur Rowley, (21 April 1926 – 19 December 2002) was an English football striker. He holds the record for the most career goals in The Football League, 434 from 619 games. He was the younger brother of Manchester United legend Jack Rowley. He was shortlisted for inclusion into the English Football Hall of Fame in 2008.

Laurie Cunningham
sports
Laurie Cunningham is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Glenn Hoddle
sports
Glenn Hoddle is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Robert Pirès
sports
Robert Pirès is a football player. He plays for Villarreal.

Zoran Mirković
sports
Zoran Mirković is a former football player. He has played for Serbia and Montenegro national team.

Jimmy Floyd Hasselbaink
sports
Jimmy Floyd Hasselbaink is a former football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Andrew Cole
sports
Andrew Cole is a football player. He currently has no team.

Steve Bruce
sports
Steve Bruce (born December 31, 1960) is an English football manager and former player. He is currently the manager of Wigan Athletic F.C.. Bruce was best known for playing for Manchester United where he was captain.

Cornthwaite Rason
politics
Sir Cornthwaite Hector William James Rason (18 June 1858 – 15 March 1927) was the 7th Premier of Western Australia from 25 August 1905 until 7 May 1906.

Henry Daglish
politics
Henry Daglish (18 November 1866 – 16 August 1920) was the 6th Premier of Western Australia from 10 August 1904 to 25 August 1905. He was the first Western Australia Premier from the Labor Party and the first from any organised political party.

Walter James
politics
Sir Walter Hartwell James (29 March 1863 – 3 January 1943) was the 5th Premier of Western Australia from 1 July 1902 to 10 August 1904.

Alf Morgans
politics
Alfred Edward Morgans (17 February 1850 – 10 August 1933) was the 4th Premier of Western Australia from 21 November to 23 December 1901.

John Forrest
politics
Sir John Forrest (22 August 1847 – 2 September 1918) was the 1st Premier of Western Australia from 22 December 1890 – 15 February 1901.

Into the Fire (album)
music
"Into the Fire" is the fifth studio album by the Canadian rock artist Bryan Adams. Released on March 30, 1987 through A&M Records, the album was a huge commercial success selling over 2 million units worldwide, peaking at number 7 on the US "Billboard" 200 chart and reaching high positions in charts worldwide. It was recorded at Adams' home in London, England.
Six singles were released from the album: "Heat of the Night", "Hearts on Fire", "Victim of Love", "Only the Strong Survive", "Into the Fire" and "Another Day".
Into the Fire Tour.
On May, 1987 Adams startet the Into the Fire tour where his first performance was in Shreveport, Louisianna with his backing band. Adams first stop of the UK leg of the tour at the Prince’s Trust charity concert at Wembley Stadium, London. Adams would later heads back to the United States to continue the American leg of the tour, Adams appeared on The David Letterman Show. Adams would later sell out two nights in a row at Madison Square Garden in New York City and was visited backstage by Brian Wilson of the Beach Boys, he would later get a sold out show in Toronto, Ontario. The tour continued through the Western United States. Adams heads back to the UK on October 13 in Newcastle, England. Adams sold out four nights in a row at Wembley Arena in London. Adams starts his tour in mainland Europe and Adams previous album "Reckless" achieves gold status in Sweden and "Into The Fire" achieves gold status in Switzerland and later he travels to Dublin, Ireland. Adams started the Asian leg of the tour and ended up selling out ten concerts, five of which were in Tokyo's Budokan. "Into the Fire" ends up being certified platinum with sales over 100,000 copies sold in Japan. Adams headed back to Europe and played in East Berlin and later West Berlin. The last concert part of the Into the Fire tour was played in Locarno, Switzerland.

Cuts Like a Knife
music
"Cuts Like a Knife" is the third album by the Canadian rock artist Bryan Adams. Released on January, 1983 through A&M Records, the album became a big hit in Canada when it was released. Outside Canada and the United States the album didn't do so good. After the release of Reckless the album would chart on the British album chart and would later be a Silver Record by the BPI. It was made at Little Mountain Sound, in Vancouver, Canada.
Three singles were released from the album: "Straight from the Heart", "Cuts Like a Knife" and "This Time", the three made Adams very popular.

You Want It You Got It
music
"You Want It You Got It" is the second album by Bryan Adams, and was released in 1981 (see 1981 in music). The album was to be called "Bryan Adams Hasn't Heard Of You Either" but the record company wanted him to change the title to something safer.
The first single "Lonely Nights" was a big hit in the US, and two other singles 'Coming Home' and 'Fits Ya Good' were top 40 hits in Canada.
Many songs from this album were covered by other artists, they are "Lonely Nights" by Uriah Heep, "Jealousy" by Prism, "Tonight" by Randy Meisner and "Fits Ya Good" by Tove Naess and more others.
After Dave Taylor listened to this album, he decided to become Bryan Adams' bass player.

Bryan Adams (album)
music
"Bryan Adams" is the first album by Canadian rock singer Bryan Adams. It was released in February 1980 by A&M Records. 'Hidin' From Love' went to #64 on Canada's RPM 100 Singles chart and 'Give Me Your Love' went to #91 on the same chart.
In early 1978, Bryan Adams and Jim Vallance made a song-writing duo together. They made the album in 1979 and released it in February 1980.
The first single was "Hidin' from Love" in 1980 (#43 on the Billboard dance charts) the next one was "Give Me Your Love" and then "Remember".

On a Day Like Today (album)
music
"On a Day Like Today" is an album by Canadian singer-songwriter Bryan Adams, released in 1998 (see 1998 in music).

Erich Mende
politics
Erich Mende (28th of October 1916 - 6th of May 1998 in Bonn) was a German jurist and politician for the Christian-Democratic Union of Germany and the Free Democratic Party of Germany.
Mende was born in Groß Strehlitz, near Oppolne.
1936 he made his abitur. Afterwards he had to do his working service for the state and then his military service.
Up from 1938 he was an officer. At the end of World War II he was major.
After he was set free as prisoner of war, his hometown was made Polish. He found a new home in the Ruhr area. Then he studied laws in Cologne and Bonn.
In 1949 he finished his doctorade thesis.
In 1946 he joined the FDP.
He was Secretary for Intra-German Relations (Bundesminister für gesamtdeutsche Fragen) from 1963 to 1966.
In the same time he was Vice Chancellor of West Germany.

Petra Kelly
politics
Petra Karin Kelly (23rd of November 1947 - 1st of October 1992) was a German politician, peace activist and one of the founders of the Green Party of Germany.
Kelly was born in Günzburg. Her stepfather was an US officer, her original father and her mother were German.
Her family moved to the USA in 1959.
She went to school in both countries.
From 1966 to 1970 he studied political sciences in Washington D.C..
Kelly campaigned for Robert F. Kennedy in the 1968 U.S. elections.
She admired Martin Luther King and was an anti Vietnam War protester.
She graduated 1970 in Washington and got another exam 1971 in Amsterdam.
Then she returned to West Germany.
She worked for the European Commission in Brussels from 1971 to 1983.
She was one of the founders of the Green Party in Germany in 1979 - the first Green Party worldwide.
From 1983 to 1990 she was member of the Bundestag for the Greens.
Kelly received the Right Livelihood Award in 1982.
In 1992 she died together with her partner Bert Bastian in Bonn by a common suicide.

John Henry Holland
science
John Henry Holland (2 February, 1929) is an American scientist and Professor of Psychology and Professor of Electrical Engineering and Computer Science at the University of Michigan, Ann Arbor. He is a pioneer in complex system and nonlinear science. He is known as the father of genetic algorithms.

Nusrat Fateh Ali Khan
sports
Nusrat Fateh Ali Khan (Urdu: نصرت فتح على خاں, October 13, 1948 – August 16, 1997), was a Pakistani musician. He was a singer of qawwali, the devotional music of the Sufis (a mystical tradition in Islam). In 2006, "Time" magazine included him in their list of "Asian Heroes'.
Traditionally, qawwali is a performing art which is passed down with in the family. Nusrat's family has been performing qawwali for the last 600 years. Among other honorary titles given to him, Nusrat was called "Shahenshah-e-Qawwali", meaning "The Emperor of Qawwali".

George Wythe
politics
George Wythe (1726 – June 8, 1806), was a lawyer, judge, prominent law professor and "Virginia's foremost classical scholar." Wythe's signature is on the list of seven Virginia signatories on the United States Declaration of Independence.
Wythe served as mayor of Williamsburg, Virginia from 1768 to 1769. In 1779 he was appointed to the newly created Chair of Law at William and Mary, becoming the first law professor in the United States. Wythe's pupils included Thomas Jefferson, Henry Clay, James Monroe, and John Marshall.

Jason Varitek
sports
Jason Varitek (born April 11, 1972 in Rochester, Michigan) is an American baseball player. Varikek is a player for the Boston Red Sox.

Süddeutsche Zeitung
media
The Süddeutsche Zeitung is the most-read nationwide quality-newspaper in Germany.
Newspaper.
The Süddeutsche Zeitung is a liberal newspaper.
The national edition features four sections: Politics, Culture, Economy and Sports. For Munich and Bavaria there are local and regional news, too.
There are 6 newspapers a week.
It has the most readers exepted the yellow press newspaper Bild-Zeitung in Germany.
Actually there are about 450,000 newspaper sold every day.
History.
The Süddeutsche Zeitung was published first time on October 6, 1945.
It was the first newspaper in Bavaria, which got a licence from the U.S. military gouvernment after World War II.

Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung
media
The Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung is a conserative newspaper in Germany.
Newspaper.
The Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung is the ledaing conserative newspaper in Germany.
There are 6 newspapers a week and supplementary the Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung on sundays.
There are about 360,000 newspapers sold every day.
It is the German newspaper with the widest circulation abroad. It is sold to 148 countries every day.
History.
The first edition of the FAZ published on November 1, 1949. Its founding editor was Erich Welter. Some editors had worked for the Frankfurter Zeitung, which was banned in 1943.

Frankfurter Rundschau
media
The Frankfurter Rundschau is a nationwide newspaper in Germany.
Newspaper.
The Frankfurter Rundschau is a left-winged liberal newspaper in Germany. Its position is often similar to the positions of the trade unions.
There are 6 newspapers a week.
It has a regional part for Hesse and a local part for Frankfurt am Main, too.
There are about 180,000 newapapers sold daily.
The Franfurter Rundschau is the first newspaper in Germany in the tabloid format.
History.
The Frankfurter Rundschau was the second newspaper starting in Germany after the World War II on the 1st of August 1945.
And it was the first newspaper in the U.S. sector.
The licence was handed over to the first team of editors consiting of Emil Carlebach, Hans Etzkorn, Wilhelm Karl Gerst, Otto Grossmann, Wilhelm Knothe, Paul Rodemann and Arno Rudert.
There were social democrats, political katholics and communists, who had spent years in the resistance and nazi concentration camps or in exile.

Die Zeit
media
Die Zeit is a nationwide weekly newspaper in Germany.
Newspaper.
Die Zeit is a weekly newspaper for well-educated people in Germany. It has the biggest working marked annonces for university positions in Germany.
It is a liberal newspaper.
The rossorts are: politics, dossier, economy, knownledge / scinces, feuilleton, literature, life (style), travelling and Chances (profession, work, education).
There are about 480,000 newspapers sold weekly.
History.
The first Die Zeit was published on the 21st of February 1946 in Hamburg.
Since that day it is published in Hamburg weekly.

Richard R. Schrock
science
Richard Royce Schrock (born on January 4, 1945) is an American Professor of Chemistry. He was awarded the Nobel Prize for chemistry in 2005 for his work on the metathesis reaction used in organic chemistry.
Professor Schrock was born in Berne, Indiana, and went to Mission Bay High School in San Diego, California. He was given a B.A. degree in 1967) from the University of California, Riverside and a Ph.D., in 1971, from Harvard University. At Harvard he was a student of J. A. Osborn. Between 1971 and 1972, he studied at the University of Cambridge with Lord Jack Lewis. In 1972, he began working for George Parshall in the Experimental Station of the E. I. du Pont de Nemours and Company in Wilmington, Delaware. He joined the faculty of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology in 1975 and became a professor in 1980.
Schrock now works as the Frederick G. Keyes Professor of Chemistry, at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT). He has worked there since 1989. Schrock is a member of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences, National Academy of Sciences and was elected to the Board of Overseers of Harvard University in 2007.
He married Nancy Carlson in 1971 and has two children, Andrew and Eric. Nancy Schrock is the Thomas F. Peterson, Jr. Conservator of Special Collections for the MIT Libraries. The family live in Winchester, Massachusetts.
Nobel prize.
In 2005, Professor Schrock received the Nobel Prize in Chemistry, along with Robert H. Grubbs and Yves Chauvin, for his work on olefin metathesis, wich is a method of organic synthesis. Schrock was the first scientist to make sense of 'black box' olefin metathesis. Olefin Metathesis is used when making petroleum and reduces the amount of dirty waste.
Professor Schrocks work is continuing with metathesis as well as projects such as dinitrogen fixation and single molecule catalysts which make ammonia from dinitrogen, similar to nitrogenase enzymes in biology.
Schrock carbenes are named after Schrock.

Dion Dublin
sports
Dion Dublin is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Stéphane Henchoz
sports
Stéphane Henchoz is a former football player. He has played for Switzerland national team.

Milan Baroš
sports
Milan Baroš is a football player. He plays for Galatasaray and Czech Republic national team.

Gabriel Batistuta
sports
Gabriel Batistuta (born 1 February, 1969) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team.

José de Acosta
science
José de Acosta (September/October 1539– February 15 1600), was a Spanish 16th-century Jesuit missionary and naturalist in Latin America. He wrote several works including and.

Alex Turner (musician)
music
'Alex Turner (born 5 July 1986) is the lead singer and guitarist of the Arctic Monkeys. He was born and raised in Sheffield.

Zohaib Hassan
music
Zohaib Hassan, younger brother of iconic Pakistani pop singer Nazia Hassan was born in Karachi on November 18, 1966.

Nazia Hassan
music
Nazia Hassan (Urdu: نازیہ حسن) singer (April 3, 1965 - August 31, 2000) and Zohaib Hassan (Urdu: زوہیب حسن), (born November 18, 1966) were a singing sensation and pioneers of the Pakistani pop music scene during the 1980s.

Bilawal Bhutto Zardari
politics
Bilawal Bhutto Zardari (Urdu: بلاول بھٹو زرداری) (born 21 September 1988) is co-chairman of the Pakistan Peoples Party, and the eldest child and only son of the late Pakistani politician and former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto and her husband Asif Ali Zardari, the President of Pakistan. Chairman Bhutto Zardari is also the grandson of Zulfikar Ali Bhutto, the first popularly elected Prime Minister of Pakistan and father of Benazir Bhutto, who held the distinction of being the first female head of government of any Islamic country.

Muhammad Ijaz-ul-Haq
politics
Muhammad Ijaz-ul-Haq (Urdu: محمد اعجاز الحق) (born 1953) is a prominent Pakistani politician and former Federal Minister for Religious Affairs of the Pakistan. Entering Pakistani politics following the 1988 death of his father, President of Pakistan General Muhammad Zia-ul-Haq,

William Sterndale Bennett
music
Sir William Sterndale Bennett (born Sheffield, 13 April 1816; died London, 1 February 1875) was an English composer and pianist.
Bennett's father Robert Bennett was an organist. He was still young when his father died, and he was brought up at Cambridge by his grandfather, who gave him his first music lessons. In 1824 he was a choirboy with the choir of King's College chapel. In 1826 he entered the Royal Academy of Music, where he spent ten years studying. His piano teachers were W. H. Holmes and Cipriani Potter, and he learned composition from Charles Lucas and Dr Crotch. It was during this time that he wrote some of his most popular works. He often went to Germany, and his music shows the influence of German composers of his time, especially Mendelssohn. At one of the famous Leipzig Gewandhaus concerts he played his third piano concerto, which the audience liked very much. Robert Schumann said that Bennett was the most musical Englishman and an "angel of music".
When he returned to England he became organist of St Anne's Chapel, Wandsworth. In the same year (1834) he composed his Overture to "Parisina", and his Concerto in C minor, a work in which he shows that he had studied the music of Mozart. An unpublished Concerto in F minor, and the Overture to "The Naiads", impressed the firm of Broadwood and Sons so much in 1836 that they offered the composer a year in Leipzig, where the "Naiads" Overture was performed at a Gewandhaus concert on 13 February 1837. Bennett visited Leipzig a second time in 1840-1841, when he composed his "Caprice in E for pianoforte and orchestra" and his overture "Die Waldnymphe" ("The Wood Nymphs").
He settled in London, spending most of his time teaching. In 1844 he married Mary Anne. He was made Professor of Music, Cambridge University in 1856, the year in which he became permanent conductor of the Philharmonic Society. He held this post until 1866, when he became principal of the Royal Academy of Music. He spent a lot of his time and energy teaching, and the music he composed during this time was not as good as the music from his early years.
Bennett wrote almost all kinds of music except opera. His best works include piano music (his three sketches, "The Lake", "The Millstream" and "The Fountain", and his third piano concerto); orchestral music (his Symphony in G minor, and his overture "The Naiads"); and vocal music (his cantata "The May Queen", written for the first Leeds Festival in 1858. For the Golden Jubilee of the Philharmonic Society he wrote the overture "Paradise and the Peri" in 1862. He also wrote a sacred cantata, "The Woman of Samaria", which was first performed at the Birmingham Triennial Music Festival in 1867.
In 1870 he was given an honorary degree by the University of Oxford A year later he was knighted, and in 1872 a scholarship to the Royal Academy of Music was formed in his name. Shortly before his death he produced a sonata called "The Maid of Orleans" based on Schiller's play. He died at his home in St John's Wood, London.

Joe Kinnear
sports
Joe Kinnear is a former football player. He has played for Republic of Ireland national team. He also coaches football.

Matt Busby
sports
Matt Busby is a former football player. He has played for Scotland national team.

Brett Emerton
sports
Brett Emerton is a football player. He plays for Blackburn Rovers and Australia national team.

David Rocastle
sports
David Rocastle is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Jorge Mautner
music
Jorge Mautner is a Brazilian writer and singer, born in Rio de Janeiro in 1941. He is the creator of the Moviment of Kaos.

Andy McKee
music
Andy McKee is a fingerstyle guitarist from Topeka, Kansas. He became famous through his YouTube videos in 2006. The most famous one, "Drifting", has over 17,500,000 views.

Hans-Christian Ströbele
politics
Hans-Christian Ströbele (7th of June 1939 in Halle) is a German politician and lawyer.
Ströbele made his school exam in Marl (Westphalia).
Then he studied laws in Heidelberg and Berlin (at the Free University of Berlin).
He has been a lawyer in Berlin (until 1990 West-Berlin) since 1969.
He was involved in the student revolt of 1968.
He was one of the lawyers of the Rote Armee Fraktion (RAF) terrorists in the Stammheim trial.
From 1970 to 1974 he was member of the Social Democratic Party of Germany.
Later he was one of the founders of the "Alternative List for Democracy and Environmental Protection," which later became the Berlin section of the Green Party of Germany.

Mark Hughes
sports
Leslie Mark Hughes (born November 1, 1963) is a Welsh football manager and former player. He is currently the manager of Manchester City. Hughes played for Manchester United, Chelsea, and Barcelona during the 1980s and 1990s.

Albert Gallatin
politics
Abraham Alfonse Albert Gallatin (January 29, 1761 – August 12, 1849) was a Swiss-American ethnologist, linguist, politician, diplomat, Congressman, and the longest-serving United States Secretary of the Treasury. He was also a founder of New York University.

Landon Donovan
sports
Landon Donovan is a football player. He plays for Los Angeles Galaxy and United States national team.

Brad Friedel
sports
Brad Friedel is a football player. He has played for United States national team.

Nílton Santos
sports
Nílton Santos is a former football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

DaMarcus Beasley
sports
DaMarcus Beasley (born May 24, 1982 in Fort Wayne, Indiana) is a American soccer player. He plays for Rangers of the Scottish Football League and United States national team.

Alecko Eskandarian
sports
Alecko Eskandarian is a American football player. He plays for Chivas USA and United States national team.

Give 'Em Enough Rope
music
"Give 'Em Enough Rope" is the second album by The Clash. It was released in 1978. In the United States, this was their first offical album because it was realsed before the U.S. version of "The Clash"). The album was well liked and got to number 2 in the UK chart, and number 128 in the U.S.
Track listing.
All songs were written by Joe Strummer and Mick Jones, except where noted. All songs were arranged by The Clash. All lead vocals were by Strummer, except "Stay Free" by Jones.

St. Anger
music
St. Anger is the 8th studio album by american thrash metal band Metallica. It was released on June 5, 2003.

Rust in Peace
music
Rust in Peace is the fourth album by American thrash metal band, Megadeth. It was released on September 24, 1990.

Peace Sells... but Who's Buying?
music
Peace Sells... but Who's Buying? is the second studio album by thrash metal band Megadeth. It was released in November 1986. Dave Mustaine wrote all of the songs except for I Ain't Superstitious.
Track listing.
All songs written by Dave Mustaine, except where noted.

Hermann Carl Vogel
science
Hermann Carl Vogel (born April 3 1841, died August 13 1907) was a German astronomer. He was born in Leipzig, Kingdom of Saxony.
Vogel was one of the first astronomers to use a spectroscope in astronomy. He used it to read the chemicals on planets far away and to measure the time it takes the Sun to spin. He could read it by measuring the Doppler effect.
In 1882, Vogel became the Director at the Astrophysical Observatory Potsdam and he is best known for some work there in 1890. Vogel found that the colour of some stars changed over time, becoming red and then later becoming blue. His idea was that the star was moving toward and then away from the Earth, and that the colour changes were the because of the Doppler effect. Each of these stars seemed to be orbiting around a hidden star as if they were double-stars but the second star could never be seen, only known by the Doppler effect.
Volgel proved that Algol was a double star that could not be seen (spectroscopic binary star) and it was one of the first of these double stars proven to exist.
Medals of Hermann Carl Vogel.
Parts of space named after Hermann Carl Vogel

So Far, So Good... So What!
music
"So Far, So Good... So What!" is the third studio album by thrash metal band Megadeth. It was released on January 19, 1988.

Jocky Scott
sports
John 'Jocky' Alexander Scott (born January 14, 1948 in Aberdeen) is a Scottish football manager and former player. He is currently the manager of Dundee F.C.

Chris Gbandi
sports
Chris Gbandi is a football player. He plays for Haugesund and Liberia national team.

Matthew Wolfenden
sports
Matthew Wolfenden is a football player. He plays for Oldham Athletic.

Arthur Wharton
sports
Arthur Wharton is a former football player.

Hristo Stoichkov
sports
Hristo Stoichkov is a former football player. He has played for Bulgaria national team.

Sandy Martens
sports
Sandy Martens is a football player. He has played for Belgium national team.

C. B. Fry
media
C. B. Fry is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Egil Olsen
sports
Egil Olsen is a former football player. He has played for Norway national team.

Franck Queudrue
sports
Franck Queudrue is a football player. He plays for Birmingham City.

Craig Bellamy
sports
Craig Bellamy is a football player. He plays for West Ham United and Wales national team.

Derlei
sports
Derlei is a football player. He plays for Sporting Portugal.

Avril Lavigne
music
Avril Ramona Lavigne Whibley (born September 27, 1984) is a Canadian singer and songwriter. At age 17, she released her first album called "Let Go" in 2002. The other two albums she had released are "Under My Skin" in 2004 and "The Best Damn Thing" in 2007. In 2004, she won a World Music Award for favorite pop/rock artist. She performed the track "Sponge Bob" for "The SpongeBob SquarePants Movie". Avril has French-Canadian grandparents, however, Avril does not speak French. Her first name, Avril, means "April" in French. Her last name, Lavigne, means "The vine" or "The vineyard" in French.
Life.
Avril was born in Ontario on September 27, 1984. She was found in a bookstore while singing songs. She started street performing. Her most famous single currently is "Girlfriend".
In February 2004, she began dating Canadian singer, Deryck Whibley, the lead singer/guitarist of pop punk band Sum 41. On June 27, 2005, Lavigne and Whibley became engaged. Whibley asked Lavigne to marry him by surprising her with a trip to Venice, Italy.
The couple married in Roman Catholic ceremony that began at 5 p.m., July 15, 2006 at a private estate in Montecito, California. Lavigne wore a Vera Wang gown and carried pearl white Australian roses. She was walked down the aisle by her father. The people who came were Steve Jocz and Cone McCaslin from Sum 41, Matthew Lavigne (Avril's older brother), and Sum 41's close friend Robb Dipple. Avril's younger sister Michelle Lavigne was one of Avril's bridesmaids. She likes the colours hot pink and black. The song "Iris" by the Goo Goo Dolls was played as their wedding song. When asked if they were ready for children they said "not right now, but somewhere down the road."
Before Let Go.
In 1999, Avril won a competition to sing with Shania Twain in Ottawa, Canada. She debuted when a recording artist saw her singing country songs in a book store.
Let Go.
In June 2002, Avril released her first album, "Let Go". It got to number one in Canada, Australia and the United Kingdom, and number two in the United States. Two months later, she won an award for the music video "Complicated", the first single off "Let Go". She made her breakthrough with "Complicated", "Sk8er Boi" then "Don't Tell Me" and the first two singles off "Let Go" both entered the top 10 in the music charts. The next February, she was nominatedd for 5 Grammy Awards, but won none.
Under My Skin.
In May 2004, her second album, "Under My Skin" was released. The next night, on "Total Request Live", she gave the middle finger to journalists after being asked for her opinions of the media, later followed by other times where she was rude and violent. Lavigne and Matthew Gerard also wrote the song "Breakaway", which became a hit for Kelly Clarkson. Lavigne also went on a tour to promote "Under My Skin" called "Live and By Surprise". The place where she was going to play was not announced until a couple days before the show. She also went on tour in 2005.
The Best Damn Thing.
In April 2007, her third album, "The Best Damn Thing" was released. The album was the first to carry the parental advisory sticker due to repeated use of swear words. Avril described the album as "fast, fun, young, bratty, aggressive, confident, cocky in a playful way... all the good stuff." "Girlfriend", the first single from the album, got to number one in seven countries. She was sued because the band The Rubinos had a song called "I Wanna Be Your Boyfriend." Avril sang in "Girlfriend": "I want to be your girlfriend," which is different to and saying "I want to" not "I wanna." She then went on a world tour, known as "The Best Damn Tour".
Music airings.
Lavigne used to be a common favourite for public radio shows. When her songs started getting too profane they stopped airing it completely sometimes, such as Radio Disney. "My Happy Ending" contained the word "shit", though it still aired because the word was edited into "stuff". "Girlfriend", a rather popular song only appeared on YouTube and her album because it contained the words "motherfucking", "hell", and "damn". Many other songs were either edited or never released on the radio.

El Hadji Diouf
sports
El Hadji Diouf is a football player. He plays for Sunderland and Senegal national team.

Dennis Wise
sports
Dennis Wise is a former football player. He has played for England national team.

Ashley Ward
sports
Ashley Ward is a former English football player.

Ivica Kralj
sports
Ivica Kralj (b. March 26, 1973) is a Montenegrin football player. He has played for Yugoslavia national team.

Flavors of Entanglement
music
Flavors of Entanglement is the seventh studio album by rock singer Alanis Morissette. This studio album was released June 10, 2008 in the United States, June 9, 2008 in Australia, and on May 30, 2008 in Europe. Singles from this album include "Underneath", "Not As We", and "In Praise of the Valnerable Man".

Studs Terkel
media
Louis "Studs" Terkel (May 16, 1912–October 31, 2008) was an American author, historian, actor, and broadcaster who lived in Chicago. He won the Pulitzer Prize in 1985 for his work "The Good War".

Mauro Zárate
sports
Mauro Zàrate (born March 18 1987 in Buenos Aires, Argentina) is a Argentine football player (footballer). He plays for Lazio.

Sami Hyypiä
sports
Sami Hyypiä (born 7 October 1973 in Porvoo) is a player from Finland playing for Liverpool F.C. and the Finland National Football Team. He was born in Porvoo, Finland. He is a defender in both of his teams and is captain of Finland and used to be the captain of Liverpool.

The Economist
media
"The Economist" is a magazine published each week in England. It was founded in 1843. It currently has about 1.3 million subscribers.
The philosophy of the magazine is "liberal, not conservative."

Yao Ming
sports
Yao Ming (; born September 12, 1980) is a Chinese professional basketball player. He plays for the Houston Rockets of the National Basketball Association (NBA). Yao is currently the tallest player in the NBA, at.
Yao was born in Shanghai, People's Republic of China. He started with the Shanghai Sharks as a teenager and played on their senior team for five years in the Chinese Basketball Association (CBA). The team won a championship in his final year. Then he entered the 2002 NBA Draft. The CBA had to release him, and he was selected by the Houston Rockets to play on their team. He had also been chosen to play for the NBA All-Star Game for all six of his seasons. However, the Rockets have not advanced past the first round of the playoffs since he joined the team, and he has also had injuries in each of the past three seasons.
His father, Yao Zhiyuan, is 2.08 m or 6 ft 10 in tall; his mother, Fengdi Fang, is 1.88 m or 6 ft 2 in tall. She was captain of the Chinese national women's basketball team. Yao's parents were the tallest couple in China when he was born.
Yao is married to Ye Li, who used to play for the China women's national basketball team. He is one of China's best-known athletes. He has sponsorships with several major companies, and he has been the richest celebrity in China for five straight years. His rookie year in the NBA was the subject of a documentary film, The Year of the Yao, and he recently wrote an autobiography titled Yao: A Life in Two Worlds.

Ray Emery
sports
Raymond "Ray" Emery (born September 28, 1982 in Hamilton, Canada) is a professional ice hockey player. He plays for the Kontinental Hockey League (KHL). Before joining the KHL, Emery played for the Ottawa Senators of the National Hockey League (NHL). Emery has been awarded many honors, most from the minor league.
Emery has been given various nicknames over his career, most goes by "Razor" and "Sugar Ray." In the 2001 NHL entry draft, Emery was chosen 99th overall by the Ottawa Senators. Emery was made starting goaltender in the 2006-07 NHL season. That year, the Senators made it to the Stanley Cup finals. On June 20, 2008, after some off-ice incidents, the Senators released Emery. Under one month later, Emery signed a one year, $2M contract with Atlant Mytishchi of the Russian KHL.
Emery has been known for getting into several altercations while playing ice hockey, a rarity for a ice-hockey goaltender.. Emery once fought two Buffalo Sabres players, Martin Biron and Andrew Peters in a line brawl during the 2006-07 NHL season. He also fought with his teammate, Brian McGrattan, during a practice in January 2008. He has also fought with teammate's Jason Spezza and Chris Neil.
Early life.
Emery was born to Charlene and Paul Emery and was the oldest of his two brothers, Nicholas and Andrew. He grew up in Cayuga, Ontario. There, he attended high school, doing well in academics and sports. He played various sports other than hockey including golf, baseball, and soccer. Emery first started off playing defense, but switched to goaltender after a shortage of goaltenders in his league. Emery was known to be very competitive and considered himself "his own worst critic." Before turning into professional hockey, Emery wanted to be an architect.

Chuck Baldwin
politics
Charles O. "Chuck" Baldwin (born May 3, 1952) is a founder-pastor of Crossroad Baptist Church in Pensacola, Florida, and 2008 presidential nominee of the Constitution Party. He was also the Constitution Party nominee for Vice President in 2004.

Darrell Castle
politics
Darrell Castle (b 1948) is an American political figure, activist and lawyer from Memphis, Tennessee, and the 2008 vice-presidential candidate of the Constitution Party

Georges Cuvier
science
Baron Georges Léopold Chrétien Frédéric Dagobert Cuvier (August 23 1769–May 13, 1832) was a French naturalist and zoologist. He was the older brother of Frédéric Cuvier (1773–1838), also a naturalist. He was a very important figure in scientific circles in Paris during the early 19th century and helped establish the fields of comparative anatomy and paleontology by comparing living animals with fossils. He is well known because he proved extinction was a fact. He was the most influential person believing in catastrophism in geology in the early 19th century. He opposed early evolutionary theories. His most famous work is the "Règne animal distribué d'après son organisation" (1817; translated into English as "The Animal Kingdom"). He died in Paris of cholera.

Samuel Chase
politics
Samuel Chase (April 17, 1741 – June 19, 1811), was an Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court and earlier was a signer of the United States Declaration of Independence as a representative of Maryland.

Rod Paige
politics
Roderick Raynor "Rod" Paige (born June 17, 1933), served as the 7th United States Secretary of Education from 2001 to 2005. He was the first African American to serve as the nation's education chief. He earned a bachelor's degree from Jackson State University in Mississippi and a Master's degree and an Ed.D from Indiana University Bloomington. He also holds an honorary doctoral degree from the University of Houston presented to him in 2000.
Paige was sitting with George W. Bush at the Emma E. Booker Elementary School in Sarasota, Florida, when Bush received the news that a second plane had hit the World Trade Center in the September 11, 2001 attacks.
On November 15, 2004, Paige announced his resignation after overseeing the President's education agenda for four years. White House domestic policy adviser Margaret Spellings was nominated as his successor. The U.S. Senate confirmed her on January 20, 2005 after Bush's inauguration for a second term.

Garfield Sobers
sports
Sir Garfield St Aubrun Sobers (born 28 July 1936 in Bridgetown, Barbados) is a former West Indian cricketer. He is often known as Garry.
Sobers is a very good batsman and highly effective bowler. He is able to bowl both fast and as a spinner. Sobers is widely regarded as the greatest all rounder of all time and, with Sir Donald Bradman, as one of the greatest cricketers of any type.

Rogério Ceni
sports
Rogério Mücke Ceni (January 22, 1973) better know as Rogério Ceni, is a Brazilian football player. He is a goalkeeper, and he plays for the football team São Paulo since 1990. Ceni has been the holder of his position since 1997.

Lies for the Liars
music
"Lies for the Liars" is a full-length album released in 2007 by The Used. It is currently their most recent album.
Hidden track.
"Smother Me" ends at 4:20 but runs to 6:17 due to the addition of a hidden track titled "Queso". "Queso" is a 30 second song that is about a quesadilla. Though it was first released on The Used's MySpace in late 2006, most fans talked about it on message boards and thought of it as a joke - it was not expected to actually be on the album.
The music.
"Lies for the Liars" contains emotive, heartfelt and sometimes sarcastic or Gothic lyrics. It has more swearing than previous The Used albums, but this is used on fewer songs. For example, "Liar Liar (Burn in Hell)" swears 10 times.
The first song "The Ripper" has an ending that makes the CD appear to be stuck, but its only part of the song.

If Only You Were Lonely
music
If Only You Were Lonely is the second album released by Hawthorne Heights. Many listeners consider the album more on the dark side, than the first Hawthorne Heights album.
The album includes a few songs where screaming is absent, and others where it is only used in a small part of the song, to make it fit better. Previously, they would just scream for the sake.
The band asked fans desperatly to mess up neyos (Pop music singer) album sales and to move copies so that people couldn't find them, but they would still be in stock showing on the computers. The main reason for that was because neyos album was being released on the same day, and hawthorne heights didn't think it was a fair competition.
It brought singles such as "This is Who We Are" and something new for the band with songs like "Decembers"

Varg Vikernes
music
Varg Vikernes(born Kristian Vikernes on February 11, 1973 near Bergen, Norway) is a black metal musician, convicted murderer, arsonist and political activist. In 1991 Vikernes created the one-man music project Burzum. Burzum quickly became important within the early Norwegian black metal scene. Later he became a part of the Heathen Front and wrote several writings on Germanic neopaganism. In a documentary on heavy metal, he was described as "the most notorious metal musician of all time."
In the early 1990's, there were black metal bands that believed in burning churches to prove their hatred for Christianity. Vikernes was found guilty of arson and the murder of another black metal singer. He was sent to prison for 21 years. Vikernes was up for parole in 2008 but it was denied.

Travis Barker
music
Travis Landon Barker (born November 14, 1975) is an American drummer. He is better known for being in the band Blink-182. He is also the drummer for +44 and has several side projects such as Box Car Racer, Transplants and Expensive Taste.

Regina Spektor
music
Regina Spektor is a singer-songwriter and pianist. She was born on February 18, 1980 in Moscow, Russia, but moved to The Bronx as a child.

Hawk Nelson Is My Friend
music
"Hawk Nelson is my Friend" is the latest album by Christian rock band Hawk Nelson. It was released on April 1, 2008.
The title was taken because they find it funny - some people still think of Hawk Nelson as a person instead of a band. It was also chosen because, Hawk Nelson like to connect with fans, and make friends with them.
Songs.
It also includes a special edition CD/DVDwith extra tracks and a paper board game. Also including a video showing how the music video for "Friend Like That" was made. It has four other videos from the band.
Singles.
"Friend Like That" was the only single from this album. It was first made available on music programmes such as Itunes. It was announced a while before, and was available on ChristmasEve 2007. However, it was taken early on websites such as YouTube.

Alonzo Church
science
Alonzo Church (June 14, 1903 – August 11, 1995) was an American mathematician and logician who made major contributions to mathematical logic and the foundations of theoretical computer science. He is best known for the lambda calculus, Church's thesis and the Church-Rosser theorem.

Bleed American
music
Bleed american is the fourth album released by Jimmy Eat World and was made available in 2001. They had to change the title in stores to "Salt sweat sugar" because they were scared "Bleed american" would be taken the wrong way, possibly in an offensive way.
Trivia.
On the second song, "Praise chorus" they mention old songs such as our house in the middle of the street. Davey Von Bohlen from The promise ring does some of the vocals for the song.
Hear you me is believed to be written for two fans who died, it's also reffering to the weezer song
The authority song makes certain references to the Pop culture - the dj never has it, j.a.m.c automatic, if those were roys headphones, you'd bet he play what goes on.

Late Registration
music
Late Registration is the second album of American singer Kanye West, released on August 30, 2005 by the label Roc-A-Fella Records. This album debut on #1 on billboard hot 100 albuns (the most popular chart on the world) selling 860 copies. Beyond this, the album also has been very well received by critics, being nominated Album Of The Year for Grammy Awards

I Am... Sasha Fierce
music
"I Am... Sasha Fierce" - is the third solo studio album by American Rhythm and Blues singer Beyoncé Knowles.
Background.
Knowles worked on the album for almost one year. This is longer than she had spent on her previous solo albums and records with her old group Destiny's Child. She said that she has co-written and co-produced over 70 songs.
I am in a different place right now and I wanted people to see the many sides of me. The music is upbeat for the dance, fun side and it is reflective, passionate and serious for the personal side. I have taken risks here. I am not afraid and my music will explain it all. There is no label or tag on my sound. It's me and I am so excited to share it with the world on November 18.

The Flame in All of Us
music
The Flame in All of Us is the last album released by Thousand Foot Krutch. It was released on September 18 2007. It has more of a rock sound than earlier albums, but also has some softer songs. The band recorded with producer Ken Andrews in the Spring of 2007. The album began at #58 on The Billboard 200 charts.
Five songs from The Flame in All of Us were put on the internet before the album actually released. One of them, Falls Apart was a single for the band.

Countdown to Extinction
music
Countdown to Extinction is the fifth studio album by American thrash metal band Megadeth. It is their best-selling album. It was released on July 14, 1992.

Live! Live! Live!
music
"Live! Live! Live!" is a live album released by Bryan Adams in 1988.

MTV Unplugged (Bryan Adams album)
music
"MTV Unplugged" is an acoustic live album by Canadian musician Bryan Adams. The album was recorded in September, 1997 at the Hammerstein Ballroom in New York City. Adams was joined by Irish piper Davy Spillane and Michael Kamen who wrote orchestrations for many of the songs and brought students from the Juilliard School to play them.
The album includes only thirteen of the songs recorded at the show. Many more are included on the MTV Unplugged DVD and the song order is also different than the CD.

Anthology (Bryan Adams album)
music
"Anthology" is a compilation album by Canadian singer-songwriter Bryan Adams which contains songs he recorded from 1978 through 2005. The two disc set includes songs from 1980–2005. A third disc which was a DVD live concert which was recorded in mid 2005 called "Live in Lisbon" was included in North America for a limited time. All the songs are in chronological order of their release, except the last song on the first disc on the North American edition, which was released in 1999. The album's enclosed booklet has notes about the process of the recordings and the credits for each track.
Release and reception.
"Anthology" co-produced by Adams, Robert Lange and Bob Clearmountain, peaked at number 65 on the Billboard 200. The album was released on October 18, 2005 and features songs like "Heat of the Night", and "Summer of '69". Anthology peaked at 4 on the Canadian Album Chart 29 on the UK Albums Chart and was certified two times platinum in Canada and gold in the UK.
Version differences.
On the first disc, the North American edition has "The Best of Me" as the last track, while the International edition moved the song to the 2nd disc, and had "All I Want Is You" instead.
On the second disc, The North American edition has two songs from his Album "Room Service" and a new recorded version of "When You're Gone" with Pamela Anderson, while the International edition has the Chicane song "Don't Give Up" in place of Chicane's remix of Cloud Number Nine, and a new song "I'm Not the Man You Think I Am" (from the movie "Colour Me Kubrick"), and the original version of "When You're Gone" with Mel C. instead.

Chris Melling
sports
Chris Melling (b. 21 September 1984, Ashton-in-Makerfield, Greater Manchester) is an English rugby league player. He plays for Harlequins RL in the European Super League.
Chris Melling's position of choice is as a full-back. He can also operate on the wing, in the centres or at hooker.
Melling is a Great Britain international.
Wigan Warriors.
Melling is a former Wigan Senior Academy captain who made several appearance for the Wigan first team.
In Super League 2004 it had seemed that Melling's career was in doubt following a serious knee injury suffered playing for Wigan against Leeds at Headingley. Melling had been seen as a future star before having his season ended by a cruciate ligament injury.
Upon his return to first team action in 2005 Chris made a further 10 first grade appearances for the JJB club before picking up another knee injury requiring further surgery.
Melling returned to full fitness in 2006, but found first team opportunities limited, due to the emergence of Chris Ashton at the club.
Chris Melling moved into the hooking role in Wigan's academy, impressing enough to be voted as the U'21 Academy 'Player of the Year' for 2006.<ref name="League Playing squad 2006/2007">
He left Wigan to pursue regular first team football.
Harlequins RL.
Melling was initially signed as a back-up hooker to Chad Randall, however the Great Britain international has made full back position his own. He has been compared to Wade McKinnon with the youngster being defensively solid and dependable, with an eye for a gap bringing the ball out in attack.
His move to Harlequins RL was to have seen the youngster undergo a positional change with a move to hooker. He had been previously employed throughout the backline, with most of his first team appearances coming as an outside back.
Melling has impressed in 2007, starting games at full-back and throughout the backline and scoring four tries.
In May 2007 Chris Melling agreed to a new two-year deal with Harlequins Rugby League, midway through his first season at the Twickenham Stoop. This will keep Melling in the capital until 2009.
He is seen as the emerging star at the London club, with Harlequins RL investing in young British talent.
Representative Football.
In June 2007 Melling was called up to the Great Britain squad and wore the number 1 shirt in the Test match against France.
Melling was joined in the Great Britain Test side by Quins teammate Paul Sykes.
Melling made his Great Britain debut in the 42-14 victory over the French on June 22nd 2007, despite carrying an injury.
Melling is also a youth level international for England.
Away from football.
Melling is a qualified Physiotherapist after studying at the University of Central Lancashire in Preston, graduating in June 2006. Melling hopes to set up his own physiotherapy practise in the future.

The Piper at the Gates of Dawn
music
"The Piper at the Gates of Dawn" is Pink Floyd's debut album and the only one made under Syd Barrett's leadership, although he made some contributions to the follow-up, "A Saucerful of Secrets". It has been regarded as one of the most influential albums ever made, being a tremendous influence on the psychedelic rock scene of the time and much of what followed. The album has whimsical lyrics about space, scarecrows, gnomes, bicycles and fairytales, along with psychedelic instrumental passages. Special limited editions were issued to mark its 30th and 40th anniversaries in 1997 and 2007.
Track listing.
All songs written by Syd Barrett, except where noted.
40th Anniversary Edition (2007).
A two-disc 40th anniversary edition was released on 4 September 2007, and a three-disc set was released on 11 September 2007. The packaging, designed by Storm Thorgerson, resembles a cloth-covered book, along with a twelve page reproduction of a Syd Barrett notebook. Discs one and two contain the full 'Piper' album, in mono (disc one) and stereo (disc two) mixes. Both have been newly remastered by James Guthrie, and the mono mix is a substantial improvement over the poor-sounding 30th Anniversary CD.
The third disc includes several Piper-era outtakes from the Abbey Road vaults, along with the band's first three mono singles. Unreleased material includes an alternate shorter take of "Interstellar Overdrive" that was previously thought lost, the pre-overdubbed abridged mix of "Interstellar Overdrive" previously only available on an EP in France, an alternative mix of "Matilda Mother" as it appeared early in the sessions, and also the 1967 stereo mix of "Apples and Oranges", which features extra untrimmed material at the beginning and end.

It's Only Love (Bryan Adams song)
music
"It's Only Love" is a hit rock duet recorded by Grammy Award winning singers Bryan Adams and Tina Turner. It was included on Bryan Adams' album "Reckless" and Tina Turner's live album "Tina Live in Europe", as well as being added to both artists' greatest hits compilations: Adams' "Anthology" and Turner's "All the Best". It reached number 15 on the Billboard Hot 100 in the U.S. and number 29 in the UK. The 12" single included the 1985 live version that would later appear on the 1988 album "Tina Live in Europe".

Tina Turner
music
Anna Mae Bullock, better known by her stage name Tina Turner (born November 26, 1939) is an American singer, dancer and entertainer. Her success, dominance, popularity and consistent contributions to the rock music genre have garnered her the title, "The Queen of Rock & Roll". She is known worldwide for her overpowering and energetic stage presence, powerful vocals, ground-breaking concerts as well as for her long, well-proportioned legs that are considered the most famous in show business. She was listed on Rolling Stone's list "The Immortals — The Greatest Artists of All Time". Turner is a Rock and Roll Hall of Fame inductee, and she is also represented in the Grammy Hall of Fame by two of her recordings: "River Deep - Mountain High" (1999) and "Proud Mary" (2003). Turner has won eight Grammy Awards.

Bonnie Raitt
music
Bonnie Lynn Raitt (born November 8, 1949) is an American blues singer-songwriter who was born in Burbank, California. Raitt is best known for her songs "Nick of Time", "Something to Talk About", and the ballad "I Can't Make You Love Me." Raitt is also an avid political activist and has received nine Grammy Awards in her career.

Melanie Chisholm
music
Melanie Chisholm is an English singer-songwriter and television personality best known as one of the five members of the English girl group Spice Girls, who was nicknamed "Sporty Spice". As a solo artist she has released four albums and was nominated for a BRIT and ECHO Awards and charted at the top of Billboard Dance Chart in US in late 2000.

The Wall
music
"The Wall" is a rock opera presented as a double album by the English progressive rock band Pink Floyd, released in late 1979. It was subsequently performed live, with elaborate theatrical effects, and made into a film.
Following in the footsteps of their previous albums, "The Wall" is a concept album - specifically, it deals largely with the theme of isolation from one's peers. The concept was largely inspired by the band's 1977 tour promoting the album "Animals", with regards to an incident where Roger Waters' frustration with the audience reached a point where Waters spat in the face of a fan who was attempting to climb on stage; this, in turn, led him to lament that such a wall exists. With its significantly darker theme, "The Wall" featured a notably harsher and more theatrical sound than their previous releases.
"The Wall" is a rock opera that centers on the character "Pink". Largely based on Waters' personal life, Pink struggles in life from an early age, having lost his father in war ("Another Brick in the Wall (Part 1)"), abused by teachers ("The Happiest Days of Our Lives"), nurtured by an overprotective mother ("Mother"), and deserted by his wife later on ("Don't Leave Me Now") - all of which factored into Pink's mental isolation from society, figuratively referred to as "The Wall".
In 2003, Rolling Stone magazine listed "The Wall" as #87 in "Rolling Stone's 500 Greatest Albums of All Time".
Track listing.
All songs by Roger Waters except as noted.

The Final Cut (album)
music
"The Final Cut" is a rock album by Pink Floyd recorded at various studios in the UK from July to December 1982. It is the final Pink Floyd studio album to feature the band's bassist and primary songwriter Roger Waters. The album is predominantly the work of Waters, this being the only Pink Floyd album on which the composers' credit on every track is given to Waters alone. Keyboardist Rick Wright played no part in the recording of "The Final Cut" having been sacked by Waters during recording of "The Wall", meaning that this is the only Pink Floyd album on which Wright does not feature at all. David Gilmour meanwhile sings lead vocals on only one of the album's twelve songs, the rest being sung entirely by Waters. The recording of "The Final Cut" was marred by tension between Waters and his bandmates, particularly Gilmour, who has since expressed his dislike for much of the album. For these and other reasons, it is sometimes regarded as a Roger Waters solo album rather than a true Pink Floyd album. None of the album's songs has ever been performed live by Pink Floyd, though some have been performed live by Waters during solo tours. Waters' dominance on the album is most clearly seen on the back cover, which reads: "The Final Cut: A Requiem for the Post-War Dream - by Roger Waters, performed by Pink Floyd".
Track listing.
All songs composed by Roger Waters. All lead vocals performed by Roger Waters unless otherwise stated.

A Momentary Lapse of Reason
music
"A Momentary Lapse of Reason" is Pink Floyd's 1987 album, the band's first release after the departure of Roger Waters from the band in 1985. The album reached #3 on both the U.S. and UK charts. It was released in the UK and the rest of Europe on EMI and on Columbia Records for the rest of the world.
Track listing.
All lead vocals performed by David Gilmour except where noted.

Mmhmm
music
Mmhmm is the Fourth album released by Relient k it has other spellings because it's a strange word it's different to the bands previous albums, because it's heavier but also softer at times with the music.
It marks the time where the band became more serious, using fewer Joke songs than before.
Two things should be noted here: It was their first album on their record label capitol records. It was also the last CD which Brian pitman (Relient k bassist) recorded with the band.
The album was released again, and contained a song which was first found on an EP
In 2005, the album was given gold stats, because it had sold half a million copies in america
The album had a few singles which were played only on Christian radio such as High of 75 and I so hate consequences

What Time Is It? (song)
music
What Time Is It? is a song off the soundtrack for High School Musical 2.

Die Welt
media
Die Welt is a German newspaper.
Die Welt was founded in 1946. The founder was the British Military Government in Germany.
In the 1950's the Axel Springer Verlag bought the newspaper.
Die Welt is a daily newspaper. It is conservative and market-liberal.
Actually it has an circulation of about 210,000 newspapers a day.

John Vane
science
John Vane was an Australian bushranger who became a member of Ben Hall's gang. He was one of the few members of the gang to die of old age, and not to be killed.
Early life.
John Vane was born at Jerry Plains in New South Wales in 1842. His grandparents had come to Australia as convicts but his parents were seen as respectable and wealthy. They lived at a place called Number One, which was about 11 miles from Carcoar. He was described in 1863 as being about 6 feet tall, with dark hair and a ruddy (red) face.. He worked as a stockman, looking after cattle and was said to be an excellent horse rider.
Bushranger.
Vane said that he became a bushranger because the police said he had robbed a hotel. The hotel was at Long Swamp and owned by a man named Boyce. It was robbed on February 12, 1863. Vane's brother, William Vane, with James Burke and George Cheshire had already been charged with the robbery. The police let them go when no one was able to identify them as the robbers. Vane said he was scared of the police and went into the bush to hide. He met with John Gilbert and O'Meally, who were members of Ben Hall's gang. For sveral months Vane was a member of the the Ben Hall gang.
On October 24, 1863, the Ben Hall gang went to the house of Gold Commissioner Keightley at Dunn's Plains. There was a big gun battle before the bushrangers were able to capture the house. Micky Burke was shot dead by Keightley during the battle. Vane wanted to kill Keightley for shooting his friend, but Ben Hall would not let him do it. Instead they said that wanted 500 pounds or they would shoot him. Keightley's wife rode to Bathurst that night to get the money. The story of the ride was later turned into a stage play.
Surrender.
In November 1863 a priest, the Reverend M'Carthy met Vane by chance in the bush. He later met the bushranger's mother. They talked Vane into giving himself up. He went with the priest to the Bathurst courthouse, made several statements and was then put into Bathurst gaol to wait for a trial.
Later life.
Vane continued to be in trouble with the police. In 1880 the newspapers reported that John Vane, ex-bushranger, was in court at Bathurst, for stealing 431 sheep. A friend, Terence M'Cann who had helped steal the sheep, was the main witness. Another man, Thomas Parker, tried to stop M'Cann from giving evidence. He was put in gaol for 12 months.
John Vane died in Cowra, New South Wales on January 30, 1906.

Lisa Gerrard
music
Lisa Gerrard (born April 12, 1961) is an Australian musician, singer and composer who rose to fame as part of the group Dead Can Dance with former music partner Brendan Perry.
Gerrard received a Golden Globe award and an Academy Award nomination for the score for the 2000 film "Gladiator" on which she teamed up with Hans Zimmer.
Voice.
Lisa Gerrard is a contralto vocalist. Her vocal range was once described as rich, jaw-dropping, unique, deep, dark and mournful. Gerrard's vocal range changes from a contralto to a mezzo-soprano on such songs as, "The Host of Seraphim" and, "Elegy".
On the other songs, "Sanvean" and "Sacrifice", Gerrard performs in the deep contralto range.

Sean Kingston
music
Kisean Anderson (born February 3, 1990) better known by his stage name Sean Kingston'", is a Jamaican reggae singer and rapper.

Morris Iemma
politics
Morris Iemma (born 21 July 1961) was the 40th Premier of New South Wales from 3 August 2005 to 5 September 2008. He was from the Labor Party.

Vernon Chatman
music
Vernon Chatman (born circa 1972) is an Emmy Award winning American television producer, writer, voice actor, comedian and musician. He is best known as the voice of "Towelie" on the cartoon series "South Park".

Chuck (album)
music
"Chuck" is the third album by Sum 41. It was released on October 12, 2004.

Cato the Elder
politics
Marcus Porcius Cato (Latin: M·PORCIVS·M·F·CATO) (234 BC, Tusculum–149 BC) was a Roman statesman, surnamed the Censor ("Censorius"), "Sapiens, Priscus", or the Elder ("Major"), to distinguish him from Cato the Younger (his great-grandson).
He came of an ancient Plebeian family who all were noted for some military service but not for the discharge of the higher civil offices. He was bred, after the manner of his Latin forefathers, to agriculture, to which he devoted himself when not engaged in military service. But, having attracted the notice of Lucius Valerius Flaccus, he was brought to Rome, and successively held the offices of Cursus Honorum: Tribune (214 BC), Quaestor (204 BC), Aedile (199 BC), Praetor (198 BC), Consul (195 BC) together with his old patron, and finally Censor (184 BC).

Hannes Schäfer
music
Dr. Johannes Schäfer, born 2nd October 1965 in Göttingen, Germany, was the bass player of the German rock band Fury in the Slaughterhouse from the beginning (1987) until 1996. Today (2008) he is a doctor.
Schäfer's first band was 1982 the punk band "Defekt" in Hanover, Germany, where he was singer and bass player. From 1985 until 1987 he played in the jazz rock band "CIT.", together with Mousse T. and at the same time he worked as a studio musician at the "Stakkato Studio" in Hannover.
In 1987 Schäfer founded the rock band Fury in the Slaughterhouse togehter with Kai and Christian Wingenfelder, Rainer Schumann and Christoph Stein-Schneider. He played the bass in this band until 1996, when he was followed by Christian Decker. Together with his band Schäfer was awarded golden recording sales certifications for the Fury albums "Fury in the Slaughterhouse" (1988) "Mono" (1992) and "the Hearing and the Sense of Balance" (1995). Fury in the Slaughterhouse sold about three million recordings of albums made in their time with Hannes Schäfer (1987-1996).
After leaving Fury in the Slaughterouse Schäfer studied medicine and today (2008) he works as a doctor in the hospital "Vinzenzkrankenhaus" in Hanover.

Javon Ringer
sports
Javon Ringer (born February 2, 1987, Dayton, Ohio) is an American football running back for Michigan State University. He attended Chaminade Julienne High School, where he set many running records. Ringer has played at Michigan State since he was a freshman, and is on pace to break many MSU rushing records. He is currently a candidate for the Maxwell Award, the Walter Camp Award, and the Doak Walker Award. He is a currently a Heisman Trophy candidate. In the 42 college games he's played in, Ringer has a record of 24 wins and 18 losses.

Get Born
music
Get Born is the debut album by Australian band Jet. It was recorded in 2003 and released on September 14 of 2003. The song Cold Hard Bitch reached the top spot on the Modern Rock charts.
Track Listing.
(*) Bonus track in Limited Edition CD

Tom Wills
sports
Thomas Wentworth "Tom" Wills (19 August 1835 – 3 May 1880) was an Australian all-round sportsman who helped invent Australian Football, and umpired the first ever game of Australian Football, and helped write the Laws of Australian Football.
Wills was born in south-east New South Wales, Australia either near Gundagai or Queanbeyan.
From the age of 14 he went to Rugby School in England. At school he played both rugby football and cricket very well. By his final year in England, he was captain of the Rugby XI and he was listed in Bells Sporting Life as being one of the most promising young cricketers in England.
In 1858, Wills created a set of football rules that were like a cross between rugby, soccer and Gaelic football. He made up the game for cricketers to keep in shape during the off-season (winter). Wills had help in making up the game from other people including his cousin Henry Colden Harrison, and W.J. Hammersly and J.B. Thompson. This game is now Australian Rules Football.
Wills grew up with Indigenous Australians. He spoke the language of the people who lived near him and played with the children. It has been suggested that Australian Rules Football is based in part on "Marn Grook", an Aboriginal game with some similar rules to Australian Rules Football. Because the indigenous people Wills payed with as a child would have played "Marn Grook", Wills would have been influenced by this game when creating the rules for Australian Rules Football.
In 1868, Wills coached the first Australian cricket team to tour England, which was composed entirely of Indigenous Australians.

Simple Plan (album)
music
"Simple Plan" is the third, self-titled studio album by pop punk band Simple Plan.

Smile, It's the End of the World
music
Smile, it's the End of the World is the second album by pop punk band Hawk Nelson. It was released on April 4, 2006.

Letters to the President
music
Letters to the President is the debut album by pop punk band Hawk Nelson. It was released on October 4, 2005.

Blizzard of Ozz
music
Blizzard of Ozz is a heavy metal album by Ozzy Osbourne, recorded in Surrey, UK and released on September 20, 1980 in the UK and on January 15, 1981 in the U.S..
This is Ozzy's first solo album. The tracks "Crazy Train" and "Mr. Crowley" were released as singles. Crazy Train peaked at #9 on the Mainstream Rock Charts.
"Blizzard of Ozz" remains Osbourne's highest-selling album to date, selling over 4.1 million copies in the U.S. alone.
The album reached #21 on Billboard's Pop Albums chart, and is on the list of the top 100 best-selling albums of the 1980s.
Track listing.
All songs written by Ozzy Osbourne, Randy Rhoads, and Bob Daisley except where noted.

Button Gwinnett
politics
Button Gwinnett (baptized: April 10, 1735 – May 19, 1777), was second of the signatories (first signature on the left) on the United States Declaration of Independence as a representative of Georgia. He was also briefly the provisional president of Georgia in 1777, and Gwinnett County (now a major suburb of metro Atlanta) was named after him.

Cotidianul
media
"Cotidianul" is a Romanian newspaper. It is published from Monday to Saturday in Berliner format. It was started by Ion Raţiu. The first issue was published on May 10, 1991.

Francis Hopkinson
music
Francis Hopkinson (September 21, 1737 May 9, 1791), an American author, was one of the signers of the Declaration of Independence as a delegate from New Jersey. His supporters believe he played a part in the design of the first American flag.
Great Seal of the United States.
Francis Hopkinson gave his help to the second committee that designed the Great Seal of the United States. This is the same seal that is now impressed upon the reverse of the United States one-dollar bill.

Stephen Hopkins (politician)
politics
Stephen Hopkins (March 7, 1707 – July 13, 1785) was an American political leader from Rhode Island who signed the Declaration of Independence. He served as the Chief Justice and Governor of colonial Rhode Island and was a Delegate to the Colonial Congress in Albany in 1754 and to the Continental Congress from 1774 to 1776.

TNA X Division Championship
sports
The X Division Championship is the 3rd highest ranked championshiptitle of the TNA professional wrestling company. It is defend by wrestlers in the X Division, meaning high flyers and cruiserweights. The current champion is Eric Young. Young defeated Sharik Abdul Bashir on "TNA Impact" on November 11, 2008. This was his first time winning the championship.

WWE Hardcore Championship
sports
The WWE Hardcore Championship is a former championship for World Wrestling Entertainment. The first champion was crowned when the championship was awarded to Mankind by Vince McMahon. It was defended always in some sort of Hardcore match due to it's name. When Crash Holly won the title however, he stared what became known as the 24/7 rule. Which means the title was being defended at all times. Anyone could surprise the title holder and pin him to become the new champion anywhere, as long as a Referee was present. The last official champion was Rob Van Dam when he won the title from Tommy Dreamer to unify the title with the WWE Intercontinental Championship.

Mary Douglas
science
Mary Douglas'", DBE, FBA (25 March 1921 – 16 May 2007) was a British anthropologist, known for her writings on human culture and symbolism.

Georg Michael Telemann
music
Georg Michael Telemann (born 20 April 1748 in Plön, died March 4, 1831 in Riga) was a German composer and theologian. He is mainly known for the Church music he wrote. His grandfather is better known, Georg Philipp Telemann.

Alan Keyes
politics
Alan Lee Keyes (born August 7, 1950) is a conservative American political activist, author, and former diplomat, and candidate for public office. He ran for President of the United States in 1996, 2000, and 2008, and was a Republican nominee for the U.S. Senate in 1988, 1992, and 2004.

Valentina Tereshkova
politics
Valentina Vladimirovna Tereshkova (; born 6 March 1937), is a retired Soviet cosmonaut and was the first woman to fly in space, aboard Vostok 6 on 16 June 1963.

Kansas Koyotes
sports
The Kansas Koyotes are a professional indoor football team based out of Topeka, Kansas. The Koyotes compete in the American Professional Football League (APFL). They began play in 2003.

Banjo Paterson
media
Andrew Barton "Banjo" Paterson (1864 – 1941) was a famous Australian bush poet, journalist and author. He wrote many ballads and poems about Australian life. He wrote about life in the country and outback areas of Australia. Much of his work was about the area around Binalong, New South Wales where he spent much of his childhood. Paterson's famous poems include "Waltzing Matilda", "The Man from Snowy River" and "Clancy of the Overflow".

Martin Carthy
music
Martin Carthy MBE, is an English folk singer and guitarist. He was one of the first performers in the renewed interest in British folk music in the 1960s. He has inspired other musicians such as Bob Dylan, Paul Simon and Richard Thompson. He is seen as one of the most important people in English folk music.
Early life.
Martin Carthy was born in Hatfield on May 21, 1941. He grew up in Hampstead, North London. After he left school he had a number of jobs. He worked behind the scenes at the open air theatre at Regent's Park as a prompter (helping actors who forgot their words). He later worked as an assistant stage manager (ASM) on a tour of "The Merry Widow". He then worked at Theatre in the Round in Scarborough. He then sang in coffee bars. He became a resident (regular act) at The Troubadour Folk Club in Earls Court in the early 1960s. He joined Redd Sullivan's "Thameside Four" in 1961. He is a famous solo performer of traditional songs. He has a very special individual style of guitar playing on his old Martin Guitar. He uses different ways of tuning his guitar. He has a strongly percussive (drum like) picking style that brings out the melody. His first album, "Martin Carthy", was released in 1965. It had Dave Swarbrick playing fiddle playing on some songs, although he was not named on the album cover. Carthy's way of playing the traditional song Scarborough Fair was used by Paul Simon on the Simon and Garfunkel album Parsley Sage Rosemary and Thyme in 1966. Simon did not admit that he had used Carthy's version.
Working with others.
Carthy has also worked with many other musicians. He has sung with The Watersons since 1972. He been a member of the UK electric folk group Steeleye Span at two different times. He was a member of the famous Albion Country Band 1973 line-up. This had members from the band Fairport Convention and John Kirkpatrick. This group recorded the original and important album "Battle of the Field". Carthy was part of the new and different band Brass Monkey which mixed brass instruments, Carthy's guitar and mandolin and John Kirkpatrick's accordion, melodeon and concertina.
For many years Carthy has enjoyed a creating music with fiddle player Dave Swarbrick. He has also worked with his partner Norma Waterson and their daughter Eliza Carthy in a group called.
In June 1998 he was made an MBE in the Queen's Birthday Honours. He was named "Folk Singer of the Year" at the BBC Radio 2 Folk Awards in 2002 and again in 2005. In 2005 he also won the award for "Best Traditional Track" for 'Famous Flower of Serving Men'. In the 2007 Folk Awards Martin Carthy and Dave Swarbrick won "Best duo".

Imran Khan
sports
Imran Ahmad Khan Niazi (Urdu: عمران خان نیازی) (born 25 November 1952) is a retired Pakistani cricketer who played international cricket for two decades in the late 20th century. He became a politician in the mid-1990s. Currently, besides running his own political party, Khan is also a charity worker and cricket commentator.

Benjamin W. Lee
science
Benjamin Whiso Lee (Korean: 이휘소, Lee Whi-so) (January 1, 1935 - June 16, 1977) or Ben Lee, was a Korean-American theoretical physicist. His work in theorical particle physics was very important to the development of the standard model in the late 20th century. His work mainly affected the renormalization and the charm quark.
Biography.
Benjamin W. Lee was born in Seoul, Korea. Before finishing high school, he entered the department of Chemical Engineering at Seoul National University. He was one of the best students. During his time in college, he transferred to the United States. He graduated from Miami University. Lee received a master degree from the University of Pittsburgh, and his Ph.D. from the University of Pennsylvania at the age of 25. Lee worked at Institute for Advanced Study. He was a professor of physics at University of Pennsylvania, SUNY at Stony Brook, University of Chicago, and head of the theoretical physics department at Fermi National Accelerator Laboratory. On June 16, 1977, he was killed in a car accident near Kewanee, Illinois. Lee studied symmetry principles and weak interactions.

Alessandro Volta
science
Count Alessandro Giuseppe Antonio Anastasio Volta (18 February 1745 – 5 March 1827) was a Lombard physicist known especially for the development of the first electrical cell in 1800. He was born in Como in Lombardy, Italy.
Volta worked on the that makes a static electric charge in 1775. Volta also studied what we now call capacitance, developing separate means to study both electrical potential V and charge Q, and discovering that for a given object they are proportional. This may be called Volta's Law of, and likely for this work the unit of electrical potential has been named the volt. Around 1791 he began to study ". In this way he discovered Volta's Law of the series, and the law that the (emf formula_1) of a. In 1800, He invented the "voltaic pile", an early electric battery, which made a steady electric current. It is credited as the first electrochemical cell.
In honor of his work in the field of electricity, Napoleon made him a count in 1810. A museum in Como, the Voltian Temple, has been built in his honor and exhibits some of the original equipment he used to conduct experiments. In 1881, an important electrical unit, the volt(V), was named in his honor. There have also been innovations and discoveries named after Alessandro Volta including the, and the on the Moon.
Volta married the daughter of Count Ludovico Peregrini, Teresa, with whom he raised three sons. In 1779 he became professor of experimental physics at the University of, a chair he occupied for almost 25 years. Volta is buried in the city of Como. At the Tempio Voltiano near there is a museum devoted to explaining his work.

Friedrich August Kekulé von Stradonitz
science
Friedrich August Kekule von Stradonitz (also August Kekulé) (7 September 1829 – 13 July 1896) was a German organic chemist. Kekulé was born in Darmstadt, the son of a civil servant. After graduating from secondary school, in 1847 he entered the University of Giessen, with the intention of studying architecture. After hearing the lectures of Justus von Liebig he decided to study chemistry. Following his education in Giessen, he took postdoctoral fellowships in Paris (1851-52), in Chur, Switzerland (1852-53), and in London (1853-55), where he was decisively influenced by Alexander Williamson.
In 1858 he was hired as full professor at the University of Ghent, then in 1867 was called to Bonn. He studied carbon compounds, especially studied benzene and he suggested benzene ring structure.
Kekulé's most famous work was on the structure of benzene. In 1865 Kekulé published a paper in French suggesting that the structure contained a six-membered ring of carbon atoms with alternating single and double bonds. The next year he published a much longer paper in German on the same subject. The empirical formula for benzene had been long known, but its highly unsaturated structure was challenging to determine. Archibald Scott Couper in 1858 and Joseph Loschmidt in 1861 suggested possible structures that contained multiple double bonds or multiple rings, but the study of aromatic compounds was in its earliest years, and too little evidence was then available to help chemists decide on any particular structure.

Dave Baksh
music
David Nizaam "Brownsound" Baksh (born 26 July, 1980 in Toronto, Ontario, Canada) is a Canadian guitarist, singer and producer of Guyanese descent, best known as the former guitarist of successful pop punk band Sum 41, but has since became a singer/guitarist in his own heavy metal/reggae project Brown Brigade.

Half Hour of Power
music
Half Hour of Power is Sum 41's debut EP. Despite its title, there is only 24 minutes of music on it. It was released on June 27, 2000 on Big Rig Records, a subsidiary of Island Records (US), and Aquarius Records (Canada).

Don McLean
music
Don McLean (born October 2, 1945) is an American singer and songwriter. He is most well-known for the songs "American Pie" and "Vincent".
In his early career, Don Mclean mainly played folk music. He sang folk songs and played simple chords with acoustic guitar and harmonica. In 1969, Don Mclean joined folk singer Pete Seeger in the environment campaign. They gave talks and playing concerts to help people know some of the problems with the environment. Also in the same year, Don McLean released his first album "Tapestry". This album was not very successful. McLean continued to perform in many small places.
In 1971, Don Mclean released an 8-minute-long song named "American Pie". The song was dedicated to Don McLean’s music hero Buddy Holly. Much of the song was about the deaths of Holly, Richie Valens and J.P. Richardson ("The Big Bopper") in 1959. It also dealt with many important events in American history. Quickly "American Pie" became the number 1 song in the United States. Don Mclean became a superstar and drew many audiences to his concerts. In 2005, "American Pie" was voted 5th in the "365 songs of the century" list. His second single "Vincent", featuring Vincent Van Gogh's masterpiece "Starry Night", also topped the UK and US charts in 1971. The song is played in Van Gogh Museum in Amsterdam every day.
In the later 1970s, Don McLean tried other styles of songs. He was not as popular with these other styles. Bad sales of albums caused him to change recording companies from one to another. Finally, in 1980, Don McLean regained his popularity by playing "Crying", a song first sang by Roy Orbison. The song reached the first place in UK chart.
Don McLean is not as popular today as he was before. He is still writing and singing his own songs and performing in concerts.
The famous guitar player, Eric Clapton, spoke highly of Don McLean’s guitar playing skill after listing to his guitar performance. Also, Don McLean’s performance on stage once inspired Lori Lieberman to write the 1974 Grammy-winning song "Killing me softly with his song". Most of the successive folk singers entitled him with "US legend"

Lorraine Kelly
media
Lorraine Kelly (born 30 November 1959) is a Scottish television presenter and journalist. She is known for starring in the television programme on GMTV, "LK Today". Kelly was born in East Kilbride, Scotland. She is married to Steve Smith and has one daughter called Rosie.

Timo Kotipelto
music
Timo Antero Kotipelto (born March 15 1969) is the vocalist of the Finnish power metal band Stratovarius and is the creator and vocalist of the power metal band Kotipelto.

Yellow Emperor
sports
Huang-di, (黃帝/黄帝 huángdì) or the Yellow Emperor, is a legendary Chinese sovereign and cultural hero who is thought to be the ancestor of all Han Chinese. One of the legendary Five Emperors, it was written in the "Shiji" by historian Sima Qian (145 BC-90 BC) that Huangdi reigned from 2497 BC to 2398 BC. His personal name was said to be Gongsun Xuanyuan (公孙轩辕). He became the chief deity of Taoism during the Han Dynasty (202 BC-220 AD).

Pushim
music
PUSHIM is a Japanese reggae singer. She was born in Osaka and has started
to sing since 1995 and released her first single in 1999.
She has strong and deep voice that everyone doesn't have.
Her younger sister, YOUNGSHIM, is also a reggae singer.

Charles Barkley
media
Charles Wade Barkley (born February 20, 1963) is an American retired professional basketball player and politician. Nicknamed "Sir Charles" for his aggressive and outspoken demeanor, and "The Round Mound of Rebound," for his unusual build and talent as a player, Barkley established himself as one of the National Basketball Association's most dominating power forwards.

William Clark Falkner
politics
William Clark Falkner (July 6, 1825 or 1826 – November 6, 1889) was a soldier, lawyer, politician, businessman, and author in northern Mississippi. He is most notable for the influence he had on the work of his great-grandson, author William Faulkner.
Although born in Knox County, Tennessee, Falkner lived with his family in Missouri and Pontotoc, Mississippi before settling at the age of 17 in Ripley, Tippah County, Mississippi. He served in the Mexican-American War and, when the American Civil War broke out, he raised a company of men and was made colonel in the Second Mississippi Infantry of the Confederate Army.

Charles Kennedy
media
Charles Peter Kennedy MP, PC (born 25 November 1959) is a British politician.
From 9 August 1999 until 7 January 2006, he was the leader of the Liberal Democrats, the third largest political party in the United Kingdom.
In the 1983 General Election he stood for the Ross, Cromarty & Skye constituency, then held by the Conservative MP and Minister, Hamish Gray. In a shock result, Kennedy was elected (for the SDP): at 23, he became the youngest MP in the House of Commons. Ambitious and popular, he quickly emerged as a potential party leader. In 1994, by which time the SDP and the Liberal Party had merged, he became President of the Liberal Democrats - a position he held for four years. In 1999, on the resignation of Paddy Ashdown, Kennedy was elected party leader.
He took the party through two General Elections. However, he faced criticism for his laid-back leadership style, and there was considerable speculation regarding his alcohol consumption. From December 2005, some within the party were questioning his leadership and calling for a leadership election. On 5 January 2006, Kennedy was informed that ITN would be reporting that he had received treatment for a drinking problem. Kennedy decided to pre-empt the broadcast and admit his drinking problem openly. He called a leadership election at the same time, stating that he intended to stand. The admission of a drinking problem seriously damaged his standing within the parliamentary party. As support for him amongst this key group ebbed away, Kennedy resigned as leader on 7 January, saying that he would not be standing in the leadership election. Deputy leader Sir Menzies Campbell took over as interim leader and was elected as leader on 2 March 2006.

MTV Unplugged in New York
music
"MTV Unplugged in New York" was the first out of two live albums by the American grunge band Nirvana. (The second one was "From the Muddy Banks of the Wishkah".) It was recorded on November 18, 1993 as a part of the "MTV Unplugged" television series, which many artists and bands perform on. It was released on November 1, 1994, six months after the band had broken up because of the death of Kurt Cobain, who was the lead singer and guitarist.
It was unusual compared to other artists on the "MTV Unplugged" series, because Nirvana played mostly their less-famous songs and cover versions of other artists' songs. Most artists on the program played mainly their hits.
Four singles were released from the album. This was unusual because it was a live album. The singles were "About a Girl", "The Man Who Sold the World", "Where Did You Sleep Last Night", and "Lake of Fire". All of these except for "About a Girl" were covers.

Krist Novoselic
music
Krist Novoselic, born Krist Anthony Novoselic II, is an American rock musician. He is most famous for being the bass player for the popular grunge band Nirvana with Kurt Cobain and Dave Grohl. When Cobain died in 1994, Nirvana broke up. Grohl moved on to form the band Foo Fighters, and Novoselic has been mostly involved in politics. However, he is also currently the bassist for the American punk band Flipper.

Paul Hegarty
sports
Paul Hegarty is a former Scottish footballer who is famous for being the captain of Dundee United during their best years in the 1980s. He currently manages Livingston.

A Girl like Me (Rihanna album)
music
"A Girl Like Me" is the second studio album by Pop and R&B singer Rihanna. The album was released April 19, 2006. Singles included "SOS", "Unfaithful", and "Break It Off".

Matt Hasselbeck
sports
Matthew Hasselbeck (born September 25, 1975, in Boulder, Colorado) is an American football quarterback for the Seattle Seahawks. He was drafted by the Green Bay Packers in the sixth round of the 1998 NFL Draft. He played college football at Boston College.

Julia Somerville
media
Julia Mary Fownes Somerville (born July 14, 1947) is a reporter. She has worked for BBC News and ITN. She studied English at Sussex University.
Somerville has been interested in art. In 2001, she was one of the people who selected the National Portrait Gallery's BP Portrait of the Year. She has also served as a judge for several years on the RIBA Annual Architecture Award Panels. On 18 September 2003, Somerville was appointed Chair of the Advisory Committee of the Government Art Collection.
Somerville has married three times: to Stephen Band (1970 - 1975, no children), Ray Gowdridge (1984 - 1992, two children). She currently lives in North London with her third husband, the architect Sir Jeremy Dixon. Somerville and Dixon were interviewed by police in 1996. The people who developed their photograph had raised suspicions, because the couple wanted ot have images of their seven-year-old child developed. These photos showed the child bathing. No caution or charges followed the investigation.

Ur So Gay
music
"Ur So Gay" is a single released by Katy Perry of the debut EP called "Ur So Gay - EP". The song is featured on the Perry's new debut hit Studio Album "One Of The Boys".
Music Video.
The music video for "Ur So Gay" depicts Perry singing the song with animated clouds and grass surrounding her and her blue guitar. It occasionally cuts to a storyline featuring a Barbie version of Katy.

Hala Gorani
media
Hala Basha-Gorani (Arabic: هالة غوراني) (born 1 March 1970), is a Syrian American reporter for "CNN International" based in the network's headquarters in Atlanta, Georgia. Previously based at the London bureau, she anchors "CNN Internationals "Your World Today" along with Jim Clancy. The program is seen on US from 12-1 p.m. Eastern Time. She also hosts a monthly program on CNN called "Inside the Middle East" and often reports from the region.
Biography.
Gorani was born in Seattle, Washington, United States to Syrian parents from Aleppo but was mainly raised in Paris, France. She lived also in Algeria. Her name "Hala" is a common Arabic name which means "halo".
Career.
She has established herself as a Middle East specialist and covered the Hezbollah-Israel war in the summer of 2006 from Lebanon as the main anchor for CNN International, helping the network's coverage of the Middle East win an award for "Excellence in Journalism".
Gorani also reports from Saudi Arabia, Iraq, Lebanon, Syria and Egypt. In April 2007, she led CNN's coverage of the 2007 French presidential election. Gorani avoids discussing her political and religious views, saying the job needs her to be neutral.
Personal life.
She speaks English, French and Arabic (though she can't read it). She currently resides in Atlanta. French novelist Yann Moix dedicated his first novel "Jubilation Vers le Ciel" to Gorani in 1996.

Jamiroquai
music
Jamiroquai is an English acid jazz band. It was created by Jason Kay. The name of the band is a compound word created from "Jam session" and the name of the Native American tribe, the "Iroquois".
The band's first single, "When You Gonna Learn?", was released in 1992. Because of the success of this single, Jamiroquai made a contract with Sony BMG. They release their first album "Emergercy on Planet Earth" in 1993. The next year, their second album "The Return of Space Cowboy" was released. This album become popular. In 1996, a song "Virtual Insanity" on the third album "Travelling without Moving" was very popular. The music video of this song was so innovative that it caused a big sensation. With this song, Jamiroquai was nominated for 10 MTV video awards. It won four awards. This album made the band famous all across the world.

Murray Gold
music
Murray Gold (born 1969 in Portsmouth) is an English composer for stage, film, and television.
A lot of people know him for composing the music for the popular science-fiction program Doctor Who

The Best of Billie
music
"The Best of Billie" is a album by British pop singer Billie Piper. It was released by EMI on 8 August 2005. The album contained Piper's single releases as well as B-sides.

Delta Goodrem
music
Delta Lea Goodrem (Born November 9, 1984) is an Australian actress and singer. Her first single, "I Don't Care", charted as high as #64 on Australia's ARIA Singles Chart in 2001. In the following year, Goodrem took up the role of a schoolgirl named Nina Tucker in the Australian soap opera "Neighbours". This helped her into becoming a well known musician.
Innocent Eyes.
Delta Goodrem released her second single "Born to Try" in 2002. It charted at #1 on the ARIA Singles Charts for one week. Her third single, "Lost Without You", was released in February 2003. It charted at #1 on the ARIA Singles Charts for two separate weeks. Her album, "Innocent Eyes", was released in March the same year. It was on the charts for 29 weeks. A single of the same name ("Innocent Eyes") was later released in June, followed by the release of two more singles from the album, "Not Me, Not I" and "Predictable".
Mistaken Identity.
In late 2004, Goodrem released the first single, "Out of the Blue", from her second album. The album, "Mistaken Identity", was released a month later. Other singles from the album include "Mistaken Identity", "A Little Too Late" and a duet with Brian McFadden, "Almost Here".
Together We Are One.
Delta Goodrem was asked to write a song for the 2006 Commonwealth Games Opening Ceremony and perform in the event herself. The single, "Together We Are One", was released on the "Commonwealth Games: Melbourne 2006 Opening Ceremony" compilation.
Delta.
In 2007, Goodrem released a single titled "In This Life". It was from her third studio album "Delta" which was released a month later. Other singles from this album include "Believe Again", "You Will Only Break My Heart" and "I Can't Break It To My Heart".

Kele Okereke
music
Kelechukwu Rowland Okereke or Kele Okereke is a singer and guitar player for the rock band Bloc Party. He was born in Liverpool in England, United Kingdom but his parents are from Nigeria. He was born on 13 October 1981, which means he is now 27 years old.

With the Lights Out
music
"With the Lights Out" is a box set album by the American grunge band Nirvana. It was released on November 23, 2004 on Geffen Records.
It was the only box set by Nirvana, and it one of several albums by Nirvana after the band broke up because the lead singer and guitarist Kurt Cobain died in 1994.

Virgin Killer
music
Virgin Killer is the fourth album by the German heavy metal band Scorpions. It was released in 1976, and it helped the Scorpions gain fans outside Europe. The album's cover has caused controversy, as it features a naked young girl. Some of the band members have said that the cover is okay, but others have said that they feel bad about releasing it. Some magazines and websites, such as "Cracked" and Gigwise.com, have called it one of the worst album covers of all time.
In 2008, the English Wikipedia page for "Virgin Killer" was put on a blacklist (a list of bad content) by the Internet Watch Foundation (IWF), a UK organization. Because of this, many major Internet service providers (ISPs) in the UK were banned from seeing the page. The IWF called the cover "indecent".

BBC HD
media
BBC HD is a high-definition television channel provided by the BBC. The service was initially run as a trial from 15 May 2006 until becoming a full service on 1 December 2007. The first HD originated program to be shown on the channel was "Planet Earth", shown on 27 May 2006.

Dagens Næringsliv
media
"Dagens Næringsliv" is one of Norway's main newspapers. The newspaper was first named "Norges Sjøfartstidende". It was founded in 1889.

Teresa Stratas
music
Teresa Stratas is a Canadian soprano opera singer. She was born on May 26, 1938, in Toronto, Ontario, which is in Canada.

Right Now (Leon Jackson album)
music
"Right Now" is the debut album by X Factor winner Leon Jackson.

George Butterworth
music
George Butterworth (born London, 12 July 1885; died Pozières, France, 5 August 1916) was an English composer. He showed great talent as a young man and might have become one of England’s greatest composers if he had lived longer. He was killed while fighting in World War I. He is best known for a group of songs which are settings of poems by A. E. Housman.
Early years.
Butterworth was born in London. His father was a solicitor who later became the general manager of the North Eastern Railway. The family moved to Yorkshire soon after George’s birth. He had his first music lessons from his mother, who was a singer, He soon started to compose music. His father wanted him to be a solicitor and so he sent his son to Eton College. From there he went to Trinity College, Oxford. At Oxford he became more and more involved with music, especially after he met the folk song collector Cecil Sharp and composer and folk song enthusiast Ralph Vaughan Williams. Butterworth and Vaughan Williams made several trips into the English countryside to collect folk songs. Both of them were influenced by English folk songs when they were composing. Butterworth was also a very good folk dancer. He was particularly fond of Morris dancing.
Vaughan Williams and Butterworth became close friends. It was Butterworth who said to Vaughan Williams that it would be a good idea to turn the symphonic poem he was working on into his "London Symphony". When the manuscript for that piece was lost in the post Butterworth and two other musicians helped Vaughan Williams to write it out again. Vaughan Williams dedicated the piece to Butterworth's memory after his death. When he left Oxford, Butterworth became a music critic for "The Times" as well as composing and teaching at Radley College, Oxfordshire. He also studied at the Royal College of Music for a short time, working with people such as Hubert Parry and Charles Villiers Stanford.
First World War.
Although Butterworth had lots of work he often felt that his life had no purpose. When World War I broke out, Butterworth felt that he could be useful so he joined the British Army. He was killed by a sniper in 1916 at Pozières leading a raid during the Battle of the Somme. His body was not found, and his name appears on the Thiepval memorial, near the site of the Somme. He was awarded the Military Cross, and a trench was named after him.
A Shropshire Lad.
Butterworth did not write a great deal of music, and during the war he destroyed many of his compositions that he thought were not good enough. Of those that survive, his works based on A. E. Housman's collection of poems "A Shropshire Lad" are the best known. Many English composers of Butterworth's time set Housman's poetry, including Ralph Vaughan Williams.
Butterworth wrote two song cycles on Housman's poems. They include some of the best-loved English songs of the 20th century, especially "Is My Team Ploughing?" and "Loveliest of Trees". He used this last song as the basis for his 1912 orchestral rhapsody, also called "A Shropshire Lad". It is full of soft, tender music as well as passion.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie, 1980, ISBN 1-56159-174-2.

Charles Villiers Stanford
music
Sir Charles Villiers Stanford (born Dublin, 30 September 1852; died London, 29 March 1924) was an Irish composer who lived in England for most of his life.
Life.
Stanford was born in Dublin. His father was a very successful lawyer who was also interested in music. He played the cello and sang. Stanford’s mother played the piano. The young boy heard a lot of music at his home as there were often visitors who came to make music. Charles studied the piano, organ and composition and was composing and performing at concerts when he was still very young.
His parents had wanted their son to be a lawyer, but it was obvious that music was to be his profession. He won a scholarship to Queens' College, Cambridge in 1870 where he was a choral scholar. He learned very quickly and in 1873, while he was still a student, he was made organist of Trinity College and conductor of two choirs. While he had these jobs he was given time to make visits to Germany where he studied with Carl Reinecke and Friedrich Kiel. He met several famous composers including Brahms and Offenbach. He went to the opening of the Bayreuth Festival Theatre where the music of Richard Wagner was performed.
Stanford took his BA degree in 1874 and MA in 1878, and was given the honorary degree of D.Mus. at Oxford in 1883 and at Cambridge in 1888. He had a lot of energy and was known for working very hard. When the Royal College of Music opened in London in 1883 Stanford was made professor there. He became conductor of the Bach Choir and then he was made professor of music at Cambridge. He was still only 35 years old. He kept these two professorships until his death. Although he gave up his job as organist at Trinity he became conductor of the Leeds Triennial Festival and appeared with nearly every important British music festival. In 1902 he was knighted.
Stanford married in 1878 and the couple had two children.
Stanford died in London and was buried in Westminster Abbey.
Music.
Stanford is best known today for the choral music he wrote for the Anglican church. These includes some very fine anthems and motets as well as service settings. His music was much better than most of the church music that had been composed during the 19th century, so he helped to make British music better. He composed many pieces for music festivals: these include oratorios and cantatas as well as partsongs and solo songs. He also wrote a lot of orchestral and instrumental works. These often show the influence of Brahms and Schumann.
As a teacher of composition Stanford had a great deal of influence on many British composers. He often became very cross when pupils wrote bad compositions, but he was also very good at showing them how they could improve their music. Composers such as Charles Wood, Constant Lambert, Vaughan Williams, Holst, Coleridge-Taylor, Boughton, John Ireland, Frank Bridge, George Butterworth, Arthur Bliss, Herbert Howells, George Benjamin and Moeran all learned a great deal from him.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie, 1980. ISBN1-56159-174-2

Thaksin Shinawatra
politics
Thaksin Shinawatra is a Thai businessman, politician, former Prime Minister of Thailand, and former leader of the populist Thai Rak Thai Party. He was removed from an influence of laws. Now he is currently outside of Thailand.
Profile.
Thaksin Shinawatra was born on 26th July, 1949 at San Kamphaeng,Chiang mai. His nickname is Maew. Thaksin He's the second child of Mr.Bunlerd Shinawatra and Mrs.Yindee Shinawatra. In 1974 Thaksin was maried with Mrs.Podchaman Shinawatra. They have three children are Mr.Panthongthea Shinawatra, Miss Pinthongtaa Shinawatra, and Miss Pheathongtan Shinawatra.
Politics.
Thaksin is very clever. He can solve many problems that the last prime minister can not do. He did many good things like subdue the drugs, set up OTOP, and develop Thailand.
Because Thaksin Shinawatra is too clever. He can found the opening of the law. He use the opening of the law for himself. And a group of Thai people know about his mistakes. Then they set up PAD.

Masaharu Fukuyama
music
Masaharu Fukuyama is a famous singer and actor in Japan. He is from Nagasaki, Kyusyu. His famous and popular song is "Sakurazaka".

We Started Nothing
music
We Started Nothin is an album recorded by Pop duo The Ting Tings. Singles include "Shut Up and Let Me Go", and "Be The One". The studio album was released May 2008. The album was also released as a limited edition LP on red vinyl limited to 2,000 copies.

Bandai
sports
Bandai Co., Ltd. is a Japanese company that makes toys and video games. It is the third largest toy maker in the world.

John Key
politics
John Phillip Key (born 9 August 1961) is the 38th and current Prime Minister of New Zealand and leader of the New Zealand National Party.
John Key entered the New Zealand Parliament in 2002 representing the north-west Auckland area of Helensville as a National MP, a seat that he still holds. In 2006 he succeeded Don Brash as the National Party leader in 2006. Key led his party to victory in the November 2008 general election.
Personal Life.
Key was born in Auckland, New Zealand, to George Key and Ruth Key. His father, who was from the UK, died of a heart attack in 1967. Key and his two sisters were raised in a state house in Christchurch by his mother.
He attended Burnside High School, and earned a Bachelor of Commerce degree in accounting from the University of Canterbury in 1981. He has attended management studies courses at Harvard University, although he did not receive a degree from this institution.
Key met his wife Bronagh when they were both students at Burnside High School. They married in 1984. She is currently full-time mother of their two children, Stephie and Max.
Before politics.
In 1995, he joined Merrill Lynch as head of Asian foreign exchange in Singapore. That same year he was promoted to Merrill's global head of foreign exchange, based in London, where he may have earned around US$2.25 million a year including bonuses, which is about NZ$5 million at 2001 exchange rates. Some co-workers called him "the smiling assassin" for maintaining his usual cheerfulness while sacking dozens (some say hundreds) of staff after heavy losses from the 1998 Russian financial crisis. He was a member of the Foreign Exchange Committee of the New York Federal Reserve Bank from 1999 to 2001.
Prime Minister.
Key became Prime Minister following the general election on 8 November 2008 which ended the Labour-led government of nine years under Helen Clark. The National Party, promoting a policy of "change", won 45% of the party vote and 59 of the 122 seats in Parliament, a big margin over the Labour Party which won 43 seats.
Key was sworn in as Prime Minister on 19 November 2008 along with his new cabinet. His first international outing as Prime Minister was the 20th APEC meeting in Peru the following day.

Peter Warlock
music
Peter Warlock (born London, 30 October 1894; died London, 17 December 1930), was an English composer. “Peter Warlock” was not his real name. His real name was Philip Heseltine. He was also a music critic. When he wrote about music he used his real name, but when he composed music he used the pseudonym (borrowed name) "Peter Warlock", which is the name by which he is usually remembered today.
Life.
Philip Heseltine did not come from a musical family. When he was two years old his father died. His mother married again and went back to live in Wales where she came from. Philip went to school at Eton College.
He was still a teenager when he was introduced to the composer Delius who lived in France. They became good friends and Philip made piano arrangements of some of Delius’s music. Later he wrote a book about Delius. He studied in Germany for a time and then at Oxford where he studied classics. He learned about music by teaching himself. He did not fight in World War I. He was a conscientious objector, but also: his health was not good enough for being in the army.
He spent most of his life in London, but he did visit Ireland for a year, and also spent three years with his mother in Wales and four years in Kent where he lived with Ernest Moeran. The two of them often got drunk together. He became friends with the composer Bernard van Dieren whose music influenced him a lot.
He also liked poetry from the time of Queen Elizabeth I.
He died in his apartment from gas poisoning. It is not certain whether it was suicide, but he did let the cat out before he turned on the gas.
His music.
His music, written under the name of Peter Warlock, often has links with his literary writings. Some of the best works he wrote are his songs, especially the song-cycle "The Curlew" which set poems by W. B. Yeats. One of his most popular works is the "Capriol Suite" for string orchestra.
Warlock wrote many lovely carols, such as "Adam Lay Ybounden", "Tyrley Tyrlow", and "Bethlehem Down".
Warlock was not influenced by folksong like many other English composers of the time. He liked many different styles including Renaissance music and the music of Bartók whom he met.

Arthur Bliss
music
Sir Arthur Bliss, (London, 2 August 1891; died London, 27 March 1975) was a British composer (a person who writes music). When he started composing, his music sounded very modern and harsh. As he got older he changed his style and wrote more Romantic music in the style of English composer Edward Elgar. For more than twenty years he was Master of the Queen's Music.
Early life.
His father was American, his mother was English. He went to school at Rugby. He went to Cambridge University where he studied with Irish composer Charles Wood. Wood also taught the composer Ralph Vaughan Williams. Bliss got to know Elgar whose music influenced him very much.
For a short time he learned music from Charles Villiers Stanford at the Royal College of Music. During World War I he served in the army.
After World War 1.
After the war he started to play his music in public. These compositions show the influence of Stravinsky, Ravel and Les Six. His music even sounded jazzy. After a few years his music became more Romantic. Elgar asked him to write something for the Three Choirs Festival in 1922. The piece he composed was his "Colour Symphony" in which he tries to describe colours in music.
During the 1920s his music became more traditional. He wrote a lot of music for films including music for the film "Things to Come" (H.G.Wells). He loved the theatre and composed music for the ballets "Checkmate" and "Miracle in the Gorbals". One of his best works is the choral symphony "Morning Heroes" (1930). This was written to remember those who were killed in World War I.
America.
When World War II started he was in the USA. He stayed there and taught at Berkeley, California until 1941. Then he returned to England. For a time he was Director of Music of the BBC. He wrote an opera "The Olympians". In 1953 he was made Master of the Queen's Music. He kept that position until his death, writing many pieces of music for official royal occasions.
He was given many honours, including the Companion of Honour and the Royal Victorian Order.
In his later years he composed several works for orchestra as well as for choirs.
He died on 27 March 1975. His wife, Gertrude died on 21 November 2008 at the age of 104.
References.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Mike Busniuk
sports
Mike Busniuk (born December 13, 1951 in Thunder Bay, Ontario) is a retired Canadian professional ice hockey player. He is the younger brother of Ron Busniuk, who played for the Buffalo Sabres.

Law of three stages
science
"From the study of the development of human intelligence, in all directions, and through all times, the discovery arises of a great fundamental law, to which it is necessarily subject, and which has a solid foundation of proof, both in the facts of our organization and in our historical experience. The law is this: that each of our leading conceptions -- each branch of our knowledge -- passes successively through three different theoretical conditions: the theological, or fictitious; the metaphysical, or abstract; and the scientific, or positive. In other words, the human mind, by its nature, employs in its progress three methods of philosophizing, the character of which is essentially different, and even radically opposed: namely, the theological method, the metaphysical, and the positive. Hence arise three philosophies, or general systems of conceptions on the aggregate of phenomena, each of which excludes the others. The first is the necessary point of departure of the human understanding, and the third is its fixed and definitive state. The second is merely a state of transition." (citation from "Cours of philosophy positive")

Constant Lambert
music
Constant Lambert (born London, 23 August 1905; died London, 21 August 1951) was a British composer and conductor.
Lambert’s father was the painter George Washington Lambert who had come to England from Australia. Lambert was often ill when he was a child. He went to school at Christ's Hospital and won a scholarship to the Royal College of Music. He soon became interested in French and Russian music. He became friends with other famous people including the Sitwell family, William Walton, Philip Heseltine and Bernard van Dieren. He and Edith Sitwell were the reciters at a performance of Walton’s "Façade".
Lambert was a prodigy: he was composing music for orchestra when he was only 13, and when he was 20 he was asked to write a ballet for Serge Diaghilev's world-famous Ballets Russes ("Romeo and Juliet").
He soon became very famous. His best known work is "The Rio Grande" for piano solo, chorus and orchestra. It has a mixture of musical styles: jazz, habaneras and the influence of Delius and Duke Ellington.
During the 1930s he performed a lot as a conductor with the Vic-Wells ballet (later the Royal Ballet), but he stopped composing music. Lambert thought he had failed as a composer, and only finished two more big works in the last sixteen years of his life. He continued conducting, and appeared at Covent Garden and in BBC broadcasts, and travelled to Europe and America conducting ballets. He was an excellent ballet conductor and helped the dancers to give their best performance.
During the war he became ill. He refused to see a doctor. He was working very hard and also drinking a lot.
Lambert liked jazz and thought it was an important influence on popular culture of the time. He wrote a book about this, called "Music Ho!" (1934). The book is widely read today, although it shows a very personal approach to music.
Lambert was married twice. His first marriage was to Florence Kaye. He later married Isabel Nichols, an artist, in 1947. After Constant Lambert's death, Isabel married the composer Alan Rawsthorne.
Lambert died on 21 August 1951. He had pneumonia and it was also found that he had diabetes made worse by alcoholism.

Samuel Coleridge-Taylor
music
Samuel Coleridge-Taylor (born London, 15 August 1875; died Croydon, 1 September 1912) was an English composer.
Coleridge-Taylor was born in Holborn, London. His black father was a doctor from Sierra Leone, his mother was English. His parents were not married. The father went back to Africa by February 1875. He had the job of coroner for the British Empire in the Gambia in the late 1890s. He did not know anything about his son’s existence.
Coleridge-Taylor was brought up in Croydon. He studied the violin at the Royal College of Music and composition with Charles Villiers Stanford. In 1899 he married Jessie Walmisley who had been a student with him at the RCM. Her parents did not want her to be married to someone of mixed race. The couple had a son, Hiawatha (1900-1980) and a daughter, Avril, born Gwendolyn (1903-1998).
Soon Coleridge-Taylor became known as a composer. Edward Elgar helped him get one of his pieces performed at the Three Choirs Festival. Two months later Stanford conducted the cantata "Hiawatha’s Wedding Feast", the piece for which he is best remembered. He toured the United States in 1904. This made him even more interested in finding out about his racial heritage. He wanted to do for African music what Johannes Brahms had done for Hungarian music and Antonín Dvořák for Bohemian music. He had met the American poet Paul Laurence Dunbar in London and set some of his poems to music. Several people encouraged him to learn more about his heritage.
Coleridge-Taylor was a shy man, but he was a very good conductor. He was often asked to adjudicate at music festivals.
Coleridge-Taylor was 37 when he died of pneumonia. His widow hardly had any money, but King George V gave her a pension of GB£100, which shows how popular Coleridge-Taylor had been as a composer. A memorial concert was held later in 1912 at the Royal Albert Hall and gathered £300.
Coleridge-Taylor's works were often performed by Sir Malcolm Sargent who conducted ten seasons of a costumed ballet version of "Hiawatha" at the Royal Albert Hall between 1928 and 1939 with the Royal Choral Society (600 to 800 singers) and 200 dancers.
His music.
Coleridge-Taylor's best-known work is his cantata "Hiawatha's Wedding-feast", which was performed very often by choral groups in England during his lifetime and for many years after his death. He wrote several other pieces about Hiawatha: "The Death of Minnehaha", "Overture to The Song of Hiawatha" and "Hiawatha's Departure".
He also wrote a lot of chamber music, anthems and other works. The orchestral piece "Petite Suite de Concert" used to be very popular, but its Romanticism sounds a little old-fashioned now.
Reference.
The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed Stanley Sadie; ISBN 1-56159-174-2

Quim Monzó
media
Quim Monzó was born in Barcelona, Spain, in 1952. He is a Catalan writer of novels, short stories and discursive prose, mostly in the Catalan language.
In the early 1970s, Monzó reported from Vietnam, Cambodia, Northern Ireland and East Africa for newspapers in Barcelona. His fiction is full of irony. His other prose maintains this humor. One collection of his essays, "Catorze ciutats comptant-hi Brooklyn", is notable for its account of New York in the days immediately following September 11.

Jeremy Adduono
sports
Jeremy Adduono (born August 4, 1978, in Thunder Bay, Ontario, Canada) is a Canadian professional ice hockey winger. He was drafted in the seventh round, 184th overall, by the Buffalo Sabres in the 1997 NHL Entry Draft.

Rutland Boughton
music
Rutland Boughton (born Aylesbury, Buckinghamshire 23 January 1878; died London, 25 January, 1960) was an English composer. He was well known in the early 20th century as a composer of opera and choral music.
Boughton studied with Charles Villiers Stanford and Walford Davies. He wrote many different kinds of music including symphonies, concertos, part-songs, songs, chamber music and opera. His best known work was the opera "The Immortal Hour". His carol "Bethlehem" (1915) became very popular in England and in many other countries.
He was a great admirer of the composer Richard Wagner who had built his own theatre, the Bayreuth Festspielhaus, in the German town of Bayreuth. Boughton wanted to create an "English Bayreuth" at Glastonbury, so he started the series of Glastonbury Festivals that took place from 1914 until 1926. From 1927 until his death in 1960, he lived at Kilcot near Newent, Gloucestershire.

Carl Reinecke
music
Carl Reinecke (born Altona, Hamburg 23 June 1824; died Leipzig, 10 March 1910) was a Danish-born composer, conductor, and pianist.
Reinecke was born near Hamburg, which was part of Denmark at the time. Carl learned music from his father. He was soon playing the piano in public and was composing by the age of twelve.
When he was 19 he travelled about giving concerts. He went as far east as Riga. In 1846 he became to Court Pianist for King Christian VIII in Copenhagen. He stayed there until 1848, composing four piano concertos as well as concertos for violin, cello, harp and flute. He continued to travel, including to Leipzig where he met Schumann, Mendelssohn and Liszt.
In 1851 he became a professor at the Cologne Conservatory. Later he had conducting jobs in Barmen and Breslau.
In 1860, Reinecke was made director of the famous Gewandhaus Orchestra concerts in Leipzig, and professor of composition and piano at the Conservatorium. He became director of the Conservatorium and made it one of the best in Europe. He conducted the Gewandhaus Orchestra for 35 years and raised the standard of their playing. He conducted many first performances, including the first complete performance of Brahms's "German Requiem" (1869).
Perhaps his best-known piece is the flute sonata "Undine". He taught many famous musicians, including Edvard Grieg, Christian Sinding, Leoš Janáček, Isaac Albéniz, Johan Svendsen, Felix Weingartner and Max Bruch.
At the age of 80, Reinecke recorded his playing on piano roll, making him the earliest-born pianist to have his playing recorded in any way.
He retired in 1902, but continued to compose until the end of his life.

Marin Marais
sports
Marin Marais (31 May 1656, Paris – 15 August 1728, Paris) was a French composer and viol player. He studied composition with Jean-Baptiste Lully. Marais often conducted the operas Lully had written. He also studied with Monsieur de Sainte-Colombe for 6 months. De Sainte-Colombe was a master at playing the bass viol. Marais was hired as a musician in 1676 to play at the royal court of Versailles. He did quite well as court musician. In 1679 was appointed "ordinaire de la chambre du roy pour la viole", a title he kept until 1725.
He was a master of the basse de viol. He wrote a lot of music for that instrument, he was the leading French composer for it. He wrote five books of "Pièces de viole" (1686-1725). Most of the pieces in the book are suites with basso continuo. These were quite popular in the court, and for these he was remembered in later years as he who "founded and firmly established the empire of the viol" (Hubert Le Blanc, 1740). His other works include a book of "Pièces en trio" (1692) and four operas (1693-1709). "Alcyone" (1706) is well-known for its tempest scene.
As with Sainte-Colombe, little of Marin Marais' personal life is known after he reached adulthood. Marin Marais married a Parisian, Catherine d'Amicourt, on September 21, 1676. They had 19 children together.
Facsimiles of all five books of Marais' "Pièces de viole" are published by Éditions J.M. Fuzeau. A complete critical edition of his instrumental works in seven volumes, edited by John Hsu, is published by Broude Brothers.
References in Film.
Marais and his music were featured in the movie "Tous les matins du monde" (1991). The movie shows an atmospheric, meticulously imagined life of Monsieur de Sainte-Colombe. Marais' music was very present, including his longer work "Sonnerie de Ste-Geneviève du Mont-de-Paris" (1723). A recording of the Sonnerie performed on a Fairlight synthesizer was used in the cult classic film Liquid Sky.

Frank Bridge
music
Frank Bridge (born Brighton, 26 February 1879; died Eastbourne, 10 January 1941) was an English composer, violist and conductor. His music often sounded quite modern to the people of his day. He wrote many excellent works including chamber music as well as orchestral music. One of his composition pupils was Benjamin Britten. Later Britten remembered his teacher by using one of Bridge’s tunes and making them into a piece of music called "Variations on a Theme of Frank Bridge".
Life.
Bridge was born in Brighton and studied at the Royal College of Music in London from 1899 to 1903. One of his teachers was Charles Villiers Stanford. He played the viola in several string quartets and conducted many orchestras. He learned difficult music very quickly, and sometimes Henry Wood asked him to take his place when he was not well enough to conduct himself. After a while he spent most of his time composing. He privately taught several pupils, including Benjamin Britten, who later helped to make his teacher's music better known and honoured him in his "Variations on a Theme of Frank Bridge" for string orchestra (1937), based on a theme from the second of Bridge's "Three Idylls for String Quartet" (1906).
Music.
Bridge’s early works show the influence of Brahms and Stanford. He wrote some excellent chamber music and songs. The "Phantasie Quartet" and the "String Quartet no 1" show his talent. His later pieces such as the third (1926) and fourth (1937) string quartets have quite complicated harmonies and show his interest in the music of Schoenberg as well as the harmonies of Maurice Ravel and Alexander Scriabin. His most important orchestral works include "The Sea" and "Summer". He wrote some lovely chamber music for the cello as well as many songs. In his later years his harmonies become quite advanced, for example a favourite chord of his can be found by playing a C minor chord and a D major chord together. In his longer pieces the speed of the music often changes and he avoids repeating himself exactly.
For a long time after his death his music was hardly ever played, but more recently musicians have discovered the greatness of his compositions. Pianists like to play the popular piano piece called "Rosemary".

Bruce Gamble
sports
Bruce George Gamble (May 24, 1938 – December 30, 1982) is a former professional ice hockey goaltender who played 10 season in the NHL between 1962 and 1972.

Live from Le Cabaret
music
Live from Le Cabaret is a hit live studio album by Rock-Pop band "Maroon 5". The album was exclusivly released on iTunes Store on July 8th of 2008.
The Recording of "Live from Le Cabaret".
This hit live album by Maroon 5 was released on July 8th, 08 and was recorded in Montreal, Quebec. The album is originally 1:05:37 long. The album is the third known live album recorded by Maroon 5.
Songs Performed.
The songs performed on "Live from Le Cabaret" are songs from Maroon 5's past studio albums. Songs from their debut studio album called "Songs About Jane" like Harder to Breathe, This Love (Maroon 5 song), She Will Be Loved, Shiver, and Sweetest Goodbye. Songs are also included from Maroon 5's second hit studio album called "It Won't Be Soon Before Long" like Makes Me Wonder, Little of Your Time, If I Never See Your Face Again, and more.

Charles Ives
music
Charles Edward Ives (born 30 October 1874; died 19 May 1954) was an American composer. He experimented with new ways of composing which many people did not understand at the time. These became more widely used later in the century. He used dissonant (harsh) sounding intervals and techniques such as polytonality (playing in several keys at once), polyrhythms (several rhythms at once) and polytextures (several textures at once). Very few people listened to his music at the time he was writing it. Only much later did musicians start to realize the importance of his work. Ives earned his living as an insurance agent. He composed in his spare time.
Early years.
Charles Ives was born in Danbury, Connecticut. His father George Ives, was a U.S. Army bandleader in the American Civil War. His mother was a singer. His father taught him a great deal about the music and encouraged him to experiment with new sounds. As well as teaching him counterpoint and introducing him to the music of J.S.Bach he trained his son’s musical ear by getting him to sing a tune in one key while he played the accompaniment in another. In this way the young Charles became used to modern sounds that were quite different from traditional, Romantic music. Charles also listened in Danbury town square to his father's marching band and other bands that were playing on other sides of the square, so that he heard a mixture of several pieces of music at the same time. His father also taught him the music of Stephen Foster.
Ives became a church organist at the age of 14 and wrote various hymns and songs for church services, including his "Variations on 'America' ". At the same time he also enjoyed sport and was good at baseball, football and tennis.
Ives spent four years at Yale University. His teacher Horatio Parker was very good and taught him important basic techniques of composing, but he could not understand some of things that Ives was writing in his music. Ives got annoyed when his teacher told him he could not finish a section of music on a dissonant chord, but Ives liked it like that. The choirmaster at the Centre Church where Ives played the organ was John Griggs. He had more understanding of what Ives was trying to do. It was a terrible blow to Charles when his father died on 4 November 1894. He always had a huge admiration for his father who had encouraged him in his musical experiments. Charles kept busy composing. He did not do any sport at Yale because his father had forbidden him to take part in sport so that he would spend his time on studying. By the time Charles graduated he had composed more than 40 songs, several marches, overtures, anthems and organ pieces, a string quartet and a symphony. However, most people thought of him as the composer of a simple waltz tune called "The Bells of Yale".
Adult years.
After his studies at Yale Ives continued to work as a church organist while working for an insurance firm. He was very good at his job and became very well known in the insurance business. Some of his business friends were often surprised to find out that he was also a composer.
In 1907, Ives had his first "heart attack". These attacks may have been more to do with his imagination. When he was better he composed more than ever before. He married in 1908. After several heart attacks in 1918 he composed very little. He stopped composing altogether in 1926. His health problems continued, and he retired from the insurance business in 1930. He spent some time revising works he had written early, but never wrote any more new pieces.
Ives died in 1954 in New York City.
His music.
Ives published more than 100 of his songs. He was a very good pianist and the piano parts are often quite difficult. They include bitonality and pantonality.. Although he is now best known for his orchestral music, he composed two string quartets and other chamber music. His organ piece "Variations on "America" (1891), takes the tune "My Country, 'Tis of Thee" (which is the same tune as "God Save the Queen ") and changes it in several amusing variations, using a march, a ragtime and bitonality. it was not published until 1949. The variations differ sharply: a running line, a set of close harmonies, a march, a polonaise, and a ragtime allegro; the interludes are one of the first uses of bitonality.
His "Symphony Number 1" was fairly traditional, but "Symphony Number 2" is much more modern sounding, even ending with a dissonant chord with 11 notes.
In 1902 he gave up his organ job. Unfortunately he left all his best anthems and organ music in the church library, and these were thrown out in 1915 when the church moved so most of them are lost.
"Central Park in the Dark" is a piece for orchestra which describes the mysterious, quiet park and then sounds of music coming from nearby nightclubs in Manhattan (playing the popular music of the day, ragtime, quoting "Hello My Baby" and even Sousa's "Washington Post March").
Perhaps the piece which is most often heard today is the short fanfare "The Unanswered Question" (1908), written for the very unusual combination of trumpet, four flutes, and string orchestra. The strings, playing from behind the stage, play very slow, chorale-like music throughout the piece while several times the trumpet (playing from behind the audience) plays a short group of notes that Ives described as "the eternal question of existence". Each time the trumpet is answered with harsh outbursts from the flutes (onstage) — apart from the last one. That is the question that is left unanswered. Musicians often have discussions about what the real meaning of the piece is.
Another well-known orchestral work is "Three Places in New England". His best-known piano work is his "Concord Sonata". Ives often liked to quote bits of other pieces, and in this piano sonata he quotes the famous opening of Beethoven's "Fifth Symphony". It also has an interesting example of one of Ives' experiments: in the second movement, he tells the pianist to use a 14¾ in (37.5 cm) piece of wood to make a thick but soft cluster chord. The sonata is one of the best piano works of the 20th century.
One of his most interesting works is the his "Fourth Symphony" (1910–16) written for a huge orchestra. The last movement is like a fight between discord and traditional tonal music. The piece ends quietly with just the percussion playing at a distance. This symphony seems to say everything that Ives had been trying to do in music. It was not until 1965 that a complete performance of the symphony was given.
Ives’ music only gradually began to get well known during the 1930s and into the 1940s. Schoenberg recognized his importance. In 1951, Leonard Bernstein conducted the first performance of Ives' Second Symphony in a broadcast concert by the New York Philharmonic Orchestra. He recorded a lot of his music and even played some in a television programme for young people.

Happy Xmas (War Is Over)
music
"Happy Xmas (War Is Over)" is a song by John Lennon, Yoko Ono and the The Plastic Ono Band.

Jean-François Le Sueur
music
Jean-François Le Sueur (or Lesueur) (15 February 1760 — 6 October 1837) was a French composer, best known for his oratorios and operas.
Life.
Jean-François Le Sueur was born in a tiny village called Plessiel, near Abbeville. His great-uncle was the painter Eustache Le Sueur. He started his musical training by singing in the choir at the church of Abbeville, then at the cathedral of Amiens. Le Sueur became chorus master at the cathedral of Sées. He went to Paris to study harmony. His teacher was Abbé Nicolas Roze, chorus master at the church Saints-Innocents. Le Sueur got jobs at Dijon (1779), Le Mans (1782), Tours (1783) and then took over Roze’s job at the Saints-Innocents at Paris. In 1786 he was made music director at the famous church Notre-Dame de Paris.
At Notre Dame he started to use orchestras to play the music for some of the special services. The priests did not like this. Le Sueur replied by writing a little book about music for big religious celebrations. It was a bad time in France financially and the church had to make savings, so Le Sueur could not have his orchestra any more, so he resigned from his job.
Le Sueur spent some time in London, 1788-92, then returned to Paris where the revolution was going on. Three of his operas were performed, and he became professor at the Ecole de la Garde Nationale, and then at the Conservatoire which was very new at the time. There he taught basic music theory. He was unable to get any more operas of his performed. He wrote a book saying how music should be taught in France, and criticizing the Conservatoire and its director. Because of that he lost his job at the Conservatoire.
Le Sueur now had no job and so he was very poor. Then, in 1804, Napoleon made him maître de la chapelle at the Tuileries in the place of Giovanni Paisiello. He was then able to have his most famous work performed at the Opéra. It was called "Ossian ou Les bardes". Napoleon liked it very much and gave Le Sueur the cross of the Légion d'honneur. Le Sueur composed the "Triumphal March" for the coronation of Napoleon. In 1813, he was given a position at the Académie des Beaux-Arts, replacing André Grétry.
At the Bourbon Restoration, he was named composer of the royal chapel and conductor of the orchestra of the Opéra. From the beginning of 1818, he taught composition at the Conservatoire. He stayed there many years. His most famous pupils were Hector Berlioz, Ambroise Thomas and Charles Gounod.

Anton Reicha
music
Anton Reicha (born 26 February 1770; died 28 May 1836) was a Czech-born composer who became naturalized French. He was a lifelong friend of Beethoven.
Reicha is now best remembered for the large number of quintets that he wrote for wind instruments, and for his work as a music teacher. Franz Liszt and Hector Berlioz were both pupils of Reicha. Reicha wrote several books about music theory and composition.

Alexandra Burke
music
Alexandra Imelda Cecelia Ewan Burke (born 25 August 1988) is an English soul singer. She is known for winning the fifth series of the "X Factor UK" in 2008. She also had the 2008 Christmas number one single in the United Kingdom with a cover of Leonard Cohen's "Hallelujah"

A Rush of Blood to the Head
music
A Rush of Blood to the Head eas released August of 2002 by Coldplay. The album includes the singles "In My Place", "The Scientist", "Clocks", and "God Put a Smile Up On Your Face".

Lost!
music
"Lost" is a series of songs/singles recorded aspecially by Coldplay. The songs came off the full extended version of "Viva la Vida or Death and All His Friends" called "Prospect's March Edition".

Georg Michaelis
politics
Georg Michaelis (September 8, 1857 – July 24, 1936) became the first Chancellor of Germany with a non-noble background.

Minneapolis Millers
sports
The Minneapolis Millers were an ice hockey team that played in the American Hockey Association. A famous player who played for the Millers was Tiny Thompson.

Ricky Sbragia
sports
Richard 'Ricky' Spragia (born May 26, 1956) is a former Scottish footballer who currently manages Sunderland.
He was appointed in late December 2008 after the previous manager Roy Keane walked out after a run of bad results which had left Sunderland towards the foot of the table. In his first four games as caretaker manager he managed two wins and a draw and this was enough to get him the unanimous vote of the board and was appointed with a permanent contract on 27 December 2008.

Alex Kapranos
music
Alex Kapranos is the lead singer of British band Franz Ferdinand.

Steve Lamacq
media
Steve Lamacq is a disc jockey for BBC Radio 1.

Bloc Québécois
politics
The Bloc Québécois is a federal political party based in Canada.

James Hansen
science
James E. Hansen (born March 29, 1941 in Denison, Iowa) heads the NASA Goddard Institute for Space Studies in New York City, a part of the Goddard Space Flight Center in Greenbelt, Maryland, Earth Sciences Division. He is currently an Adjunct Professor in the Department of Earth and Environmental Sciences at Columbia University. Hansen is best known for his research in the field of climatology, his testimony on climate change to congressional committees in the 1980s that helped raise broad awareness of the global warming issue, and his continuing advocacy of action to limit the impacts of climate change. He has been a critic of both the Clinton and current Bush Administration's stances on climate change.
Hansen was elected to the National Academy of Sciences in 1996 and he received a US$250,000 Heinz Environment Award
for his research on global warming in 2001. He was listed as one of Time Magazine's 100 Most Influential People in the Time 100 (2006) list
and, in 2007, he shared the US$1 million Dan David Prize. On April 5, 2008, Dr. Hansen received the PNC Bank Common Wealth Award of Distinguished Service for his outstanding achievements in science.

Conspiracy theory
science
A conspiracy theory is a story that says that a small group of people (a "conspiracy") are doing illegal or evil things and hide them from the public. Many conspiracy theories say that certain historical events were actually caused by this group but nobody knows about it.

Missy Elliott
music
Melissa Arnette "Missy" Elliott (born July 1, 1971) is a five-time Grammy Award-winning American rapper, singer, songwriter, and record producer. With record sales of over seven million in the United States, she is the only female rapper to have six albums certified platinum by the RIAA, including one double platinum ("Under Construction").

James Henry Hammond
politics
James Henry Hammond (November 15, 1807 – November 13, 1864) was from South Carolina. He served as a United States Representative from 1835 to 1836, Governor of South Carolina from 1842 to 1844, and United States Senator from 1857 to 1860. He had a son. He was also a slave owner; his plantation is in Redcliffe Park in South Carolina. The stables at Redcliffe Park were either built by him or his son.

She Wants You
music
"She Wants You" is a single by English singer and actress Billie Piper. The single reached #3 in the UK becoming her third top three hit in a row.

Neil Peart
music
Neil Peart (born Neil Ellwood Peart, September 12, 1952, Hamilton, Ontario) is a Canadian musician and author. He is best-known as the drummer and lyricist for the rock band Rush. He is also an author of 4 books, including Ghost Rider, a book about his life after both his daughter and his wife died within a year of each other. He has won many awards for his drumming, and is often considered one of the greatest drummers of all time.

WWE Tag Team Championship
sports
The WWE Tag Team Championship is a professional wrestling world tag team championship of World Wrestling Entertainment, and it's exclusive of SmackDown brand.
Current Champions.
The current champions are Carlito and Primo Colón, both in their first reign. They defeated Curt Hawkins and Zack Ryder on the September 26, 2008 "SmackDown" edition (taped September 21) in Columbus, Ohio.

Maurice Duruflé
music
Maurice Duruflé (born Louviers, 11 January 1902; died Louveciennes, 16 June 1986) was a French composer and organist. He was very self-critical and destroyed any of his compositions that he thought were not really good. This is why we now only have a small number of his works. He wrote choral music and music for the organ. His most famous work is his "Requiem".
Life.
Duruflé was born in Louviers, Haute-Normandie. In 1912, he joined the choir of Rouen Cathedral where he studied piano and organ. When he was 17 he went to Paris and had private organ lessons with Charles Tournemire. He became Tournemire’s assistant at the Basilique Ste-Clotilde, Paris until 1927. In 1920 Duruflé went to study at the Conservatoire de Paris. His organ teacher was Eugène Gigout. When he graduated he got first prizes in organ, harmony, piano accompaniment, and composition.
In 1929 Duruflé became organist at St. Étienne-du-Mont in Paris, a job he kept for the rest of his life.
In 1939, he gave the first performance of Francis Poulenc's Organ Concerto. In 1943 he became professor of harmony at the Conservatoire de Paris, where he worked until 1970. In 1947, Duruflé wrote his famous "Requiem" op. 9, for soloists, choir, organ and orchestra. In the same year Marie-Madeleine Chevalier became his assistant organist at St-Étienne-du-Mont. They married in 1953 after Duruflé divorced his first wife. The couple often travelled together to give organ recitals together. They always spent many hours practising on the organs on which they had to perform, often practising a lot of the time without the sound so that their fingers were really used to the feel of the organ.
In 1975 Duruflé was badly hurt in a car accident and had to give up performing. His wife, who was not so badly hurt in the accident, was still able to play and continued to play the organ at St-Étienne-du-Mont.
Duruflé died in Louveciennes (near Paris) in 1986, aged 84.
Duruflé only left a few of his works for publication. His two important organ works are the "Suite, op. 5" which has a famous Toccata as last movement, and his "Prelude and Fugue sur le nom d'Alain". His "Requiem" remains a favourite work for choirs. Duruflé’s music uses Gregorian plainchant, modal harmonies and polyphonic writing. He was a great admirer of the music of Louis Vierne and Charles Tournemire and he made transcriptions of some of their improvisations.

World Chess Championship
sports
The World Chess Championship is played to choose the World Champion in the board game chess. Both men and women can become champion. Before 1886, there was no official championship held, and from 1948 on, the world chess federation FIDE held the championships. Between 1993 and 2006 there were two world champion titles, the FIDE one and the classical one.

Kazuyoshi Miura
sports
Kazuyoshi Miura (born 26 February, 1967) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Yokohama.

Pierre Littbarski
sports
Pierre Littbarski (born 16 April, 1960) is a former German football player. He has played for West Germany national team.

Masashi Nakayama
sports
Masashi Nakayama (born 23 September, 1967) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Júbilo Iwata.

George Enescu
music
George Enescu (August 19, 1881, Liveni – May 4, 1955, Paris) was a Romanian composer. He was born in Liveni, Romania.

BC Lions
sports
The BC Lions are a Canadian Football League team from Vancouver, BC. The Lions play their games at BC Place Stadium. The Lions play in the CFL West Division. The Lions were started in 1954 and used to play at Empire Stadium in East Vancouver. They have won the Grey Cup five times.

Karl Goldmark
music
Karl Goldmark (born Keszthely, Hungary, 18 May 1830; died Vienna 2 January 1915) was a Hungarian composer. His music was largely forgotten for a long time after his death, but is now starting to be played much more.
Life and career.
Goldmark came from a large Jewish family. He was one of 20 children. His father was a chazan to the Jewish congregation at Keszthely. He learned to play the violin and was sent to Vienna to study music. After the Revolution of 1848 the Conservatory had to close down and so he had to teach himself how to compose. He earned money by playing the violin in theatre orchestras and by teaching music. For a short time one of his pupils was Jean Sibelius.
Wagner's music was an influence on his compositional style. However, he could not form a proper friendship with Wagner because of Wagner's antisemitism.
Goldmark composed six operas, including "Die Königin von Saba" ("The Queen of Sheba"). It was very popular during his lifetime and continued to be performed by the Vienna State Opera until 1938. His Violin Concerto No. 1 was also very popular indeed, then it lay forgotten for many years. It is very Romantic and sounds very Hungarian.
Other works include a symphony called "Ländliche Hochzeit" (Rustic Wedding) and several other orchestral works, some chamber music and choral music.

Ferruccio Busoni
music
Ferruccio Busoni (born 1 April; died 27 July 1924) was an Italian composer, pianist, teacher and conductor.
His life.
Ferruccio Busoni was born in Empoli in Tuscany in Italy. His parents were both musicians. His father played the clarinet and his mother played the piano. They were often touring when Ferruccio was young. He spent most of his childhood in Trieste.
Busoni was a child prodigy. He first played the piano in public at the age of seven. Two years later he played some of his own compositions in Vienna. The composer Franz Liszt heard him. He also met Liszt, Johannes Brahms and Anton Rubinstein.
For a short time he studied in Graz, then in Leipzig. He taught in several places including Helsinki, where he met Jean Sibelius as well as a young lady was to be his wife. In 1890 he won the Anton Rubinstein Competition with his Concert Piece for Piano and Orchestra. He taught in Moscow in 1890, and in the United States from 1891 to 1894 where he also toured as a virtuoso pianist.
In 1894 he went to Berlin where he stayed. He performed as a pianist and conductor and taught many gifted pianists.
He wrote a book called "Sketch of a New Aesthetic of Music". He did not agree with the strict rules that were used by most teachers for teaching composition. He thought that music was "born to be free". His thinking influenced his composition pupils who included Percy Grainger, Kurt Weill and Edgard Varèse.
During World War I, Busoni lived first in Bologna, where he was director of the conservatory, and later in Zürich. He refused to perform in any countries that were involved in the war. He returned to Berlin in 1920 where he gave master classes in composition.
Busoni died in Berlin from a kidney disease.
Music.
Busoni's music is based on the Romantic style, but it also starts to sound quite modern. He uses a lot of complicatedcounterpoint. Sometimes it is quite atonal. A lot of it is based on music of the past. He made many transcriptions, including piano transcriptions of several works by Johann Sebastian Bach.
Busoni was a virtuoso pianist, and his works for piano are difficult to perform. His "Piano Concerto" is extremely hard to play as well as being extremely long (about 70 minutes). The British pianist John Ogdon, who played it, called it "the longest and grandest piano concerto of all".
Some of his best known works include his suite for orchestra "Turandot" which he made into an opera, and his opera "Doktor Faust" which he had not finished when he died. It was finished by his student Philipp Jarnach, but in the 1980s Anthony Beaumont made a better version of it.
Recordings.
Busoni made a number of piano rolls, and a small number of these have been re-recorded onto CD. People who knew him disagree about whether these piano roll recordings show his playing at his best.

Ian Gillan
music
Ian Gillan is the lead singer for the heavy metal band Deep Purple. He is famous for his high-pitched falsettos and the ability to reach notes much higher than most people. He also wrote lyrics to many of their famous songs, including "Smoke on the Water." Gillan is also noted for singing the part of Jesus on the original rock opera concept album Jesus Christ Superstar.

Robert Costanza
science
Robert Costanza (born 14 September, 1950) is an American ecological economist and the Gund Professor of Ecological economics and Director of the Gund Institute for Ecological Economics at the University of Vermont.
Biography.
Robert Costanza was born in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. He studied architecture and urban and regional planning from the University of Florida and got a Masters degree. He received his Ph.D. from the University of Florida in 1979 in systems ecology, with a minor in economics.
In 1982 he was selected as a Kellogg National Fellow, in 1992 he was awarded the Society for Conservation Biology Distinguished Achievement Award and in 1993 he was selected as a Pew Scholar in Conservation and the Environment. In 1998 he was awarded the Kenneth Boulding Memorial Award for Outstanding Contributions in Ecological Economics. In 2000 he received an honorary doctorate in natural sciences from Stockholm University.
Before he moved to Vermont in August 2002, he was director of the University of Maryland, College Park Institute for Ecological Economics, and a professor in the Center for Environmental Science, at Solomons, and in the Biology Department at College Park.
Costanza is co-founder and past-president of the International Society for Ecological Economics (ISEE) and was chief editor of the society’s journal "Ecological Economics" from its inception until 9/02. He serves on the editorial board of eight other international academic journals. He is president of the International Society for Ecosystem Health.
Work.
Dr. Costanza's research has focused on the interface between ecological and economic systems. This includes landscape level spatial simulation modeling; analysis of energy and material flows through economic and ecological systems; valuation of ecosystem services, biodiversity, and natural capital; and analysis of dysfunctional incentive systems and ways to correct them.
Literature.
His work has been cited in more than 1700 scientific articles since 1987 (according to the Science Citation Index) and more than 80 interviews and reports on his work have appeared in various media, including Newsweek, US News and World Report, the Economist, the New York Times, Science, Nature, National Geographic, and National Public Radio.

Gringo Gazette
media
The Gringo Gazette is a newspaper in English-language founded by Carrie Duncan, published every other week for the americans expatriate communities in Baja California and Baja California Sur, Mexico. It is published since 2001 and most of its contributors are Americans living in Mexico or Americans with a second home in Mexico. Most of the subscribers of this newspaper are located in San Felipe, La Paz and Cabo San Lucas.

Barry Marshall
science
Barry James Marshall, AC FRS FAA (born 30 September 1951) is an Australian doctor and winner of the 2005 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine. He is Professor of Clinical Microbiology at the University of Western Australia. Marshall is well-known for proving that bacteria "Helicobacter pylori" are the cause of most stomach ulcers. This changed years of medical belief which said that ulcers were caused by stress, spicy foods, and too much acid. He has recently taken a part-time position at the Pennsylvania State University.
Early years.
Marshall was born in Kalgoorlie, Western Australia. He lived in Kalgoorlie and Carnarvon until moving to Perth at the age of seven. He went to high school at Newman College, Perth. At the University of Western Australia, he studied medicine and surgery. He married his wife, Adrienne, in 1972. In 1972 he was also the Western Australian state yo-yo champion.
Life and research.
In 1979 Marshall became a Registrar in Medicine at the Royal Perth Hospital. At the hospital he met Robin Warren, a pathologist who was interested in gastritis. They were both training in internal medicine at Royal Perth Hospital in 1981. Together they looked at spiral bacteria in gastritis. In 1982 they grew a culture of "H. pylori". They worked on their idea that there was a bacterial cause of peptic ulcer and gastric cancer. Their idea was laughed at by scientists and doctors who did not believe that any bacteria could live in the acidic stomach. Marshall said that "Everyone was against me, but I knew I was right". Other doctors said they wouldn't believe it until the "H. pylori" idea could be proved.
Marshall and Warren tried to give the bacteria to piglets in 1984, but it didn't work. Marshall drank some of the bacteria and soon developed gastritis with achlorhydria. He had stomach discomfort, nausea, vomiting and halitosis (bad smelling breath). On the 14th day of the infection, biopsies of Marshall's stomach did not show any bacteria. His body may have got rid of the bacteria without help. His wife made him take antibiotics immediately so there was no way of checking the negative result again. He did not develop antibodies to H.pylori. This means that natural immunity can sometimes get rid of H.pylori infection. His illness and recovery, showed the link between "H. pylori" and gastritis, but not for peptic ulcer. This experiment was published in 1985 in the Medical Journal of Australia and is among the most cited articles from the journal.
After this work at Fremantle Hospital, Marshall did research at Royal Perth Hospital (1985-86) and at the University of Virginia, USA (1986-1996), before going back to Australia. He held a Burnet Fellowship at the University of Western Australia from 1998-2003. He is still looking at "H. pylori" and runs the H.pylori Research Laboratory at UWA.
Awards and honours.
In 2005, the Karolinska Institute in Stockholm gave the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine to Dr. Marshall and Dr. Warren for finding the bacterium "Helicobacter pylori" and its part in gastritis and peptic ulcer disease.
He was made a Companion of the Order of Australia in 2007.

Ronald Ross
science
Ronald Ross (May 13, 1857 - September 16, 1932) was an English doctor. He won the 1902 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for work on malaria.

Niels Ryberg Finsen
science
Niels Ryberg Finsen (December 15, 1860 - September 24, 1904) was an Danish doctor. He won the 1903 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for treating lupus vulgaris (tuberculosis of the skin), with light radiation..

Robert Koch
science
Robert Koch (December 11, 1843 - May 27, 1910) was a German doctor. He won the 1905 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for studying tuberculosis".

Camillo Golgi
science
Camillo Golgi (July 7, 1843 - January 21, 1926) was an Italian doctor. He won the 1906 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, along with Santiago Ramón y Cajal, for their work on the parts of the nervous system.

Santiago Ramón y Cajal
science
Santiago Ramón y Cajal (May 1, 1852 - October 18, 1934) was a Spanish doctor. He won the 1906 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, along with Camillo Golgi, for their work on the parts of the nervous system"

Robert Douglas (footballer)
sports
Robert James "Rab" Douglas is a footballer currently playing at Dundee F.C.;

Charles Louis Alphonse Laveran
science
Charles Louis Alphonse Laveran (June 18, 1845 - May 18, 1922) was a French doctor. He won the 1907 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for his work on the way protozoa can cause disease.

Paul Ehrlich
science
Paul Ehrlich (March 14, 1854 - August 20, 1915) is an German doctor. He won the 1908 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, along with Ilya Ilyich Mechnikov, for finding out how immunity fights disease.

Emil Theodor Kocher
science
Emil Theodor Kocher (August 25, 1841 - July 27, 1917) was a Swiss doctor. He won the 1909 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for his work on the thyroid gland"

Albrecht Kossel
science
Albrecht Kossel (September 16, 1853 - July 5, 1927) was a German doctor. He won the 1910 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for his work on proteins and nucleic substances

Allvar Gullstrand
science
Allvar Gullstrand (June 5, 1862 - July 28, 1930) was a Swedish opthalmologist (eye doctor). He won the 1911 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for his work on light refraction and the eye.

Robert Bárány
science
Robert Bárány (April 22, 1876 - April 8, 1936) was an Austrian doctor. He won the 1914 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for his work on the ear and balance

Eddie Vedder
music
Eddie Vedder is an American singer. He has been a member of the grunge bands Pearl Jam and Temple of the Dog.

August Krogh
science
Schack August Steenberg Krogh (November 15, 1874 - September 13, 1949) is an Danish zoologist. He won the 1920 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for his discoveries about capillaries.

Archibald Hill
politics
Archibald Vivian Hill (September 26,1886 - June 3, 1977) was an English mathematician. He won the 1922 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for finding out how muscles make heat.

Otto Fritz Meyerhof
science
Otto Fritz Meyerhof (April 12, 1884 - October 6, 1951) was a German doctor. He won the 1922 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for finding out how oxygen makes chemical changes in lactic acid in muscles.

Frederick Banting
science
Frederick Grant Banting (November 14, 1891 - February 21, 1941) was an Canadian doctor. He won the 1923 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, along with John James Richard Macleod, for the discovery of insulin

George Weah
sports
George Weah (born 1 October, 1966) is a former football player. He has played for Liberia national team.

Naohiro Takahara
sports
Naohiro Takahara (born 4 June, 1979) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Urawa Red Diamonds and Japan national team.

Shunsuke Nakamura
sports
Shunsuke Nakamura (born 24 June, 1978) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Celtic and Japan national team.

Romário
sports
Romário (born 29 January, 1966) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Fernando Hierro
sports
Fernando Hierro (born 23 March, 1968) is a former Spanish football player. He has played for Spain national team.

Andriy Shevchenko
sports
Andriy Shevchenko (born 29 September, 1976) is a football player. He plays for Milan and Ukraine national team.

Ferry Corsten
music
Ferry Corsten is a musical artist that creates music in the electronica and trance varieties. He lives in Rotterdam, Netherlands. Ferry hosts his own radio show, "Corsten's Countdown".

Sócrates
sports
Sócrates (born 19 February, 1954) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Atsushi Yanagisawa
sports
Atsushi Yanagisawa (born 27 May, 1977) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Kyoto Sanga.

Ian Harte
sports
Ian Harte (born 31 August, 1977) is a Irish football player. He plays for Blackpool.

Damien Duff
sports
Damien Duff (born 2 March, 1979) is a Irish football player. He has played for Newcastle United and Republic of Ireland national team.

Shay Given
sports
Shay Given (born 20 April, 1976) is a Irish football player. He plays for Newcastle United and Republic of Ireland national team.

Dragan Stojković
sports
Dragan Stojković (born 3 March 1965) is a former Serbian (formerly Yugoslavian) football player. He has played for Yugoslavia national team and Yugoslavia national team.

Tsuneyasu Miyamoto
sports
Tsuneyasu Miyamoto (born 7 February 1977) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Vissel Kobe.

Filippo Inzaghi
sports
Filippo Inzaghi (born 9 August, 1973) is an Italian football player. He plays for Milan.

Kenny Miller
sports
Kenneth "Kenny" Miller, born 23 December 1979 in Edinburgh, is a Scottish footballer playing for Scottish Premier League side Rangers and the Scottish national team. He is a centre forward.
Hibernian.
Kenny started his career at Hibernian F.C., and made his debut in the 1997/98 season. He was loaned to Stenhousemuir F.C. where he scored 10 goals in 11 games. He spent four years at the club, and was the SPL top scorer in season 1999/00 and received the Scottish Young Player of the Year award in 2000.
Rangers.
Kenny signed for Rangers for £2 million in June 2000.. He made his debut in a 4-1 win against FBK Kaunas on 26 July during a Champions League match. His first goal came on 5 August 2000 during an SPL match away to Kilmarnock, scoring the third in a 4-2 win.
Three months later, Miller netted five goals (a Scottish Premier League record) during a 7-1 home defeat of St Mirren. More goals against AS Monaco and Aberdeen meant he had ten goals from just fourteen games. However, until the end of the season, Miller only scored once more, against Brechin City in the Scottish Cup.
In September 2001, he went to Wolverhampton Wanderers (Wolves) on a three-month loan, scoring two goals in his first two games. However, during his third match, Miller broke his shoulder in a fall. During the next two months, Wolves and Rangers had talks over his future. Wolves finally bought him on a permanent deal at a cost of £3 million. Miller had made a total of 38 appearances and scored 11 goals for Rangers.
Wolverhampton Wanderers.
In 2002/03 Miller was playing most games for Wolves, but he had only managed six goals in 19 games. However, during the final six months of the season he scored 18 goals in his final 24 appearances. He equalled a club record of scoring in six consecutive games. That helped Wolves gain promotion into the English Premier League.
In the summer of the 2005/06 season, the newly promoted Premiership team Sunderland wanted to sign Miller, but Wolves rejected their £1m and £1.2m offers and Miller began the new season as a Wolves player. Miller scored 12 goals, and ended the season as top scorer - the third time in Wolves last three seasons. Miller played more than 190 games for Wolves and scored more than 60 goals during his five years with the club.
Celtic.
When Miller's contract finished at the end of that season, he transferred to Celtic for free under special rules, caled the Bosman ruling. He signed an agreement in January after refusing to sign a new deal at Wolves a month earlier. Miller became only the third player since the war to have played for both sides of the Old Firm - following Alfie Conn and Maurice Johnston.
Despite being praised by many for his overall performances, Miller failed to score in his first nine games for Celtic. He finally scored his first goal, against Old Firm rivals and former employers Rangers at Celtic Park in September 2006. He then went on to score in Celtic's 1–0 UEFA Champions League win against Copenhagen from the penalty spot and scored two in the 3–0 win over Benfica. By scoring in the 2006/07 Champions League season, Miller became the first player to score goals in the Champions League for both Rangers and Celtic. However, he ended the season with only four league goals. He did play in the 2007 Scottish Cup final, before being substituted because of an injury. Despite hints from the player himself that he would leave to get more first-team opportunities, Miller vowed to stay at the club and fight for his place at the club. Miller scored his first goal in his first appearance of the 2007/08 season in a 4–1 victory over Falkirk and added to his collection the following week by scoring against Aberdeen. He scored 11 goals in total for the club in 46 appearances.
Derby County.
Miller signed a three year deal with newly promoted Premier League club Derby County on 31 August 2007 for an undisclosed fee, thought to be around £3 million, but later confirmed by Derby County manager Paul Jewell to be closer to £2.25m.
Miller started well at his new club, scoring in his first two home matches, including the winner on his league debut for the Rams against Newcastle in a 1–0 win on 17 September 2007, a strike which won the club's Goal Of The Season award. However, following this initial success Miller netted just twice in his next 28 league fixtures.
With Derby looking like they would be relegated Miller said he would like to move just over 6 months after joining the club - with a return to Rangers his preferred destination, though his manager Jewell insisted any move would have to be financially fair for Derby.
Return to Rangers.
A fee of £2m was agreed between Rangers and Derby allowing Miller to move back to Ibrox. The deal was completed on 13 June. Miller's return to Ibrox means he is one of only a few players to cross the Old Firm divide twice.
Miller made his second debut for the club on 30 July 2008 in a UEFA Champions League qualifier gainst FBK Kaunas. He scored in the first Old Firm game of the season on 31 August 2008. He followed this up with a further two goals against former employers Hibernian at Easter Road on 28 September 2008, then adding his sixth goal back in a Rangers shirt at Rugby Park in a 4-0 win over Kilmarnock.
International career.
Since making his Scottish international debut in 2001, Miller has remained a player in the Scotland team under the management of Berti Vogts, Walter Smith and Alex McLeish.
He has scored goals in crucial games against several teams, including Germany and Ukraine. In 2005, Miller scored in three consecutive internationals, with goals against Austria, Italy and Norway.

Yasuhiko Okudera
sports
Yasuhiko Okudera (born 12 March, 1952) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Hans Ooft
sports
Hans Ooft (born 27 June, 1947) is a former Dutch football player. He has played for Feyenoord Rotterdam.

Ruy Ramos
sports
Ruy Ramos (born 9 February, 1957) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Sergio Echigo
sports
Sergio Echigo (born 28 July, 1945) is a former football player.

Takashi Mizunuma
sports
Takashi Mizunuma (born 28 May, 1960) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Yokohama Marinos and Japan national team.

Sōta Hirayama
sports
Sōta Hirayama (born 6 June, 1985) is a Japanese football player. He has played for Tokyo.

Alessandro Nesta
sports
Alessandro Nesta (born 19 March, 1976) is a Italian football player. He plays for Milan.

Ahn Jung-Hwan
sports
Ahn Jung-Hwan (born 27 January, 1976) is a football player. He plays for Busan I'Park and South Korea national team.

Pavel Nedvěd
sports
Pavel Nedvěd (born 30 August, 1972) is a football player. He plays for Juventus.

Marcus Tulio Tanaka
sports
Marcus Tulio Tanaka (born 24 April, 1981) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Urawa Red Diamonds and Japan national team.

İlhan Mansız
sports
İlhan Mansız (born 10 August, 1975) is a former football player. He has played for Turkey national team.

Masakiyo Maezono
sports
Masakiyo Maezono (born 29 October, 1973) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Zico
sports
Zico (born 3 March, 1953) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Akihiro Nagashima
sports
Akihiro Nagashima (born 9 April, 1964) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Roque Santa Cruz
sports
Roque Santa Cruz (born 16 August, 1981) is a football player. He plays for Blackburn Rovers and Paraguay national team.

Cafu
sports
Cafu (born 7 June, 1970) is a Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Eric Walter Elst
science
Eric Walter Elst is an astronomer from Belgium. Elst has found nearly 3,500 asteroids, including many notable asteroids. An asteroid, 3936 Elst, was named after him.

Gary Neville
sports
Gary Neville is an English footballer. He was born on February 18, 1975. He plays for Manchester United. He has played for the club for his whole career, and is captain of the club. He has also played for the England national football team.

Michael Carrick
sports
Michael Carrick is an English footballer. He was born on July 28, 1981. He plays for Manchester United.

Phil Neville
sports
Phil Neville is an English footballer. He was born on January 21, 1977. He plays for Everton.

Paul Scholes
sports
Paul Scholes (born 16 November, 1974) is an English footballer. He was born on November 16, 1974. He plays for Manchester United. He also played 66 games for England, scoring 14 goals. He retired from playing for England in 2004.

Ashley Cole
sports
Ashley Cole is an English footballer. He was born on December 20, 1980. He plays for Chelsea.

Jamie Carragher
sports
Jamie Carragher is an English footballer. He was born on January 28, 1978. He plays for Liverpool.

Ledley King
sports
Ledley King is an English footballer. He was born on October 12, 1980. He plays for Tottenham Hotspur.

Robbie Keane
sports
Robbie Keane (born 8 July, 1980) is a Irish football player. He plays for Liverpool and Republic of Ireland national team.

Takayuki Morimoto
sports
Takayuki Morimoto (born 7 May, 1988) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Catania.

Pablo Aimar
sports
Pablo Aimar (born 3 November, 1979) is an Argentine football player. He plays for Benfica and Argentina national team.

Toninho Cerezo
sports
Toninho Cerezo (born 21 April, 1955) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Iván de la Peña
sports
Iván de la Peña (born 6 May, 1976) is a Spanish football player. He plays for Espanyol.

Jorge Valdano
sports
Jorge Valdano (born 4 October, 1955) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team.

Kazushi Kimura
sports
Kazushi Kimura (born 19 July, 1958) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Yokohama Marinos and Japan national team.

Takeshi Okada
sports
Takeshi Okada (born 25 August, 1956) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Furukawa Electric and Japan national team.

Diego Simeone
sports
Diego Simeone (born 28 April, 1970) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team.

Tsuyoshi Kitazawa
sports
Tsuyoshi Kitazawa (born 10 August, 1968) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Takeshi Mizuuchi
sports
Takeshi Mizuuchi (born 19 November, 1972) is a former Japanese football player.

Masahiro Fukuda
sports
Masahiro Fukuda (born 7 December, 1966) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Urawa Red Diamonds and Japan national team.

Raymond Kopa
sports
Raymond Kopa (born 13 October, 1931) is a former French football player. He has played for France national team.

Luis Suárez Miramontes
sports
Luis Suárez Miramontes (born 2 May, 1935) is a former Spanish football player. He has played for and Spain national team.

Omar Sívori
sports
Omar Sívori (born 2 October, 1935) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team and Italy national team.

Josef Masopust
sports
Josef Masopust (born 9 February, 1931) is a former football player. He has played for Czechoslovakia national team.

Denis Law
sports
Denis Law (born 24 February, 1940) is a former Scottish football player. He has played for Scotland national team.

Eusébio
sports
Eusébio (born 25 January, 1942) is a former football player. He has played for Portugal national team.

Flórián Albert
sports
Flórián Albert (born 15 September, 1941) is a former football player. He has played for Ferencvárosi and Hungary national team.

Gianni Rivera
politics
Gianni Rivera (born 18 August, 1943) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Guillermo Stábile
sports
Guillermo Stábile (born 17 January, 1905) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team.

Angelo Schiavio
sports
Angelo Schiavio (born 15 October, 1905) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Bologna and Italy national team.

Edmund Conen
sports
Edmund Conen (born 10 November, 1914) is a former German football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Leônidas da Silva
sports
Leônidas da Silva (born 6 September, 1913) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Ademir Marques de Menezes
sports
Ademir Marques de Menezes (born 8 November, 1922) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Sándor Kocsis
sports
Sándor Kocsis (born 21 August, 1929) is a former football player. He has played for Hungary national team.

Gareth Barry
sports
Gareth Barry is an English footballer. He was born on February 23, 1981. He plays for Aston Villa.

Scott Carson
sports
Scott Carson is an English footballer. He was born on September 3, 1985. He plays for West Brom.

Gabriel Agbonlahor
sports
Gabriel Agbonlahor is an English footballer. He was born on October 13, 1986. He plays for Aston Villa.

Ashley Young
sports
Ashley Young is an English footballer. He was born on July 9, 1985. He plays for Aston Villa.

WTVT
media
WTVT is a Fox-affiliated television station in Tampa, Florida. The station was aired on April 1, 1955. The station is owned and operated by Fox.

Just Fontaine
sports
Just Fontaine (born 18 August, 1933) is a former French football player. He has played for France national team.

Didier Deschamps
sports
Didier Deschamps (born 15 October, 1968) is a former French football player. He has played for France national team.

Siniša Mihajlović
sports
Siniša Mihajlović (born 20 February, 1969) is a former football player. He has played for Yugoslavia national team and Yugoslavia national team.

Daisuke Matsui
sports
Daisuke Matsui (born 11 May, 1981) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Saint-Étienne and Japan national team.

Kiyoshi Okuma
sports
Kiyoshi Okuma (born 21 June, 1964) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Tokyo Gas.

Allan Simonsen
sports
Allan Simonsen (born 15 December, 1952) is a former Danish football player. He has played for Denmark national team.

Garrincha
sports
Garrincha (born 28 October, 1933) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Vavá
sports
Vavá (born 12 November, 1934) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Leonel Sánchez
sports
Leonel Sánchez (born 25 April, 1936) is a former football player. He has played for Chile national team.

Dražan Jerković
sports
Dražan Jerković (born 6 August, 1936) is a former football player. He has played for Dinamo Zagreb and Yugoslavia national team.

Valentin Kozmich Ivanov
sports
Valentin Kozmich Ivanov (born 19 November, 1934) is a former football player. He has played for Torpedo Moscow and USSR national team.

Grzegorz Lato
politics
Grzegorz Lato (born 8 April, 1950) is a former Polish football player. He has played for Poland national team.

Mario Kempes
sports
Mario Kempes (born 15 July, 1954) is a former Argentine football player. He has played for Argentina national team.

Full Moon Party
politics
Full Moon Party.
"Full Moon Party" had begun the first time in 1985. This party make for give a farewell party for the tourist that stay overnight in Paradise Resort at "Pa-Ngan Island". This party is on the middle of the lunar month or full moon day of the year. This party is consisted of white beach, sea water, beautiful coral and the mountain that cast down in the beach and it surround around the area. It's the strange area, but it's very beautiful and wonderful place. When the time is almost night, the moon will full and reflex in the middle of the beach. It's very beautiful. The full moon shines around that area. It's the big impression of tourist.
First time, there are about 20-30 people came to the party. The all people that came to the party are the tourist that stay overnight in Paradise Resort. This party makes friend relationship. After the party, the tourist got many impressions from each other. So In every year on the middle of the lunar month or full moon day of the year, there will have the "Full Moon Party" for give a farewell party and thank for the tourist.
For now, the Full Moon Party is different from the past. In the past, there are just 20-30 people in the party, but now there are 20,000 – 30,000 people in the party which it's the big top 10 parties in the world...

Paolo Rossi
sports
Paolo Rossi (born 23 September, 1956) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Masakuni Yamamoto
sports
Masakuni Yamamoto (born 4 April, 1958) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Yamaha Motors and Japan national team.

Dino Baggio
sports
Dino Baggio (born 24 July, 1971) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Hong Myung-Bo
sports
Hong Myung-Bo (born 12 February, 1969) is a former South Korean football player. He has played for South Korea national team.

Giancarlo Antognoni
sports
Giancarlo Antognoni (born 1 April, 1954) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Seigo Narazaki
sports
Seigo Narazaki (born 15 April, 1976) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Nagoya Grampus Eight and Japan national team.

Christian Vieri
sports
Christian Vieri (born 12 July, 1973) is a Italian football player. He plays for Atalanta.

Careca
sports
Careca (born 5 October 1960) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Demetrio Albertini
sports
Demetrio Albertini (born 23 August, 1971) is a former Italian football player. He has played for Italy national team.

Philippe Troussier
sports
Philippe Troussier (born 21 March, 1955) is a French football manager.

Kunishige Kamamoto
sports
Kunishige Kamamoto (born 15 April, 1944) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Yanmar Diesel and Japan national team.

Frank Rijkaard
sports
Frank Rijkaard (born 30 September, 1962) is a former Dutch football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Diego Sinagra
sports
Diego Sinagra (born 20 September, 1986) is a Italian football player.

Masami Ihara
sports
Masami Ihara (born 18 September, 1967) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Noh Jung-Yoon
sports
Noh Jung-Yoon (born 28 March, 1971) is a former South Korean football player. He has played for South Korea national team.

Guido Buchwald
sports
Guido Buchwald (born 24 January, 1961) is a former German football player. He has played for Germany national team.

Edwin van der Sar
sports
Edwin van der Sar (born 29 October, 1970) is a Dutch football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Hiroaki Morishima
sports
Hiroaki Morishima (born 30 April, 1972) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Cerezo Osaka and Japan national team.

Albert Nađ
sports
Albert Nađ (born 29 October, 1974) is a football player. He plays for Čukaričk.

Hajime Moriyasu
sports
Hajime Moriyasu (born 23 August, 1968) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Rahman Rezaei
sports
Rahman Rezaei (born 20 February, 1975) is a football player. He has played for Iran national team.

Muhsin Musabah
sports
Muhsin Musabah (born 1 October, 1964) is a former football player. He has played for UAE national team.

Juan Sebastián Verón
sports
Juan Sebastián Verón (born 9 March, 1975) is an Argentine football player. He plays for Estudiantes La Plata and Argentina national team.

Wagner Lopes
sports
Wagner Lopes (born 29 January, 1969) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Motohiro Yamaguchi
sports
Motohiro Yamaguchi (born 29 January, 1969) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Álvaro Recoba
sports
Álvaro Recoba (born 17 March, 1976) is a football player. He plays for Panionios.

Roberto Abbondanzieri
sports
Roberto Abbondanzieri (born 19 August, 1972) is an Argentine football player. He plays for Getafe and Argentina national team.

Park Ji-Sung
sports
Park Ji-Sung (born 25 February, 1981) is a South Korean football player. He plays for Manchester United and Korea Republic national team.

Yoshikazu Nagai
sports
Yoshikazu Nagai (born 16 April, 1952) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Furukawa Electric and Japan national team.

Tiësto
music
Tijs Michiel Verwest is a Dutch musician. He was born on January 17, 1969 in the Netherlands.

Yoshikatsu Kawaguchi
sports
Yoshikatsu Kawaguchi (born 15 August, 1975) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Júbilo Iwata and Japan national team.

Francesco Totti
sports
Francesco Totti (born 27 September, 1976) is an Italian football player. He plays for Roma.

Celestine Babayaro
sports
Celestine Babayaro (born 29 August, 1978) is a football player. He has played for Nigeria national team.

Takashi Fukunishi
sports
Takashi Fukunishi (born 1 September, 1976) is a Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Tetsuo Nakanishi
sports
Tetsuo Nakanishi (born 8 September, 1969) is a former Japanese football player.

Sunday Oliseh
sports
Sunday Oliseh (born 14 September, 19) is a former football player. He has played for Nigeria national team.

Karel Poborský
sports
Karel Poborský (born 30 March, 1972) is a former football player. He has played for Czech Republic national team.

Shoji Jo
sports
Shoji Jo (born 17 June, 1975) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Julius Aghahowa
sports
Julius Aghahowa (born 12 February, 1982) is a football player. He plays for Kayserispor.

Takumi Horiike
sports
Takumi Horiike (born 6 September, 1965) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Michel Miyazawa
sports
Michel Miyazawa (born 14 July, 1963) is a former Japanese football player.

Ion Ivanovici
music
Ion Ivanovici (alternatively, Iosif Ivanovici, Josef Ivanovici, baptised as Jovan Ivanović) (born 1845 in Timişoara, died September 28, 1902 in Bucharest) was a Romanian military band leader and composer.
Today Ivanovici is especially remembered for his waltz "The Waves of the Danube", Donauwellen in German, in his lifetime he composed over 350 dances, and his works were published by over sixty publishing houses throughout the world. In 1889, Ivanovici won the much-desired march prize to mark the World Exhibition in Paris, out of 116 entries.
Ivanovici's Dabube Waves was first published in the U.S. in 1896, and republished in 1903, by the Theodore Lohr Company in an arrangement for piano by Simon Adler. The published version was called "Waves of the Danube". The composition is most commonly known as "Danube Waves Waltz".

Wayne Bridge
sports
Wayne Bridge is an English footballer. He was born on August 5, 1980. He plays for Manchester City.

Shaun Wright-Phillips
sports
Shaun Wright-Phillips is an English footballer. He was born on October 25, 1981. He plays for Manchester City.

Darren Bent
sports
Darren Bent is an English footballer. He was born on February 6, 1984. He plays for Tottenham Hotspur.

Stewart Downing
sports
Stewart Downing is an English footballer. He was born on July 22, 1984. He plays for Middlesbrough.

Matthew Upson
sports
Matthew Upson is an English footballer. He was born on April 18, 1979. He plays for West Ham.

Micah Richards
sports
Micah Richards is an English footballer. He was born on June 24, 1988. He plays for Manchester City.

Scott Parker
sports
Scott Parker is an English footballer. He was born on October 13, 1980. He plays for West Ham.

Curtis Davies
sports
Curtis Davies is an English footballer. He was born on March 15, 1985. He plays for Aston Villa.

Jimmy Bullard
sports
Jimmy Bullard is an English footballer. He was born on October 23, 1978. He plays for Fulham.

Eugène Joseph Delporte
science
Eugène Joseph Delporte (January 10, 1882–October 19, 1955) was a Belgian astronomer. He is known for discovering 66 asteroids.
Findings.
Some of his notable discoveries are 1221 Amor (whose name was later used for the Amor asteroids) and the Apollo asteroid, 2101 Adonis. Delporte discovered some comets as well, including periodic comet, du Toit-Neujmin-Delporte. He worked in the Observatoire Royal de Belgique (Belgian Royal Observatory), located in the town of Uccle (which was used to name 1276 Ucclia).
The crater Delporte on the Moon is named after Eugène Delporte.

John de Menteith
politics
Sir John de Menteith (c. 1275 - c. 1323) was a Scottish nobleman.
On August 3rd, 1305, William Wallace was captured at Robroyston, near Glasgow. His captor, Sir John Menteith, the ‘false’ Menteith, has gone down in Scottish legend as the betrayer of Wallace, but he acted as many others would have. Menteith was no English lackey, and in 1320 he put his seal to the Declaration of Arbroath.

Ken Naganuma
sports
Ken Naganuma (born 5 September, 1930) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Furukawa Electric and Japan national team.

Masaaki Yanagishita
sports
Masaaki Yanagishita (born 1 January, 1960) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Yamaha Motors.

Koichi Hashiratani
sports
Koichi Hashiratani (born 1 March, 1961) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Yasutaro Matsuki
sports
Yasutaro Matsuki (born 28 November, 1957) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Yomiuri and Japan national team.

Tetsuji Hashiratani
sports
Tetsuji Hashiratani (born 15 July, 1964) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Tijani Babangida
sports
Tijani Babangida (born 25 September, 1973) is a former football player. He has played for Nigeria national team.

Yasuharu Sorimachi
sports
Yasuharu Sorimachi (born 8 March, 1964) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Takayuki Suzuki
sports
Takayuki Suzuki (born 5 June, 1976) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Portland Timbers.

Bismarck Barreto Faria
sports
Bismarck Barreto Faria (born 17 September, 1969) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Robert Green
sports
Robert Green is an English footballer. He was born on January 18, 1980. He plays for West Ham.

Ion Antonescu
politics
Ion Victor Antonescu (June 15, 1882, Piteşti – June 1, 1946 was the prime minister of Romania from September 4, 1940 to August 23, 1944.

Hiroki Ito
sports
Hiroki Ito (born 27 July, 1978) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Kawasaki Frontale.

Noritada Saneyoshi
sports
Noritada Saneyoshi (born 19 October, 1972) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Gamba Osaka.

Hitoshi Sogahata
sports
Hitoshi Sogahata (born 2 August, 1979) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Kashima Antlers.

Justice Christopher
sports
Justice Christopher (born 24 December, 1981) is a former football player. He has played for Nigeria national team.

Haruna Babangida
sports
Haruna Babangida (born 1 October, 1982) is a football player. He plays for Apollon Limassol.

Guus Hiddink
sports
Guus Hiddink (born 8 November, 1946) is a former Dutch football player.

Hiromi Hara
sports
Hiromi Hara (born 19 October, 1958) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Mitsubishi Motors and Japan national team.

Naohiro Ishikawa
sports
Naohiro Ishikawa (born 12 May, 1981) is a former Japanese football player. He plays for Tokyo.

Yukihiko Sato
sports
Yukihiko Sato (born 11 May, 1976) is a Japanese football player.

Eisuke Nakanishi
sports
Eisuke Nakanishi (born 23 June, 1973) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Yutaro Abe
sports
Yutaro Abe (born 5 October, 1984) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Gainare Tottori.

Tatsuya Enomoto
sports
Tatsuya Enomoto (born 16 March, 1979) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Vissel Kobe.

Daisuke Nasu
sports
Daisuke Nasu (born 10 October, 1981) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Júbilo Iwata.

Joe Hart
sports
Joe Hart is an English footballer. He was born on April 19, 1987. He plays for Manchester City.

Jonathan Woodgate
sports
Jonathan Woodgate is an English footballer. He was born on January 22, 1980. He plays for Tottenham Hotspur.

Jermaine Jenas
sports
Jermaine Jenas is an English footballer. He was born on February 18, 1983. He plays for Tottenham Hotspur.

Tom Huddlestone
sports
Tom Huddlestone is an English footballer. He was born on December 28, 1986. He plays for Tottenham Hotspur.

Ion Iliescu
politics
Ion Iliescu (born March 3, 1930) is a Romanian politician. He joined the Communist Party in 1953, and became a member of the Central Committee in 1965, serving in various positions until Nicolae Ceauşescu was overthrown in 1989. Iliescu was the elected President of Romania for eleven years (three terms), from 1990 to 1992, 1992 to 1996, and 2000 to 2004.

Traian Băsescu
politics
Traian Băsescu (born November 4, 1951) is a Romanian politician and former Merchant Navy officer. He is the current President of Romania, inaugurated on December 20, 2004. He won the office in the 2004 presidential election. Prior to becoming President, he was the Mayor of Bucharest from June 2000 until December 2004.

Silent Alarm
music
"Silent Alarm" is an album by Bloc Party. It was released on the 14th February 2005 in the UK and in the USA, it was released on the 22nd of March.
Track Listing.
The albums tracks were written by lead singer Kele Okereke and guitarist Russell Lissack. The album was produced by Paul Epworth who also produced "A Certain Trigger" by Maximo Park and "Made Of Bricks" by Kate Nash.

CBeebies
media
CBeebies is a children's television channel suitable for children that are 6 years old or younger. It was launched on the 11 February 2002 by the BBC. It broadcasts from 06:00 to 19:00 on freeview channel 71. The sister channel is CBBC for older children.
Get Set Go.
"Get Set Go" is the first block of the day that starts at 06:00 and ends at 09:00. It is presented by Andy Day, but on weekends Sidney Sloane co-presents it with Andy.
Discover & Do.
"Get Set Go" is followed by "Discover & Do" which is broadcasted at 09:00 and ends at 12:00 noon. It is presented by Chris Jarvis and Pui Fan Lee."Discover and do is repeated at 12:00 til 15:00
Big Fun Time.
"Discover & Do" is followed by "Big Fun Time" which begins at 15:00 and finishes at 18:00. It is hosted by Sidney Sloane, but on weekends is co-presented by Andy Day.
Bedtime hour.
"Bedtime hour" follows Big Fun Time. It's broadcasted from 18:00 to 19:00 and includes programmes such as: The Fimbles, Step Inside, The Story Makers and The Roly Mo Show. Also shown is In The Night Garden and Jackanory.
This section of CBeebies starts with the song called ("Goodbye Sun, Hello Moon") at the end of the section Chris Jarvis sings a lullaby called ("The Time Has Come to Say Goodnight"). After the song, the station closes down for the night.
Presenters.
Liz Victor
Aneta Piotrowska (Cbeebies Poland)
Previous Presenters.
Eva Alexander (February to October 2006)
Awards.
Children's Channel of the Year (25 November 2007 BAFTA)
Best Music Original Score (29 November 2007)

Isah Eliakwu
sports
Isah Eliakwu (born 25 October, 1985) is a football player. He plays for Triestina.

Teruyuki Moniwa
sports
Teruyuki Moniwa (born 8 September, 1981) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Tokyo.

Kenta Hasegawa
sports
Kenta Hasegawa (born 25 September, 1965) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Alcindo Sartori
sports
Alcindo Sartori (born 21 October, 1967) is a former Brazilian football player.

Masayuki Okano
sports
Masayuki Okano (born 25 July, 1972) is a Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Mohamed Al-Deayea
sports
Mohamed Al-Deayea (born 2 August, 1972) is a football player. He plays for Al-Hilal.

Masaaki Sawanobori
sports
Masaaki Sawanobori (born 12 January, 1970) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Shimizu S-Pulse and Japan national team.

Christian Obodo
sports
Christian Obodo (born 11 May, 1984) is a football player. He plays for Udinese and Nigeria national team.

Willem Einthoven
science
Willem Einthoven (May 21, 1860 - September 29, 1927) was an Dutch doctor. He won the 1924 Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine, for inventing the electrocardiogram

Stephen Makinwa
sports
Stephen Makinwa (born 26 July, 1983) is a football player. He plays for Lazio and Nigeria national team.

Obafemi Martins
sports
Obafemi Martins (born 28 October, 1984) is a football player. He plays for Newcastle United and Nigeria national team.

Sho Naruoka
sports
Sho Naruoka (born 31 May, 1984) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Júbilo Iwata.

Cha Bum-Kun
sports
Cha Bum-Kun (born 22 May, 1953) is a former football player. He has played for Korea Republic national team.

A Weekend in the City
music
"A Weekend in the City" is the second studio album by Bloc Party. It was released on 5 February 2007. The album was produced by Jacknife Lee. The album cover is "A Project" by Rut Blees Luxemburg. This album deals more with original day working life than was on "Silent Alarm". The album has themes from the 7 July 2005 London bombings, immigration, drug abuse, and criticism of youth and casual sex. The album has gotten many high reviews by web-critics and fans.
The album came in at #56 in the United Kingdom end of year album chart. It sold about 266,500 copies in 2007. Over 1 million copies of the album have been sold worldwide.

Kevin-Prince Boateng
sports
Kevin-Prince Boateng, also known as "The Ghetto Kid", is a professional football player who was born on March 6, 1987 in Berlin, Germany. He has two brothers George and Jérôme, who are also both professional football players. This German-Ghanaian central midfielder married his long-time girlfriend Jennifer in 2007.
Internation.
Kevin-Prince Boateng has made several appearances for the German Under-16, Under-19 and Under-21 teams. On July 20, 2005, he scored a spectacular goal in a Union of European Football Associations (UEFA) European Under-19 Football Championship game against Greece in his side’s 3-0 victory. This goal was voted as the Goal of the Month by viewers of a popular German TV sports show. That year, he won Fritz Walter Bronze Medal as well as the Best German Young Player of the Year title. On July 27, 2006, Kevin-Prince Boateng was adjudged as the Fritz Walter Gold medal winner and the 2006 Best Young Player in Germany by a jury consisting of the German Football Association (DFB), Youth Coaches and Members of the DFB Board. As of 2008, he has won a total of five international caps for the German U-21 side.
His Career.
In 1994, Kevin-Prince Boateng began his professional football career with the German side Reinickendorfer Füchse’s youth team. On July 1, 1994, he moved to Hertha Berlin’s youth outfit and was soon promoted to the Hertha Berlin II side. During his stint with this team that lasted for two seasons, he made a total of 29 appearances and scored 5 goals to his credit. In the following year, Kevin-Prince Boateng was selected for Hertha Berlin’s first team, and he made his debut for it in a Round 2 game of the 2005-06 Bundesliga season against Eintracht Frankfurt in which he came in as a second-half substitute. His impressive performance at this game earned Kevin-Prince Boateng his first full debut for this club in a 2-2 draw against Borussia Mönchengladbach in Round 14 of the Bundesliga season. During his two-year tenure at this club, he played 43 games, scoring 4 goals.
From Hertha to Tottenham.
On July 31, 2007, Kevin-Prince Boateng signed with the English Premier League side Tottenham Hotspur for a fee, reportedly worth £4.5million. His first start in the Premier League came on November 3, 2007 in a game against Middlesbrough F.C. As of 2008, he has made a total of 13 appearances for this side.
His role Models.
Kevin-Prince Boateng considers the Brazilian football greats Pelé and Rivaldo as his role models in his sporting career.

Norio Takahashi
sports
Norio Takahashi (born 15 March, 1971) is a former Japanese football player.

Hisato Satō
sports
Hisato Satō (born 12 March, 1982) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Sanfrecce Hiroshima and Japan national team.

Nobuyuki Zaizen
sports
Nobuyuki Zaizen (born 19 October, 1976) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Montedio Yamagata.

Ryuichi Kamiyama
sports
Ryuichi Kamiyama (born 10 November, 1984) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Avispa Fukuoka.

Ariel Ortega
sports
Ariel Ortega (born 4 March, 1974) is an Argentine football player. He plays for Independiente Rivadavia.

Yoshiteru Yamashita
sports
Yoshiteru Yamashita (born 21 November, 1977) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Ryukyu.

Isao Homma
sports
Isao Homma (born 19 April, 1981) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Albirex Niigata.

Kim Byung-Ji
sports
Kim Byung-Ji (born 8 April, 1970) is a South Korean football player. He plays for Gyeongnam.

Koji Yamase
sports
Koji Yamase (born 22 September, 1981) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Yokohama F. Marinos and Japan national team.

Bloc Party (EP)
music
"Bloc Party" is an EP of songs in Bloc Party's first two (UK) singles: "She's Hearing Voices" and "Banquet/Staying Fat". The EP was released on May 24, 2004 through-out Europe. It was Bloc Party's first V2 Records EP. This EP was released later in Japan in August, and then in the United States in September of the same year.

Helicopter (song)
music
"Helicopter" is a song by British band Bloc Party. It was written by all band members for their album, Silent Alarm. The song uses a punk rock-style, built up with many different parts, and the tempo is faster than other Bloc Party songs. The idea behind the song has been debated, with lead singer Kele Okereke disagreeing with rumours a few times.

Naoki Chiba
sports
Naoki Chiba (born 24 July, 1977) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Vegalta Sendai.

Daijiro Takakuwa
sports
Daijiro Takakuwa (born 10 August, 1973) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Tokushima Vortis.

Toshiya Ishii
sports
Toshiya Ishii (born 19 January, 1978) is a Japanese football player.

Yasushi Fukunaga
sports
Yasushi Fukunaga (born 6 March, 1973) is a former Japanese football player.

Teruo Iwamoto
sports
Teruo Iwamoto (born 2 May, 1972) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Satoshi Tsunami
sports
Satoshi Tsunami (born 14 August, 1961) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Ryuji Kawai
sports
Ryuji Kawai (born 14 July, 1978) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Yokohama F. Marinos.

Ryūji Bando
sports
Ryūji Bando (born 2 August, 1979) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Gamba Osaka and Japan national team.

Yasutoshi Miura
sports
Yasutoshi Miura (born 15 July, 1965) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Wim Jansen
sports
Wim Jansen (born 28 October, 1946) is a former Dutch football player. He has played for Netherlands national team.

Yuji Nakazawa
sports
Yuji Nakazawa (born 25 February, 1978) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Yokohama F. Marinos and Japan national team.

Cagliari Calcio
sports
Cagliari Calcio is a football club which plays in Italy.

Romana
politics
Romana, short for Romanadvoratrelundar, is a fictional character in the British science fiction television series "Doctor Who". She is a Time Lady from the planet Gallifrey, she was a companion of the Fourth Doctor.
Because she was a Time Lord, Romana was able to regenerate, having two on-screen incarnations with somewhat different personalities (called Romana I and Romana II by fans). Romana I was played by Mary Tamm from 1978 to 1979. When she became pregnant and chose not to return for another series, the part was recast. Romana II was played by Lalla Ward from 1979 to 1981.
Romana I.
The White Guardian assigns Romana to help the Doctor during his quest for the Key to Time. Romana first appears in "The Ribos Operation", and was intended as a contrast to her predecessor, the savage Leela. Romana is initially haughty and somewhat arrogant, looking down on the Doctor (whom she considers to be her academic inferior; she obtained a triple first at the Academy, while the Doctor passed with only 51 percent, on his second attempt) and responding to his initial resentment at her presence with icy put-downs. However, she soon gains an appreciation for the Doctor's experience and sense of adventure, and begins to respect him as a teacher.
Romana II.
The introduction of Romana's second incarnation in "Destiny of the Daleks", a script credited to Terry Nation, but with several changes by script editor Douglas Adams, treats the concept of regeneration humorously. At the beginning of the serial, Romana changes bodily forms several times, like she was trying on different outfits, before deciding to take the form of Princess Astra, who had been played by Lalla Ward in the final serial of Season 16, "The Armageddon Factor".
Romana II enjoys a more intimate relationship with the Doctor than her first incarnation, some fans have assumed that she had a romantic relationship with the Doctor. Although a relationship was never shown or intended by the writers. In many ways, she is the companion most like her Doctor - besides being of the same race and close to the same intelligence, she occasionally mimics his sense of style, wields her own sonic screwdriver and can occasionally get the better of him in moments of banter and more practical situations. As her practical experience develops, she also becomes more assured and capable in the situations she finds herself in.
Her final television appearance was in "Warriors' Gate", where, along with the robot dog K-9, she leaves to forge her own path in the parallel universe of E-space. She also appears briefly in the 20th Anniversary special "The Five Doctors" through the reuse of footage from the uncompleted story "Shada" because Tom Baker refused to come back.
After the departure of both Romana I and II, both versions of the character also appeared very briefly in flashback sequences during the Fourth Doctor's regeneration in "Logopolis" as well as the Fifth Doctor's mind-copy in "Resurrection of the Daleks".
She would also be mentioned in "Castrovalva" during the Fifth Doctor's post-regenerative confusion, as well as "Arc of Infinity", where the Fifth Doctor, in response to a reprimand from the High Council of Time Lords for "leaving her behind", retorts that she "chose to remain in E-Space".
In then new series the doctor says that all of the Time Lords apart from him were kille din the time war. Whether Romana was killed with the others, or is still alive in E-Space or elsewhere, has not been specifically established on screen.
Appearances in other media.
An article by Russell T Davies in the "Doctor Who Annual 2006" states that Romana was President of the Time Lords during the Time War against the Daleks (see below), which ended with Gallifrey being destroyed. As with all spin-off media and the new series, it is unknown if it is canon.
Novels.
In the licensed Virgin New Adventures novel "Blood Harvest" by Terrance Dicks, Romana II leaves E-Space and returns to Gallifrey with the help of the Seventh Doctor. In "Goth Opera" by Paul Cornell, from the complementary Missing Adventures series, she is given a seat on the High Council of Time Lords. In New Adventures' "Happy Endings", also by Cornell, it is revealed that Romana has become Lady President of Gallifrey. Romana's presidency is reflected in the later novels and in her appearances (voiced by Ward) in audio dramas from Big Finish Productions. Romana appears in independent charity novel Time's Champion, in the role of President of the Time Lords.
In the BBC Books Eighth Doctor Adventures novels, Romana undergoes a second regeneration, and her new incarnation (Romana III, whose appearance was modelled on silent movie actress Louise Brooks) is far less sympathetic and far more ruthless than the other two.
Audio plays.
Romana II appeared pseudonymously in a series of audio plays produced in the early 2000s by BBV. In this series, Lalla Ward played a character who appeared with K-9 in an unnamed parallel universe. This character is called the Mistress (which was what K-9 called Romana in the television series). Because of an unusual copyright situation in which BBV was able to license K-9 but not Romana or other "Doctor Who" elements, the Mistress is not explicitly called Romana. For similar reasons, the parallel universe (obviously intended to reflect Romana's exile in E-Space) is called a "pocket universe" in the series' packaging.
In Big Finish's regular line of "Doctor Who" audio stories, Ward joined the Sixth Doctor in "The Apocalypse Element", in which Romana is Lady President of Gallifrey. In "Zagreus", Romana II is forced to banish the Eighth Doctor from the universe as he has become a danger to it following his infection by the forces of "anti-time". Following on from this, she is featured in a number of audio plays with former Doctor companion Leela (played by Louise Jameson) under the umbrella title of "Gallifrey".
The series ends on a cliffhanger, with Gallifrey on the brink of economic and social collapse as well as in danger of being overrun by a Free Time virus, while most of the characters are trapped with no apparent means of escape.

Christine Anu
music
Christine Anu (born 15 March 1970) is an Australian pop singer and actress.
Discography.
Singles: Monkey & the Turtle, Come On, Island Home, Party
Singles: Sunshine on a Rainy Day, Jump To Love, 'Coz I'm Free

John Gould
science
John Gould (14 September, 1804 – 3 February, 1881) was an English ornithologist (bird scientist). The Gould League (a bird group) in Australia was named after him. His knowledge of the birds now called "Darwin's finches" was a turning point in the Charles Darwin's thinking about evolution by natural selection. They are are barely mentioned in Charles Darwin's book, "On the Origin of Species".

Gary Karr
music
Gary Karr (born 20 November 1941), is an American classical double bass virtuoso and teacher.
Life.
There were several double bass players in his family, but he did not meet them. He studied with several teachers. He went to the Juilliard School. In 1962 he became famous when he was a soloist in a nationally televised New York Philharmonic Young People's Concert, conducted by Leonard Bernstein. On that famous telecast, Karr performed "The Swan" from "Carnival of the Animals" by Camille Saint-Saëns.
Gary Karr has given performances in many parts of the world. He has published a number of books for learning to play the double bass. After 40 years as a concert artist he retired in 2001 to Victoria, British Columbia, where he lives with his dog Shin-Ju.
Foundations.
In 1967, Karr founded the International Society of Bassists (ISB), an organization which encourages the playing of the double bass all over the world. Every two years the ISB has a big international conference.
Olga Koussevitzky, widow of the conductor and double bass player Serge Koussevitzky (1874-1951) heard Karr play when he was young, and gave him the beautiful Amati double bass made in 1611 which her husband had played. Karr later gave this double bass to the ISB so that double bassists world-wide could play on it.
In 1984 the Karr Doublebass Foundation was established by Karr, which loans instruments to promising young double bassists to help them in their careers.

Tatsuya Ishikawa
sports
Tatsuya Ishikawa (born 25 December, 1979) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Montedio Yamagata.

Go Oiwa
sports
Go Oiwa (born 23 June, 1972) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Kashima Antlers.

Adrian Ilie
sports
Adrian Ilie (born 24 April, 1974) is a former football player. He has played for Romania national team.

Takafumi Ogura
sports
Takafumi Ogura (born 6 July, 1973) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Émerson Leão
sports
Émerson Leão (born 11 July, 1949) is a former Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team.

Nobuhiro Takeda
sports
Nobuhiro Takeda (born 10 May, 1967) is a former Japanese football player. He has played for Japan national team.

Eddie Thomson
sports
Eddie Thomson (born 25 February, 1947) is a former Scottish football player.

Tatsuya Masushima
sports
Tatsuya Masushima (born 22 April, 1985) is a Japanese football player. He plays for Kyoto Sanga.

Jozef Vengloš
sports
Jozef Vengloš (born 18 February, 1936) is a former football player. He has played for Slovan Bratislava.

Adriano Leite Ribeiro
sports
Adriano Leite Ribeiro (born 17 February, 1982) is a Brazilian football player. He plays for Internazionale Milano and Brazil national team.

Andrea Pirlo
sports
Andrea Pirlo (born 19 May, 1979) is an Italian football player. He plays for Milan and Italy national team.

